Hear, you come here. You're the Mayflower?
- Master's main, Coppin is my name.
- These passengers for the Mayflower?
- Aye.
- Any on board?
None on board.
- Rough are they, aren't they?
- Aye.
They want to pray this way, instead of this way.
And they do not kneel, they pray standing up.
They call religious freedom... and for that they're sailing away into a black sea of darkness.
Will you search that cargo or been... spending here time watching the waves as they descend to us?
- Will search the cargo.
- Ah?
- Here, you, what's your name?
- Samuel Fuller William Button.
John Carver, my wife.
Stephen Hopkins, my wife, my children, my bonds man.
William Bradford, my wife.
- And you?
- Mary Brewster.
Love Brewster, Roaster Brewster.
- Wife of William Brewster?
- Yes.
Where is your husband?
I came from Holland with the others on the Speedwell.
- And we had no words...
- Speak out.
Did your husband come with you on the Speedwell?
- I've not seen him these many months.
- Brewster is not been among us.
He fled from Holland months ago, he's believed to be dead.
And voyaging to the world alone?
By the goodness of my neighbor,
Mr. Bradford and my two sons...
Why are we been questioned?
We've all been clear for departure.
Except William Brewster, we want your leader.
The rest of you may go and good riddance to you.
Passenger for the Mayflower?
Gilbert Winslow, I've just down from London.
May I give you a word of advice?
This Brewster, this leader of the dissenters.
If you are wise, you'd force him to go with us.
It'll be easier to let them sink out there that to keep... him lock up in prison until he starves to death.
This man won't starve to death, he'll hang.
And there's 5 crowns reward for the fella who turns him in.
5 crowns, eh?
- What he looks like?
- Old man, white hair.
Well, we must do something about this.
This is the years of one round earth, when a young man... make up beyond the world's rim and live to see marvels.
If he can keep his feet dry and the ship from sinking.
Why are you going?
I'm going because I've nothing better to do.
I want to see for myself if there's really a new world or only the backside of the old one.
- Does it take money to go?
- If it did I shouldn't be here.
I'm an impoverish tutor. Not quiet a gentleman but not worst than the other.
No, there's not a drop of blue blood among my soul, scarcely a shilling.
- Who pays for the ship and the provisions?
- Investors.
A Mr. Weston, representing the Virginia Company.
It passes me how Mr. Watson and his investors expect to get their money back.
They'd do and the profit.
We going up a contract.
In exchange for the money will give our labor for...
5 days of every week for 7 years in the new world.
We'll harvest crops, trap birds, dry fish and the profits will be there.
And for the other 2 days of each week we should be permitted to work for ourselves.
Please all passengers...
It's a rich country, 2 days a week is enough if you expect to find gold in your dori art.
Seems we going aboard, we sail tomorrow.
They're only waiting to hire 2 more sailors and a carpenter.
- Good day to you, carpenter.
- Good luck.
Track for it.
In halt.
- Cargo loading is moving Mr. Coppin?
- Hi Captain, but we be loaded dip.
Fools, taken their wives and children with them, keep them out of my way.
Get up board.
Gentleman from London is been asking for you.
- Where?
- Yonder, the one in brown velvet.
Sailing in the morning?
- You came to say me goodbye?
- Later.
- Mr. Weston?
- Captain Jones, won't you sit dowm?
So we meet at last Captain Jones.
Our correspondence has been must satisfactory but... as I wrote you, I have a small matter
I wish to discuss with you in person.
Not so small bring you from London to Southampton.
In confidence Captain.
What is your opinion of your passengers?
You're paying me to transport them Mr. Weston.
They are ravel, a ravel poppers...
Running this obnoxious of wealth and adventures because... they believe the tall tales they've heard from the new world.
And others running from the Church of England.
Because they got some new notions to how to say their prayers.
But there's one thing to be said for them, they'll made good settlers.
Because they'd nothing to comeback to.
They sold their home and spent the last shelling in equipments for the new world.
As for the religious dissenters... they're very earnest and determined to see it through.
And when you have a small group like that Captain... they're likely to infect the rest with their zeal.
So they can say their prayers standings on their heads or their minds too.
If the bottom near settlement, here.
Oh, I don't understand, you must be mistaken.
Your company, the Virginia Company, owns a track here, in this region.
That's south of the 41st parallel.
That's were the settlers will be landed?
Do you know this other track?
The cape Patrogen.
Oh, that's of another company, New England Company.
Captain Jones, you take your passengers to New England.
But that's hundreds of miles north of the bridging agreed upon, by all parties.
100 pounds and another 100 when you return.
The passengers are not to know their destination is been changed.
Naturally, there'll be nothing in writing between us.
And if ever in the future you speak of it, I'll call you a liar to your face.
That's by all means, have a gentlemen agreement.
Troubles you Captain?
- Do you care where this people land?
- I don't care if they land in hell.
No, that isn't it, but there's another man who have to know about this.
My mate, Coppin.
He's a good navigator.
We sail above the 41st parallel, he's bound to know it.
- Coppin will have to be told.
- I see. Yes, he'll have to be paid.
- I'll see...
- Is Captain Jones here?
You're Captain Jones of the Mayflower sir? I am a carpenter.
I'm a good carpenter sir, I've worked on the buildings of ships and I built houses.
I'm a barreler too, a train cooper and I can read and write a letter.
And I'm an orphan and not married.
How interesting.
I've never been to sea sir, but I, I'm a carpenter.
You're a carpenter, you also had a drink too many.
Oh, not today sir.
Then what in the name of bladder and bills you talking about?
I am told your hiring a carpenter.
Not I, I have a full crew, I had the same ship's carpenter for 5 years.
It's not a ship's carpenter they need.
It's the passengers they're still short
3 men, they're putting them on today.
They'll pay a man to attend to their barrels and... cast from the voyage and help them build houses in the new world.
Sign on for one year, then return or stay if you will.
See Mr. Martin at the Old Inn, he'd give you a paper to sign.
Thank you sir, thank you sir Captain.
- Get on with you.
- I'll put in a word for you with Mr. Martin.
- What's your name?
- John sir John Alden.
We lucky we shipping on the Mayflower.
This other one, the Speedwell, is a tub of bones and she's rigged all wrong.
But she's our consort vessel, she's sailing with us.
Aye, she's over spot, a ballast won't take her, she'll be giving trouble.
But the settlers are keeping with them for a year in the new world.
- How many passengers she's carrying?
- About 30 I think.
Captain Jones of the Mayflower never carried no passengers before.
- Oh, he hates them.
- He's a blizzard, that man.
Aye, his odd master.
But a good sailor, you'll ride easier on this ship.
You there.
You, passengers were told to stay in the waste deck.
Oh, I'm not a passenger, I'm not a sailor.
I am a carpenter, I was hired...
You were hire by that company of ride pickers, not by the ship.
I wish yourself off the captain's deck or I'll help you.
Why?
Be right there.
Next time I'll leave him over the side.
Below.
Where am I suppose to put my gears?
Passengers look upon me as one of the crew and the crew thinks I'm one of the passenger.
Oh poor laddy and that's makes real off and shy, don't you?
Get below.
I hired you to look out of this price... shoot the the rats and the passengers keep out of them, now get below.
Yes sir.
Human cargo this perch.
They come from home, many of them, where they slept... in their own soft beds in their own clean rooms.
What is it drives such men to adventures of this sort?
The police.
No, no alone that.
No that alone.
Here, here's my captain, It's not precisely luxurious but you welcome to half of it.
I'll see what comfort there is below.
John, this my elegant brother, Edward Winslow.
This is John John...
We are off to a meeting in the deck of box.
Still you get with mine until you find your own corner.
Who is she>
The daughter of
William Mullins, Priscilla Mullins.
The only female aboard unmarried over the age of 10 good to look at.
Christ-men cross, I thought it were rats.
I've been sleeping I believe.
Good day to you young man.
Your pardon sir, I thought to make me my bed here, but if your...
Take no notice of me my lad, I shan't stay here now.
I've been having a nap, away from noisy children on the like.
Children are a blessing, but they ram and yam an so.
- Who are you young man?
- I'm the settlers carpenter's.
I came here for a quiet hour with the good book.,
- Great comfort in Scriptures.
- But that's not Scripture.
The People's Plead for a Free Church.
- How now? A carpenter that can read?
- It's a forbidden book, isn't it?
You're a well informed carpenter.
I never saw the book before this minute but I'm better inform now.
I see.
I'm a loyal subject of the king and guard fearing member of the church of England...
Mr. Brewster.
I'm going above now for the rest of my gear.
How do you know I'm not going to turn you in for the 5 crowns?
- Cause we're on the same pilgrimage each.
- I'm in no pilgrimage.
Every man on the ship is on a pilgrimage.
To a spacious land where a man can set up a... trade without pulling down 2 of his neighbors.
And need no pack his means from other's throat.
Such a man can not be tempted by 5 crowns to betray a fellow pilgrim.
- The settlers are all above in a meeting.
- I'm not a settler, I'm a hired man.
So am I, hired as a soldier to teach them the use of firearms.
- John Alden.
- Myles Standish.
That don't last, set it to.
- My wife Rose.
- Delighted.
Her last works seems to be tacking me, dosing me...
- minding me.
- Let's look at the meeting? Yes.
Aye.
As it was signed... all profits and benefits that are got by trade, traffic, trucking, working, fishing... or any other means of any person or persons... to remain still the common stock until the division, furthermore... if the agreement went off, we do by this presence solemnly and mutually hear by our fix our seals.
And so forth and forth.
Each man must sign.
These are not the terms we agreed upon our discussions.
Agree or not agree, this is what you to sign.
I for one, one sign.
And before you sign friends, reflect carefully on what you sign.
Mr. Weston is waited until the 11 hour to present this agreement in writing.
And now, it does not contain the terms that he promised us.
He promised us that the homes we built... and the vegetables crops will be ours from the beginning.
And only the profits from our labor will be divided by his company.
But this paper says we're to work not 5 but 7 days a week.
And everything produced, bought, grow or made in the new world... our homes and the tables and chairs we made for them are to belong to the company.
This means that after 7 years Mr. Weston's... company can lawfully seize every stick and stone we're able to produce.
You'll sign it, you'll sign it or I'll wash my Hans of the whole affair.
But we can not sign our lives away, you're making puns way of the sort.
Do as you please, you'll get no more from me, this is my last one.
You'll stand on your own feet now, we all be.
You can now you'll be sail Captain Jones.
Close the door.
He's left it in out hands.
Now, I think I begin to see what he's doing.
He's going clean-up of his head, that's what his doing.
The money is already been spent for charter and supplies.
His company's money, now he tosses all away.
Mr. Weston suddenly makes the terms too difficult for the settlers to accept.
In the name of the company he represents... he forces a quarrel and then he tears up the tie with it.
Now there is no contract and no obligation on either side.
But why?
So it would be easier for me to land them in the wrong place.
These are honest fools.
With a contract they might insist upon been taken where they agreed to land.
But now they have no contract.
But he works for the Virginia
Company, they pay his wages.
It's a neat sham, and it's likely to make him rich.
Oh, I don't understand.
Get... another cup please Coppin.
The new New England Company...
The New England Company has never been able to gather enough settlers... together to make a permanent colony on Cape Cod.
I've heard that the New
England Company is bankrupt, now... without notifying his employers, as to his activities...
Mr. Weston will privately and secretly... buy a, a bankrupt New
England Company for small penny.
When he will work his back to London, at either through accident or error... the settlers has landed on their land.
Now, with good settlers, the
New England Company will prosper.
And Mr. Weston become rich, all at the expense... of his former employer, the Virginia Company.
A deep bay infilsh.
Hey, he hasn't paid us enough.
No, we'll see to that when we return.
- Mr. Coppin.
- Aye, aye sir.
Gentlemen gentlemen.
We have no further time to argue back and forth.
I'm ought we sail, without Mr. Weston's lead.
But is the Captain willing to sail?
I have no other to the contrary, I sail on the morning tide.
Fools.
Take ready to sail in the morning, I'm going ashore.
Aye sir.
♪ I see the one-eye, they have one on the sea. ♪
- ♪ I have one the shore. ♪
- ♪ Sea and watcher. ♪
- Careful, old sailor.
- Here we go lady.
Give a hand old lad.
- Farewell Maggie.
- Good luck sailor.
Now I'm unsteady, I'm full of these culprits.
Oh now, there is a pretty girl.
Well, is the very same, the very same, the one with the sad, beautiful eyes.
- Let me go.
- Why, there's nothing to fear us.
- Let me go I beg you, let me go.
- Why, she's blossom, all a quiver.
Flesh and kindle.
Hey, I'll make you my camera man and we'll have a nice couple of brandy, you and I.
We'll punch a few fires.
Oh, a skittish maid and as pretty as any that stroll the land.
Married to that dove face Psalm singer who doesn't know the right...
- kind of hymns to sing our way to...
- Please Captain, you will let me go?
Oh, you have to pretend your old fight, fight. I...
Hymns and prayers are all you ever know.
- That's all you ever...
- Let me go.
Let me go, I beg you sir, let me go.
- Mister Clark?
- Aye.
- Mister Coppin.
- Aye.
- Mister Duff?
- Aye.
- Say pry your sail.
- Very Weill, sailors...
Passengers below.
Clear that deck, stay below, your fill is bock for sailing.
Sailor, place the advance sail.
Anchor is up for now.
Anchor is away.
Set topsail.
Set quarter main.
- Rudder starboard.
- Starboard sir.
That's good, alright.
- Ease the helm.
- Easing the helm.
Ready to go.
August the 06, this is our first night at sea.
I'm going acquaintance with my fellow passengers.
It is possible to distinguish the religious dissenters... to the ones who are going for trade or adventure.
Perhaps it is the preeminence and... neatness of the dissenters which they have made part of their religion.
They've invented a saying, cleanliness is next to godnidessim.
There someone tiresome about it.
The others are a varied lot, farmers, weavers, tailors, coppers.
Some are tradesman with the wisdom to see ahead the opportunities of the new world.
In addition to the children of the settlers there are the street waifs.
Homeless orphans, cast aboard by royal major of the populated London.
The master of the Mayflower Captain
Jones, had shown in many small matters... an attitude of unfriendliness toward the passengers.
He sees insult in every clanks and accusations in every innocent word.
Well, master William
Button, you should be below and sleep.
I'm going to be the first to see land, keep me up little while, then I be the first one.
It'll be like the Garden of Eden and I'm going to be the first to see it.
As for me... and the way the wind is blowing I should probably be the first... to be beaten by the snake that flocks in every Eden.
- You well?
- Had to see daylight.
Mary is been warned, your name is John Williamson.
- She's been told to...
- Good morning.
Good morning Mr. Williamson.
Fine weather, eh? I hope it holds.
Mistress Brewster...
This is John Williamson, whom you may of heard.
Mr. Williamson.
- How much did he hear?
- I don't know, he's no fool that captain.
August the 15.
We've been in sea for 10 days, our consort,
The Speedwell has caused several delays.
Putting back, trimming and mending.
She's now once more beginning to laid behind.
- She's signaling sir.
- Answer he too.
Confound slack package, she's given nothing but trouble since we started.
- Ahoy Speedwell.
- Ahoy.
Captain Reynolds report.
- We are leaking for an aft.
- Can it be mended?
- Not at sea.
- Can you stay above with pumping?
Aye, but I don't know how long.
- Mister Coppin...
- Aye sir.
Break out the long boat.
Greenhorn are on no form for my aft, I'm going over.
Will you tell me the nature of the trouble Captain Jones?
I'll report it to the passengers so that they may decide.
I tell you the nature of the problem, you report it to the passengers and they decide?
In the first place I don't know the nature of the trouble.
In the second place, what I do know is
I'll tell the passengers and I'll decide.
I've inspected the damage and she's leaking like a sieve.
There's only one thing for you to do and that's turn back once more for England.
Hold, we're 100 lays from land's end.
Speedwell should found on the way home all her passengers would've to go down with her.
Because it happens to be room only for crew in her longboat.
I care no more what happens to those passengers than I care about what happens to you.
But if she sinks, I'll never be able to show my face in an English port.
There you have it, we're going back with her.
That's the nature of the trouble
Mr. Bradford and that is my decision.
We're once more back in
England, anchored off Plymouth.
Having lost many week since the Mayflower left London.
If we ever sail again and there's now some doubt of that... this delay will bring us into the season of storms.
- You asked to see us Captain Jones.
- I asked to see the leaders.
I take that you heard the news.
We heard that the Speedwell can't sail again. Not for several weeks.
- We don't understand these nautical matters.
- Nautical?
Captain Reynolds received the best part of his money in advance.
He was to remain with the Speedwell and stay with you in the New World for a year.
I never made such a bargain.
Perhaps if I had, I would've done the same thing he did.
- Then what did he do?
- He broke the Speedwell hull Mr. Bradford.
The Speedwell was over-spot, he knew that and yet he sail, there were too much canvas... so were the rigging too slack and now her...
It's a matter of stresses on the hull Mr. Bradford.
The tirses are wack, the seams are open, you've lost the Speedwell.
That much we've heard.
We discussed, all of this and we made our decision.
Oh, you considered it and you've made the decision?
This is our rightfully area of authority.
Area of authority?
On my ship I'm the authority.
- But Captain Jones...
- Mr. Bradford, did...
I think you'll agree we have no choice but to sail again and at once.
Will you permit us to transfer the passenger from the Speedwell to the ship?
18 passengers have chosen to remain in England after discouragements and the illness.
But the rest are willing to share their foods and their space.
You want the Mayflower to sail all alone, without a consort.
You understand the danger of this?
Afraid Captain Jones?
Now, let's us have one or two matters understood before we sail.
Sit down.
I can give you no more space aboard the ship than you're already provided with.
As far as food is concern, if you choose to starve, it's nothing I can do about that.
Starving at sea is no worse than starving at
England, you will have no ship of your own.
You will have no Speedwell standing by during those long months, housing your woman and children while you build shelters for them.
And no Speedwell to carry you back when you grow discourage and give up this adventure.
I intend to land you and leave you there.
And as for you the masquerade is over.
You know that as the captain of the ship I have the right... to turn you over to the constables of the king.
Well, I'm not going to turn you over.
- Thank you Captain Jones.
- Thank you.
Keep your thanks to yourselves.
There's so much mealy-mouthed kindness aboard the ship as sick as we have hear it.
I'll god my word to truth you.
You've nevertheless done me a kindness.
I've done myself a kindness,
I'm taking you along as a hostage.
- Hostage? Against what?
- Against trouble.
So be fore warn gentlemen.
If there is ever the slightest question raise by any decision I may make...
I'll put his old gentleman of yours in irons, take him back to England and watch him hang.
That is all.
Why do you hate us Captain Jones?
Why you so full of contempt for us?
Because you are hypocrites, you talk fine about a new, clean world.
What you're really dreaming up is getting rich.
For the gold you'll steal from the savages.
I grant you we may be common peasants and no better than any others.
But Heaven is chosen to create around us a situation to which we must rise.
Or die in ourselves, that's when men perform miracles Captain Jones.
Be a miracle if only of them is alive after this.
Evening Captain Jones.
I gather we're sailing in the morning tide?
We are this fog lifts.
The people from the Speedwell are aboard now, I don't know where we store them.
But we put together a new list of passengers.
- How many in all?
- 102. 50 men, 20 women and 52 children.
More women and children than men.
Sailing across an ocean into a winter wilderness with their women and children.
I'm carrying a cargo of mad men..
You can make a world only with men.
We are settlers Captain Jones, not explorers or conquerors.
You are fools, that's what you are and liars.
I can see through this clean new world talk.
It's possible Captain Jones that you see no further than the end of your nose.
- These are honest men.
- There are no honest men.
There those who try to be.
I've lived long enough in the world to know what men are made of.
There's the good of the world
Mr. Winslow, the good clean sea.
And my ship, my good ship.
I put faith in my ship and she's never failed me.
Don't put your faith in men and you never know disappointment.
Perhaps, but then I could never know friendship or love either.
Friendship? Love?
- Lead out Jake.
- She'll handle easy.
Fishing ma'am?
- Lord, she's got a whale.
- Let me give you a hand dear.
- Leave off, I'm helping the lady.
- Will you please go away?
Be laid there.
- You go away, is she told you to go away.
- I'm helping the lady.
- I'll help you over the side.
- I'm sorry ma'am.
- Both leave me alone, both of you.
- I saw her first.
Be laid, be laid there.
- Your father been seasick again?
- Is to wash me.
Oh mistress Mullins, you can't wash you with sea water.
- Superstitions.
- Seawater won't take soap.
It will crack your skin open and the winds will do the rest.
Can't be helped, we're not given enough water to wash our hands.
You will wait it rains again,
I take you plenty of nice soft water.
It never going to rain again, we've been 8 days without it.
We all smell like pigs.
Oh, I must remember staying down wind from you then.
You're not too bad, not like the sailors.
- Haven't you fill that bucket again?
- No.
But if you must wash I get you some water, come on.
Until we land I must see that every tonel and barrels they mustn't leak or go bad.
- That's beer.
- It's a important one.
Trading goods for the savages, knives and bracelets. Here is water.
That's oats and that's smoked beef over there.
And this is a printing press.
I may not know about your beer and your beef... smoked but I do know about this printing press.
It was brought from Holland, is the reason in a way for this whole voyage.
It was on this very press that Mr. Brewster... and the others printed those books that made us exile.
Now I show you where I live.
I found me a snot place.
Come on.
It's the rope locker.
It's so quiet here.
Aren't you ever afraid so far from the others?
It's nothing to be afraid of.
I've seen the sailors looking at you.
- And I don't like it.
- I don't like it either.
- But you're not different from the others.
- Oh, but I am, I am.
How you different?
Because you like me, that's the importance difference.
Let me carry it for you.
Oh no, no need, no.
Stay where you are. Father come looking.
Hey, that's not salt water.
Water from the see don't make a lather like that.
- You've been washing clothes, eh?
- Keep your hands of me.
To good for a sailor, eh? But not too good to use of his drinking water.
Now you come with me.
Is a lady who's had a bath with our drinking water.
Now we know how someone would kept their faces.
You forgot to knock when you came in Mr. Cobbin, get back to your watch.
Aye sir.
I could punish you for this.
I did to wash my face and my hands and little bit my neck.
And I washed the cap and collar.
All this cleaning and scrowing was learned in Holland... now a good Englishman doesn't mind a little dirt, sit down Mrs. Bradford.
You see, the passengers and crews have separate storage of food, but... water is common to the ship and if it's run dry we all go thirsty.
I promise not to us the drinking water again Captain Jones.
Of course, there's always a little water to be found for friends of the captain.
- May I go now?
- No not yet.
The laws of the sea requires I punish you for this...
I'm quite decided what the price of the water should be.
If you going toss me over the side and feed me to fishes... do it now and spare me this cat and mouse game.
When I start feeding the fishes Mrs.
Bradford there 1 or 2 others who'll go first.
What is wrong with you people?
Why can't you be civil and agreeable?
What's wrong with you sailors?
You give the women no peace.
My sailors are not use to see women strolling int he deck.
You mustn't be annoyed with them if the get out their hands the times.
Remember they're men.
Although I'm not to sure that you would know a man if you saw one, married as you are...
I'm not obliged to listen to this.
You're obliged to live in a 90 foot vessel with me.
And there are some things we charge inevitable lady.
- Inevitable?
- I can see it all, just like a south sail.
You've never been on a long voyage.
Weeks and weeks in closed quarters with nothing to do and very little to think about.
All with the liquid sea moving beneath you, setting you stern... telling you that you're alive.
I don't need to feel my blood to tell me I'm alive.
By the time this voyage ends, this ship will contain not 102 passengers and...
30 crew men, will contain
132 cats and dogs, 132 robbing peace..
Is the sea that does it, the closeness of all together.
You'll sea it.
So, you and I may just as well meet out choice early.
Best choosing the best.
It assure ourselves a very pleasant journey.
What a foul man you are.
Tom Tinker's boy is ill, you should visit them.
- Oh yes. I'll go.
- Not now, tomorrow will do.
I understand there some unpleasantness in a matter of water.
Where is the? Here.
We must try to understand the problems of the ship Dorothy.
The rules must be obey.
And I should try to keep out of the way of the sailors.
There was probably some justice in whatever occurred... but it may have been an embarrassment to you.
Don't wait for me, I may be late. I'm meeting with the others, we'll talk about rations...
September the 15.
Today Captain Miles
Standish is making his most... earnest effort to teach us the use of firearms.
But I suspect that we shall never be soldiers... for we grow clumsier and more baffled with each new command.
Now again and this time all of you do as I do, shoulder your musket.
Put in you muskets.
Arm your musket.
Recover your musket.
Fair your musket.
Go for the Scottish dirk.
Recover your Scottish dirk.
Return you Scottish dirk.
Halt, halt.
I laugh you barrel life laughing stake no just scotch long us.
But if you don't attend to me now, you'd wish you have when... savages and wild beast fall on you in the wilderness.
I shall now load the musket with gunpowder.
Observe me first and do nothing.
This is gunpowder.
Open your charge, charge your musket.
Put in your ball.
Go for your Scottish stick.
And ram your ball home.
Return your scouring stick.
Hoist your musket, mount your musket.
When you go arm, you will carry your fuse lightly.
It is apply to this cocking piece.
When you pull the trigger it is release... downing to the flash pan, the powder ignites... bangs through the shock-holds...
Explodes the powder in the barrel and the ball flies forward.
Carrying destruction.
Now, attend me carefully.
Prime your pan and shock-hold.
Guard, blow... and open the pan.
Go for your wick... and blow on the cold.
Straighten musket.
Present... give, fire.
I was a boatswain when Captain John
Davis, god bless him, were lost in his grace.
Have you been to the New World too?
Not in Virginia where we be heading, but to the fishing off of Cape Cod.
- Indeed you Se savages?
- That I did, we brought 3 home with us.
All smear with grease they was.
Naked that make you blush.
We tried to put decent cloths on one of them.
But they had a lead into a chicken feathers.
I'm going to be a king in the new world and
I'm going to be the first one to see land.
I swore I've never make this voyage again but here I am.
The last time weeks on weeks we plowed south by west.
And again and again heavy seas and headwinds drove us back.
All our spars were carried away.
- And dying men gathers without end.
- Spring us some more cheerful young sailor.
Tell us of the mighty rivers and warm sands. Palm trees.
If you think you'd be seen palm trees and warm sands... and leaving a live of ease, let me disavow you right now.
Why, it'll be a cold winter world, where fine words... will be useless and your saints will be a burden.
A world in which only men of brung and blood will survive.
A world in which each men will have to be strong enough... to care for the women they have drag like cattle into the wilderness.
At last the autumn voice of the Atlantic is come bellering out from the horizon.
The passengers remain huddle in the crowded tween-deck and all the hatches are close.
With the wind and the assault of the black water of the weather had grown suddenly cold.
As for the Eden I dreamed of, it seems it is not to be.
But they have found theirs.
He's appointed himself as her watchdog and guardian.
I know of no sure sign of love in a man.
Young William Button, who plans to be a... king in the new world has been taken with lung fever.
Backs down Mr.Coppin.
- Watch your helm, hold her steady you don't.
- Steady sir, steady.
- Flow up and sail Mr. Coppin.
- Aye, up sail. Up.
- Take him to spritsail.
- Aye, take him to spritsail.
Highly a aft.
- Stake away that.
- Stack away.
- Where we all? All fast, all fast.
- Holding fast sir.
Cooper, here,
Where are the broken spar?
You up there, bring a seal,
Young, Young...
Young, my son.
Young, Young, Young...
- My son, he's gone on deck again.
- Alright, alright, I'll fetch him for you.
Young, Young, Young...
- Mother, here I am.
- Bradford Bradford.
Go below.
Get below you blubber-head, get below.
Held a hand.
Yeap, blubber-head, now get below.
Fix the line.
Big fields coming, hold tight.
I can mend it sir, there's something down in the cargo hall that would do it.
- What do you got there?
- A printing press.
A printing press?
Leave...
Now.
Water on this hose.
Leave...
Now...
Go on.
With God's mercy, we had weather the great storm.
Till our deck are quarters are cold, airless and moldy with moisture.
Many passengers are bedded with the fevers and injuries of the storm.
Captain Jones, there's something I should like to say to you.
Thank you for saving my husband's life.
You know as well as I do if
I had my wisdom by then I let him drawn.
I'm not wiser and at least won the married.
I know that and so I must thank you.
Why you done it.
October the 2nd.
The days go by each like the other and it grows... difficult to believe we should ever see land again.
At times it seems that for weeks we've not moved at all.
For there's always the same horizon, the same cold pitiless circle.
A son was born today to the wife of Stephen
Hopkins, he was named Oceanus Hopkins.
October the 7th.
Firewood is growing very short... we have a fire every 3rd day and cook enough for 3 days and eat it cold thereafter,
October the 10th.
The scanty food, the airless quarters and the endless darn cold are taking their toll.
October the 14th.
We've almost forgotten what is like to be without the pains of hunger.
It is not difficult to understand why the children remains... sturdy while their mothers grow weak and thin.
Who's there?
It's Coppin stealing food.
- I've been spoiling for this.
- Will teach them.
- Dirty scum.
- Get a poor sailor, will you?
Coppin.
Go below.
Get below.
Back to your quarters.
October the 29th.
We sail on and on Southwest by
West moving slowly under short sail.
Captain Jones is been easing his ship... cautiously along since the breaking of the beam.
He does not dare to move faster yet there is desperate need for haste.
For our drinking water is very low and there is firewood enough for only 4 more days.
The sailors blame the settlers for the delay as they're... brought us into winter and short rations.
November the 4th.
Scurvy has began to show it's hideous symptoms among passengers and crew alike.
The seed of death has been planted.
In some hope is dying.
Our firewood is gone and the water will last only a few days.
November the 6th. The lamps in the Captain's cabin burn late.
He sleeps at odds hours and holds himself more and more apart, a lonely man.
You coming to thank me again Mrs. Bradford?
The time for lies is over,
I know how is for you, I know.
You came here half hoping to meet... me only to pass me on the deck and see the need in my face.
That's what good women like you feed of.
But the time for that is over too, we've missed the time for taking.
I have a feeling we're all doom Mrs. Bradford.
Your adventures and your saints and
Bradford with his frenzy religion and... you with your sense of duty that have you bleeding at the soul.
My scurvy ridden crew and the empty water tasks, last prove of food.
And my broken ship.
And my nights alone with this hunger for you that will not leave me.
Perhaps it will end soon in the dark sea and good riddance to us all.
You are not alone in this.
What make you think only you can feel?
Others had known the hunger you speak of and live to tell of it.
Yes, they never to tell of it.
And one thing more.
- I get to your secret.
- What secret?
That you have a heart, that there's goodness in you.
And that you die rather to admit it.
You say you know how it is for me.
Well my captain, I know how it is with you.
What you feel isn't anger and loading.
It's despair, despair because the dream is about to perish out of fulfillment.
Because this beauty is about to be lost.
Wednesday, November the 8th.
We've been at sea for 64 days since leaving
Plymouth and 96 since Southampton.
The weather has grow warmer and the sea gently during the past 2 days.
For these 2 days the captain has scarcely left his upper deck.
Fog has been heavy and there is no wind.
Encouraged by the warmer weather, a few passengers adventure above deck.
What have you there Sibby?
Look, Sibby found a bird, dead dead.
- A thrush is, I think.
- A land bird.
King Button.
See what we brought to you.
It's a land bird.
It means we'll soon be seeing the shores of Virginia.
Poor land bird.
It flew too far from home.
We therefore commit the body of our deceased brother William Button to the deep.
To return in the corruption looking... for the resurrection of the body when the sea shall give up her dead.
Ho, land, ho Land...
Land, ho...
- Far away,
- Too close, further right of bow.
- Starboard cap Mister Coppin.
- Free traces.
Looks most barren,
Miles of sand.
That's bit of sand is only Cape Cod... there's a good snug harbor in the other shore of the bay.
- Is Virginia over there in the bay?
- We no way near Virginia.
I've been here before with the fishing fleets.
This is New England, Cape Cod.
The captain will likely put in here for water and firewood.
And then sail south to the Virginia shore.
I've read the books of Captain
John Smith, he wrote much of New England.
If this is it, we're still hundreds of miles north of our destination.
They are coming.
They coming mister Clark, did you lock away their muskets?
Aye sir.
- Good morning gentlemen.
- Good morning Captain Jones.
Sit down. And mister Clark, pull up a chair for our visitors.
You asked to see me?
We noticed the long boats it's been on ship Captain Jones, that means you're... sending a party a shore for water and fuel, is that all?
Aye, that it does.
Is it possible that we may be off New England Captain Jones?
This country is ever be as good as Virginia.
That strip of land you see conceals a very good harbor.
Well, the sooner you get your shelters built, the better chance you have for survival.
Besides, I can't risk another hour of sailing in my ship in this condition.
Are you suggesting that we settle here?
No, I'm not suggesting anything, I'm telling you that this is where you going to settle.
But what with your contract with the Virginia Company.
This is not the territory of the merchant who paid our way.
No, that may well be, that may well be.
But you would do well to remember your lead... taken of Mr. Weston in Southampton, he's for you, he's cutted you a drift.
You're under no obligation to him nor I to you, I've done my duty.
I have delivered this cargo sons, seniors and babies and there is an end to it.
Explore the other harbor.
I'll stand by while you do it, in meantime I provisioned again my ship, then I go.
And this for you Mr. Brewster, I haven't quite decided what to do about you.
You remember the constable still wants you.
So, if there's any trouble about this matter where you land...
I'll leave here with you and maybe one or two others hanging from the order.
I don't know why you brought us to New England...
Captain Jones when you knew we were bound for Virginia.
Accident? You're too better navigator for that, but here we are.
And here we intend to stay.
We decided that before we enter this cabin.
We're staying not because you are threatening and... pulling us here for some reason of you own.
But because we wanted that way.
This region is better for us than Virginia.
Because is not so close beyond the domination of the king and church.
Here we will have even more freedom.
I'll go reasons don't concern you Captain Jones, I know that.
And what your reasons were, we may never learn.
But let me tell you that if we'd decided to land elsewhere... not all your gun and cut-asses would stop us.
And if you think you could take Mr. Brewster back to England with you, you're mistaken.
We are men well accustomed to fighting for our lives.
Think you don't know that.
But what we know of you, makes us pity you now.
For the comptentable weakness that greet us here with guns.
Call off your dogs.
You laugh too much Mr. Cobbin.
The company we've pledged to serve has no rights in this territory.
None and every man can take as much land as he pleases.
- We'll divide the food and the gunpowder.
- Aye, we'll take our chances on that.
We starved and frozen for weeks, we're free now.
I'll thrust my own strength back to get me my own part of living.
- Give each man...
- Hopkins Billington I beg you to hear me.
This would not do, some form of government is needed here.
- What sort of government? I need to rush...
- Wait Billington.
What is the deadliest danger we now face?
Hunger, wild beasts, savages?
No, the deadliest danger we must face is that we may disagree.
If we may each go groping in the wilderness by himself alone and so face quick destruction.
And you will.
It is possible here to revise old institutions and start a new system.
Of a perfection and excellency that still unknown to feed our infant society..
But until such government can be devised, we must agree to stand together.
Let's us therefore sign this Mayflower commit.
By which we all agree, irrespective of religion or former condition... to unite in one body politic... and to obey all laws, which will be necessary for all of us to make.
What say?
It is this or anarchy, and anarchy means disaster.
We are not alone in this room, god is in this room.
For whenever a man goes upward... he takes another step to also prove fulfillment of the god's head that lays within.
What say, you gentlemen?
- I say aye.
- Aye.
Governor John Carver.
William Bradford.
Whether they know it or not, they have laid hold of great principles... hided to unrevealed to the nations of the Earth.
They're about to establish just and equal laws adopted and administered by the people.
A government based on the will of the govern.
John Alden, a hired man, grateful for the privilege of signing.
Isaac Allerton William Brewster...
Myles Standish.
Samuel Fuller Richard Warren.
Stephen Hopkins, Francis Cooke.
Thomas Rogers. Edward Fuller.
Francis Eaton.
John Billington, Christopher Martin.
William Mullins William White,
Some are bonds slaves, some can not write.
But they make their mark with earnest pride.
James Children, Degory Priest.
Brown...
The Mayflower has been move into the harbor of New Plymouth.
Today, some of the men are setting up on a long and hazardous... exploration to find a place for a settlement.
They planed to be gone for several days.
They carry bundles of beads and mirrors against the chance of encountering savages.
In the hearts of those who remain behind lays the feat that theses husbands and fathers... may never be seen again.
- Dorothy?
- Yes William?
Many things had happened on this voyage.
But if this exploration succeed there will be a new world and a new beginning.
And what happened aboard ship will be forgotten.
And forgiven.
I wanted you to know that before I go.
Now, I wanted you to know you have fill my life with sweetness.
- Bradford William Bradford.
- God keep you William.
Here, at last, the beginning.
This lonely boat be in beach in a cold and empty coast.
I do not know if anyone will ever learn what was done here today.
But if one of us survives, this day must be remember for the courage of these... weavers and haters, these carpenters, Taylors and tradesman.
Shivering in their city clothes, frighten.
Setting forth into they not know what, holding guns they scarcely know how to shoot.
Ragged, foolish looking and weak as they are, they have the true splendor of man.
They'll be save, they'll return. Now go to bed.
I've heard it said Captain Jones is going to take the Mayflower out of here.
Back to England as soon the man return in the long boat.
It can't be true, he can't leave us without shelters.
- Is what he plans to do.
- Is there no way to that man heart?
You can't take the ship back to England.
Before we sail I made it clear that's what I must do.
If you remain until our shelters are built some may live out this voyage.
If you go it is certain they'll die, every last one of them.
- They choice that, I warned them.
- I ask you to stay.
And I ask you to come back to England with me.
This is no place for you, what do you know of building new worlds?
I have no dreams of a new world, make no mistake.
But here or there, my place is beside William Bradford.
No.
This is where you belong, here.
No.
- We'll sail away together.
- No.
- Where else is we be able to love...
- There is none.
When?
- After we married.
- No.
- There's nothing between you two.
- Yes, there isn't between us too.
The years of understanding.
He feels more than the others show, my feelings for him run deeper than you know.
This is wrong.,
It's just as wrong leaving beside me and thinking of me.
I know.
I could never be happy in a runaway life with you remembering him.
You can't go back to him, you'd never belong to him again.
That I know too.
But somehow I lost it, somewhere between you.
Let me go now, let me think about it.
Let me go.
- We found it, a perfect harbor.
- Perfect, it's warm.
The ground is good too, even in December and a good rich soil.
It's a shelted harbor, with a large rock risings from the water.
It's the very place that
John Smith called Plymouth.
There is a hill which rises thus and there is a good stream here.
We can built our fort on the hill and our settlement along the stream.
There is a plentiful supply of leonburguers size of wild game that if...
Three nights ago, the night you left.
Not if in her own free will, she would not have broken god's commandments.
We can only believe she felt over when no one was about.
Captain Jones, the men appointed me to ask you again.
How much longer do we stay here?
The ship ready to sail, there's no gold here, nothing but beavers and clams.
And sickness, the crew said they feel they're taking the sickness... from the settlers, lung fever is beginning to spread.
They'll get out of hand sir, when do we sail?
Let them die, the whole unlawful, blasphemous look on the noose lot of them.
You wasn't so worry about them when you took Weston money to drop... what makes you side with them now?
Look in to your face and look in to theirs.
Stay by with your friends... and look at that mealy faces, we're going home, we done enough,
We're taking the Mayflower out of here.
Now, who else threaten mutiny?
Clear the deck, step back to your posts.
April the 4th.
The winter is over, the land is a bloom and nature's bleak face begin to smile again.
Of the 102 who landed here, 56 remain.
6 died in December, 8 in January,
17 in February, 13 in March.
All taken by the sickness.
A combination of scurvy and lung fever.
But now this plague is over and our hopes are high for the future.
The Indians have prove gentle, poor, friendly and often hungry like us.
If only in this we are fortunate in having settled here in New England...
For in Virginia the Indians are murderers of hate for the white man.
And all these months Captain
Jones has kept his Mayflower standing by.
Providing us with shelter and comfort during the long winter.
Until out homes were built, without that we have perish.
All of us.
We who through god mercy survive the sickness...
Are gather to say farewell to Cap Christopher
Jones, who sails tomorrow for England.
We wished this token could be of thing of greater value.
But there's nothing of much value on the shore.
Sir, perhaps what we hold in out hearts for this matter.
To Christopher Jones, master of the Mayflower who's fidelity sustain us and kept us alive... during our first winter on the shores of America.
We give our thanks and our friendship... until eternity.
This scroll is inscribed with the names of all, even our latest settler.
Mater Peregrine White.
I, I had spoken with your leaders and... and we have an offer to make to you.
Any of you who wishes to return to England...
I shall carry you back.
My ship will be traveling on short rations, the food will be scarce but... probably no scarcer than it will be here until your crops are harvested.
So, if any who wish to go will appear at dawn on Plymouth Rock.
You'd be taken aboard.
I wish you all good fortune.
And I want to thank you for what you've taught me.
The growth of the human spirit bring him closer to all living beings.
I was alone.
Now I'm with my fellows.
There's so something I must tell you, I'll be brief about.
- I loved her.
- I knew that.
There's something you may not know.
She loved you in a way she never love me.
In a way which I never understand then, but she never betrayed you.
Thank you.
Thank you.
Do you realize the wonder of it?
That a handful of sick and dying men had built a settlement that now... not one has appear to ask me for passage back to England
I'm glad we didn't disappoint you.
I suspect that you too were on a pilgrimage whether you knew it or not.
Searching for what? A glimmer of hope for your discourage heart?
I see the sails.
I can see the sails, 2 then 5, then fleets come here to join you.
I'll be in one.
I must go.
God be with you.
Fire a salute.
- For living and the dead.
- Aye sir.
    - You know who that was?
    - No.
             Major Lincoln Bond.
I wonder what he's doin' back here.
                       I wonder.
   Edwards to General Banner,
   I can see it again.
     It looks like the fire
     is back to the wing.
'Roger, Edwards.
I can see it now in my mirror.'
  'I'm reducing power
  to idle position. Stand by.'
     General, this Mickey McKee.
 I don't see any fire now.
 Is your warning light still on?
   'Affirmative, Mickey,
   no fire in the mirror now'
    'but the warning light's
    still on.'
'I'm stop-cocking the throttle, and comin' in.'
 Okay, we'll be all set for you.
     I want crash trucks
     at both ends of the runway.
  Calling Crash Control,
  we have an F-102 in trouble.
  Give us equipment
  at both ends of the runway.
  You got fire again, general.
  Don't try to land, bail out.
      'Relax, Mickey,
      we'll never locate'
     'the cause of the fire
     that way.'
  'If I can't make the runway,
  I'll land on the dry lake.'
Don't try it, she may get worse.
Get out while you can.
   'Negative, I'm coming in.'
I'm sorry, Lt. Sweeney, but only the rescue party is allowed in the crash area.
It's still dangerous, ma'am.
        - You too, sir.
        - Okay, captain.
            Mm-hmm. Yeah, I see.
   Oh, what's his condition now?
   Hmm, good.
What about the plane, any report come through on it yet?
               What do you know,
               it's Major Bond.
   - Welcome back to Edwards.
   - Thanks, Jerry.
Just visiting.
    - What'll you have, sir?
    - Scotch on the rocks.
                      Coming up.
                      How is he?
 Hospital says he's okay.
 He'll be back at work tomorrow.
          I was afraid this time
          he'd had it.
     Excuse me.
     Major Bond, meet Major Lee.
Bromo Lee?
I've heard about you.
     I've heard about you.
  I saw the general coming in.
With that much fire, you'd have thought he'd have bailed out.
   Looks like you don't know
   General Banner.
  He's allergic to abandoning
  any aircraft..
    ...if it's still flying.
    Well, it's getting late.
          - Goodnight.
          - 'Night.
Bromo's been making quite a name for himself with those speed and altitude records.
               Oh, I don't know.
      Always figure we got
      other pilots just as good.
         But he rates number one
         with General Banner.
      'There's no question
      about that.'
           Tell me..
...the general still doing a lot of tests, like the one tonight?
  Are you kiddin'?
  He flies more than his pilots.
      Especially the tough ones.
That's what I hear.
     Mickey.
   You should know better, Linc,
   this is no way to do things.
Well, maybe I should've come in through the back door.
             The idea is to give
             a little notice.
 Why, we have a band that jumps
 at any excuse to start playing.
They'd need a better excuse than me.
                 Sit down, Linc.
Well, since you having made general obviously, you've been doing something else with your time.
               Well, I just had
               another daughter.
All by yourself?
        No, there was some woman
        around at the time
           by the name of Sarah,
           I think.
I think so too.
How is she?
    They're all wonderful, Linc.
   Well, you didn't come
   all this way just to find out
         that we're loaded
         with kids at our house.
 Mainly, I came all this way
 to get away from where I was.
           Washington? I thought
           that's the place
       where everything happens.
  Not any of the things
  that I know anything about.
 You know why I'm here, Mickey.
   I want a job test flying.
         Yeah, I know.
  And I know all the questions
  you've got to ask
     before you can give me
     any sort of an answer.
   First, "Am I alright now?"
            Are you?
           I'm fine.
     All I need is a job
     that I know I can do.
  I know what a spot
  it's putting you in to ask.
         That doesn't bother me.
          The only thing
          that really matters is
             are you sure
             you're alright now?
      'Maybe you need
      a little more time.'
           I'm okay.
                    I don't have
                    to tell you
           if it were up to me
           you'd already be set.
  It goes without saying that
  I'll put in a request for you.
    Then it's up to the general.
Banner?
Is he everything they say he is?
     He's a real good man, Linc.
What's his attitude going to be about me?
                 Let's find out.
                 Come on.
    Hi, Connie. Any chance of
    seeing the man for a minute?
 Probably. You're ranked pretty
 high around here, you know.
'Yes?'
     Col. McKee would like
     to see you, general.
        - 'Send him in.'
        - Yes, sir.
See how easy it is when you're ranked pretty high?
       'Thanks, Connie.'
Oh, by the way..
I think this is what
Sarah means when she says
I'm always putting my foot in my mouth.
Anyway, there's a guy outside
I think you used to know.
  I used to know lots of guys.
That's what I mean.
So, you probably know this one.
         Linc.
                  Hello, Connie.
This is a fine thing to do to a girl.
             Well, I didn't know
             you were here.
 - Last time I heard you were--
 - I was in dating.
That was quite a while ago, Linc.
                Yes, yes it was.
General Banner requested me here about a year ago.
                             Oh.
You would've known all this if
I hadn't started feeling silly about all those letters
I was writing and never getting any answers.
           Yeah, well, it wasn't
           that exactly, I--
Lots of time can pass before you even know it.
                           Yeah.
            Well, all in all,
            wouldn't you say I..
  ...look a lot younger
  than you've ever seen me look?
I was thinking that but...
I couldn't find just the words.
Good Ol' Linc... he can always tell when a girl's about to go completely to pieces.
I haven't even asked you what you're doing here.
                Well, I'm trying
                to get a job
     which no one seems to think
     I have a chance of getting.
You'll never know until you ask.
           Well, it used to be..
           knew before I asked.
              Well, things have
              a way of changing.
Don't they just?
          Connie, how about
          having dinner tonight?
I'd like to, but..
I'm afraid I'm going to have to work tonight, Linc.
     Well, couldn't you tell him
   that a ghost out of your past
   showed up unexpectedly?
The general is a man who doesn't believe in ghosts.
But if you're going to be around for a few days..
         Not if the news is bad.
Well, I better be getting back to my desk.
Oh.
         Connie, isn't there
         something you could do?
        I mean about the dinner.
I'm afraid not, Linc.
If I'd had any warning..
...but of course you didn't know I was here.
Goodbye, Linc.
  But, general, I wouldn't be
  asking you to assign Bond if..
 Look, he wasn't a collaborator.
         Oh, wasn't he?
 A confession he made to
 the Chinese about germ warfare
      sounded a lot like
      collaboration to me.
     Alright, so he signed
     a piece of paper.
 But not until he'd held out
 for 14 months of brainwashing
       and gone through..
     Hell, who knows
     what they go through.
              But more important
              than anything..
     ...before he went to Korea,
     he was turning into
        the most promising pilot
        I'd ever run across.
          He had natural ability
          and judgment.
  And what you need more
  than anything else right now..
                   ..experience.
What I need more than anything else right now is pilots I know I can count on under stress.
I'm sorry, Mickey, that doesn't sound like Bond to me.
           But who knows how bad
           the stress got?
           Maybe nobody could've
           taken it any longer.
Maybe.
   He tried to kill himself by
   slashing his wrist, you know.
     We turn down good men
     every week.
  How can you ask me to lower
  that standard for Bond?
 Bond met those standards when
 he came here originally, sir.
     There's no use
     trying to convince me.
     It doesn't matter
     how I feel personally.
 What matters is, that I have
 pilots I know I can count on.
  With Bond, I wouldn't know.
   That's all there is to it.
Believe me, it's a rotten decision to make.
 It looks as though
 I was giving him a final kick.
It  wi be the final kick, sir.
      If it is, I'm sorry.
 That doesn't change anything.
                Well, it looks
                as if we've won.
           Maybe full production
           on the XF-120.
  Great. It's about time too.
        I gotta go fly.
Well, you're in the right branch of the service for it, general.
Never without a word on the subject, these civilians.
      You were right.
      I used to know him.
I was sure I had the right girl.
    Oh, general...I'd like
    you to meet Major Bond, sir.
    - General Banner.
    - Glad to meet you, sir.
Haven't I seen you before?
      I don't believe we've met.
Thanks for trying to pry me out of there last night.
             Well, sir, I wasn't
             doing much good.
                 The rescue boys
                 got you out.
About your request, Bond
I'm afraid I'll have to turn you down, I'm sorry.
Too bad you had to come all the way out here.
           It meant a lot to me.
Look, if you'd be interested in anything else around here except test flying..
- That's nice of you. sir.
- You let McKee know if you are.
Where are you staying?
        I piled in last night
        on Joe and Polly Craven.
   From all the fuss you'd think
   they were glad to see me.
   - Great actors, those two.
   - Yeah.
In our theater group they don't come any better than Joe and Polly.
    - When are you leaving?
    - Tomorrow morning.
      In case you don't know it,
      I'm having dinner tonight
                with the Cravens
                and the McKees.
      Thanks, Mickey,
      I know how hard you tried.
See you later.
  Well, you know what
  it was like during the war.
       No place to eat,
       no place to park.
   Luckily, of course, we had
   only two children then.
Only two..
Sounds like a whole gang to me.
      Believe me, Linc,
      two children aren't enough
           to completely destroy
           a large house.
         Stick around a few days
         and you'll see.
    Absolutely, Linc, and you're
    not gonna leave tomorrow.
    You just can't do things
    like that.
    Just pop in after
    who knows how many years
    then turn right around
    and pop right off again.
  Before anyone's had a chance
  to get used to you again.
Now, why would you want me and my long sad face around?
It may be long and sad, but it's a familiar face.
    Andf I think old friends
    are the best friends.
            She didn't read that
            any place.
       She made it up
       on the spur of the moment
         just for this argument.
You better watch yourself, pal.
This is the kind you wind up marrying.
          Don't worry,
          I'll keep my guard up.
       Don't you agree?
       If he did marry me
               it'd be nice
               for the children.
'Don't worry, you'll find out.'
       Not at this rate,
       I won't.
    Connie told me
    she was working tonight.
  So what? It's already 10:30,
  they worked until ten
    and then Connie dragged
    the general down here
  for a little Saturday night
  relaxation.
   You know, I think I'll ask
   that girl for a dance.
                      Uh, Linc..
Nothing, I was just gonna wish you luck.
            Thanks.
   - Why didn't you tell him?
   - Why didn't you?
  There's nothing for anybody
  to tell anybody.
    He's just gonna ask her
    for a dance, isn't he?
      - Evening, general.
      - Good evening.
      How are you, Connie?
I was afraid you'd take off before
I had a chance to see you again.
    You've heard of
    the perennial bad penny.
 And I hope, sir, you've
 heard of the universal custom
    of asking an attractive
    young lady to dance.
                  Oh, I've heard
                  of it alright.
     I can't say that I
     particularly approve of it.
             But if it's alright
             with her, major.
It's alright with me.
        Thank you, sir.
        You know, a lonely major
        can find himself
     flying with his wings
     cut off
  by making a pass
  at the general's girfriend.
          It isn't that exactly.
But it is something.
      Well, we've been going out
      quite a bit together
      and you know how
      those things are built up.
      How serious is it, Connie?
       If somebody asked me that
       yesterday, I..
...would have said pretty serious.
       - What's changed?
       - Stop it, Linc.
              You know very well
              what's changed.
            You don't sound
            very happy about it.
                   Why should I?
             What's there to be
             happy about finding
         you still get disturbed
         about someone
      who hasn't even given you
      a thought for over a year?
  - You know better than that.
  - How?
  That big stack of letters from
  you that I treasure so much?
        Like old times,
        isn't it?
    I don't think it's much
    like old times, do you?
Oh, I'm sorry, sir.
I certainly didn't mean to disturb you but there's been trouble at the rocket testing station and I--
         Alright, Sweeney,
         pull yourself together.
        - I'm leaving right now.
        - Oh, yes, sir.
   - So, you're at it again.
   - Oh, it isn't my fault.
    Being a general's aid's
    a lousy position to be.
  I-I-I didn't mean that, sir.
     It was an unfortunate
     choice of words--
   - Alright, Sweeney.
   - I'll go with you, Bill.
 No, it's early, you stay here
 and have a little fun.
    You can bum a ride with
    the McKee's or someone
       I'll see that she
       gets home, sir.
       Yes, the major
       can see you home.
       Thank you, major.
      - Alright, Sweeney.
      - Yes, sir.
       Why don't we leave
       by the front door?
Thank you, sir.
       - Goodnight.
       - Goodnight, sir.
But at least somebody's on my side.
               Just pray that
               it isn't Sweeney.
Why won't you tell me about Korea?
    Honestly, Connie, I'd rather
    tell you about it
         than anybody else but..
      ...it'd be like two people
      trying to communicate
   with each other,
   each in a different language.
            I just don't think
            you'd understand me.
Alright, then let's forget it.
From now on, if anybody asks you anything you tell them to check with me.
     I don't want a whole lot of
     people checking with you.
              If it's scars
              you're looking for
                I've got some
                worse than that.
I just wanna be sure they're all healed.
Gone as far along toward healing as they can without some help.
What kind of help, Linc?
    I need somebody to show
    some confidence in me again.
      Believe me, I never needed
      anything so desperately
               in my whole life.
            What it amounts to..
                ...I guess, is..
  ...starting from scratch and
  selling myself all over again.
   Ever try to sell something
   that nobody wanted to buy?
         - Connie, I--
         - Don't, Linc.
           - Why not?
           - Why not?
 Linc, you can't just wander
 back here after all these time
    and pick up right where
    you left off.
You're not the only one that things have happened to since you've been gone.
And believe me, you're not the only one who's been hurt.
You hurt me bad, Linc, real bad.
Taking me in your arms isn't going to help me forget it.
                        Connie..
You talk about needing someone to show some confidence in you..
Why couldn't you have shown a little in me?
Didn't you know that no matter how cut up you were mentally or physically, you could've come right back to me and that's all
I would've cared about.
   Perhaps I needed some time
   to pull myself back together.
I didn't want you all together.
I wanted you all the pieces.
So I could show you how much I loved you by helping you get back.
'I'll try to make it brief, sir.'
  'I'd like to quote something
  you said in a speech once.'
You said that the most important requirement of a test pilot
      is the desire to be
      a test pilot.
No doubt about it.
       Well, that I've got, sir.
           And I think my record
           will back me up.
         Then you went on to say
         that the second-most
           important requirement
           is stability.
That's right.
And since you brought up your record, I..
Go ahead, major.
   Well, sir, unfortunately,
   at this point
    the only way I can prove
    my stability
      is for somebody
      to let me prove it.
      Also, unfortunately
   nobody who's in a position
   to let you prove it
   could possibly ignore
   everything on your record.
    No, sir, they couldn't.
  The only reason that I'm
  taking up more of your time
    is to try to impress you
    with my complete desire
      to be a test pilot.
  In regards to my stability,
  I..
    ...I think I'm qualified
    there again, sir.
    I'm sorry but the answer
    is still no.
Alright, sir, may I take you up on your offer of last Saturday?
         Some other job
         on the base?
   You didn't seem
   very interested Saturday.
       What made you
       change your mind?
    Well, when it came time
    to leave, I..
   I realized that even if
   I couldn't do test-flying
  I'd still like to be around
  where it's being done.
     I'm afraid I've gotta
     say no to that too
       because it,
       it wouldn't work.
        And I quote you
        right back..
  You mentioned your complete
  desire to be a test pilot.
    We both know that there
    isn't any substitute.
 But maybe there's another way,
 a better way.
 Nobody knows all the answers,
 least of all, me.
But I do know some testing procedure.
Suppose you have to determine the stability of an experimental aeroplane, how would you proceed?
    I'd work up to it, sir,
    step by step.
   Exactly.
   You nibble at the problem.
  Now, on that basis
  I'm going to change my mind.
     I'll go along with you
     for that first step.
  I'm willing to re-assign you
  as a test pilot.
But you'll be limited to chase and pace.
None of the major projects.
   - I understand, sir.
   - Alright, it's up to you.
      Yes, sir.
      Thank you, general.
           - Bill..
           - General.
     Senator, may I present
     General Bill Banner
     he runs the show here.
  I've been hearing about you
  for years, Banner.
  Thank you, sir, I hope
  you had a comfortable trip.
     Very smooth. General Shelby
     is a good pilot.
      Don't tell me you finally
      broke down and got an aid.
    Yes, sir.
    Gentlemen, Lt. Sweeney.
Lieutenant.
    Isn't that Lincoln Bond?
'Yes, Bromo's checking him out on the XF-120.'
- How long has he been here now?
- Little over two months.
I was surprised when you took him here.
       - How's he doing?
       - Alright so far.
That about covers it.
And remember she's got a high rate of sink.
Your first landing, come in flat with plenty of power.
 - Hard to judge the flare out.
 - Roger Wilco.
And try to bring it back in one large attractive piece, huh?
         I'll bend every effort.
       - All checked out?
       - Yeah.
              I get to do it
              all by myself now.
This makes just about everything on the base you checked out on now, doesn't it?
                     Just about.
How you coming along with Bromo?
       I'd say, I was
       winning him over, slowly.
At least, he stopped foaming at the mouth every time my name's mentioned.
    That's progress.
    You can't get away from him.
           'Right..'
I'll see you later.
'That was flight 745 taxing.'
         Quite a view.
Sixty four square miles of level rock-hard landing surface.
 We figure you save the country,
 a quarter of a billion dollars
     in safe emergency landings.
   Edwards is one of ten centers
   under General Shelby
         and Aero Search
         and Development Command
         but it's developed into
         a pretty big operation.
         I have over 8000 people
         on duty here.
  There's our rocket engine test
  station right over there
                 in those hills.
     High altitude speed course,
     deceleration track.
             All this is just
             a bird's eye view..
     Oh, there's the Gilbert 120
     taking off right now.
'Yes, Mr. Gilbert was telling me we really got something there.'
Before I came here, I thought you tested mainly airplanes at Edwards.
Just what is your mission?
  Quality. Flying hardware of
  better quality than the enemy.
   Not just the aircraft but
   the power plant, the armament
 the RADAR, everything that goes
 with the vehicle
           to make up a complete
           weapon system.
   How long have you been in
   command here, Bill?
          Well, it's going
          on six years now, sir.
         I'm just really getting
         broken in, Senator.
 What it boils down to, is this.
   Our whole future air strategy
rests on the accuracy of the data, our guys pass on to the planners at Washington.
I'd call that a good sized responsibility.
   We try and pick the good ones
   and throw out the bad.
What was that?
 Sonic boom. An aircraft
 penetrating the sound barrier.
You're looking at an engine right now with enough thrust to reach outer space.
     - What's stopping you?
     - Money.
   Then the guiding system.
   We're still perfecting it.
'Attention! Final warning for ten second countdown.'
  This high speed track is the
  world's fastest
    and straightest railway.
 - 'Ten. Nine.'
 - Sled'll do 1500 miles/hour.
   'That way we can make
   some tests on the ground'
  'without risking the pilot.'
'Five-four-three-two-one.'
'Fire!'
   Senator, there you see
   an Air Force tanker refueling
       a bomber and two fighters
       at the same time.
'Yes.
A B-66, an F-100, an F-101.'
 'Some of our latest aircraft.'
        - Bye, Senator.
        - Thanks a lot.
    - Goodbye, general.
    - It's a pleasure, sir.
           Carry on.
 We just intercepted a radio
 call, Mickey, what's going on?
 Major Bond just called in, sir.
 Having trouble with the 120.
             Says he's got
             aileron on reverse.
'Edwards Control to Major Bond.
What's your present position?'
I'm eight miles south to the lake at 22000 ft., Edwards.
    I'm trying another roll
    to the same side.
'There she goes again,
Edwards Control.'
I think I've got something else.
 I've got wrinkles in the skin.
 My left wing.
This is General Banner, how bad are the wrinkles, Bond?
     - Not too bad, sir.
     - Can you land safely?
   - 'Affirmative, General.'
   - Alright, bring her in.
 - Keep checking on that wing.
 - Roger.
'Control to Major Bond, you're cleared'
   'for an immediate landing
   on runway 22.'
 - What'd you do? Pull ten Gs?
 - No, sir. Less than five.
     - Report to my office.
     - Yes, sir.
 Did you authorize Bond to carry
 out any stability tests?
    No, sir. It was strictly
    a check up.
      - I recommend, sir--
      - Yes, Connie?
   - Major Bond is here, sir.
   - Send him in.
        Come in, Major.
    What's the story, Linc?
    It's the wings, General.
They won't take the design load on a rolling pull out.
       Until, they're
       beefed up stronger
     you've got
     a dangerous airplane.
      Somebody's gonna
      pull the wings off.
    I don't agree, General.
I pulled more than five Gs with no sign of structural weakness.
You must've exceeded design limits.
  It happened exactly at 4.5 Gs.
You must've pulled more Gs than that. Maybe you blacked out?
  No, sir, I didn't black out.
  I'm sure it's gust loads.
Hitting few bumps for a fraction of a second would do it.
    If it could happen to me
    it's gonna happen to others.
  Bromo Lee is plenty capable
  of running phase four tests
 on that aircraft. You were up
 there for familiarization.
 Why did you start
 your own private test program?
 Sir, I stumbled on a condition
 that didn't feel right.
    I wasn't looking for it.
But when it happened
I thought I oughta pin it down.
            Alright.
But Gilbert's chief engineer tells me, you must be mistaken.
      Maybe he can explain
      the wrinkles, sir.
    The question is
    what really caused them?
  You're telling us, Major Bond,
  we're committing ourselves
 to mass production of a fighter
 with a dangerous defect?
                 Yes, sir. I am.
    Mickey, is the other 120
    in commission?
 It'll be ready tomorrow, sir.
 Set it up for me. Linc, I want
 you to fly chase.
And help me duplicate the exact conditions you encountered.
  General, since Bromo's been
  directly responsible
  for this project, it'll save
  time if he flew with Bond
       on the first one.
Save my time? What do you think
I'm here for, Mickey?
        Very well, sir.
 That's all for now, gentlemen.
Bill, you suppose bond pressed the panic button up there?
             I'm gonna find out.
How do you feel about his reliability?
               It's this simple.
If I were commanding an army and he was guarding my left flank
   I'd be running there every 30
   minutes to check up.
Why you wasting your time on him?
  Well, because what I said just
  now is a personal feeling.
      I'm gonna judge him on
      performance, nothing else.
You know, Bill, this X2 may well be as far as we can go with a human pilot.
And expect him to survive.
                    Yes, I know.
How soon are you starting tests with rocket power?
 Not for several months.
 We've lot of blind drops to do.
Decided on our pilot for it.
        I'll take that one, sir.
      That's been my pet project
      from the beginning.
  I've watched six years, nine
  million dollars and the brains
   of 280 engineers go
   into that X2. Excuse me, sir.
  - Banner.
  - 'This is Harvey Gilbert.'
               Yes, Mr. Gilbert.
'What's this about wrinkles in the wing? Is it true?'
              Yes, that's right.
              News travels fast.
'...accepting his report?'
        We don't know yet.
        We'll find out tomorrow.
Of all people, we don't consider a brainwashi qualified
        to say we've got
        a bad airplane.
   I'd like to come up there
   right away.
   Fine, we'd be glad to see ya.
  Alright, Mr. Gilbert, goodbye.
     Well, he's in a real storm.
Well, I can't say I blame him.
I'm equally concerned.
Bill, running Air Research and
Development Command has turned into a tremendous responsibility.
I could sure use you at my headquarters.
   How soon do you think you can
   wind it up here?
Wind it up sir?
Oh, I can't leave this job now right in the middle of all the new projects we're getting into.
Not that I don't appreciate your asking me.
I know there's no job more important than yours.
    I'm glad you agree we're not
    exactly an old man's home
        back there in Baltimore.
    Leave some of the strenuous
    testing to Mickey and Bromo.
                     The others.
Oh, it's good for the circulation, General.
     Just remember, you and I
     aren't getting any younger.
Yes, Connie.
                 I have the 104
                 data here, sir.
Oh, good let's have a look.
That's all.
         - Hey, Connie?
         - Yes, sir.
Do you think I'm getting old?
            Well, I'd say that's
            the usual procedure.
I mean maybe I'm too old to compete with these youngsters around here.
       - You mean flying?
       - All departments.
        In experience, I'd say
        you're older than Moses.
          But you seem ten years
          younger than you are.
It's a good definition of what the commander here better be.
You know, Connie, one thing
I'm not going to do is get my brains knocked out at any high school competition over you. I'd lose that one.
All I'm asking is that I be the first one you tell.
              Of course, I will.
            The first thousandth
            of a second, I know.
    Oh, wait. Mr. Gilbert,
    this is Major Bond, sir.
         - Mr. Gilbert.
         - Oh, yes.
            Lincoln Bond.
            Structural Engineer.
         Just a pilot,
         Mr. Gilbert.
             Very modest of you.
  I was just talking with
  Gilbert's chief test pilot.
    He inspected the damage
    and frankly he thinks
    you're out of your mind.
    However, I'm going ahead
    with the test anyway.
           Yes, sir.
Give me a double. Honest double.
Do you mean that, sir?
   Yeah, I wanna see how four
   ounces of alcohol
  affects a flyer's judgment.
    Connie, I didn't know you
    were working the West Coast.
Linc, you've a real important day ahead of you tomorrow.
   They're all important, honey.
  It's just that some are little
  more depressing than others.
       However,if it bothers you
       to see me to lush it.
              I'll wait it out
              until you've gone.
What's the matter? You're afraid you're wrong?
I have a feeling I've never been right a day in my life.
It should show one way or other shouldn't it?
          It should but then you
          never know.
I know one thing, mister.
Anybody who's thinking about having any kind of tussle at all with Bill Banner had better think it over carefully because he's really in the heavy weight division, Lincoln he belongs there.
   Yours could hardly be an
   impersonal opinion, could it?
I just know the General in question never ran away from a thing in his life.
He faces things head on, Linc.
And when he does, people always wonder what hit them.
There was a time when I thought that you and the General were two of a kind.
 Let's just chalk it off to
 girlish enthusiasm, shall we?
         Just a minute.
    Hi. Am I still under
    the 10 o' clock curfew?
              Yes.
 - Well?
 - Since you made it. Come in.
 I juts want it made perfectly
 clear that even if you hadn't
    waded into me with those
    bitter, stinging remarks
   I still probably wouldn't
   have taken that drink.
  Because I believe basically
  people don't change.
 I'm a man who's never run away
 from anything in his life.
 I don't know whether you know
 it or not, Connie
  but I've always been a man
  who's faced things head on.
 Whenever I have, people always
 wondered what hit them.
  If you've ever had any other
  impression of me
       you've been wrong.
       Unfairly wrong.
I should be boiled in very warm oil.
    - At least.
    - How about some coffee?
  No, sir, because I've got
  a very important day tomorrow.
 And I believe a man should get
 to bed early before such a day.
Well, hurray for you,
Horatio Alger.
      Thanks for the help, lady.
Any red blooded girl interested in experimental aircraft would've done the same.
   Ha ha. Hey, that's very good.
      About the red blooded girl
      interested
       in experimental aircraft.
       Very good indeed.
 You know all the people around
here who think I'm going crazy like Gilbert's chief pilot, he's an awfully good man, Connie.
     Maybe I did read those
     instruments wrong.
  At Red Prison they got me to
  where two and two
       looked like five.
       Maybe I am crazy.
I'm betting my own money that you're right in this thing.
    Sure, what do all those
    old highly trained engineers
                  know about it?
Will you please relax, Linc?
        It'd be too smooth today
        at 20000.
Well, if we don't find the right conditions there, General
Bromo reported some turbulence lower down.
  All set, Bond. Now, give me
  the exact conditions.
      Okay, General, start
      a shallow dive.
      Stay 40 knots below
      critical Mach number
       at 95 percent rpm.
  Pull 4.5 Gs and a steep bank
  to the left.
'Then give it, three quarter air rock.'
             Roger.
    What is this,
    you're giving us, Bond?
  Everything's normal.
  I pulled more than 5 Gs too.
'I'm afraid the air is too svelte at this altitude.'
   'No gust blows that time.'
'I'll try lower over the mountains at the Pass.'
       'Ought to be bumpy
       enough there.'
'Roger.'
'Giving it 4.5 Gs now, Bond.'
  I can't find anything wrong.
I guess we're not getting quite the same conditions, General.
You mean wrinkles in the wings, you're right. Returning to base.
             Roger.
Well, Mr. Gilbert, everything's seemed normal to me.
     That's not conclusive.
The fact remains that one of my pilots did get wrinkles and till we find out why, Mickey
I want the phase four test
 done over from the beginning.
 Assign Joe Craven to work with
 Bromo on the 120 full time.
   - Double check everything.
   - Yes, sir.
  I'm all for caution, General
  but it can't be overdone.
      Specially in view
      of...circumstances.
    I repeat I think
    you're airplane is okay.
  But if there's one chance
  in a million that Major Bond
   stumbled on something.
   Now's the time to find it.
    I'm confident you won't
    find anything.
  Unless the design limits
  are exceeded. Right, Major?
         Who knows, Mr. Gilbert
         what a limit really is?
It's funny.
Trippin over my own feet.
Me and my big feet.
        You don't look too well,
        General.
Oh, I'm alright.
  The flu's going around. You
  oughta see the flight surgeon.
Flight surgeon?
No, I feel fine.
You've been General Banner's friend longer than anyone else.
I suppose it's occurred to you he can't stay here forever?
       Oh, I hadn't given it any
       thought, sir.
     You know how he flies
     all the winds himself.
   Finds it hard to delegate
   responsibility?
Mickey, it's time to think about another commander.
            But his whole life
            is test flying, sir.
Naturally it'll be an important promotion.
               Boot him upstairs
   when every pilot on this base
   would crawl on his belly
              to Chicago for it?
Mickey, what he's got in his head is too valuable.
General, he wouldn't understand.
  Do you want to risk losing him
  to some big company
     like Gilbert Aircraft?
I know he's had some fancy offers.
That's where you come in. I'm talking to the next commander.
   Start getting ready. Take all
   the load off General Banner.
Aren't you placing me in an awkward position, sir?
  Let's say an unusual position.
       One that involves loyalty
       to General Banner.
I don't know what to say, sir.
             You know him better
             than anybody.
Nudge his elbow every chance you get about the challenge.
The bigger challenge waiting for him in Baltimore.
       I'll try, General.
     But you're handing me
     an awful big pair of shoes.
  Okay, sergeant, pop it out.
With this amount of drag, you'll drop from 20000 feet
                    like a rock.
       We figure 4000 feet
       to be the lowest altitude
         you can get rid of this
         deceleration chute
 with a safe margin to pull out.
Suppose the electrical release mal-functions
    have you got
    a manual release for me?
        Yeah we've installed one
        just in case.
Good. You know the old saying,
"If it can go wrong, it will."
  You wouldn't change your mind,
  would you, General?
 You know, I've been kinda
 hurting to do this test myself.
You've got enough to do.
I can't spare you right now.
I was thinking, sir, Linc Bond's got this current as anyone
 on this F-94. They want you
 pretty badly at the conference.
            I think he'd be okay
            to do this test.
You know my policy, Mickey, Bond is limited to chase and pace.
           Well, I knew that was
           your policy, sir.
       But he's been putting out
       harder than..
          I think he's really
          earned the right, sir.
I know he's putting out.
Just leave it that way.
 You see what I mean about Bond?
'He's been bumming rides in the
B-66 in his spare time.'
     'I don't when
     the guy ever sleeps.'
You're pressing, Mickey. So is
Linc. Pressing too hard, maybe.
Trying to prove something.
That alone can make him a risk.
Oh, thanks.
Oh, never mind, Connie.
No more coffee.
I think I'll knock off.
Why don't you take off, Connie?
You're probably late for a date.
                 That's alright.
That reminds me. When's that wing-ding Lillian's giving?
   - Thursday night.
   - I guess we'd better go.
  Help celebrate Joe Craven's
  promotion.
      When you said we, were you
      including me?
Of course. Why?
Somebody else ask you?
  Incredible though it may seem,
  somebody did.
                   Lincoln Bond.
Make a note in your book to remind me to ask you sooner.
That won't be necessary. You did ask me over a week ago.
     I told Linc,
     I was going with you.
      Hmm, that's a mark
      of a good commander.
     Instinctively he does
     the right thing.
      - I did.
      - You certainly did.
   But don't you go assuming
   I would've said no to Linc
      if he'd asked first.
 Oh, before you go. The mayor's
 appointment tomorrow.
    Will you be down
    from your test by nine?
   Better change him to 9:30.
  And operations called about
  your chase pilot.
 Bromo has to go to El Centro.
     Mickey's tied up too.
 They said Bond was available.
    - Alright, make it Bond.
    - I'll tell them.
   - Thursday night, then.
   - 'Affirmative, General.'
   Okay, Bond, I'm deploying
   the chute.
             Roger.
    You fouled up, General.
    You're only half open.
 Getting plenty of drag though.
 - I've got 4300 feet, General.
 - Roger.
     It's about that time.
     There she goes.
 - You've strung up the shoot.
 - 'I know it.'
   Both release
   has mal-functioned, Linc.
 Well, maybe I can land anyway.
 The chute's only half open.
    Negative. Might open
    all the way any second.
'If it does, you'll spin like a top.'
     I'm gonna have to try
     to snag the chute.
 Don't try it, Linc. Pull away.
        That was close.
      Can you hold
      that position, Linc.
   I'll have to hold it
   right through the landing.
I don't want the chute to pull lose and open again.
   Okay. I'm landing straight
   ahead on the lake.
             Roger.
 For Pete's sake don't lose me.
  We'll leave everything as is
  until they photograph it.
                       Yes, sir.
Well, Linc, how much do I owe you?
            A couple of bucks
            ought to care of it.
Two dollars, huh?
A minute ago my neck wasn't worth two cents.
Well, no sweat, huh?
                       No sweat.
           Lucky we didn't
           need the rescue boys.
Yeah. They would've been a little late.
Too far out.
You know, Linc,
I can't figure you out.
In these emergencies..
Well, it just doesn't jibe with that business in Korea.
Of course, you never did tell me your version of it.
I wish you would though.
Maybe if I understood what really happened.
Something beside the inhuman treatment.
What they use?
Drugs, truth serum?
                        No, sir.
Well, it just doesn't figure.
Even with torture, you're not the kind to crack.
What made you do it, Linc?
  Have you ever been in solitary
  confinement, general?
               Tortured mentally
               24 hours a day.
     Physical torture is nothing
     compared to the things
          they've learned
          to do to a man's mind.
That covers it, huh?
            Well, it's something
            entirely new, sir.
                 If a man hasn't
                 been through it
              it's no use trying
              to explain it.
Look, I'm trying to give you a break.
Give me something to go on.
   What does it take, general?
You think I'm hard to convince, huh?
Well, I am.
I always have been when the test date issued a flaw.
Can't you give me a better reason?
            I wish I could, sir.
Well, at least you showed me something today.
Another step, shall we say?
And if I step you into something more important what's your first choice?
                  Rocket flight.
          X-2 project.
Ah, that's a big step.
Too big maybe.
I always had
Mickey and Bromo in mind
  to work with me on the X-2.
However, Bromo's still got his hands full with the Gilbert job.
- I'll talk it over with Mickey.
- Yes, sir.
      ♪ Off we go into the
      wild blue yonder ♪
             Crash!
        Come on, Carmen.
            Come on.
   You don't want me to have
   to right in my log book
     that you're
     uncooperative, do you?
 I'm not going to your quarters
 for a nightcap
       or anything else.
       I just wanted you
       to see how much
      my wonder box
      geraniums had grown.
        Sure...you did.
        Come on, Carmen.
            Come on.
         - Hiya, Jimmy.
         - Hello, Linc.
 How about all this
 fancy dan flying you're doing?
          Trying to make
          Chuck Yeager look bad?
Chuck could fly better than that before he ever saw a plane.
   So much modesty to be in just
   one little old Korean hero.
A couple of real sharp chase pilots you got tonight.
                 Chase is right.
           I don't like him very much.
Mickey.
        The only man now alive
        who's flown an aeroplane
                 with no wings..
           ...faster than sound.
I was in a hurry.
It's just no way to live.
You're always so jumpy and jittery and popping right out of your skin every time you hear his voice.
           Just because I always
           try to be cognizant
                     to my duty.
Don't know what that means, but I do know all he has to do is say hello, and you shoot up 14 feet.
  Debbie, I wish you'd try not
  to exaggerate every time.
        Hello, Sweeney.
          Oh, oh, oh!
Honestly, you did it again.
You embarrass me so much!
    'Why do you always
    do that sort of thing?'
         His heart's going
         to give out long before
      he makes first lieutenant.
Ha ha!
                    Oh, so soon.
Well, Joe and Polly have finally gotten here.
Let's go.
    - Hi, Joe.
    - Good evening, general.
Those look awfully good, colonel. Congratulations.
      - Thank you, Connie.
      - You too, Polly.
    - Congratulations, Joe.
    - Thank you.
   What does his promotion
   really mean to you, Polly?
Well, for the first time in our marriage, food on the table.
        When did we get a table?
      I'll be right back.
Alright.
    Any messages for anybody
    in the powder room?
No. But on your way past the bar
     would you mind telling
     my husband
     that his leave from me
     has just expired?
    I always like to be
    the bearer of bad news.
            Then as we pulled
            into a steep climb--
   You will be sorry to hear
   that you were just shot down.
  Sarah's reeling in her apron
  strings again, is she?
             Oh-oh!
   I was saving that
   to go to camp this summer.
             But..
Here you sit all by yourself and there are literally 50 girls
        who are drooling
        for you to ask them out.
You know that, but nobody ever tells me.
       Nobody tells you.
 I suppose that little red head
 at the PX isn't telling you.
    Every time she sees you
 she goes into
 that exaggerated model's walk.
     She throws her hips
     out so far you wonder
  if they're ever coming back.
Well, I assume, naturally that she has some sort of trouble with her back.
        Aren't you going
        to join us at the table.
Oh, I was afraid a man all by himself would put a crimp in the fun you couples are having.
            You're just a lonely
           wanderer, aren't you?
I don't think so.
          Well, I hope I see you
          at the table.
             Have a drink on me.
No, thanks, Bromo.
I was just leaving.
           Yeah, maybe your wise
           at that, buddy-buddy.
       'Cause I hear you've been
       bucking real hard
   for the job tests on the X-2.
          And I kind of consider
          that belongs to me.
Good luck.
       I don't like you, mister.
     I'll go home and stick
     my head in the oven.
    Oh, I got a better idea.
Let's go outside, and I'll knock it off for you.
        Come on, Bromo.
        I've got--
              No.
Hey, don't hit him again.
He's drunk.
Linc!
                He held my arms.
              He shouldn't
              have held my arms.
How could you hit him?
      You didn't see
      what happened, Bill.
 It was on account of that man
 over there trying to stop him.
      Whatever it was
      you better get home.
           Yes, sir.
Come on, men, give him a hand.
Connie.
Let's get back to the table.
        We can't just..
         Alright, Bill.
         You go ahead.
     I'll only be a minute.
             Linc.
                If only that guy
                 hadn't held me.
I know, Linc.
I know.
        Look, Connie,
        you're with the general.
             You better go back.
It's perfectly alright.
    Please, it's bad enough now.
I want to talk to you.
        Go on back in, will you?
Better go in there, and explain how it happened.
          That's the worse thing
          I could do.
I know he'd understand.
         Better for him to think
        that I go around socking
        helpless people
                   than peg me
                   for a psycho.
You've got to do something.
                 Leave it alone.
- I'm going back to the base.
- I think I better go with you.
           Don't you understand?
      The general gave me
      my chance and I muffed it.
If he gave me another, I still wouldn't have the right to..
Finally it happened.
Blew my top.
That's what they've all been waiting for.
   Nobody's been waiting for it.
    They're pulling for you.
    Everybody.
It's going to be alright.
         You still don't get it.
              I'll spell it out.
   The Reds hammered me
   to my limit and broke it.
    I put a patch over it,
    and hoped it would hold.
  For months now, I've been
  praying that it would hold.
       Trying to hide it.
    Now the patch is pulled off.
                      It's over.
No, Linc, it isn't.
                  It's all over.
                Goodbye, Connie.
       - Hi there, Linc.
       - Hi, Hank.
    - The party over.
    - No, it's still going.
What are you doing here so late?
  We got a glide drop coming up.
         Hope you get in on her.
         Been making any hit way
         with the old man?
Afraid not.
Just thought I'd drop by and see how it was going.
  You, uh, changed the stick?
             Yeah.
  Moved it half an inch forward.
        Go ahead and try it out.
                     Any better?
I'd even give it a little more.
Of course, it's not up to me.
I wish it were.
       Well, you're about the
       same size as the general.
    Like sitting in the nose
    of a guided missile.
       I guess that's what
       it would be like, alright
        when she carries a man
        right up to outer space.
           Only I'll never know.
      You'd like to Hank,
      wouldn't you?
                   Be the first?
Who wouldn't, Linc.
             Yeah.
'And to have this kind of behavior'
   'from two of our officers'
 'well, it...it's just not the
 sort of thing we point to'
 'with pride in the Air Force.'
      I just can't drink.
      I know that, sir.
 But you proved you could stay
away from it, Bromo for three years until last night.
Now since this is your first slip with me
I'm gonna leave it this way.
Some people just can't drink.
If you ever take another, your career in the Air Force is over
I'll see to that.
      I think the general
      can count on me.
              Yes.
       'Sir, can we give
       out a statement'
    'on the chute emergency
    yesterday?'
 No! I don't want the
 drag chute story released yet.
         - 'Yes, sir.'
         - Not yet.
      'How do you want me
      to handle it, sir?'
 - We've had several inquiries.
 - Alright. Then hold them off!
              Yes.
    Sir, major here is Bond.
I mean Major Bond is here, sir.
          Send him in.
I was about to send for you.
Have you talked to any newspaper men?
                        No, sir.
Somebody leaked a premature report on our chute emergency.
I dropped by your quarters last night.
Where were you?
  I returned to the base,
  and then to my quarters later.
You weren't there when I looked for you.
   Excuse me, general, it'll
   save a lot of questions--
Just let me handle the questions.
 The big question is what am I
 supposed to do about that show
 that you put on with Bromo Lee
 in a public place?
If I ground you you'll be dead weight.
       If I take strong--
 May I say something, general?
    I came in here to resign
    from the Air Force.
So you're, you're ready to quit, hmm?
      I never should've started.
You had to start somewhere.
I appreciate your giving me a chance against your instincts.
Let's say in spite of my prejudice.
             Your first judgment
             was right, sir.
Have a seat, Linc.
What I wanted to talk to you about last night..
                     No, thanks.
...I got to thinking that over.
It just didn't add up.
You slugging Bromo Lee.
Unless there was something else.
     That's right, sir.
     It was a mental thing.
     That's why I want out.
  I was about ready to put you
  into the X-2 project.
So you want to admit failure, huh, Linc?
Look, I've gone along with you this far
I'd feel like it was my failure too.
   I'm sorry, sir. I'm just
   afraid I'd mess things up.
Ever read William Faulkner?
         Yes. Most of his stuff.
Well, than maybe you'll remember something he said when he accepted the Nobel Prize.
   It's sort of, sort of goes
  to the heart of the job here
  at the flight test center.
   Something like,
   "Man will not only endure
       he will prevail."
         Some men, yes.
You'll never know where you'll find it, Linc.
 Excuse me, sir.
 It's Col. McKee. An emergency.
Craven's having trouble, sir.
Aileron reverse, she just snap rolled on him.
'Chase pilot to Craven.'
   'Chop your throttle, Joe.'
 'Just turn everything loose.'
  Okay, Joe, you're out of it.
           Level off.
Craven from Gen. Banner.
You okay, Joe?
'No sweat now, general.'
   'but I was real busy there
   for a minute.'
   'I sure got the reversal.'
   General, I've got wrinkles
   in both wings.
        'How bad, Joe?'
      Worse than Bond got.
        Chase to Craven.
        Hold your level.
       I'll have a closer
       look underneath.
 Wrinkles underneath too, Joe.
    I'm afraid you're
    gonna have to leave her.
'Chase pilot from Gen. Banner.'
       'You're sure it's
       that bad, Harry?'
     Affirmative, general.
The wrinkles are flexing bad in the left wing. May come off.
     General, I still think
     maybe I can land.
       Negative, Joe.
       Get out, get out.
        - Bail out now.
        - Okay, general.
 But I'd like Harry to get some
 pictures of those wrinkles
      before I fire myself
      out of here.
 'Use your own judgment, but I
 advise you to bail out now.'
   Hardly take a minute, sir.
          Okay, Harry.
     'I'm ready to eject.'
         'Stay clear.'
'Bail out, Joe.
Joe!'
       'Can you hear me?'
       'Bail out!'
    'Joe, fire the canopy.'
        'Joe, bail out.'
     Joe, fire the canopy.
     'Get out of there.
     Fire the canopy, Joe.'
'Too late, general.'
  'His chute opened too late.'
Just the instant before he hit.
            Are you sure, Harry?
      'Positive, general.
      He was too low.'
    'Never had a chance.
    He...he's had it, sir.'
           Well, I guess there's
           nothing we can do.
        I let him wait too long.
It's not that, sir.
He, he never answered any calls.
He must've been knocked out.
          Mickey, you know Polly
          better than I do.
     - It might help--
     - I can tell her, sir.
 Only Linc really knows Joe and
 Polly better than any of us.
      - Maybe..
      - Do you mind, Linc?
   - No, sir. I'll tell her.
   - Thanks.
  I'll send the flight surgeon
  and the chaplain over later.
   - 'I'll drop in shortly.'
   - Yes, sir.
   Why do they always have
   to have two or three kids?
          Hiya, Linc.
          Come on in.
        Hi, Uncle Linc.
     Daddy hasn't come home yet.
Hi, Uncle Linc.
            Polly..
  Maybe we'd better go inside.
              Joe?
          I heard it.
He was..
Well, it was instantaneous.
Let me get Sarah McKee for you.
                        Not yet.
         Please, just excuse me,
         will you, Linc?
     You know, I've been
     ready for a long time.
  Kids, how about going to
  Aunt Sarah's for ice cream?
Yeah, yeah!
      Okay, let's go.
      Thanks, Uncle Linc.
        How'd she take it, Linc?
General, she's got more guts than anybody you ever saw.
               Think she's ready
               to see me yet?
Yes, sir. I think she'd really appreciate it.
           I want to thank you
           for going over there.
   We've got a big job ahead
   of us with this X-F 120.
   Major modifications
   on that wing and all that.
   It'll be your project
   of course if you want it.
- Sir, I appreciate that very--
- Ah, Linc.
I hope this has knocked out all ideas of your resigning.
      Well, general, it hasn't
      changed the primary reason
                that I felt
                I should resign.
   The fact that Joe went in
   still doesn't change the fact
            that I went
            sky high last night.
Why shouldn't you have gone sky high?
If a man's taken a lot of nasty beatings while somebody's holding his arms he'd have to be an insensitive idiot not to react violently when he felt somebody was holding his arms again.
What would you do if you got out?
You'd make a rotten insurance salesman anyway.
            I wouldn't care
            to argue that point.
     Well, sir, if I'm back
     on the payroll
     what you said about working
     into the X-2 rocket program
           sounded awfully good.
Alright, Linc, you've got it.
                 Thank you, sir.
          Okay, Linc.
          8000 feet.
      Count off for drop.
       Five, four, three
          'two, one.'
            'Drop.'
Hank, I'm still getting a little buffeting in the nose.
   Stability could be better.
'Stalling action, good.'
         Linc to Harry.
      Are you sure my nose
      wheel is straight?
                     How was it?
You ought to know.
       - Wow!
       - Same way I felt.
That was really something, Mickey.
But the real charge would be with rocket power.
      The old man's set on doing
      that himself.
          I think it's
          a younger pilot's job.
 - I know.
 - I got this much out of him.
      I get to do this next drop
      with partial rocket power.
I want you to get qualified to be my launch panel operator.
Well, that's something anyway.
      Passing 20,000 feet.
    Launch panel cameras on.
     Selector switch, off.
      Count for jettison.
       Five, four, three
          'two, one.'
        Locks, jettison,
        switches open.
       Come off the X-2!
       Come off the X-2!
        Get out, Mickey.
        Get out quick.
   Bond to pilot.
   Drop her! Drop her quick!
'Yes. Yes, sir, that's right.'
'Well, what happened?'
'We don't know, general.'
 'They told me she just blew.'
      Something more Barn,
      but we haven't--
'Well, anyway, this settles it.'
     I'm not taking anymore
     chances with you.
     On the test
     with full rocket power
      you've got to assign
      somebody else.
      The day I can't run
      my own show
     I'm turning in my suit
     for a different model.
'Don't be pig headed, and stubborn.'
'I'm sorry, but if you tie my hands--'
'Nothing personal, Bill.'
       'I'm just thinking
       of the Air Force.'
'Yes, general,
I appreciate that.
'But we need you here in Baltimore.'
'Okay. But not until this one's finished. This one's mine.'
'Remember what I told you.'
'We're not getting any younger.'
'Yes, sir. Goodbye.'
  That was a real close call
  for Mickey McKee, wasn't it?
                    Yes, it was.
Mickey said you must've been almost psychic.
As if you'd had premonition.
            I don't go for that.
         The instruments weren't
         reading quite right.
   Anyway, testing is based
   on facts not premonitions.
   Linc, there's still one thing
   after all this time I don't
   understand about test flying.
             What?
Why anyone should want to do it?
Well, why do you think?
   I haven't the slightest idea.
At first, I thought maybe it had to do with something silly like
 proving to each other
 what real good he-men you were.
      But I never met one of you
      that needed to prove that.
     Maybe it's the money.
No, I'm serious.
It's a mystery to all the other women I know.
  Well, part of it is the
  excitement and satisfaction.
             Doing something
             for the first time.
                  The challenge.
       That's a very small part.
            When you love flying
     you know that the aeroplane
     wants to fly right.
You get a compulsion to make it as perfect as you can.
 But with you and Bill and the
 others, it's almost fanatical
        like a religion.
               Ever heard of
               a good ballplayer
       who lived much
       of anything but baseball?
Or a woman that didn't know that the...only really important thing in life was having children?
  But that happens to be true
 because if we didn't have them
 where'd you get
   all your ballplayers or..
          Test pilots?
         That's right.
 Is Bill Banner still planning
      to fly the big test
      in the new X-2?
              Yes.
        Should he do it?
    Have you or Mickey explained
    to him that he shouldn't?
 No, Gracie Allen, we haven't.
    Just the same, if Bill
    shouldn't fly that test
      and everybody knows
      that he shouldn't
 then somebody should tell him.
       Yes, they should.
       Linc, I'm almost..
   I probably shouldn't ask.
  But what's Bill going to be
  up against in the X2?
  Well, you can't say exactly.
   First time a man goes over
   a hundred thousand feet..
     ...three or four times
     the speed of sound
 hits the heat barrier
 where the friction of the air
   makes the wings white-hot.
And the pilot has a fraction of a second to make decisions.
    Why did they have to use
    anything as dangerous
       as rockets anyway?
    There isn't any choice.
         No other type of engine
         develops enough power.
           Those two rockets
           in the tail of the X2
          give it enough power
          to drive a battleship.
Linc, do you have any idea?
Well, any premonition about Bill?
      I don't have premonitions.
             Connie, you've said
             Bill four times?
      If it weren't Bill
      it would be another pilot.
You know it's Bill.
             Yes, I guess it is.
            Well, I got an early
            take off tomorrow.
     - 'Do you have to go?'
     - Yes, ma'am.
Goodnight, Linc.
At least I'm glad it doesn't have to be you.
   You haven't understood a word
   I've been saying, have you?
    I'd give anything if it were
    going to be me up there.
           And I'd give anything
           if it were me
          instead of Bill Banner
          down here.
         I don't know.
   She oughta be ready for
   a try at full rocket power
    but how can you be sure?
    This time she's going
    right out of this world.
Let's face it, Hank, you'll never be sure.
      Maybe one more time
      with one rocket.
     I don't see why, Hank.
   Mickey and I have already
   done three more drops
   than we did on the old X2.
       Everything is
       checking out okay.
      Maybe you're right.
      Well, whatever
      General Banner says.
Yeah. See ya, Hank.
Any chance he'll let one of you fly?
           Not a prayer,
           you know the general.
     Thanks for the coffee.
  Tomorrow's okay with Hank
  if it's okay with you, sir.
         Then it's on.
       Something else
       isn't okay though.
      Ever since you went
      to Baltimore, Mickey
  there's been new heat
  on me to delegate this test
      to a younger pilot.
   Now I get a TWX that's
   a next thing to an order.
     Did you have anything
     to do with this?
  They pinned me down, general
  I gave them a straight answer.
       Younger pilot,
       you for instance?
                             Me.
                        Or Linc.
        We've been friends
        for a long time, Mickey.
           If I can't depend on
           your absolute loyalty
I'd better get me a new director for flight test.
       If it's a question
       of loyalty, sir
  that'll never be necessary.
                           Okay.
        Alright, wheel and deal.
               Set me up for
               an 05:30 takeoff.
           Yes, sir.
May I speak to the general privately?
      What's on your mind, Linc?
Well, sir, I never wanted to ask a favor.
 Pretty hard to turn you down.
   Well, what I mean sir is..
    ...I'd like to make this
    next flight in the X2.
- You too?
- I hope I'd earned the chance.
     I've flown in her
     as much as anyone now.
      I don't know what's
      the matter with you.
   We know this
   is gonna be a rugged one.
       That makes it
       my responsibility.
    I have a responsibility
    too, sir.
       That day in
       the locker room..
    - What about it?
    - You almost passed out.
- That could happen in the air.
- I told you, I tripped.
      We both know
      what happened, sir.
   I think the flight surgeon
   would agree with me.
You'd go to the flight surgeon?
    I didn't say that, sir.
    I know best whether
    or not I'm safe to fly.
      General, may I speak
      off the record?
        Go right ahead.
I know what it's like to go through hell.
I've been there, and I failed.
And I would've failed here too if it hadn't been for you.
You gave me your confidence and your respect.
                  You earned it.
      Not my own respect.
 'You reached your limit once
 but that was all in the past.'
     You would've held out
     until they killed you.
         Keep talking.
I think I've faced myself on that score.
Have you faced yourself?
Have you faced the fact that with your stubborn pride your blind egotism and time catching up with you
     'you could jeopardize
     this whole project?'
        That's enough--
If you keep this up your failure can be greater than mine was.
   You're the only man alive
   that could say that
   to me that I'd listen to.
       Is it true, Linc,
       is it that bad?
    I wish I didn't have
    to be the one to say it.
      Do the rest of them
      think the same?
    I can't speak for them.
      Well, I'm not making
      any promises.
   But I can't fly them all.
       Somebody else will
       get their chance.
       But not this time.
       I still wish you'd
       change your mind.
   I guess that's all, Linc.
      Very well, general.
And I think you can count on the zero wind for the landing.
               Hello, Linc.
               Hank, come on in.
         - Coffee?
         - No, thanks.
             What's the problem?
      Well, sir, it isn't
      exactly a problem.
      Hank was
      wondering whether..
    Well, maybe you better
    tell the general, Hank.
General, I've been going over the figures again and could we have one more drop at half power?
Just one rocket?
I know you're anxious to go ahead--
  I'm not that anxious, Hank.
       Not until
       you're satisfied.
Then I'd suggest, sir that Major Bond repeat exactly the same test he made last week.
   Well, the only thing
   I don't like is the delay.
'I'd really feel better, sir.'
   What's your opinion, Linc?
   Well, sir, everything checked
   out normally on my last test
      but it would give you just
      that much more information
      before using both rockets.
        Certainly couldn't hurt.
          Okay, Hank,
          I'll approve one more.
You take it up, Linc.
You'll be getting a piece of what you want anyhow.
'I appreciate it.'
       After Bond's test
       set me up
      as soon as possible
      for the final test.
  - Both rockets, full power.
  - 'Yes, sir.'
            'Linc.'
     How about flying Chase
     for you tomorrow?
                   Okay, Mickey?
             Okay.
'Weather report's still okay for take off time?'
       'Affirmative.
       Wind's subsiding.'
    - 'Forward tank filled?'
    - 'Check.'
     - 'Aft tank filling?'
     - 'Check.'
'Operations inform Bond we still have a zero wind for takeoff.'
    'Affirmative, he knows.'
   That liquid oxygen
   is really frosting up now.
      Snow's beginning
      to form on the skin.
How do you feel, Linc?
  I always get a few butterflies
  with rocket power.
         Yeah, so do I.
  But using one rocket you can
  stay below 70,000, alright.
                No problem, sir.
       - Good luck.
       - Thank you, sir.
       - Good luck, Linc.
       - Thanks, Bromo.
      Five thousand feet.
'5-0-0-0 at 0-5-4-1'
    'Paraplane oscillograph
    on 60 seconds.'
    'Launch panel camera on,
    15 seconds.'
   - 'Top off liquid level.'
   - 'Okay.'
     - 'Forward LOX tank?'
     - 'Normal.'
     - 'LOX tank pressure?'
     - 'Okay.'
     'Camera heaters, on.'
'Okay.'
'Four minutes to drop.'
'Flap circuit breaker, in.'
    'Hawk number one
    switch to run position.'
    'Hawk number two
    switch to run position.'
      'Hydraulic pressure
      gauge is 2000 psi.'
          'Radar on.'
'Two minutes to drop.'
       'Launch switch
       to drop position.'
       Launch switch
       to drop position.
     Data and oscillograph
     switch is on
         let's start up
         a countdown.
        Zero button in.
     Calibrating button in.
       Item 41 complete.
            Item 42.
  Indicated air speed, 2-0-0.
         Starting dive.
  Starting countdown for drop.
           Five, four
          'three, two'
         'one...drop.'
   There goes number two too.
'He's fired both rockets.'
- He's got full power, general.
- I know, I heard it.
What does he think he's doing?
       Did you give him
       a choice, general?
       Later, Hank.
       Talk to me later.
       Passing mach one.
'Got mach two.'
     'Sixty thousand feet.'
    'Seventy thousand feet.'
    'Eighty thousand feet.'
    'Ninety thousand feet.'
         'Ninety five.'
     'I'm in trouble.
     She's rolling badly.'
   'No directional control.'
  I think I know what's wrong.
  I've gotta change the tail.
     Raise the fin higher.
     Increase the area.
  Everything's going haywire.
  I can't..
         'I can't. I..'
    Ask Bromo if he's still
    in contact with Bond?
      Bell control to Major Lee.
   Are you still reading the X2?
'Negative.'
     'His transmission
     was getting garbled.'
  'The last I heard, he was
  firing the ejection system.'
                      Thank God.
The flight surgeon is here, sir.
And Colonel McKee.
Send them in, Connie.
            Come in.
How is he now, doc?
  He's gonna make it, general.
Good.
      Near as we can tell
  a wind blast tore open
  that experimental face plate
      at high altitude
      and passed him out.
      And he's got a mild
      brain concussion
      and an injured hip.
Ah, Linc's a pretty rugged customer.
       He had to be.
       It was that close.
 He's still coming out
 of a severe case of the bends.
      Call for excellent
      physical condition.
Oh, I know that.
 Frankly, sir, a pilot your age
 wouldn't have had a chance.
 Well, sir, I better be
 getting back to the hospital.
Thank you, doctor.
Well, Mickey, I've been here a long stretch.
Seems like a lifetime.
      Tests that came out
      okay, and some bad.
'But in a way they were all successful.'
What I meant to say Mickey..
...I've got news for you.
I'm transferring to headquarters
Air Research and
Development Command.
I'll recommend you to succeed me.
     We're gonna miss you, Bill.
I know you'll do a great job.
           - Thanks.
           - Coffee?
No. thanks, Connie.
   About Linc's flight, sir.
 General Shelby's headquarters
 wants to know
  if he violated orders
  going to full rocket power?
Of course, he didn't violate orders.
I left it up to him.
Verbal orders.
   Then we better amend this
   operations order, officially.
         - In writing.
         - Alright.
It's amended.
        - Line of duty.
        - Yes, sir.
  Connie, what are your plans?
   I imagine I'll stay here.
Of course, I'd love to have you go with me.
          I'd love it too, Bill.
         But you know that story
         about the paratrooper
         who was afraid to jump.
    And the general asked him
    why he became a paratrooper?
                    The boy said
    "Because I like to be around
    guys who like to jump."
   I guess I'm that way
   about the flight test center.
Yeah.
I know what you mean.
   I'll miss these guys
   around here, all of them.
        Mickey, Linc.
        Specially, Linc.
 There's a big fire burning
 out of control near the dump.
                Tell them to put
                it out, Sweeney.
           Yes, sir.
   But, sir, won't they just
   naturally go ahead and..
    Yes, sir, I'll tell them
    to put it out.
   Connie, I'll tell you how
   much I think of Lincoln Bond.
                He deserves you.
      Now, you'd better get over
      to the hospital, hmm?
Bill, I'm so sorry.
      Look, you don't have
      to worry about me.
Anybody who's waited as long as I have to get married probably knows subconsciously what a rotten husband he'd be anyway.
             Don't give me that!
              I'm tellin' you
              what the man said.
       I'm not responsible
       for the caliber of orders
     that are given around here.
           Under this antiquated
           military system
             they're given to me
             and I pass 'em on.
      Lieutenant Sweeney.
  I'm leaving for Baltimore
  so you'd better get me packed.
           Yes, sir.
  If you're coming along you'd
  better start packing yourself.
  You mean, you want me to go
  along with you, sir?
    Well, let's put it this way.
  After having been
  in the service almost 25 years
         I've run into something
         completely new
               and unheard of
               in the Air Force.
 I don't want to let it get away
 until I find out what it is.
           Yes, sir.
      Something new
      and unheard of, sir?
        A second lieutenant with
        a general for an aid.
That'll finally hit him tonight in bed and he'll go right through the ceiling.
I don't care if that is against regulations.
     It's all your, Mickey.
  Take good care of the place.
I won't say goodbye, Bill.
I know you'll be droppin' in on us to keep your hand in.
     Connie, you take good
     care of Mickey.
        I'll do my best.
       And I'm not saying
       goodbye, either.
     You'll be coming back.
          Sure, sure.
   You see that Linc follows
   Doc Bailey's orders.
  He's not supposed to be out
  of bed for another week.
           What the..
      - Button your coat.
      - I know, I know.
   It was like getting out
   of Alcatraz but I made it.
                          Linc..
      ...when are you gonna
      learn to carry out orders?
  Sorry, general, but I've never
  been able to miss a parade.
           Present..
          Order, hut.
        There goes a lot of guy.
A lot.
   As much as we'll ever see.
Well, almost.
Medieval England...
the early years of
the reign of Edward I.
A troubled land in those days.
Her great feudal fortress castles,
born in that uneasy time...
stand now as stately
monuments...
to how unyielding were the enmities
that caused their building.
More than two centuries
have passed...
since the Norman conquests have
brought the last infusion...
of what was one day
to be English blood.
Yet, the bitterness between the Norman
conqueror and the Saxon conquered...
lay still unhealed.
It had separated the neighboring
great houses of Bulaire and Gurnie...
by far more than the scant
few miles that lay between them...
in those days that began
with the death of Rauf.'...
Earl of Lessford and
Lord of the House of Bulaire.
You there.
What's your business?
- I was sent for by the earl's man of law.
- And what might your name be?
They call me
Walter of Gurnie.
I should have known you're his son by the look of you.
You had a good man to father you,
I'll say that. You'd best come this way.
Saxons of any breeding won't find much welcome here now that he's dead.
- What do you want here?
- He wants to see Simeon Bautrie, the earl's man of law.
Oh, so you're the lad from Oxford.
- I'll take you to him.
- Thank you.
- Walter, my lad.
- Simeon, I'm glad to see you.
You've grown.
Thickened out anyway.
Did you find your grandfather well?
Well, I— I didn't stop at home.
I came straight here.
I thought—Well, I was afraid that he'd forbid my coming.
My grandfather never stopped hating him.
You'll not have eaten then.
Sit down, lad.
I keep bite and sup handy.
Fall to, lad.
Tell me, young scholar... what have they taught you in this Oxford of yours?
Oh, numbers.
Ma— Many things.
- I can read as well as you, Simeon Bautrie.
- And write too?
Yes, I know a little Latin and some Greek too.
And French too, perhaps?
No, I'll not learn that Norman tongue.
Let them learn ours.
Two hundred years since they came here... and their court still clatters with that foreign—
Easy, lad, easy.
You forget this is a Norman house now.
Do you want to get us hanged?
Simeon, tell me, why did you send for me?
Reason enough.
- You're in the will.
- By name?
I mean, he acknowledges me as his son?
Yes, he says you're his son.
I knew he would.
But don't count on too much from it, lad.
Tell me.
You knew my father well.
He loved my mother, didn't he... more than he loved that Norman... woman he married.
He loved me too.
I know he did.
I remember once when I was little...
I admired a pair of boots he was wearing.
They were black with gold leopards.
He said that he'd get me a pair like them.
He never did, of course, but I knew that he wanted to.
If he could have done what he wanted, he— he would have made things different, wouldn't he?
Your father, Walter, bore a stout lance in battle... and he was gentle enough of heart, there's truth in that.
Yes, I think he loved your mother best... and that you were the son he wanted.
But it may be too that he's done you more harm
than good by mentioning you in the will.
There's no love here for Saxons of any breeding now.
They gave their allegiance to your father... and well that Norman wife of his knows it.
She's already thrown a score of them into her dungeons... hostages against trouble.
So I'll not have you come charging into this business with all your emotion.
You can be present at the reading of the will... but only if you'll stand well back in the hall.
If my lady sees you, she'll do you harm if she can.
Oui.
Begin.
In the name of God, amen.
This is the last will and testament of Rauf...
Earl of Lessford and Lord of Bulaire.
First, he gives and bequeaths his soul unto the Lord God Almighty...
and to all saints...
and his body to be buried
in the chapel ofhis castle at Bulaire.
Item— He wills that all such manors, lands and rents... which were descended unto him by way of inheritance, shall remain unto his heirs... namely, Eleanor, his wife, and Edmond, his lawful son.
Item.
He wishes to acknowledge a known truth... that he had another son, who, for lack of his name... is known as Walter of Gurnie, and for whom he had affection.
To this said Walter of Gurnie... he bequeaths his black boots of
Spanish leather with the golden leopards.
Further,
and of most importance... it was his wish to will this son's life into the service of our king...
confident that he will make a fitting and
honorable place for himself in such service.
Item—
He gives and bequeaths to
the high altar of the chapel of Bulaire...
- the chalice—
- There's no more in that will concerns that nameless lout!
- Let him take what was given him and leave.
- Why should I?
Shall I crawl out on my hands and knees because some Norman tells me to?
- Watch your Saxon tongue!
- And I'll serve no Norman king either.
I'm a Saxon. He had no right to hand me over to a Norman tyrant.
- This is treason!
- And may you hang for it, Walter of Gurnie.
By your leave, my Lady of Lessford.
There's something here, I think, that touches on a matter... with which I am very much concerned.
I should like to question this young man.
You have no need to ask,
Your Majesty.
It would seem that the prospect of entering the service of your king... does not altogether fill you with pleasure.
I'd like you to tell me freely why this feeling is so bitter.
You may speak up, lad.
As you see, I came this way while hunting...
so let us say that for the moment
I am not your king... so we talk as between two men.
There'll be no penalty for the truth.
You're a Norman, that's reason enough.
But it's not.
It's over 200 years since the conquest.
Surely Saxons and Normans should have found a way... to live together in that time.
Your father did not feel as you do.
He was a Saxon.
He knew that if this bitterness was not healed... it would be the worse for England.
This is a problem that must be dealt with one way or another.
Tell me, when you refuse me your loyalty because I am a Norman... have you not considered that
I have no choice in the same matter... that I must be king for Norman and Saxon alike... whether I like it or not?
Do you Saxons not owe something besides hatred to the same cause?
What do I owe the Normans?
We lived at Gurnie when the Normans were no better than wolves of the sea... and it was a better Gurnie then before they came to rob us.
She's a Norman... and she robbed me of my name.
She robbed my father of the chance he had to have a Saxon son.
It was her doing
that I never knew my father.
He willed me into the service of a Norman, but he can't make me serve them.
I have heard nothing in this that touches my problem.
This seems to me to be a matter between a son and his father.
I would not like the lad to be hanged merely because he has been hurt.
It is our wish that he be let go free.
Do you suppose this house could give a traveler rest? Let's say if he was born here?
- Master Walter!
- It's good to see you, old Will.
You've grown, and well too.
Come in. Come in.
You're home again.
I hoped you'd come by suppertime.
I laid a place for you.
You knew I'd left Oxford then.
Aye. We have a guest who came from Oxford. About you, I think.
- Who's that?
- Bacon. Friar Roger Bacon.
Oh. Friar Bacon. He was a teacher of mine. I'd like to see him.
I'll tell him, Master Walter.
Will—
Uh, what did he say when he found I'd left school?
- My grandfather, I mean.
- You know him, Master Walter.
He never says anything.
He just looks.
- Well, how is he?
- You saw that pile of iron in the moat?
Yes, I did.
I meant to ask.
We have gone into trade.
A belted knight of Gurnie in trade... dealing in armorers' iron and swine.
And just like he does everything else, not a word to anyone.
One morning, the horses were gone and the swine came.
And then the iron.
And when they wanted to know where he wanted it put... he told me to have them put it in front of the gate.
They didn't know what he meant, but I did.
If we were going to be in trade, put it out where the worid could see.
If there's a price to pay, pay it.
And when he walks by it... he looks neither to the right nor to the left.
I'll call Friar Bacon,
Master Walter.
 I trust this reception
is not planned for me.
Oh, Friar Bacon.
I— I couldn't help doing that.
When I was very little, that was my measure of growing up... when I could wield that sword.
I could wish I'd given you so much of feeling about your books.
Perhaps you would not have given them up so readily.
Oh.
What happened concerning your father?
Was it all you hoped for?
No.
Will you return with me then?
I, uh—
I don't know.
Never mind.
There'll be time to talk of that later, perhaps with your grandfather.
That won't be so easy.
Why not?
Well, you see, my grandfather and I only talk to each other through someone else.
It, uh— It makes discussion difficult.
You mean you don't speak?
Generally we talk through old Wilderkin... but I should warn you that it may very well be you if no one else is here.
No, you mustn't think that he's unkind.
It— It's just an oath he took after the great quarrel with my father.
Well, perhaps I ought to tell you a little bit about it to make it clear.
My father was betrothed to my mother before he went on his crusade... but when he was returning, he fell ill of a wound—very nearly died of it.
They cared for him in a Norman house.
Well, after a long time, when he was well again... he married the daughter of that house, the one who had nursed him.
It was out of gratitude, I suppose.
He didn't know that I'd been born.
How could he?
As soon as he found out, he came straight here.
And then there was a quarrel, so bitter that I can still remember it.
My grandfather swore that he would never speak to my father again... nor to anyone else of his blood.
That included me, of course... although he didn't mean it that way.
I've often thought that he was sorry for it afterward.
But my grandfather, you will find, is a man who does not take an oath...
- nor anything else, lightly.
- I see.
I, uh— I think that
I should tell you something—
 Wilderkin.! Is our supper ready,
and is our guest here, Wilderkin?
Yes, my lord.
Uh, Wilderkin, tell my grandson that I'm pleased to see him... and to see that he's grown the shoulders of a man.
- My lord wishes me to tell you—
- Tell my grandfather, Wilderkin... that I'm glad to see him, and that I hope the shoulders... are broad enough to be of service to him soon.
- My lord, Master Walter says—
- Well spoken, Wilderkin. Well spoken.
Ah, and our guest.!
- Welcome to our table, Friar Bacon.
- Thank you, my lord.
Ah. Pig.
Not the best of meats to offer a guest,
Friar, but it's stout and it fills the belly.
Uh, Wilderkin, ask my grandson what he thinks about our venture into trade...
- a course of which no doubt he's aware.
- My lord asks—
Tell my grandfather,
Wilderkin... that I think he has adopted a courageous and knightly course.
Ah, well spoken again,
Wilderkin.
Well, now let's fall to.
Talk comes easier
on a full belly.
The Normans haven't
changed that yet.
A pair of boots... and the privilege of wearing an iron collar for a Norman king.
- Ask him what else he expects.
- My lord says—
Tell my grandfather I— I had hoped there would be some help for Gurnie in it.
Tell my grandson he was a fool to think it.
Tell him he can help Gurnie best by returning to his studies... where he can learn to be a better man than his father was.
Tell my grandfather that...
I'm not going to return to school.
Tell him that I think my place is here with him at Gurnie, if there is to be a Gurnie.
Ask him by what right he thinks at all in such a matter.
Ask him who's the best judge of what he'll need... to hold this house against the Norman thieves.
- Ask him if he thinks I—
- Tell my grandson that—
- My lord, will you permit me?
- On whose side will you speak?
- On no one's side, my lord.
- I warn you, Friar... that if what you say is not on my side...
I shall pay but little heed to the fact that you're my guest.
I journeyed here, my lord, to urge the same point as you— the return of your grandson to Oxford.
Few scholars have come to me with such
an aptitude for learning as your grandson.
It would be a personal and bitter failure to me if I lost him.
What good is it?
How can you fight the Normans with—with books?
Walter, if I was young and had no sure place to put my life...
I could think of nothing better than to give it for the search for knowledge.
The strength in knowledge, it can win victories that the sword cannot.
There's so much we need to know
and so few people to seek it out.
England will need it someday.
She needs it now.
Just a handful ofbooks in all our land.
Painfully written, painfully read by only too few.
There is in every land knowledge that we need to add to our store.
I've heard of Cathay, a country they say where no Englishman has been...
an old country,
fabulously rich not only with gold...
but with the knowledge
of many ages.
I've heard that they know of a substance... which when it touches a spark... disappears in a blinding flash of light.
That they have instruments which help them to travel by sea and land without becoming lost.
Do you believe those old wives' tales?
Yes, and more.
Walter, what a challenge when you're young.
What better thing can a man ask of life than that?
I don't know... but it's a— it's a soft blow to strike.
If I'm gonna leave him here alone, I—
I want to strike a better blow than that.
Let him go.
He has been hurt.
He'll think better after he has slept.
You! What are you doing down there?
- What do you want here?
- Who are you?
- It's the grandson of the old lord.
- Nobility then. I don't like it.
Tris. Tris Griffen. You're no thief.
What are you doing here?
- Go on. Let him up.
- But he's Saxon.
Tris, we've played too often on these walls.
I know you and— and you, Dicken.
You're not thieves.
- What are you doing here?
- Well, it's bad enough.
We had no trouble with Bulaire castle while your father was alive.
But now the Norman woman has thrown a dozen Saxons in her dungeons as hostages.
- Yes, I saw them.
- Well, we're gonna get them out.
Out of Bulaire? How?
Well, don't think too little of the strength of this.
She has a beautiful long arm.
Oh, but not against stone walls, Tris.
I told you he'd be on their side.
Who said I was on
Norman side in anything?
- Who's your leader?
- Well, I am, in a manner of speaking.
- Well, we all are.
- Well, you—
You might stand a chance if you could get inside the gate.
What's your plan?
Well, that's the hard part, the thinking.
- Well, maybe I can get you in.
- Look, this isn't your quarrel, Walter.
Give me a few men. I may be able to get them in the miller's gate.
I know the signal.
If we can get the drawbridge down from the inside, you might stand a chance.
If we can't, you're still on the outside safe, to hunt me down if I've betrayed you.
All right, you can go with us.
Come on. Get your weapons.
What do you want?
Who are you?
- Our luck's too good.
- It's probably yours.
Who are you, out there?
Stay where you are!
Any man coming out of that door will meet a shaft coming in.
Like this.
The rest of you in there, throw out your arms one at a time.
You down there, whoever you are.
I must ask you to disperse... and if you have a grievance, to submit it in the proper fashion.
We'll present it now.
We'll give you five minutes to yield the prisoners.
For every minute more, we'll hang a man of the household from the battlements.
Wait there.
Well, that's the end of your problem.
His new Norman master has no belly for fighting.
I'll go see about my problem now.
The prisoners will be set free.
Who you are,
I have no means of knowing... but I beg of you to receive them quietly... and go to your homes before deadly harm comes of this night's work.
Oh, I say.
We can't go without young Gurnie.
Stop where you are!
You'll pay for this,
Walter of Gurnie... and you,
Tris Griffen!
Well, we can't stay here.
They'll hunt us early in the morning.
I know this forest better than they do.
They'll hold your family to bring you out.
There's nobody but Sarah.
You're lucky.
I have my grandfather to tell, and tonight.
Why did you want the boots so much, Walter?
Well, they were all I had on the side of sayin' my father loved me... when all the worid said he didn't.
Well, if they— if they fit, they'll keep my feet warm.
It's a letter,
Tris, from my father.
He did care.
Listen.
"Written at Bulaire by candlelight with the hand of Simeon Bautrie to help.
"To my son Walter:
"I have left a legacy in gold for you...
"with Joseph at the sign of the merry-totter in London.
"I could not leave this openly because
to do so might do you hurt.
"And in the matter of bidding you to the service of the king...
"that was done in the hope that in helping him to serve this torn England...
"you could earn for yourself the honorable name I could not give you.
"God bring you
to a good decision...
"and I regret to my heart all unhappiness I have brought you.
Your affectionate father,
Rauf of Bulaire."
I'm glad we got the boots.
Tell my grandfather if they find me here,
Gurnie will suffer for it.!
Ask my grandson when it was the part of
Gurnie men to run from Norman trouble.
Tell my grandfather, please,
Wilderkin, that we've no choice.
They've won.
The—The Normans have won.
Bulaire is theirs and— and Gurnie soon will be.
It's their England now, not ours!
And tell him that I'm not going to stay in this Norman country.
- Master Walter says that he has—
- Ask my grandson... where he hopes to find a land where he can live with himself... when he knows he's run away from his obligations.
Tell my grandfather that I'll find it... and the farther away from this land the better.
And the farther away from this land the better.
That—
Cathay, perhaps.
Tell him if I can get my hands on enough gold to buy the lands that Gurnie needs... then maybe
I'll come back.
But until that time, they can have their England.
I'll not set foot on Norman soil.
Our guests, Wilderkin, have a long road before them.
- See that they have what they need for their journey.
- Yes, my lord.
Come on.
The sun will soon be up.
Yes, the Bulaire hounds will run with the first light.
Master Walter, he said you were to have all the things you needed.
And... he said you were to have this standing cup.
It has some value.
It is the last.
Oh, tell him to keep it.
Maybe I'll fill it with gold for him someday.
Thank you, Wilderkin, for everything.
Good luck,
Master Walter.
Well, that's the end of something... or the beginning of something,
I don't know.
- I hope you sleep well in your forest.
- Walter, I've been thinking.
- What?
- I was thinking about going with you.
- To Cathay?
- Well, where's that?
Well, it's a long way from your forest.
Well, maybe Sarah would like it there.
Now, don't talk too lightly about it, Tris.
If we should go to such a place, the chances are all you'll get out of it... is that in the end you'll be hung by a Mongol instead of a Norman.
Well, if it comes to that, I'd sooner give the pleasure to somebody I don't know than— than a Norman I hate.
A far land it is then.
I guess this is the beginning.
- Well, that's the best.
- So far.
Now, what heathen—
Easy.
Crusades have given these people reason enough not to love Christians.
Besides, we're not looking for trouble.
We're looking for the biggest merchant with the biggest caravan to the farthest places.
He'll likely be the biggest pirate too.
Good day.
- Are you master of this house?
- No. The master of this house... is the amiable, gracious and kindly Anthemus of Antioch... who I serve the best I can.
Will you tell him two travelers of importance are here to see him?
My kindly master concern himself with only the greatest matters.
Perhaps his servant could—
Look, we've come a long way to see your master himself.
It will be difficult.
I don't want to disturb him without a reason.
The risk is too great.
I suppose the risk seems less now, hmm?
I will see my kindly master.
Good day.
You do not look important to me.
I warn you that every minute of my day must show me a profit.
Well, all we wanted to say, sir, is that we desire passage with a caravan to the East.
- To what part?
- It's of no matter, sir.
- To Cathay perhaps.
- Well, I have a caravan... which will go near enough to, uh, Cathay.
It is a caravan of gifts...
I'm sending to Kublai Khan.
We understand that small caravans... too often disappear in the wild country they pass through.
Small?
What are you talking about?
When you send presents
to the great Khan...
he demands nine times nine
of everything—
silks, jewels, women.
I had to find 81 of the most beautiful women of this land.
And because it is
all for the Khan... it will travel under the protection of the army of the great General Bayan himself.
Bayan of the Hundred Eyes.
Does that sound
safe enough for you?
A caravan of nothing but gifts.
It's strange. I—
It isn't strange at all.
You see, the Khan begins his war against China—
Cathay, as you call it.
He will have the spoils of the oldest
and richest country in the worid.
I will be his friend.
I will help him to, uh, dispose of the wealth of ages.
I will be the richest
merchant in the worid.
Well, young travelers, are you prepared to, uh, pay well... to travel in such company?
Well, we thought we might put ourselves to hire as guards for such a caravan.
Christian guards.
It would invite attack.
Is that the best you can offer?
You've wasted my time.
I warned you. Search them!
If there is nothing of value, cut off their hair to make a pillow for my feet.
I will have something
for my trouble.
I have already made such a search.
There was only this of value.
I kept it for just such a moment.
It's not much profit, but it is enough to save my honor.
- Throw them out.
- Oh, yes, sir.
This way.
What did you do that for?
Why did you lie to him?
Sometimes they call me
"the bird who feathers his nest"... because they say that
I steal from everyone.
It is not true, of course.
But let us say that I'm in a position to take a smaller profit than my kindly master.
I go with the caravan.
I'm in charge of it.
Perhaps I will take you.
It will cost me nothing
to provide you with equipment.
It will be his.
How much gold do you have?
There isn't much left... and you're not exactly giving us good reason to trust you with what there is.
Who is this Bayan general, the one with all the eyes?
Oh, he's the greatest soldier in the worid.
The great Khan borrowed him from Persia for his war against China.
He will conquer the worid one day.
And, uh, where is he camped now?
Three days from here with his army.
I wouldn't consider offering your services to Bayan.
His men are trained to love killing.
They would enjoy cutting a Christian's throat.
I'm afraid you have no choice but to... deal with me.
How much gold have you?
What kind of a country
is this?
- Good.
- How soon can we get started?
Two dawns from now.
You're lucky you found me.
These, by the reason of the great kindness of my heart... they're for you for the journey.
This one they call her "the singer" because she makes horrible noise all the time.
The other will bite you
whenever she cannot kick you.
You'll have to find a place to sleep in your tent...
where it doesn't leak.
But I think it's good enough for Christians.
The servant is good.
He will steal
everything for you.
- Mahmoud, sir.
- That's all.
Good day, young sirs.
I'll toss you whether you get sung to or bitten.
- Wet or dry?
- Wet.
It's dry.
Mahmoud, I don't know why they didn't build me to fit a camel better... or build a camel to fit me better.
Well, I found out some of it from our nest-feathering friend.
That mighty general is camped right over that hill with his army.
We're camped here so that wild crew of his... doesn't get a look at the women we brought with us.
We're not traveling today because he's holding games... some sort of tournament on the plain.
And I also found out another thing— why they call him Bayan of the Hundred Eyes.
- Thought maybe he had that many.
- No, they say he can see everything.
Tomorrow he'll know how every man performs in the games.
- There'll be all kinds— horsemanship, archery, all—
- Archery?
- Oh, that interests you, huh?
- Yes, it's a little cold for fine work... though the light should be good.
- What are their bows like, do you think?
- Bone and steel.
- The finest in the worid.
- Ah, wait till they hear Sarah talk.
But they won't, my impulsive friend.
The last thing we want to do is to attract attention... so you leave Sarah right where she is.
It wouldn't hurt just to take her along.
- Well, you won't take her off your shoulder.
- She wouldn't make any trouble.
I'd feel surer about that if her name wasn't Sarah.
That's an English banner.
Probably a crusader's that he killed.
The infidel swine!
- What's that about?
- He's the camel driver... who came too close to the women's tent yesterday.
Child's play.
Child's play, hmm?
At that range,
I could toss an arrow in the mark.
Somebody ought to show them what an English bow can do.
Tris!
Get over there and see if you can find out what's happening.
He says that master is to compete... but if he does not make good, the bow is to be broken over his head.
He means that if master fails, they are to beat out his brains.
- Who is he?
- That, master, is Bayan of the Hundred Eyes.
- Does he know what'll happen to him if he fails?
- I do not think so.
Well, I guess you're right.
Look at him.
All he knows is that he's out with Sarah.
What were they talking about?
Oh, nothing. Nothing.
The bow, that's all.
Well, go ahead, my friend.
- Remember the wind, Tris.
- Walt, I was weaned on remembering the wind.
Sarah herself would remember it if I forgot.
Good enough.
Well, that's enough of children's games.
Now give us a little room to shoot.
Tris!
If we're gonna show them something, let's show them something good.
Tris.! Don't be a fool.
That's far enough.
No, a little further.
I want to make him refuse to try it.
Now, my heathen friend, would you like to try first?
I thought as much.
Tris! Not even a miracle can make that shot.
Well, if I miss this,
I'll have missed a hard one.
- You did it!
- Yes, but it was luck.
I moved too far back.
I don't know why.
I think it was Sarah trying to show off.
- Well, if you'd have missed, we'd be very dead by now.
- What?
Yes. His orders,
Bayan himself.
Well, why didn't you tell me?
No, I'm glad you didn't.
Sarah.
Bayan wishes to see you, master.
- Now?
- At once. Be very careful what you say.
You let me do the talking. This may be the chance we've been waiting for.
- My lord—
- That shot of yours, how much luck was there?
- I want the truth.
- There was a certain amount of luck in it, my lord.
- How often can you make the same shot?
- Three out of five times.
The bow can be handled quickly?
He's put three shafts in the air before the first touches the ground.
I asked the bowman.
With accuracy?
I've seen him bring down three ducks with four shafts.
It's light. Light and strong.
Comes from the wood or the way it's made?
From both, my lord.
From the yew, and from skill...
- in shaping the bow to take advantage of the grain.
- What's it called?
- It's called a longbow.
- He calls it Sarah, my lord.
- Sarah. That's a woman's name.
- Yes, my lord.
You'll have reason to love your Sarah even more after today.
She... saved your skull, you know.
- Yes, I've just been telling him about that, my lord.
- The shaft should pierce armor.
- Yes.
- You've seen it tried? You.
Steel-tipped, it will pierce anything, my lord.
I think this is the finest weapon in the worid.
She can reach out that long arm of hers and meet the enemy... before he can get close enough to strike a blow against her.
With her, an English yeoman stands as tall as any man.
He's the greatest soldier in the worid.
I take it you're English then?
Yes, my lord.
I've seen you English hacking away at the Saracens in your crusades.
Each man his own fortress in his great armor... so weighed down he can't move.
It's very stupid.
But this... is not so stupid.
We'll talk about it.
Do you play chess?
- Sorry, no.
- Oh, I do, my lord.
- How well?
- Well, four moves soundly.
Four sound moves is more than any man in this army can do.
- We'll play in my tent tonight.
- With pleasure, my lord.
Oh, how do we find your tent?
Scholar, if any man in my army can't tell you where my tent is... our poetic young bowman can use him as a target.
Maybe your Sarah did us a good turn after all. Come on. We'll take her home.
You can make up a sonnet to her as we go.
- Oh, go swallow your tongue.
- Why, Tris!
Over there.
Let me see that bow of yours.
You'll find the game's ready.
I always, uh, make the first move.
About this, uh— this bow of yours.
- Could you make another one like it?
- If I had the wood.
A sound game. Thoughtful.
It lies in wait for the attack.
It won't win against an attack, of course.
It's just the kind of game I want, young scholar. Pawn to king's bishop four.
Play it.
- Can you train men in the use of such a bow?
- Yes, my lord.
Then the right wood can be found.
Uh, as a scholar... you permit no weakness in the attack.
Good. As a scholar you know something of your country's... military theory and practice.
I have a—
I have a certain knowledge of those things, my lord.
War is my trade.
At least I'm good enough to know
no war was ever won...
that was fought in the same way
as the war before it.
Why, I've made a weapon of speed.
Speed.
No man should wear armor so heavy
that he can't move quickly... to save himself or to pursue his enemy and destroy him.
That's why I like this bow of yours.
It's— It's light.
It can reach out to the enemy and put an end to him.
That's the only way you can ever sleep soundly, you know... when your enemy's sleep is eternal.
Forgive me for distracting you from your game, but I'm curious.
Why are you young travelers in this far place?
We came in search of adventure into this new land.
We heard of the greatness of my lord Bayan and came in search of him.
If that's flattery,
I don't like it.
We had to find someplace to put our lives.
Don't you plan to return to your own country?
We have no country, my lord.
That's a strange thing for an Englishman to say.
Why? A woman?
- No, more than that.
- Oh, it doesn't matter.
Bowman and scholar, both without a country.
It's just possible you two could be of service to me.
I'll think about it.
It's your move.
Oh, it's you.
What do you want?
It is bad, very bad.
- What is?
- This old tent... these old blankets and one little servant.
Steal food, cook—
it's too much.
- You need second boy.
- How do we get him... by the great kindness of your heart?
Maybe I get him for you.
Maybe some dislike Christians.
I do not.
All right, out with it.
What are you trying to say?
Never talk important matters where you cannot see who listens.
I have a message for you, from the Black Rose.
And who would the Black Rose be?
She is the sister of my kindly master.
- Well, that's fine.
- She wishes to escape.
She say she is going to England... and that all
Englishmen are gallant... and you will be glad to help one of your own blood.
- Are you trying to say that she's English?
- There is some report... that her father was English, a crusader taken prisoner.
- Well, why is she called the Black Rose?
- That's the name... they've given the clove, the most precious of the spices.
I don't like it, a girl of English blood being sent to these heathen.
- Oh, we don't know she's English.
- She has relatives in Maratha.
The only thing she needs is to reach them.
I see. And what are you doing this for?
I'm not troubled that the lady's in distress.
She has a very large sapphire.
What does she expect us to do in the middle of Bayan's army?
The bird who feathers his nest never leaves things to chance.
I have a very well-made plan in which
I will do all that's dangerous, if you're afraid.
Afraid? We'd do more for
English blood any day... than you'd do for an overgrown sapphire.
Oh, that's good.
I'll tell that to the Black Rose.
Master, the strange one's here again.
Oh?
This is your second boy.
- His name is Mahomet.
- Well, you can take him back.
- Go on. Get out of here.
- Very strange.
Last night, the camels run through the tents of the women.
They have to take a time for the search.
The Black Rose is missing.
Go on. Get her out of here.
They'll find her when they search... and they'll drag us over the hill like they did that camel driver the other day.
- Go on, Mahmoud. Go on. Back to your work.
- Yes, master.
I'm no fool. Yesterday, I bought a slave boy for the Englishman.
That boy disappeared... and everybody thinks this is the boy.
And I did something else.
One of the camels that run away was saddled.
When they find that camel, they will believe... the Black Rose tried to escape on it and was hurt.
- It's very simple.
- Well, get her out of here!
Perhaps I will call out that I've found her here now.
No one would believe
your story.
Perhaps you would like
being staked out for vultures.
- Well, I found the camels.
- And we have a new second boy too.
He's all yours, Tris.
He has beautiful, big eyes.
Very simple, young sirs.
She will do whatever you tell her to do.
You understand that?
You know what'll happen to all of us unless you do exactly as you're told?
Oh, yes, most kind grandeur.
Oh. Oh, where did—
Never mind. Mahmoud!
- I wish to say that I am very grateful.
- Yes, I know all about that.
This new second boy will stay here to help you... but you'll still be first boy, you understand?
Master, we don't need second boy.
This boy no good.
- I can do everything.
- You'll do as you're told.
Get him out of here.
Get him some breakfast, and put him to work.
Yes, master.
Second boy will eat when I'm through.
Now, go.!
Oh, it's not gonna work.
What are we gonna do now?
I guess the only thing to do is just to sit here... and wait for the ax to fall.
Well, the old pirate's right after all.
And there's that saddled camel.
He's the offspring
of a sore-eyed camel driver.!
- He wanted to beat me.!
- Quiet! Get her into the tent.
- Do you know who she is?
- Mahmoud has struck a great lady.
- Mahmoud should be whipped.
- Never mind about that!
Do you know we'll all be killed if anybody finds out she's here?
I will tell no one.
Mahmoud would die first.
I want you to get into that tent and pretend as though nothing had happened.
- Can we trust him?
- We'll either trust him or slit his throat.
- I am glad he knows.
- Why?
Because now there is no more need of pretending... and I can be in the tent with you the way that it was meant to be.
- Now, look, Mahomet—
- I suppose he told you... that I am English and that
I am to go to England.
- Yes, we know that.
- There is so much I must know about England... if I am to go to live there.
Do you think they would like me?
What is it like there?
Are all the people as beautiful as you are?
Ask him.
He's the beautiful one.
Oh, no! I think you are much more beautiful than he is.
You look just
as I've always known—
Mahomet, there's no time for talking.
This is very serious for all of us.
Put that turban back on, button yourself up... and get ready to play second boy again, understand?
- Yes, but I—
- I don't wanna talk about it.
- Just do as I say, and quickly too.
- Yes, most kind, but—
All right, then do it!
I never saw anyone look less like young gallants going off on a great adventure.
- How does the lady feel about it?
- The lady, my lord?
Hmm. What's her name?
Sarah?
Oh. I think she'll like what lies ahead, my lord.
We're making some kinsmen for your Sarah so she won't be lonely.
I've given orders to find that wood of yours, bowman.
There's something to interest you, young scholar.
With that direction-finding chariot...
we can strike straight through
any storm without getting lost.
We can leave the trade route
and travel across country.
- Was that made in China?
- Mmm.
- Well, how does it work?
- Inside, there's a box.
In the box there's a needle that points always in the same direction.
What makes the needle behave in such a manner?
Well, if you don't know, scholar,
I won't worry about it.
I need the time to make war.
Look.
- There's India. We'll conquer that someday.
- India?
We're done with China, we'll have to conquer something.
No doubt your scholar's mind
inquires into a plan for India.
But China first!
It looks like they believed his trick with the camel.
The men they left to search have joined us here.
There doesn't seem to be any sign of a search of the camp. Where is she?
In there, out of sight.
- What are you doing?
- I'm taking this ugly stain off my face.
- Put it right back on again.
- No. It's very ugly.
And I mustn't be ugly when I eat here in the tent with you.
- Mahomet—
- Maryam. There.
- Where did you get that?
- I needed it.
And I got some clothes too to wear when I eat here.
Mahmoud!
- Yes, master.
- Mahmoud, did you steal these things?
Mahmoud see, Mahmoud take.
Suppose they searched this camp?
There's to be no more stealing.
All the women steal from each other.
- There's to be no more stealing.
- But if great lady wishes—
You'll do as I say no matter what great lady wishes.
- Maryam, I want you to put
that stain back on your face.
- No.
- What do you mean, no?
- I mean no!
There is no danger.
If they were going to search the camp, they would have done this by now.
And no one will come near our tent because we are Christians.
Everything is happening the way it said in the miracle... only I must take the stain off my face so the rest of the miracle can happen.
Miracle? What miracle?
I've been very ashamed because
I almost stopped believing in it... when I found out
I was going to be sent to the Khan.
But when I saw you, I knew it must have been working all the time.
Uh, Maryam, I've never been part of a miracle before... so I don't know much about it.
But what makes you think a miracle is telling you to take that stain off your face?
I've known about it ever since
I was a little girl. My father told me.
I wanted very much to go to England... because I thought how wonderful it must be in a country... where all the people were like him— gentle and very tall and beautiful.
He wanted to take me there,
but he couldn't because he was a prisoner.
So he said that we should have to ask God to help me.
And maybe if we believed very hard, there would be a miracle.
Oh, I like the God that would do miracles like that.
So I believed very hard.
My father gave me this before they killed him to help me with the miracle.
He said that someday, a tall, beautiful Englishman... would come riding over a hill... and would think that I was very beautiful, so he would help me.
So when I saw you, I knew
God sent you to be part of the miracle.
Only how are you to see that I am beautiful... if I've got that ugly stain on the face?
That's very nice, Maryam, and I—
I wish it was a miracle, because that's just what we need.
But I'm afraid we can't count on it because miracles just don't happen like that.
Oh, but it has happened.
Tall, young Englishmen do not ride across this country.
But you were here just when the miracle needed you.
So I know the rest of it will happen just the way my father said the miracle.
Well, miracle or no miracle,
I'm not gonna get us hanged.
Now, unless you do as I say, I'm gonna send you back to the women's tent.
No. We'll do just as the miracle said... or— or I will tell them
I'm here.
All they will do to me is send me back with the other women.
But they won't be so kind with you, I think.
Now I think you will look to see if you think I am beautiful.
All right, all right.
You're beautiful.
Now I think you will help me to take this ugly stain where I cannot see?
Don't tell me you've never
seen men hanged before.
- What did they do, my lord?
- See that pass there?
We ride through there today. We could
fight our way through, but we haven't time.
So this is a warning.
If there's trouble...
I have twice as many of these fellows as prisoners.
- I'll hang them too.
- I see.
You see, but you don't like it, do you?
I forget your
English gallantry in war.
I suppose different people believe in different things, my lord.
Well, not such foolish things,
Englishman.
No. What I can't touch doesn't exist.
You conquer, or somebody conquers you.
That's all there is to it.
I thank you for reminding me, my lord.
I like you, scholar.
I like the way you speak your mind.
I must reward you.
You do not feel like talking,
Walter?
No.
That's too bad.
I hoped you would begin telling me about England.
What is it like there?
Is it very beautiful?
- I don't know.
- Do you think it's beautiful, Tris?
Yes, I think it's beautiful.
The most beautiful place in the worid.
It smells good.
The forest, the English soil.
It's clean.
The rain washes it that way, I suppose.
It's so clean, it's fragrant with it.
I think it's the most beautiful country in the worid.
Why, Tris!
Well, I wish I was there, that's all.
Bayan was right about that poet business.
And a homesick poet too.
Oh, it must be very beautiful if he feels so about it.
He only remembers the good part.
I like him for feeling like that.
Don't you ever feel like that about it?
That's the way my father felt about it.
Oh, I think you feel so too, only you don't want to say so.
Tell her about the Normans, Tris.
I don't like you to feel like that, Walter.
I think to feel like that, you must have loved it very much... and— and been hurt... by something.
- I don't like her.
- Who?
The girl in England you loved that hurt you.
There wasn't any girl.
Oh, you'll be glad—
You'll be glad to go back in England, won't you, Walter?
That's one thing I won't have to worry about.
I won't be going back.
But where will you go then?
You'd better ask
Bayan general about that.
I'll be with him, with the victor, if our luck holds out.
What's the matter, Mahomet?
Mahomet, what's the matter?
It hurts to think of England if you will not be there.
It's not the way the miracle said.
Oh, I—
I'm sorry, Maryam.
I forgot about that miracle.
But it'll be all right, you know.
You'll find yourself a hill and another
Englishman to come riding over it.
He'll be a Norman probably, but that won't make any difference.
We'll make as much of your miracle come true as we can.
- It'll be all right.
- I wish you didn't feel so.
I will be Mahomet again if it will make you feel not like that.
I don't mind the stain.
It—
Well, why don't you say something?
You're the one that started all this, you and that poetry.
You're the one that's in the miracle... and you look very beautiful there too.
We've come a long way to see that, scholar.
Cathay.
There it lies.
Play the real game with me, scholar, and the best game.
Play as you've never played.
Think. I have a new plan for war.
Find a flaw in it if you can.
It's a plan for China.
Many men have tried to conquer China, but she swallowed them all.
Strike a blow into a great, soft pillow.
The pillow gives with the blow, and the force is spent.
You can't conquer geography.
Occupy a country, and what happens?
Your soldiers become jailers, and you're that much weaker. What do we do?
Think, scholar.
We don't occupy at all.
We strike and strike on.
Destroy.
Strike at the very heart of China— Kinsai.
Destroy the government.
Destroy the will to resist.
- But suppose they get behind you, my lord?
- Let them.
It's for that I have made a new weapon of speed.
- But your lines of supply—
- We won't use any.
We'll live off the country.
Think deep, scholar.
There's supposed to be a weakness in every plan. Find this one.
My lord has spoken often about winning battles and losing wars.
Even if you win, each battle will weaken you.
We'll only fight one battle here when the Khan's army arrives.
Then we'll wait for the news of our victory to spread.
If we lose, well, we'll be very little men as history is written.
But, scholar, if we gain China... gain its strength and wisdom—
They have an iron tube there that shoots fire.
It's just a toy now... but someday it may help us to crumble the walls of Rome.
- Rome?
- Mmm.
- Rome is a long way, my lord.
- So is England.
Not too long. How would you like to visit your island again, Englishman?
This time as a conqueror to do
what you like with those that conquer you.
Think deep, scholar.
We may win the greatest game in the worid.
What's the matter, bowman?
Can't you sleep?
I was thinking of—
Do you think he can do it?
I don't know.
I think maybe he can.
I was thinking, the way he talked... maybe we were fighting on the wrong side.
- Tris?
- Yeah?
- Do you wanna turn back?
- Well, what do you want to do?
Well, I'll tell you one thing.
I'm sick of lost causes.
If he conquers the worid, at least we'll be on the winning side for a change.
What's wrong with going back with him?
It's the only way you'll ever see that England of yours that smells so good to you.
- Yes, I know.
- We'd better get some sleep, bowman.
Tris, you haven't got yourself hurt, have you?
- No, I'm all right, I suppose.
- I saw you at the beginning.
You and your bowmen against those fire tubes.
They sounded like the anger of God.
I think perhaps they were.
They're killing every man, woman and child in the district.
Like harvesters going through a field of grain.
They'd pull their heads forward by the hair for the ax.
Not one left alive, like harvesters cutting wheat.
What's the matter, Englishman?
We won today.
But you have no joy in the victory.
Why?
It's the business ofbattle.
It's very simple.
Kill the enemy.
A soldier must like to kill.
No man can follow me who hasn't the belly for that.
Go back to your tent now and think about it.
Think hard.
You have a choice to make.
That's right. We'd better go to our tents.
It was a victory, wasn't it?
The bows did well.
The general was pleased.
Let's go to our tents and think about it, Walter.
I was afraid for you.
I was very afraid for both of you.
Nothing could happen to us.
It isn't the way it went in the miracle, don't you remember?
- I know, but—
- Isn't that so, Tris?
Yes, that's so.
- I will be glad when—
- That's right, Maryam.
You mustn't forget the miracle.
A tall, young Englishman came riding over a hill, didn't he?
A knight.
A knight in shining armor.
You should have seen him today, Maryam.
He looked almost like a knight.
An English knight.
A sword and shining armor.
You'd have been proud of him.
He looked more beautiful than ever.
Except those knightly vows. You didn't think to say those over, did you, Walter?
- What's the matter with you?
- Your father would have been proud of you.
Your grandfather too.
He was a credit to them.
The way you looked anyway.
Why don't you ever wear your father's boots?
You'd look well in them.
Where are they?
I'll get them for you, and you can put them on.
There was a letter too.
You'd better read it again. What did it say?
- Something about honor.
- Tris!
Keep your hands off—
Tris!
- Walt, I'm sorry. I—
- What's the matter with you?
I don't know you anymore, quarreling, short-tempered all the time.
You're not the Tris
I used to know.
- Let's get away from here, away from all—
- For what?
- I can't help them anymore.
- Well, if you don't like it, you don't have to stay here.
What do you want to do?
March with them on England?
I don't owe England anything.
I think it's very foolish to speak of that anymore.
I think you'd better go back to England.
I don't think you have what he was
talking about— the belly for it.
- I think you're the one—
- No, I'm all right. I'll stay right here.
If you don't want the same thing,
it's all right too. I'll help you get out ofhere.
And it all fits together nicely. You can take her back with you wherever she wants to go.
No. If you are going to stay here,
I will stay here too.
That's very nice, Maryam, but it just doesn't work that way.
It's been all right up to here, but it wouldn't be from now on.
- Where are you going?
- You can't just walk out of here without a plan.
I'm gonna find out how to get to China.
What's the matter with him, Maryam?
What are we gonna do?
I don't know.
But he doesn't mean everything he says.
I think he doesn't really know what he wants.
But I don't know what to do about it.
Well, you're leaving just in time.
I found out that much.
We move again tomorrow.
Bayan's army turns south into China... and the caravan of gifts goes north to the Khan.
That means that from now on, we camp right in the middle of the army... and you'd never have a chance to get away.
You'd better try it tonight.
Yes, I guess we'd better do that.
I'd head straight south first.
Then cut across to Kinsai.
From there, the river runs to the sea... and you might stand a chance of getting back that way.
- Yes, we'd better do that too.
- Where's Maryam?
In there.
We are going tonight, Walter.
I heard what you said to Tris.
Yes.
You want to say good-bye to me?
Well, yes.
I'm glad it's hard for you to say.
Tris—Tris will take good care of you, Maryam.
You can depend on Tris.
And I— I hope you like England.
He'll feel much happier when he can smell it again.
And, uh, tell him—
Oh, never mind.
You know, Walter,
I can go or I can stay.
Whatever you want.
No. No, you'll like
England better.
I'll— I'll be up with the column... so they won't get suspicious for some time.
You'll need a good start.
Well, it looks as though it might be a nice day for a ride.
I'll go and see about the horses.
So it was you, Englishman.
Was it your curiosity as a scholar?
- Or did you know you were
steering us off our course?
- I knew, my lord.
Why? You realize the penalty for such a thing.
Why take such a risk to do me an ill turn?
Why do me an ill turn at all?
Move the column south and east for as far as we've gone off the trail.
When we camp tonight, bring him to my tent.
Well, what's the matter?
We got away, didn't we?
They can't track us in the dark.
You've got a part of your miracle.
You're going to England.
I don't want to go anymore there.
I know, Maryam.
I know.
So there was a woman in it.
I might have known.
A woman and a bowman who didn't like war.
Why take such a risk for the girl?
You must love her very much.
- No, my lord.
- The gallantry again.
I didn't mean to be gallant.
If my lord Bayan hadn't been quite so observant, I wouldn't be here now.
Why didn't you come to me about her?
I would have given her to you.
- What's one woman more or less?
- It didn't occur to me, my lord.
No, of course not.
It would have spoiled the gallantry.
Well, it's worth something... to be willing to die for something.
There's a way you may have a chance for your life. A few men have come through it.
I'll send you to the rope walk in the morning. Good night, scholar.
Good night, my lord.
Now, you understand,
Englishman.
As long as your feet touch the rope, no one can strike you... except the two men with the pig bladders.
They can hit only below the line.
Now begin.
Let him go!
Let him go!
Take him to his tent.
You are very tough for an Englishman.
Come in.
Well, my lord, am I a— a prisoner or what?
You paid for what you did.
Your back should tell you that.
But... I'd like to be doing something, my lord.
You miss the bowman, don't you?
I have a mission of some importance for you when you're ready for it.
- I'll take it now, my lord.
- Hear it first, scholar.
- You saw our Chinese visitors?
- They brought this tribute to avoid battle.
It won't be so easy nearer Kinsai, but our war has been going well.
We only had to fight once.
Since you've been sick, we've taken four cities.
Perhaps I should remain in bed.
Mmm.
Now Kinsai.
There are those in the government who want peace... but they haven't much influence with the old empress.
But, scholar, suppose I sent you to Kinsai as a traveler of rank... a student from another land, and you told what you've seen of our strength.
Yes, but will the empress hear me?
Find the heads of the peace party.
They'll see that you're heard.
You can refuse to go if you want to.
The risk is great enough.
No, I'll go, my lord.
It's settled then.
Scholar?
Maybe I'm a little sorry
I thought of this journey for you.
But be sure of this.
If they kill you...
I'll kill 10 of them for every hair on your head.
I have a strange feeling
I may not see you again.
If that's true,
I'll miss you, scholar.
I don't miss many men.
Well, for your sake,
I'll try not to get killed.
You will come with me.
- What is it? I—
- We have been waiting for you.
- What is this place?
- It is the palace of her unlimited magnificence.
Her kindly splendor, the dowager empress of China.
Well, what am I doing here?
I do not know entirely.
You will wait.
Bow.
Bow profusely.
Now are there two of them, or are there not?
Are their skins fair, or have you no eyes?
Is there such a prophecy, or is there not?
Is it your duty to know
such things, or is it not?
Do not argue with me more in this matter.
- You will come with me.
- But what is this all about— a prophecy?
No harm will come to you.
Far from it.
Please.
This is your house.
It has been prepared for you.
Tris!
Tris!
What are you doing here?
- Where's Maryam?
- Well, she must be a captive here somewhere.
Now I just left her to find out about a boat.
- But how did you get here?
- Well, I didn't even get to the river.
Some people laid hold of me before
I got started. Don't you know where we are?
We're somewhere in the palace, because I was just talking to the emp—
Oh, wait a minute.
Maybe we'll find out now.
Good day, young sirs.
I have come to welcome you.
We'd be very grateful if you'd tell us what all this means.
It means that the prophecy of the two birds... of the fairest color has been fulfilled.
It is a very old one.
It's said that in a time of great peril... two birds of the fairest coloring would appear... and the clouds of disaster would roll away like the mist.
We were urging
Her Royal Grandeur to think of peace.
She was about to yield... when word was brought her of a stranger... who was very fair of skin.
Such a thing has never been seen here... and it reminded her of the prophecy.
She said that there must be another, so guards were posted.
Now that you are both here... she is sure the prophecy has been fulfilled... and she will talk no more of peace.
Hmm. Well, what are we supposed to do here?
You will live here to ensure a continuance of the good fortune you have brought.
For how long?
I have told you, this will be your home.
You mean we're prisoners?
The chains that bind you are golden ones.
But I would not try to leave.
Now, look.
I can't just sit here.
I came to talk to the empress about peace.
- You tell her that I come from the Bayan general himself.
- It is too late.
Her Excellent Kindness is certain that you were sent by the gods.
So now,
we have nothing to fear.
The gifts are meant to fit your station as gods.
And I'm commanded to tell you
that if you have any desire... you have only to express the wish.
Well, if that's true, there is something I'd like to have done.
There's a girl. She was with my friend when he was taken prisoner.
If you know where she is,
I'd like to have her brought here at once.
I will send someone to carry out your command.
This house is called... the Abode of Everlasting Felicity.
I hope it does not fail that name for the young gods... and the young gods do not fail their obligation... to a people that they have committed to war.
I think he'd like that one better.
Oh. What's this?
Oh, I think he'd like that too.
- Walter.! Walter.!
- Not now, Maryam. Go away.
- But I have to show you.
- What?
Oh, look. It's beautiful.
They are made of silk to go on legs.
- I'll see them later.
- All right, Walter.
But it's wonderful!
Well, I don't see what you're so particular about.
It took me a half an hour to convince four giris they weren't going to bathe me.
- Where is he, Tris?
- I don't know.
He said he was going to find out if the gods could still have anything they asked for.
Did he talk to you, Tris?
About himself, I mean.
No, not exactly.
But I think he's sorry he was angry with you.
- So he ran away from the
Bayan general to be with you.
- No.
Oh, you shouldn't say such things.
He's here, and he's not angry anymore.
And he comes to go with us to England.
You really have learned to believe hard enough, haven't you?
Yes.
No. He came on a mission of some kind for Bayan.
I didn't want to talk to him about it.
You know how he is.
You can make him say things he doesn't mean.
There's one thing. He can't do anything about it while we're shut in here.
And there's something else too.
It's about these.
He got very interested.
He said they weren't written by hand... and they're not on sheepskin.
It's something to do with soaking wood and making this out of it.
And using these.
I tried to figure it out.
But he says he knows a man in England who would gladly give his life... to know of such a wonder, so there must be something to it.
Only they don't know about it over there.
- And then last night—
- Well, you could look a little happier, bowman... sitting right in the middle of the wealth of ages.
And here's some more for you.
You know, I was right.
I thought if they have books, they must set down matters of science in them... like the direction needle and how to make the books.
And look what else I have.
What do you think this is?
This is that powder that disappears in a flash of light.
It's what they use in the fire tubes.
And if you—
If you close it in somewhere—
Now, look.
You see that? Bayan was right.
There's the wealth of ages.
He'd rather have that
than all thejewels in China.
Do you know what you just heard?
They don't know it yet, but you just heard the walls of Rome begin to crumble.
The young gods already know, of course, the news that we have just received.
No. What news?
The armies of Bayan have taken four cities since you came here.
One that resisted exists no more.
Soon, that army will be before our walls.
But the young gods have done nothing.
Well, what can we do?
- It wasn't our idea to be gods.
- Nor was it mine.
I'm in an unfortunate position.
If anything happens to the young gods...
I will die very quickly for I am responsible for them.
But I will also be among the first whom Bayan will kill... if the city resists.
So if I must die...
I will take the way that will save the city from destruction.
You're trying to say, I imagine, that if you have to die... you prefer the choice that may convince the empress that we're not gods.
Say if we were found very mortally dead.
That is possible.
If you have a better remedy,
I would find it quickly.
- Walter?
- Huh?
What's the matter?
I couldn't sleep, Walter.
I want to talk. Please wake up.
Oh, can't it wait until morning?
No. I don't know if I can say it now... but if I think of it anymore
I won't be able to say it at all, I think.
All right.
What is it?
If it's true what he said, that we shall never leave here until— until we die... then— then—
Go on.
I know it's true that you do not love me... but if this other is also true... then you can never find anyone else to love.
- Isn't that so?
- Yes, I— I suppose so.
Well, then,
I was thinking.
Since you cannot love anyone else... and since it may be a very short time that we are here... maybe you could pretend for a little while that you loved me... like it was in the miracle.
Oh, I would like it very much... and you wouldn't have to pretend very hard.
But if you did pretend for a while, maybe it would get to be true... since there is no one else.
You're strange.
But the house is called the House of Everlasting Felicity... and I would rather be with you even for a— for a little while... and even if you only pretended... than to have all the rest of my miracle or anything.
Maryam.
What's the matter?
Wake up, Tris.
I think he loves me.
Oh, that. Why do you have to pick on a time like this to find it out?
Maryam?
- Maryam—
- Where have you been?
- Can you sew?
- Yes, a little.
Good. Now, I want you to take these coats... and sew as many of those jewels as you can into the linings, and do it quickly as possible.
- Did you find a way to get away from here?
- Yes, I have.
You know, I thought our friend last night
was pointing at something.
So I took a look around. Now, there was a door that was heavily barred before.
Now I could open it. There was a room behind and a passage leading to the river.
I followed it.
There are boats on the river.
Now, the attack must be close because
a lot of people are leaving down the river.
What—What I don't like about it is it's all too neat.
Now, I tried to think like our Chinese friend.
Just letting us get away isn't good enough.
But if we were killed doing itjust when danger
threatened, we wouldn't look very godlike... and he could easily convince the empress that... we hadn't just returned to our celestial paradise.
It would give him a chance to save his city and his skin.
What do you think,
Tris?
Well, he didn't give us much choice.
Well, we'd better wait until night.
We'll stand a better chance at the river.
Come on. Get ready.
- Well, the light's going. It won't be long now.
- No.
- Aren't you ready yet?
- Yes, almost.
- Well, hurry up.
- Yes, Walter.
I'm sorry, Maryam, that we got you into this, having you brought here.
- It—
- I'm glad you did it, Walter.
- Well, hurry up.
- Yes.
That's—
That's yours, Tris.
If we get out of here, you'll be a rich man with what's in there.
How does it feel?
Of course, I suppose by rights it should be Bayan's... the spoils of China, but there'll be plenty for him.
- Walter.
- What?
- Look, I've been thinking.
- Well, don't.
- It only leads to trouble.
- No, no. I've gotta say it.
What happens? I mean, when we do make it to the other side of the river?
- Well, maybe we better wait till we get there.
- No. What I mean is—
Look, I've been putting some things together.
Things about making books. Things like you said that man would give so much to know... in matters of science like the direction-finding needle.
Well, I-I thought to an island... you know, it might be useful for a trade and to defend itself.
But—
What I was really thinking, I wish it was you that was taking her back.
It'd be better that way.
I wish it was you.
Well, Bayan was right about one thing.
You're a poet, bowman, and a good one.
But he was wrong about another thing.
"What you can't touch doesn't exist," he said.
He didn't know that you could smell those English oaks of yours from here... did he, bowman?
Oh, no one could say it better than you, Tris.
And I— I wish I felt the same way.
Probably I'm sorry that I feel that Bayan... is the best thing that I have to follow, but that's the way it is.
I'd lie to you, Tris, if I were sure we weren't going to get through.
But if we do, I won't stand out there and tell you that I'd take it back.
I'm glad that it didn't end in the tent, you and I... bitter and— and angry.
Felicity means something after all, maybe.
I hope we don't make it.
I hope you don't ever get to the river.
Walter!
I finished, Walter.
Well, that's one way we won't get out.
This was open.
Well, this is it.
That door is not as high as the walls of Rome.
Why don't you get your friend Bayan to crumble it for you.
Here they are.
- Can you hold them for a while?
- We'll find out.
- I'm gonna try it.
- What?
The walls of Rome.
- Give her to me a minute.
- You couldn't hit anything. Give it to me.
And take her back out a bit.
Tris!
Tris!
Are you all right?
You all right?
Our friends will be back soon.
Now get her down to the boat.
- Hold onto me. You take—
- Stop being a hero.
How will you keep them back?
Throw a diamond at them?
Go on.
Get her down to the boat.
Hold this clear of the bank.
We'll be right back.
Walter!
- Come on.
- I said I hoped we'd never get to the river.
Well, maybe I don't have to.
What are you talking about?
You have to get back to England, don't you remember?
Come on. You can't just lie there.
Let me help you.
Leave them alone!
They're mine!
You get onto your walls of Rome and leave me alone.
Look at you.
You haven't got the belly for it either, have you?
Well, I don't know.
Books, the walls of Rome...
and the miracles...
and—and the oaks.
I don't know.
They're just so... green.
What are you talking like that for? What—
What are you trying to do, die on me?
Tris, come on.
Come on, Tris.
Come on.
Come on.
Come on, Tris.
Come on, Tris.
We don't use this door anymore.
- If you've come to trade, you'll have to—
- Old Will, couldn't I use it?
You're playing tricks at me.
It is.
It's Master Walter.
- I'm glad to see you.
- Come in. Come in.
Come in, Master Walter.
Well, it looks the same.
And I have the same questions to ask.
How's Grandfather?
He'll never say it, but he's missed you sorely.
Once we hoped that we might see you again.
The king's men came looking for you.
There were very strange men with them such as I had never seen before.
- They said that they had a message to give you.
- What message?
I don't know, Master Walter. They said they would only give it to you when you came.
I'll tell him.
- You lie, you old villain.
- I swear it, my lord.
- He's here.
- Walter, my lad.
- Grandfather.
- Where have you come from?
We thought—Wilderkin, tell my grandson—
I've spoken to him.
- My lord—
- You let me speak to him.
- My lord, I—
- What are you standing there for?
I've broken my knightly vow.
Wilderkin, tell my grandfather that it was my fault—
Tell my grandson that—
Oh, what's the good?
When a vow's broken, you can't put it together again.
Perhaps the good bishop could tell my lord—
What have I got to do with the bishop?
I can set myself my own penance.
- I'll—Well, never mind. I'll think of one.
- Yes, my lord.
Then—Then I can talk to him as much as I want, can't I?
- We've no need of you. Go on about your business.
- Yes, my lord.
Yes, my lord.
So the— the needle that points in the same direction... and those books,
I left in London to be sent to the king.
And as they might need some explanation...
I left word that they could find me here.
And then I—
I came straight here to see you.
But I— I wish I had something more to tell you.
It— It all ought to add up to something.
I've seen Cathay.
But what of that?
For all my talk, there's been no help for Gurnie in it.
And maybe—
Maybe if I'd stayed here, he'd still be in his forest...
Iooking down a shaft at some king's stag.
Well, I—
I should have the answers, lad, if you're troubled.
I'm old enough.
But if I were you, I'd—
My lord. They're here, my lord.
The king's men-at-arms.
- They wish to see Master Walter.
- Bring them in, man. Bring them in.
We're ready for them.
There is a man at Oxford who can best tell you about the importance of the books... and the manner in which they are made— Friar Bacon.
As for the rest, I—
I thought perhaps... the direction-finding needle might prove useful on the sea that surrounds us.
I don't know. However, it's all set down in the books... and your men of science can read about it there.
I am not inclined to believe all this about the fire tubes.
- I think the young man saw a dragon.
- Perhaps I did.
You have told us much and well, young Saxon.
All but the most important part.
I've— I've told you all I know, sire.
All but why you have done these things.
I remember you well, young Saxon.
You refused to enter my service.
You were very outspoken about it.
If you remember, I asked you a question then about this matter of Saxon and Norman.
I have some feeling the answer may lie here, if we can find it... somewhere in this service you have tried to do us.
- I didn't do it for you, sire.
- For whom then?
For him.
He— He wanted it that way, l- I think.
- The bowman?
- Yes, sire.
Why did he wish it, then?
I don't know.
It was something he felt that—
I don't know what it was.
Bayan used to say that nothing existed... except what you could touch.
But it did for him.
What he felt was as clear to him.
He'd— He'd sit there, and it—
Well, it was like a fragrance to him.
It had to be.
He died for it, didn't he?
Do you think it could be that he discovered he was English first and Saxon second?
I— I don't know.
Saxons can feel like this underneath the bitterness.
They can work with a king who would like to be English first and Norman second.
There are some points I would like to dispose of in your case, and in that of the bowman.
As I remember it, there was some question of a name amongst other things.
It is our wish you remain here until I return.
As you knelt Walter of Gurnie, rise Sir Walter Fitzrauf.
And it is our wish that your shield shall bear a longbow as part of your arms.
And as the first act of your knighthood... you shall place this bow, the finest I could find...
above all other
of your arms at Gurnie... since in its presence no man will be able to live less well for England... than did Tristram Griffen.
You will place this upon it as a tribute from me to a brave man.
We have been sent a long way to see you... if you are the one my lord Bayan called the scholar.
Bayan?
If you are that one, I have something
I am ordered to give you.
"To my friend,
Walter the scholar."
 "Bayan of the Hundred Eyes
sends greetings and a message.
"I think that I understand why
you did not return to me...
"and why you went back
to your England.
"I still do not believe
in your foolish chivalry...
"but I like men who are willing
to die for the thing in which they believe...
"wherever I may find them.
"The tall bowman died well...
"and I think you would both have died
well for me if that had been necessary.
"Therefore, I send you something I believe
you would have taken with you if you could.
"She will be wearing a coat you will recognize.
It has a very fine lining.
"I send you also my chessmen
and the message...
- that I would be happier if you were still here. "
- Maryam!
She is not to see you until you tell us that the gift is welcome.
My lord was afraid you might have tired of her.
Maryam!
Moscow M. Gorky Film Studio
QUIET FLOWS THE DON
Part Three
Based on the novel by
Mikhail SHOLOKHOV
Written and Directed by
Sergey GERASIMOV
Director of Photography
Vladimir RAPOPORT
Production Designer
B. DULENKOV
Music by Yu. LEVITIN
Cast:
Panteley Prokofievich Melekhov -
D. ILCHENKO
Ilyinichna - A. FILIPPOVA
Grigory - P. GLEBOV
Darya - L. KHITYAYEVA
Dunyasha - N. ARKHANGELSKAYA
Aksinya - E. BYSTRITSKAYA
Natalya - Z. KIRIYENKO
Mitka Korshunov - B. NOVIKOV
Mikhail Koshevoy - G. KARYAKIN
Yevgeny Listnitsky -
I. DMITRIYEV
Shtokman - V. SHATUNOVSKY
Kotlyarov - A. TITOV
Prokhor Zykov - V. ZAKHARCHENKO
Fomin - V. BUBNOV
QUIET FLOWS THE DON
- Why don't you talk?
- What shall I talk with you about?
About your drinking sprees and your whoring.
You know already?
The whole village knows.
There're people who talk.
If you know, why do you ask?
- So you're doing it again?
- Leave me alone, Natalya.
You damned insatiable lecher!
Why are you torturing me again?
Aren't you ashamed to look your children in the face?
Stop listening to gossip.
Yes, I’ve wronged you a bit.
Our life makes us to do wrong,
Natalya.
We walk on the edge of death.
Well, sometimes a man trips.
I’ve even taken to drink.
Recently I had a fit.
Life is not right.
Maybe it's my fault, too.
We should've made peace with the Reds now against the Cadets. But how?
Who'll heal the breach between us and the Soviets now?
My head is all mixed up,
Natalya.
Stop pulling the wool over my eyes.
You've been a swine and now you blame it on the war.
Haven't I suffered enough on account of you?
I wish I’d finished myself off that time.
Shall I give you a hand, Grisha?
I don't need any help.
Oh, Grigory Panteleyevich, you're so stern with me, poor widow.
Never give me a smile, or even a shrug.
- You'd better go cooking.
- Who wants it!
Then help Natalya.
Mishatka runs around all dirty.
That's all I need! You make them and I must wash them?
Natalya is as fertile as a bitch, she'll make another dozen for you.
My hands will fall off to wash them all.
Go away.
Grigory Panteleyevich, you're the only Cossack left in the village.
Don't drive me away, let me look from a distance at your tempting black moustache.
What a woman you are! How could Pyotr live with you? You never miss a guy.
You bet I won't.
You know, Grisha, the young girls tell me:
«It's not fair.
There're no Cossacks here, and Grisha never leaves his wife's side.
Though he's only a half of what he used to be, we would be happy to touch that half.»
I say to them: «No, girls,
Grisha is lame only at the others' places, but at home he clings to Natalya's skirt.
Lately he's become a saint.»
What a bitch!
You're a real blabbermouth!
That's the way I am.
But if you were mine, I’d knock all your bravery out of you.
Good day, dear Aksinya.
Good day.
It's been a long time.
Yes, a long time.
I’ve even forgotten the sound of your voice.
- So soon?
- You think, too soon?
Have we nothing to say to each other?
Why don't you say something?
We've already said it all, I suppose.
Really?
I think so.
A tree only blossoms once a year.
You think ours has already shed its blossoms?
Don't you think so?
It's so strange.
Yet I can't tear you out of my heart, Ksyusha.
I have grown children,
I myself am turning gray, and I still think of you.
I see you in my dreams,
I still love you.
- And when I remember...
- Me too...
I must go too.
We talked too long.
This is the spot where our love began.
- Remember?
- I remember everything.
- Darya!
- Who is there?
It's me, Aksinya.
Come here.
- Why would you want me?
- I need you very much.
What's this?
A ring?
- For me?
- For you. A keepsake from me.
It's gold. Keep it.
Oh, for Christ's sake.
What do you want me to do for it?
Tell...
Tell Grigory to come out.
You start it all again?
I want to talk to him about helping Stepan get a leave.
- Why don't you come in then?
- No, Natalya might think...
All right, I’ll tell him.
Why should I worry about him?
At the village of Ust-Khopyorskaya
What is it?
- Good morning. Is Koshevoy home?
- What happened?
It's trouble. A mutiny in the Serdobsky Regiment.
The infantry have disarmed the battery.
They're holding a rally by the church right now.
- Where's Koshevoy?
- He went to Ust-Medveditskaya.
I had a hunch yesterday that some trouble was brewing. Get ready.
- Where're the other Communists?
- Who knows?
- Communists, all to a meeting.
- Coming.
You can leave the guns.
You're not going to battle.
Glory to the rank-and-filer!
Silence!
Silence!
Silence!
Red Army men!
Shame on you!
You're betraying the people's government!
At the most critical moment!
You've been sold to Cossack generals!
Your commanders are traitors!
Bullshit!
Come to your senses!
They use you to undermine the rule of the workers and the peasants!
Don't! Don't dare!
You'll have enough time to kill me.
Glory to the Communist fighter!
You can kill me...
But let me speak!
Let me speak!
You can kill me, but I repeat: come to your senses!
Your regiment commander...
Osip Davydovich!
You've been misled.
But Communism...
Will anyway...
Death!
Death to Communists!
To the enemies of working peasants!
Beat them!
They're coming!
Here come the prisoners!
The enemy prisoners!
Look, it's Ivan Alexeyevich...
Look, they've got Kotlyarov!
I see.
Look in their dishonest eyes.
Enough!
They've had their fun!
They wanted to get the land, didn't they?
Here's one from your village.
Look at him, the bastard!
And where's the other?
Where's Mishka Koshevoy?
Only one from your village.
If we tear him to pieces, there'll be enough for everybody.
Come on, neighbour, step back.
- Hello, friend.
- Hello, Darya.
Tell me, my dear, how you killed my husband Pyotr.
No, Darya,
I didn't kill him.
What do you mean you didn't?
Wasn't it you and Mishka Koshevoy who killed our Cossacks?
I was in that battle.
So you were!
What are you doing?!
Are you going to kill your own?
Bitch!
Why locking yourselves up with some rope?
Anybody home?
What's the matter?
Where are Mother and Natalya?
What's happened?
Have the prisoners gone through?
They killed them. Oh God, Grisha!
Our Darya, the bitch, she herself shot Ivan Alexeyevich.
You're lying!
What about Shtokman and Koshevoy?
They weren't among the prisoners.
Mother and Natalya got scared and went to sleep with neighbours.
Darya came home drunk as a beast.
She's sleeping by the barn.
Viper!
Good morning, my good old men!
Good morning,
Your Excellency!
Please accept bread and salt as a welcome from the Cossacks.
Thank you.
Please.
As you see, only old men, women and children are left in the village, who can't wear arms.
You may begin.
All the Cossacks fight on the fronts for our common cause.
Darya Timofeyevna Melekhova!
- Melekhova!
- I’m here!
What?
Oh, yes...
Are you the widow of the killed
Cornet Melekhov?
Yes.
You're going to receive money too,
500 rubles.
The Don Government thanks you for your display of valour and expresses its sympathy.
Can I go?
Yes, yes, of course.
We're awarding women who have shown courage fighting the Bolsheviks.
The first recipient, an officer's widow, herself killed a commissar famous for his cruelty.
O Lord! What did they give you a medal for?
For Ivan Alexeyevich, may he rest in peace, the bastard!
And this is... for Pyotr.
- What will you do with it?
- With what?
- What will you do with the money?
- Whatever I want to.
Take it, Mother, to remember Pyotr.
Order a mass for him and hold a wake.
A few more medals for me and I’ll be a general!
While the officers are fighting, who is going to train the old men?
So they'll be put under my command.
Will I drill them, the old devils!
That's how I’ll drill them!
Attention, old men!
Beards pointing upwards!
Right, march!
And there they march, my old men.
One-two! One-two!
Stop your playing. Blow on it.
O Lord...
What's the matter with you?
Come on, come on...
I’m going to die soon, Natalya.
Stop talking nonsense.
Don't kiss me.
Why not?
I’m diseased.
Now you've done it...
Don't be afraid.
It's not catching this way.
Listen, Natalya,
I want to confess to you.
I’ll die soon anyway.
Whose ring is this?
Come on, don't be afraid too soon.
You know whose ring this is?
Right, our neighbour Aksinya's.
And why did she give it to me?
Think about it.
For sending Grigory out to her.
- Did you never guess it?
- I guessed it.
If you did, why didn't you ask him?
Want me to find out the truth from Aksinya?
She'll tell me everything.
No, I don't want any favours from you.
It's not for pity of me you confessed that you put them together, but to make me suffer even more.
That's right!
Why should I be the only one to suffer?
Do you love your man so much?
As well as I can.
It means you do.
I’ve never known real love.
If I had my life to live again... maybe I’d be different.
I see you're looking ill again.
Anything wrong between you and
Grigory?
He's gone back to Aksinya, Mother.
How... how do you know?
It's true, Mother.
It's your own fault.
Have to keep your eye on a man like him.
I can't tie him to my skirt.
He's gone gray already but doesn't let off.
Is that all your troubles?
Oh, Mother...
What do you mean to do?
What can I do?
Take the children and go to my old folks. I won't live with him anymore.
I thought so too when I was young.
My husband was the same kind.
But where will you go?
Who else needs you?
And to take the children from their father!
Besides, you're expecting another.
No, I won't even hear of it.
No, Mother, I won't live with him any longer.
And I won't bear him any more children!
How can you say such things?
You have no shame.
Come on, enough.
Stop crying, save some tears for next time.
O Lord! He's wrung my heart out of me!
I can't go on like this!
May the Lord punish him!
May the Lord strike him dead!
Let him be dead and not torture me any more!
- Have you gone mad?
- Punish him, O Lord!
Stand on your knees!
You hear me, Natalya?
Ask God's forgiveness.
Say you take those words back.
Praying for the death of your children's father!
What a sin!
Bow to the ground and say:
«O Lord, forgive me for my sins.»
En-cy-clo-pe-di...
Encyclopedia.
Wait.
And here?
Cookbook.
Where's Natalya?
- What?
- Where is Natalya?
Collected a bundle and went out.
- When?
- In the morning.
And what did she say?
What bundle?
How do I know?
Took a clean skirt, something else, and didn't say anything.
Oh, poor girl...
Oh, what a misfortune...
What a misfortune!
Is Father home?
What have you done to yourself?!
Hush, Mamma.
Help me to bed.
It's all right, it's all right...
Oh, poor girl...
Why are you standing?
Prepare the bed.
Strip off the clean linen.
Spread old rags instead.
Shut up.
Go away and don't come back!
You have nothing to do here.
Get the horse and drive for the doctor.
What are you talking about?
Now what's happened?
Natalya...
The shameless woman!
To do a thing like that!
Father, don't come in, for Christ's sake.
To do such a thing, the Devil's daughter!
Are you crazy, old man?
Don't poke in here!
Why are you dawdling, like a beetle in the dunghill?
Natalya's dying!
Go! Or I’ll go myself!
Have you gone crazy?
Shut up, you sticking scab!
Shouting at your father!
Cover me with a fur coat.
When I die, Mamma, dress me in my green skirt, the one with a stitched flounce.
Grisha liked it on me.
Don't cry, Mamma...
It's nothing...
You said you'd be dying soon, Darya.
You have years and years ahead of you.
And here my last hour has come.
What's the matter with you, Mamma?
I’ve fallen ill.
Come closer, my poor boy.
- Will you have supper, Mamma?
- I don't know. I think not.
Then I’ll bring it in here, all right?
Bend down, Mishatka.
You're so like your father...
Only kinder-hearted...
Give him to me.
Grigory Panteleyevich, not so fast, you'll kill the horse!
Grigory Panteleyevich!
The horse is done for!
We couldn't save her...
In the late July of 1919, the Don White Guard Army's forward units were stationed at Balashov.
«Rule Britannia, Britannia rule the waves.”
To your country, Mr. Campbell.
What a wonderful country it is,
Captain.
You can't imagine it.
But I lived there.
Let's drink.
Mr. Campbell doesn't believe we'll beat the Reds.
- He doesn't?
- No, he doesn't.
He criticizes our army and praises the Reds.
This damned cognac!
Strong as pure alcohol.
Yes, pretty powerful.
You know, I like you, Captain.
But why are you so sad?
What happened, Captain?
My wife died recently.
Oh, it's awful.
Why does he think highly of the Reds?
Think highly?
Who said he does?
You said so.
Impossible!
He can't think highly of them.
I’ll ask him.
- What's he saying?
- Wait.
He's seen them marching along, he's seen barefooted soldiers going against tanks.
That was enough for him.
He says you can't win fighting the people.
He's a fool! Don't believe him.
- Why not?
- Don't believe a word of his.
- What do you mean?
- He's drunk and talking nonsense.
Why can't you win the people?
Part of them... can be killed off.
And the rest brought into execution.
What did I say? Execution?
No, into submission.
Listen to me:
Go back home quick.
While you still have a head on your shoulders.
No reason for you to get mixed up in our affairs.
Go, please, or you'll be sorry.
- You hear the music, granny?
- What music?
Which is all bass music.
I hear, but I can't understand what it is.
You'll soon understand.
It's cannon fire.
They're tearing our old men's guts out.
When the Don freezes over, the Reds will chase us all the way to the sea.
- Where're you going?
- Bathing in the Don.
Who bathes in this season?
It's all right, Mamma.
Oh, God...
Go and play in the yard.
Keep off the street, or they'll trample you down.
Mishatka, come here.
My dear boy!
Grisha's son.
My darling!
I’ve missed you so much.
What a fool, your Aunt Aksinya.
Oh, what a fool!
- Don't look at me.
- Why not?
Don't look, I don't like it.
Since when you don't?
I don't and that's it.
All right, I’ll go in like this.
- Hello, Mashutka!
- Hello!
Goodbye, Dunya!
Darya, what's the matter?
Come back!
Darya!
Darya's drowned!
Darya's drowned!
Darya's drowned!
Father long mobilized?
No.
He was hiding but Mitka Korshunov betrayed him.
Even relatives turn against each other, nowadays.
- He's no relative to us.
- The beast, real beast.
Killed Granny Koshevaya and the children.
That was his revenge to Mishka.
And nobody stopped him?
Who would?
Everyone has his own troubles.
Too bad I wasn't here.
You're getting old, brother.
All gray like a lone wolf.
My time has come.
It's my time to grow old, yours to seek a bridegroom.
Only listen to my words.
Don't you dare think of Mishka
Koshevoy.
My feeling sorry for his mother changes nothing.
This is a different matter.
If I hear you're seeing him,
I’ll tear you limb from limb, like a frog.
- When are you leaving?
- Tomorrow.
You know...
I want to take
Aksinya Astakhova with me.
You have no objections?
What do I care?
You can take as many as two Aksinyas.
It'll be hard on the horses.
What the devil do you want her for?
That's none of your business.
Well, the war's over.
The Reds gave us such a push, we'll run all the way to the sea now until we end up with our ass in the salty water.
What are you grinning at?
You look like a young bride.
Glad to have escaped from the village?
Of course, I am.
Some escape.
You're a stupid woman.
Who knows how this excursion is going to end.
I won't be worse off, anyhow.
You'd better keep mum.
Where's your husband?
Running away with a lover and going nobody knows where!
What if Stepan comes home, what then?
You know what, Prosha? You'd better not meddle in our affairs, or you'll have no luck either.
Save your bickering. We've a long way to go, you'll have enough time.
- Grisha!
- I’m here, I’m here.
You see? I’m here, Ksyusha.
Grisha...
It's bad, Grisha.
Grisha...
I’m here.
I’m here, Ksyusha.
Close the door tightly.
- Is she his wife?
- Yes, his wife.
Any children?
Yes, we've got everything but luck.
Listen, friend, help me in my trouble, for Christ's sake.
We can't take her any farther, she'll die.
Let her stay with you.
I’ll pay you for taking care of her.
Naturally. Who would look after her for nothing?
As it is we've more work than we can manage.
Do it, please. I’ll remember your kindness all my life.
How much would you pay?
How much can you afford?
Take all I have.
What kind of money is that?
Haven't you any tsarist bills?
No.
Maybe Kerensky's, then?
- This money isn't very reliable.
- I have no Kerensky's money.
Do you want my horse?
- Take it.
- Take it...
It's no use, If the Whites don't confiscate it, the Reds will.
What? What?
Here, take this!
Choke on it.
All right, we'll do you the favour.
Novorossiyisk
March 27, 1920
While we fought, they needed us.
Now they don't care a hoot for us.
Damn them, let's get away from here.
Let's go to Tiflis, and from there to the Turks.
Have to save our skins somehow.
Why are you as gloomy as a fish?
No, I won't go.
What for?
Anyway, it's too late.
Look!
The Reds!
And once again spring came to the village of Tatarsky.
Good day, dear neighbour.
You've been away a long time.
Why do you stare at me and keep silent?
Have you brought bad news?
What about Grigory...
Was he sick when you parted?
No, he wasn't sick.
Thank God for that.
It can't be that I should lose my last son.
There's nothing for God to punish me for.
Don't worry about him, Grandma.
He won't get sick.
He's strong as iron.
Such men don't die.
Did he ever think of the children?
Yes, of both you and the children.
Are they well?
What can happen to them?
But Panteley Prokofievich had died when they retreated.
We're left all alone now.
Well, goodbye.
When you get settled, come to see us.
If you hear from Grigory, let me know.
All right, Grandma.
Hello, Aunt Ilyinichna.
You weren't expecting me, were you?
Hello. What are you to me that I should expect you?
A twice-removed cousin to our fence?
- We were acquainted, you know.
- And nothing more.
- I haven't come to live with you.
- That's all we need!
Where is Dunyasha?
Tidying up the house.
You're an early guest.
Good people don't come that early.
I’ve been longing for her.
I didn't care what time it was.
Mikhail, you'd better not make me angry.
How am I angering you, auntie?
How can you have the gall to come to our house?
How dare you even ask?
Who killed Pyotr? Wasn't it you?
Yes, I did.
Then what are you to be called after that?
And you come here and sit down as if...
- Hello.
- Hello.
Go and fetch water.
How can you face me?
I’ve no reason to hang my head.
If Pyotr had caught me, what would he have done?
He would have killed me too.
We weren't at war with each other in order to play kissing games.
War is war, you know.
And my hand is steady when I see the enemy.
That's why you've gone all yellow, because of that steadiness.
It must be your conscience that's eating you.
Not my conscience, but a fever.
- Otherwise, Mother, I would...
- I’m not a mother to you!
Murderer!
Get out of here!
Get out!
I can't bear the sight of you.
And your Mitka Korshunov, isn't he a murderer?
And Grigory?
Why do you keep quiet about him?
If anybody's a murderer, it's he!
Are you going to mow in the meadow?
Everybody went to the other bank.
We have nothing to cross in.
The boat's dried up.
It should be put in the water.
Who's is going to drag it down there?
Have you got any tow?
There must be some.
I’ll see.
- Hello, namesake.
- Hello.
What are you going to do?
What I’m going to do?
Have to fix your boat.
Will you make a small rake for me?
I will.
What is it with you?
Listen, namesake, bring me some covering. I’ll lie down.
Grandma! Grandma!
Uncle Mikhail is lying in the shed, all shivering.
Why don't you say something, Grandma?
Take him a blanket. Let him cover himself, the antichrist.
He's got a fever.
- Can you carry it?
- I can.
Wait!
Don't bother.
Dunya!
- Prokhor Zykov is back.
- Really?!
He got wounded. I’ll go see if he knows anything about Grigory.
Hello, companion!
Never thought to see you alive.
Hello, Prokhor.
I see that typhus makes your kind even prettier.
Come on in, sit down.
Be our guest.
Let's talk until my wife is back.
I’ve sent her for some home brew.
See how Polacks have worked on me?
Damn the bastards!
You'd better tell me...
I know. Grigory asked me to give you a bow for him.
Why are you howling, you fool?
Women! Bad news or good, they howl!
Wipe your face. He's alive and well, he's even put on weight.
In Novorossiyisk, the two of us joined Comrade Budyonny's Cavalry.
Right. Grigory was put in command of a hundred.
A squadron. And I was under him.
And we went straight to Kiev.
Will he be coming on leave?..
Don't even dream of it.
He said: «I’ll serve until
I atone for my past sins.»
Ever in battle.
He's earned a citation.
That's your Grigory for you!
Sit down, let's have tea.
No, thanks...
Go on, then, run and tell the whole village.
What are you doing, Mamma?
Well, Dunyasha...
When I come in from the yard, it eases my heart.
As if he's with us already.
Mamma, give me your blessing to marry Mikhail.
There you go again!
No, I won't give you my blessing.
I won't give you to him.
Then I’ll run away from home.
Are you mad?!
What will I do alone with the children?
Do you want to ruin us?
As you wish, Mamma.
I’ll go all the same.
People are saying we hired
Mikhail to be our labourer.
My late mother blessed me with this icon.
Taken all your things?
That's better...
Don't take any of mine.
Why the burial clothes?
It's early for you to be thinking of dying. God forbid!
No... it's time.
Look after the children till Grisha comes.
I’m afraid I won't live to see him.
Why a church wedding?
- Can't we do without?
- No, Misha, don't even mention it.
Mother feels bad enough about us as it is.
Oh, well...
What can I do with you?
Grisha!
My darling!
My dear son!
Mamma's getting ready to die.
What do you want?
You can retire, old man.
I’ve been appointed in your place.
- Thank God!
- Hand over all the stuff.
Here, son, are all the papers.
And more papers.
And still more.
And here's...
There it is! The village seal.
Take it all, for the love of Christ.
And what about me?
I’m over 70. It's time for me to make my peace with the Lord, instead they've made me a chairman.
- Where's the secretary?
- What?
- I say, where's the secretary?
- Out sowing.
He's not been around since
Yegoryev Day.
When an important paper arrives, you can't find him even with dogs.
And I can hardly sign my name, and can't read at all.
All I can do is stamp papers.
This is the lot.
There's no money.
No ataman's scepter under the Soviets.
If you like,
I can leave you my crutch.
Well, granddad, let's say you've handed everything over.
Now get the hell out of here!
- Where to?
- Take yourself home!
Ah, all right.
I recognized you at once.
You're the late Koshevoy's son.
- Yes, I am.
- Good day to you, then.
Go, go!
- What happened?
- Grisha's come home!
Congratulations.
- Hello, Misha.
- Hello, hello!
It's been a long time.
Like a hundred years.
Yes, you're right.
Welcome home.
Thanks.
So we're kin now?
Yes, looks like it.
What's that blood on your cheek?
Cut myself while shaving. I was in a hurry.
What is it?
Want to call someone to kill a sheep.
The master ought to be given a fitting welcome.
Tell Prokhor Zykov to dig up some home brew.
He knows better how to do it.
And invite him for supper.
Well... my dear hostess?
Grigory Panteleyevich!
Grigory Panteleyevich!
My dear man!
I never thought
I’d live to see the day!
- Come for good?
- For good.
What rank did you rise to?
Deputy regimental commander.
Why did they discharge you so soon?
Had no more use for me.
Why so?
Because of my past, I guess.
Where's Mikhail?
In the yard.
Platon Ryabchikov was shot last month.
- No, they couldn't!
- Believe me, they did.
Well, we'll talk later.
Let's drink, Commander!
Come in, Ksyusha.
Sit down, be our guest.
Hello.
Hello, Ksyusha.
Sit down.
Our companion, Ksyusha!
We retreated together, we fed lice together.
Drink to the health of Grigory Panteleyevich.
Don't listen to him, he's already drunk.
To your return,
Grigory Panteleyevich!
And to your joy, Dunya.
What about you? To your sorrow?
And to my joy! A great joy.
Bottoms up, for Christ's sake.
You talk straight, drink straight, too.
When something's left in the glass, it's like a knife in my heart.
You, Mikhail, are like a calf in those matters.
And I know about drinks.
There's such a wine - you hardly take a cork out, and it's all foaming, like a rabid dog.
That night I fell from my horse three times, as if I was blown off.
A glass of such wine is great on an empty stomach.
How are you?
Oh, there's too much to tell.
- Will you come?
- I will.
I’m not taking the jug.
I hate to walk with an empty vessel.
My wife will nag me.
Will you get home all right?
I will, even if I’ll have to crawl.
Aren't I a Cossack?
You're insulting me.
Wait.
Shall we talk, Mikhail?
All right, let's talk.
Something's wrong between us.
My coming isn't to you liking, is it?
Right, it isn't.
- Why not?
- Additional trouble.
Don't worry, I can make my own living.
I didn't mean that.
What, then?
You and I are enemies.
- We were.
- I guess we will.
Why?
You killed too many of our fighters.
That's why I can't look at you and not feel hatred.
I can't forget it.
You've got a good memory.
You killed my brother Pyotr, and I don't remind you about it.
If we remember everything, we'll live like wolves.
I can imagine how you would've talked to me if we had the Cadets' rule now, if it were you who had won over.
I guess you would've cut belts out of my back.
But now you seem so kind.
I don't know about others, but I’d not have dirtied my hands with you.
So we're not alike.
I’ve never been too shy to dirty my hands with the enemy, and if need be, would do it right now.
Want to have a drink?
Yes, for we seem to be too sober for this talk.
So you're afraid, Mikhail, that I will rebel against the Soviets?
I’m afraid of nothing, but I’m sure that once there's some trouble, you'll join the other side.
I’m not going to join anybody.
I’ve done my service. I’m not going to serve anybody any more.
In my life I’ve done more than enough fighting.
My soul is exhausted.
I’m fed up with everything: revolution, counter-revolution.
Let it all go to hell!
I want to live with my children and work at the farm.
That's all.
No, man, that's not all.
The revolutionary tribunal won't be asking you what you want.
When are you going to register at Vyoshenskaya?
- One of these days.
- You must go tomorrow.
Give me a day to rest.
I won't run away.
The devil only knows. I don't want to be responsible for you.
What a bastard you've become.
Don't you bastard me.
I’m not used to that.
You ought to get rid of those officer's ways of yours.
Go there tomorrow.
If you don't go by yourself,
I’ll have you convoyed. Is it clear?
Everything's clear to me now.
My darling Grisha...
How gray you've gotten.
You're growing old, aren't you?
Oh, what a lad you used to be!
It's Dunyasha.
Run quick, brother!
Four men have come from the town, they say you're to be arrested.
Thank you, sister.
Some bread, quick!
Not the whole one, just a piece!
Go back or they'll notice your absence.
Goodbye.
Goodbye.
I’ll send word of myself.
Through Prokhor.
Lock the door. If they ask, say I went to Vyoshenskaya.
Goodbye.
Grisha...
Stop! Stop, son of a bitch!
Who are you? A Communist?
Hands out of your pockets or I’ll slice your head off!
- Go ahead.
- Where to?
Forward!
Hands behind your back!
- And who are you?
- Russian Orthodox men. Go on.
Melekhov?
Hello.
Really, the steppe is wide, but the road is narrow!
Where've you turned up from?
- Hello.
- Hello.
Take your coat off and sit down.
Where did my guys catch you?
Near the village.
Where were you heading?
Wherever my feet took me.
You think we caught you and take your to Vyoshenskaya?
No, man, we're barred from that place.
Don't get scared. We don't serve the Soviets any longer.
We're divorced from them.
I’m thinking of stirring up the Cossacks.
Stop fidgeting.
Do you hear me?
We hear there's war all around, there're rebellions everywhere, in Siberia, in the Ukraine, and even in Petrograd.
The whole fleet has risen in that fortress... what's its name...
In Kronshtadt.
Idiot!
Well, what do you decide?
Speak up and let's go to bed.
Decide about what?
Are you going with us or what?
You can't hide in someone else's barns all your life.
You're right.
I’ve got no choice.
I’ll join your band.
What do you mean, band?
Stop calling us names.
Why do you call us a band?
It's the Communists who call us that, but you shouldn't.
We're just rebels. Brief and clear.
All right, that's it.
I’m giving you my horse.
I’ve got another one.
The red-haired one.
Cossacks! You know of your own experience what burdens the Soviets have saddled you with.
If they're not overthrown, you'll face final ruin.
Good day!
See my strong army!
With such boys, we can win over the devil himself.
The Soviets are doomed.
And you?
Stop your babbling.
Cossacks!
Learn how to speak from me.
Cossacks!
As of today, we free you of a requisition for farm produce.
You are not to deliver grain any more!
It is time to stop feeding the Communist parasites!
They've been fattening on your bread!
But we're ending all that.
You are free people!
Arm yourselves and support our government!
Hurray, Cossacks!
Your government is good, but have you brought us soap?
Whose bread are you eating?
They'll start stealing from our houses.
They've got sabers, they'll cut our chickens' heads.
What do you mean, not to deliver grain?
Today you're here, but tomorrow we're to answer for you?
We won't give you our men!
Go and fight yourselves.
No one's going to join them.
We don't need to rebel.
It's time for harvesting, not fighting.
Look at this one with a moustache, riding around stirring folk up.
Don't you teach us!
Nothing to say, red devil?
Aren't I right?
Shut up, you pockmarked bitch!
Stop your agitating!
You Bolshevik swine! I’ll knock this nonsense out of your head!
I’ll have you whipped on your bare bottom, and you'll get to your senses!
Like hell you will!
Whipping me?!
Go whistle for it!
Look at him, our Tsar Liberator!
To horse! The Reds!
We'll yet see who wins.
I shan't lay down arms.
Sit down to supper, brigands.
I’m a convinced fighter against the Soviets.
And you call me a brigand.
- Rightly so.
- Rightly?
Don't you understand, fool, that I’m fighting for an idea?
Stop pulling wool over my eyes.
Some «idealist» you are.
A born brigand.
Good or bad, but the Soviet government has held on since 1917.
Anyone who fights against it is a brigand.
Stop wolfing the food.
You're not alone yet.
There are four of us.
If one goes, the other three will have more.
What?
You want to run away?
I’ve nowhere to run and no one to run from.
But I’m going and you can't stop me.
Stop it, Melekhov!
I’ll shoot!
You won't.
You can't risk any noise.
Hello, Ksyusha!
Wait! Quiet. Don't open the door.
I’ll come through the window.
How are you?
Where have you been?
What if you're caught, Grisha?
Don't worry.
Will you go with me?
Where?
To the south, the Kuban, or even farther.
We'll earn a living.
I’ll take any work.
My hands long for work, not a gun. Will you go?
What do you think?
What do you think?
I’d walk,
I’d crawl anywhere after you.
I can't live without you, Grisha.
What about the children?
Dunyasha will care for them.
Afterwards we'll take them.
So you going?
Grisha!
Once before we went like this to Yagodnoye.
Only our bundle was bigger and we were younger.
Why do you carry your rifle?
What do you need it for?
I’ll throw it away farther on.
I’ll throw everything away, Ksyusha.
Will you manage to hang on?
Lord, I’d ride, or crawl, or anything.
When we get out of the ravine, the going will be easier.
Halt! Who goes there?
Go on, Ksyusha!
Keep lower!
Halt!
A hit, I think.
For God's sake, say at least one word! Why don't you?
What are you doing here?
Whom have you buried?
My wife.
- Where are you going?
- To look for an easy life.
Come with me?
An easy life?
No. Go alone.
And you, where will you go?
Home?
Yes, home.
Take the horse.
Thank you very much.
Good luck.
Good luck...
Mishatka!
My son!
My little son... my son!
The End
Today, the glory of ancient Egypt is ruins and dust.
And this greatest of the earth's earliest civilizations, are things of darkness and mystery.
These mighty monuments tell us of a people, who were rulers of the world.
Created a civilization never surpassed in beauty and splendor.
But the Egyptians were not only builders of monuments, they were human beings, no different from ourselves.
This is the story of a man who dwelled in the ancient land of the Nile.
Thirty-three centuries ago.
I, Sinuhe the Egyptian write this... in my place of exile, on the shores of the Red Sea.
There is no more desolate spot on earth.
Soon the jackals and the vultures, will make a poor meal of what is left of me.
No monument will mark my resting place.
I will leave only this.
The story of my life.
I have lived fully and deeply.
I have tasted passion, crime, and even murder.
It is for you to judge me.
You must weigh the good against the evil.
The passion against the tenderness.
The crime against the charity.
The pleasure against the pain.
I began life as I am ending it, alone.
I rode alone on the bosom of the Nile.
In a boat of reeds daubed with pitch and tied with fowler's knots.
Thus the city of Thebes was accustomed to dispose of its unwanted children.
I grew up on the waterfront of the city.
In the house of my foster parents.
Who had saved me from the river.
My foster father lived there by choice.
Because he was, also by choice, physician of the poor of the city.
From the rich he could have commanded princely fees.
For he alone in Thebes, was the Master of the ancient art of opening skulls.
Have more of the good wine ready.
Afraid, Sinuhe?
Good.
You must never fear death.
In our craft death is a familiar companion.
This time we cheat him.
Look.
This tiny splinter of bone pressing on the brain.
When I remove it, he will speak again.
Will walk, and live.
Why father? Why?
No one knows.
From the beginning I kept to myself.
I used to wander alone on the banks of the Nile.
Until the day came when I was ready to enter the School of Life.
In the School of Life, were trained the chosen young men of Egypt.
The future scientists and philosophers, statesmen and generals.
All learning of Egypt lay in the keeping of the Gods.
For ten years, I serve them in the school.
That I might earn the right to call myself a "Physician."
I learned to bend my body to them.
But that was all.
My mind still asked the question:
"Why?"
Sinuhe... be careful, the priests!
Free wine!
To the health of our classmate, Horemheb!
The best swordsman, the finest horseman, the fastest runner, and the strongest wrestler.
And the first one to tell you that!
Well, if you don't speak well of yourself, no one will do it for you.
This I learned from the Gods.
You drunk to what I am, now drink to what I will be.
For the day will come, when
I will carry the Golden Whip, and lead you all into battle.
Hey, you're not drinking, my friend.
- Wine!
- He's had enough.
Never enough for a friend.
Finish the night in some gutter with his throat cut.
He's under my protection.
To your future!
Look at our brilliant physician!
The honor student!
He's got the reeling sickness!
Can I help you?
Just a second. Don't throw things at my friend!
He's alive!
Who is he?
He's a stubborn arrogant fool, but he is my best friend.
Then take him home.
A tavern wench can't give orders to the son of a Falcon.
The son of a cheese-maker!
Take him home!
Good night physician.
Your friend is the fool, not you.
Why does no one ever answer me when I ask "why"?
Come on, let's go.
How did she know your father was a cheese-maker?
The Queen of Cities,
Thebes, of the hundred gates.
Capital of the world.
After my graduation from the School of Life.
I set myself up as physician on the waterfront.
Far from my father's house.
Lest I steal his patients from him.
But I found that not even the poorest of patients, would come to the door of so young a physician.
I had to go out into the streets in search of them.
Too late for that one.
Come over here, into the shade.
Here, sit down!
I can help you.
Under certain conditions, blindness can be cured with a needle.
Alas, no physician can restore my eye.
My first Master put it out when I drank a jar of beer, and refilled in a manner which displeased him.
Then what is the matter with you?
Nothing, I'm as healthy as the 40 sacred baboons.
My name is Kaptah, and I've decided to be your servant.
Even if I needed one,
I couldn't afford it.
And if I could afford it, I wouldn't employ a ragged beggar.
I may be ragged, but I'm intelligent, and I am handsome, and I can read.
Well, you're quite right, Master,
I am a poor servant.
But than you're a poor physician and deserve no better.
I shall obey your orders.
You may beat me, within reason.
And in return, I will steal from you
...also within reason.
Oh! Then you admit you're a thief?
We are all thieves. Only the dishonest ones deny it.
I will improve your reputation.
People will say:
"He must be a good physician if he can afford a servant "
With one eye? They will say:
"He must be a poor physician not to have cured his own servant."
Well, I shall say that when you first bought me I was totally blind, and that you restored half my sight.
Master!
Master!
Heave!... Heave!... Heave!...
ARUGH!!... ARRUGHH!.. ARRUGHH!..
ARRRUGHHH!!! ARUGH!...
Heave!... Heave!... Heave!...
Master, Master!
Master, come quickly!
Come quickly!
Look! This is your chance!
I told you I would make your reputation.
Come here everybody!
Come here and watch!
You shall see such wonders as your eyes have never beheld.
The Gods themselves has instructed my master in his art.
Known to him are the ancient spells and potions of our ancestors.
Come here and watch!
Someone bring water.
Here's water.
Moisten the cloth, and squeeze it between his lips.
I'll need fire to purify my instruments.
Fire, bring fire, for the worker of wonders!
The fire won't be needed. He's dead.
Wonders! Observe the wisdom and mercy of my master!
Lest this poor soul be forced to hobble for the rest of his life on one foot.
My Master has granted him the boon of death.
No one could have saved him.
Saved him?
For what?
So the young physician is still asking "why"?
Master... that's a dangerous woman.
Dangerous?
The look in her eyes, the look of a carping call of a ewe for it's lamb.
Beware of such looks, Master, her mind is on breaking a jar with you... on marriage.
I don't even know her name.
Her name was Merit. She was a tavern maid.
And she could neither read, nor write.
She loved me all her life.
But this I didn't learn, until it was too late.
People of Thebes!
Ask pity of the Gods.
Pharaoh is dead.
They have been caterwauling all night!
Do these fools think that they can bring Pharaoh back to life?
Why don't you take him home?
It's early morning.
What's wrong with him?
He was refused an appointment in the palace guards because of his birth.
You don't have to lower your voice.
I know what you're saying!
Yeah, I was refused...
...refused because of my birth!
Look at the ones they've excepted!
Menacing perfumed idiots, who carry sunshades, and twitter like birds!
How long until dawn?
An hour, perhaps.
You ever hunt lions?
No.
I saw a black mane male drinking from a pool at sunset.
But if he never hunted lions...
He is under my protection,
I told you once before.
I need no protection.
I'll bring you back the skin of a lion myself.
Suppose the lion brings back your skin? What happens to me?
Find another master to rob, richer than I am.
Sinuhe please be careful.
To pay our score.
May it benefit you.
Let's go before she changes your mind!
You know that's how I lost my eye...
...lion hunting.
Son of a cheese-maker.
Why didn't you run, you fool?
You were nearly killed!
Be quiet.
The God is coming.
What's he talking about?
He said "the God" is coming.
Which God?
He is coming. Aton!
Aton?
Look!
He worships the face of the sun.
Thy dawning is beautiful, in the horizon of heaven.
Oh, living Aton, beginning of life...
What's the matter with him?
He has the holy sickness.
At least I can prevent him from biting his tongue.
Well, we can't leave him here.
Let's take him into the city.
Seize them!
What's wrong? What have we done?
You'll find out in good time.
Put them in chains.
For two days, we were held without knowledge of the reason for our arrest.
Then we were taken under guard to the Royal Palace.
Silence!
On your faces!
Our new Pharaoh comes!
On your faces before the Living God.
The one we called fool, is Pharaoh.
We'll lose our heads for this.
Princess, come back!
Mighty Pharaoh! King of Upper and Lower Egypt...
Princess!
Look, Father!
Hush! Your father is busy.
But I want him to see my new monkey.
Not now, child.
Sit down, Princess.
Mighty Pharaoh! King of Upper and Lower Egypt.
Son of the Sun...
You have feet.
Stand on them.
You will please me much better, if you will all rise.
My heart is heavy because of my father's death.
Let us finish our affairs as quickly as possible.
The Embassies of Hati and Kush.
Come to pay respects to our new Pharaoh.
There are gifts from...
- Later.
I wish to see the two prisoners you spoke of.
Are they here?
Yes, Sire.
Come forward.
On your knees!
On your feet!
Why have these men have been held without trial?
Their crime is sacrilege, Sire.
They laid hands on the sacred person of Pharaoh.
Sinuhe, a physician, the son of Semut.
Horemheb, the son of a cheese-maker.
Come forward.
For a cheese-maker he has bold eyes.
The other one, the physician... notice his features.
You are the son of Semut?
I've heard of his work among the poor.
Come closer.
Sire! He must die! He laid hands on you!
I know that. It was to help me.
The law makes no such distinction, Sire!
Have I the power to change the law?
There is no limit to Pharaoh's power!
The law is changed!
I appoint you physician to my household.
I am deeply grateful, Sire.
But I can not accept this honor.
Why not?
I've sworn an oath to serve the poor.
Because of your father?
For that, and other reasons.
Semut is not my real father.
My parents must have been of the poor themselves.
For as a baby,
I was cast adrift on the
Nile, in a reed boat.
And you never learned who your parents were?
Perhaps they were fowlers.
The boat was tied with fowler's knots.
"Fowler's knots"? Did you say... "fowler's knots"?
Yes!
Why do you ask, Mother?
Curiosity, my son.
You may honor your vows
Sinuhe, and serve the poor.
But on the condition you bind yourself to come to the palace, whenever I or my family, have need of you.
Thank you, Sire!
This other one is no healer, this cheese-maker's son.
Yet, he too, profane Pharaoh with his touch.
Sire, may I speak?
Speak!
Horemheb saved your life by slaying the lion.
What is Horemhed's desire?
To let my sword drink the blood of Pharaoh's enemies...
...as my arrows drank the lion's blood.
This has been foretold is my... destiny.
And is the destiny of Egypt to be written in blood?
It has always been, Sire.
As long as there's war, blood must flow.
What is your request?
An appointment, Sire.
As an officer in your guards.
You request is granted!
I wish he asked to be our cheese-maker.
Princess!
I wish he would!
The sun is setting.
Forgive me all.
I will return to my meditations.
Come, my children.
My Lord, the Princess Baketamon commands your presence.
Follow me.
Not you.
This way, my lord.
Come in physician. My mother wishes a word with you.
He won't hurt you.
Some more beer.
Come closer.
So, you never learned who your parents were?
Surely you tried to find out?
Speak up!
I'm content with the parents
I have, your Majesty.
In what year were you cast adrift?
In the same year that Pharaoh was born.
So I've been told.
Why does your Majesty?...
You're not here to ask questions.
My mother wishes for you to examine her.
I know that I'm dying.
I want to know how long it will take.
Don't be shy.
Once, I enjoyed the touch of a man's hand.
How long ago!
Why do you stop, physician?
To admire the way that a Queen can weave a mat of reeds?
Those are fowler's knots!
Didn't you know that my family were bird catchers in the Lower Kingdom?
And I caught an eagle in my net...
Pharaoh himself.
He loved me, Sinuhe.
Because I was strong and musty.
Because I was vulgar and unlearned, and told him the truth.
His other wives, the high born delicate ones, with their narrow heads.
How they hated me.
So I swore I would give him a son to wear the Double Crown.
And I did.
But the Gods were perverts.
They gave me a son as soft as a woman, and a daughter as hard as a man.
Baketamon here, should be Pharaoh.
Not her brother.
Well, what do you find?
If your Majesty will forgive me...
Tell her the truth.
If you want to live much longer.
You must give up the strong brew.
What impenitence. I was drinking beer before you were born.
Her Majesty asked me for the truth.
Now I'll give you some advice, young man.
Never tell the truth to a old woman.
Especially if she ask for it.
Go now, you weary me.
What did she want?
I'm not sure.
Did she speak of me?
No.
Some day, when I command the armies, I...
You know, when I think of her, my blood boils.
Tell me, my friend.
Do you have a potion of something to cool my fever?
The wise men say that: "One evil spirit can only be driven out by another."
You mean, another woman?
Of course.
A noble medicine.
I know just the place.
A woman from Babylon. She gives a banquet every night.
She won't mind two additional guests.
- No, I...
- Look,
We've got to celebrate our good fortune.
Don't worry, my friend. You're always under my protection.
Let's go outside. We'll show you the garden.
Sinuhe, my friend.
Let's go out in the garden, and pick a few flowers.
No, I'll wait for you here.
Alright, I'll pick a few for you.
"Meowww!"
Have you never looked at a woman before?
Hundreds.
And in the state the Gods created them.
I'm a physician.
Your name?
I'm called Sinuhe.
"He who is alone."
Is this is your house?
This is my house.
And I have guest in the evening.
I dislike being alone.
Baraka!
The inscription of the new Pharaoh!
His gift.
I must leave now.
Why?
Because men bring you rich presents... for as little as a smile.
This is all I have.
I have never asked a man for anything.
But I ask you to stay!
I can't...
Is it because we women of Babylon have such a bad reputation?
Or do you find me so ugly?
Do you?
You're beautiful.
Beyond all dreams.
Such flattery must come easily... to a man whose known "hundreds of women."
No one before has ever seemed to me so beautiful.
So strange.
When I look in your eyes, I...
I feel...
What do you feel, Sinuhe?
I feel the fever of Thebes, in my blood.
And I know I was born to live in sunset of the world.
Nothing matters... nothing...
But what I see in your eyes.
It's late, I...
I must be leaving.
If you go for fun with wine, and wild songs, you will surely get into trouble, with some designing woman.
Would you care?
No, I brought you here only to show you the gate in my garden wall.
Later, when all my guests are gone...
I'll be here by my lotus pond.
Why do you tell me this?
Perhaps because I'm fond of gifts, and the greatest gift any man can bring to a woman... is his innocence.
Which he can give only once.
Wait.
Before you touch me, I must give you a warning.
Warning?
There is a reason why the Goddess of Love takes the form of a cat.
When I look at you, I care nothing of cats or Gods.
Look, Sinuhe.
A cat's paws are soft, but they hide claws.
A cat takes pleasure in tormenting his victim.
Not until the creature is nearly dead... will it show pity, and put an end to it.
What does this to do with you and me?
You hadn't any experience... and I must be, what I am.
Leave now... and do not return to the gate in my wall, or you may regret it all your life.
I don't even know your name.
In their foolishness, men gave me a name which means "beautiful."
Nefer!... Nefer!... Nefer!...
It's no business of mine, where he spends his time.
If you don't consider it your business, why are you so angry with me?
Get out.
For a whole week now, he's telling me to send his patients to other physicians.
Even had to return the coppers I've excepted for appointments with him.
This woman stole his mind.
He's as mad as a jackal, that prowls round about the grave in a time of drought.
And I'm as mad as he is!
It was you I warn him against!
Then why come to me now?
There are worse things than marriage.
How could I be such a fool to even dream of it?
He is a physician to Pharaoh, and I'm ...
Kapta, what can I do?
Offer him more then she can.
Get out, you one-eyed son of a baboon!
Out!
GET OUT!
Why do you wait, Sinuhe?
I told you that tonight that I'm engaged.
I'm entertaining a merchant from Syria.
If he touches you, I'll kill him.
Only foolish boys speak in such terms.
I must confess, Sinuhe.
I find that appealing.
Very appealing.
You're not like the others.
You're young, and strong, and innocent.
But unfortunately, I must protect myself.
Women like me who live alone, can not afford to give in to their weaknesses.
Or they end their days begging in the streets.
I offer my protection for as long as you live.
Men have said that to me so many times, in so many tongues.
Listen, Sinuhe.
I live in Egypt.
Because I can never return to Babylon.
When I was 12 years old, I was sold as a slave.
And passed from one Master, to another.
Is there any difference in your life now?
A very great difference.
For now, no man is my Master.
The Syrian merchant who dines with me tonight brings me a ruby that once belonged to a queen.
But to give away a present from Pharaoh is sacrilege.
I ask for nothing.
I only want you to understand.
You must go now.
My guest will be here at any moment.
Send him away.
I told you why I can't.
Send him away!
You're hurting me!
I've given you the only thing of value that I had.
Isn't that what you wanted?
What deceivers men are.
And you're the same as all the rest.
You're not so poor as you pretend, Sinuhe.
You have a house and many fine instruments of copper.
If I give them to you, will you promise me?
I promise nothing.
If you wish to give me a present, do so.
But ask nothing from me.
As I ask nothing from you.
I'm a evil woman, Sinuhe.
From the very beginning, I warned you.
Keep your house and your instruments, and go!
Your Highness shoots well, for a woman.
A child's games.
I see you won a promotion.
Why not?
A real soldier here is like a falcon among sparrows.
I wish a word with you, over here!
May I say, I long dreamed of a word with you?
We won't discuss your dreams.
I wish to speak of your friend, the physician.
Why are you so interested in him?
My brother has been asking for him.
He hasn't yet presented himself at Court.
Sinuhe has a... left the city.
He's gone to Memphis... I think.
If you hope for farther promotions, don't lie to me.
I love my friend enough to lie for him.
Even to a Royal Princess.
What do you want?
I want him saved from the creature who stole his wits.
That's easy. She's a Babylonian.
Have her banished, or killed.
He'll follow her into exile, or moan over a grave the rest of his life.
No. He must be made to see that she is worthless.
And how do you expect to accomplish that?
By letting him find out that she has betrayed him with his best friend.
You shouldn't find that to difficult.
Such a woman likes to be assaulted as if they were fortresses.
Your Highness, flatters me.
I value you in the same way you value yourself.
Give me that bracelet.
You want a reward for helping a friend you love so much?
I want it for the Babylonian.
Oh?... Then you're afraid that your manly charms won't be enough?
Not for her!
My friends are watching us.
They think you're rewarding me an honor.
Let them think what they will.
Some day you'll strip your arms of honors for me... your ankles, and your neck.
Save your passions for the Babylonian.
She will appreciate them more than I do.
Open up, let me in.
The hour is late. I have orders to admit no one.
Your mistress is expecting me.
I have a message from her.
Those are my orders.
Horemheb.
Horemhed!
NEFER, LET ME IN!
HOREMHEB!
NEFER, LET ME IN!
HOREMHEB!!
You must go.
He knows you're here.
I don't care, do you?
I sent him no message to come tonight.
I took the liberty of sending one in your name.
Do you mind?
So, that's it.
GO NOW!
Stupid fool!
I'LL KILL YOU!
You're crazy!
Listen, you fool!
It was our friendship that brought me here.
Can't you see what she is?
The only reason I have come here was to prove it to you.
Never call me friend again.
Get Out!
Very well.
You'll deserve everything you'll get from her.
You may go too.
This is my house, and it is not a tavern.
Nefer, wait.
Look here.
I brought you what you asked.
The deed to my house.
My instruments.
I never asked you for this trash!
It's all I have... and not entirely trash.
The house is small, but it is fitted up for a physician's use.
The instruments are the finest.
They're worth as much as precious jewels.
There...
Now, you own everything that was mine.
Sinuhe, please!
I'm tired.
You always have some excuse.
Nefer, I...
Wait.
Since you won't listen to my warnings.
You force me to treat you like my other friends.
What more do you want from me?
For you I've disobeyed Pharaoh, disgraced my family, beggared myself.
And still you lie to me.
Lie?
How...?
Why have you chosen not to tell me that your father has a fine house on the waterfront?
I can't give you what isn't my own.
Or that he has built and furnished for his wife and himself, a scenic tomb in the City of the Dead?
You're asking me to rob my parents of immortality.
And let their bodies, rot into nothingness, like the carcasses of slaves and animals?
I ask for nothing.
But if you do this one thing for me.
I'll show you the finer perfection of love.
What are you doing here?
You haven't been to the tavern for many days.
I had to see you.
The man you know, is dead.
Forget him!
I could never forget you.
Sinuhe, please listen to me. I want to help you.
I am not without experience.
You learn a great deal about life in a tavern.
Every night, I see the hunger in men's eyes.
With a tavern maid they don't trouble to hide it.
There are some who will approach you arrogantly, demanding.
Like your friend Horemheb.
That kind can never be hurt by a woman.
Then there are those to shy to ask.
But the hunger is in their eyes too.
They are the one's who are unarmed.
Because they are afraid to approach a woman who might make them happy.
They fall a easy victim of the other kind.
They think they are in love, because they have no way of knowing what love is.
What are you trying to say?
What I shouldn't have to say.
When you come home at this hour, and find me waiting for you.
If you wish to help me, you can.
Here are the deeds to my parents house, and to the tomb, which they thought would give them immortality.
Here is her name, the new owner.
Read it, Merit: "Nefer, Nefer, NEFER!"`
Sinuhe, you can't!
The deeds have to be witnessed.
Be the first to sign.
GO ON! SIGN!
IF YOU CAN'T WRITE, MAKE YOUR MARK!
Gods have pity on you!
The house and tomb are yours.
From this hour, I am accused and disgraced.
Before Gods and men.
It's a high price to pay.
Now prove to me it's not too high.
How shall I prove it, Sinuhe?
By keeping your promise.
Promise?
What did I promise?
The perfection of love.
I did?
Sinuhe, as I have already told you,
I find you very appealing.
Are you quite sure that it's "perfection" you want?
Yes.
Then you shall have it.
I will end your misery.
Secum!
Show this man to the door.
Never admit him to my house again.
Every philosopher knows that we spend our lives seeking perfection.
And find it only in a ending.
Ending?
Sooner or later, even a cat tires of it's game.
Sinuhe!
SINUHE!
NO!
Baraka! Secum!
Sinuhe!... Sinuhe...!
Once again I came alone, and in darkness, to the house of my parents.
The house that was no longer theirs.
How did they die?
As you should know, Master. A physician can turn his skill to taking life, as well as to saving it.
Your father left this for you.
Read it.
I can't.
Then listen.
"To Sinuhe, our son.
We are grieved for your sake, because you have met with ill fortune.
Do not regret that you were required to sell our tomb.
For all existence is vanity.
We desire no life in the hereafter.
Remember always that we blessed you before we left.
For you who came to us, from the river when we were already old.
And was the greatest joy of our lives.
May your heart be shielded from sorrow.
Such is the desire of your father and your mother."
What do you want here in the House of Death?
I've brought you the bodies of a man and a woman.
To be preserved by your art.
So that they may enjoy eternal life.
As you say, we are artists here.
What can you pay for our services?
I have nothing.
Nothing? Throw this carrion in the river.
Wait! I am willing to work here.
To pay for the embalming.
For as long as you say I must.
Work here?
Only condemned criminals, and the accursed of the Gods, seek work in the House of Dead.
There is no man here who is not better than I am.
Put him to work!
For 90 days, I labored among the accursed in the House of Death.
It was as if I died myself.
And only my servant, Kapta, knew what I had done, or where I was.
What are you doing here?
Speak, or I'll bash your head in!
Are you a God?
God?
No God would dare show his face here after dark.
You're a grave robber?
I don't come here to steal.
What do you want then?
I brought my parents here to bury them.
In the Valley of the Kings?
I had hoped that if
I buried them here, they might share the wealth of the Pharaohs, in the other world!
Other world, hmph!
It is true that many
Pharaohs are planted here.
I have yet to see anyone of them here putting out any shoots.
And they certainly don't see the gifts.
Cause we get them first.
You don't believe in another life.
They believed.
You're a strange one.
I'll help you dig.
I wish somehow I could mark their graves.
Mark or unmarked, is all the same.
20 years to build a pyramid.
Or 10 minutes to scrap a hole in the sand.
Dead are dead, no matter where we put them.
In the end, the sand conquers all.
Every grain of sand, will outlive every man alive, and every man that ever will be born.
Immortality?
I hold it in my hand.
Only the little grains of sand will never die.
Listen!
A jackal.
A jackal with two legs.
One of my friends warning us there is a stranger coming.
Here in the shadow.
Sinuhe?
That you?
Yes.
This is as good a place as any to meet a woman.
Sinuhe?
How did you find me?
Kapta told me.
He told me what you've done.
Hard at labor 90 days in the House of Death.
Keep away!
The smell of death is still on me.
How long since you've eaten?
I don't know.
I brought you some bread and wine.
Go back, Merit, Go back.
Leave me alone.
Not until you've eaten.
Sit here, Sinuhe.
To please me if nothing else.
Bread?
Some wine?
Thebes, city of lust and evil.
Men deserve injustice.
They deserve their cruel priests, and evil gods.
For we are vile!
No more than a crawling disease on the face of the earth.
The grave is the only cure for our vileness.
That is what I've learned.
I'll take you back to the city.
You can't go back.
Pharaoh's daughter died because you could not be found to save her.
He's frantic with grief.
Sinuhe, he... he's sentenced you to death.
It means nothing.
Death never comes to him that asks for it.
I know this too in my new wisdom.
Do you call that wisdom?
To despise yourself because of what one woman did to you?
Do you really think that all women are like that?
Can't you believe in a love that asks for nothing?
Oh! My love!
Everything is arranged, Master.
I was able to buy passage for us!
Buy it?
Took everything I had... everything I've stolen from you.
Come! We must hide below decks before the other passengers arrive.
Merit...
I don't know how to say this...
Take this with you. It isn't real gold.
I want you to have it.
It's the symbol of the Sun God, Aton.
Perhaps someday...
No. We only fool ourselves to think so.
This is goodbye forever.
Forever?
You're young, Merit.
Your whole life is before you.
Mine will end somewhere in the darkness of a foreign land.
I love you, Sinuhe.
Always remember that.
Hurry, Master!
And so I left behind me the land of my fathers.
And with it, I left my youth which had promised so much, and whose only fruit has been despair.
As the years passed,
Kapta and I, traveled to the ends of the earth.
In the beginning, we lived as we could.
Friendless wanders that we were.
We cheated and stole, in order to live.
We knew heat, hunger, and cold.
And slept under the stars.
Then, as time softened my sorrows.
I began to put to use, the skills I have learned in School of Life, and in my father's house.
As we moved on, my fame went before me.
To distant lands, which had never seen an Egyptian before.
Nor a trained physician.
The simplest cures were thought to be miracles.
And I became known as a worker of magic.
As we traveled on to new lands, our wealth increased.
Everywhere we saw injustice and misery.
But I hardened my heart.
I reserved my skills for the rich and powerful.
Who could pay.
For the children of poverty, there was no cure.
Cry out when the pain is greatest.
No Hittite warrior cries out in pain.
There...?
Yes.
As I feared, Lord Commander, your skull must be opened.
And the evil removed with a knife.
Is this an Egyptian plot?
To murder our Commander at a time...
At a time when you're planning war with Egypt?
It was you who brought me here from Babylon, my Lord.
I take no interest in your plans.
I have no country. Egypt, least of all.
Shall I undertake your cure?
What chances have I to survive?
One chance in five.
If I die, my officers will kill you.
I know that.
If I live...
What will you demand?
Your sword of black metal. Nothing more.
Then you are a spy!
- Doesn't matter.
After the first skirmish, our secret, will no longer be secret.
After the second,
Egypt, will no longer be Egypt.
Proceed, Egyptian.
Shave his head and wash it.
Tie him to this chair securely.
I'll prepare a drug to dull his pain.
Master, Master.
Did you not hear that Commander, or do you have a hole bored into your head?
Why do you ask for a sword?
You could have demanded a fortune.
Because I think the new metal of the Hittites, may change history of the world!
And because Horemheb now commands the army in Egypt.
Oh, so you lied.
There is a key to your heart after all.
Still love your native land.
Least you know that back there.
No Pharaoh ever forgives his enemies.
Leave my instruments in the flame.
Kapta, we're going home.
Home.
Egypt. Egypt... was a stricken land.
Torn by hatred and civil strife.
I fear the Hittites, Master.
But I fear this more.
Better if we had never come!
Your name, Syrian?
I am Egyptian. My name is Sinuhe.
Once physician to the Pharaoh.
You must have been bitten by a rabid ape when you were small.
You know, that if your name is on that list of prescribed criminals...
Well, you know the Egyptians.
Seize them. Take them to headquarters.
There must be some mistake!
Could we go over the list again?
What do you expect me to do?
Bring soldiers here from the Delta? The Cataracts?
Your duty is to keep order in the city.
You should be able to do it with the men you have.
You were told to never return to Egypt.
Why did you come back?
It's said "He who have drunk of the Nile water... can never quench his thirst in other lands."
I know why you're here.
The priests of the old Gods hope to rid themselves of Pharaoh.
They whisper that he is mad and his skull should be opened.
It would be a simple matter to let the knife slip.
So they brought back to Egypt, the one man who is the master of the operation.
You.
Give me the sword you took from my servant.
Give it to him.
This why I came back to Egypt!
Draw your sword.
Stand back.
And now?
Strike at me, hard.
Do you know what you're asking, my friend?
Strike!
Again, harder!
Where did you get this?
In the land of the Hittites.
Hundreds of forgers are at work there night and day, making weapons of this new metal. It is called "iron."
Come with me.
Worshippers singing:
"How beautiful our God"... (repeats)
The new temple where the
Pharaoh worships his one God.
Look!
I've seen the sorrow this one
God has brought upon Egypt.
It was the priests, not Pharaoh, who brought this sorrow on us.
It is they who blamed the misfortunes of Egypt on Pharaoh.
And made the people believe thus the old Gods show their anger.
If I had my way, I would hang every priest, by his heels.
But our Pharaoh believes in repaying treachery with kindness.
Come.
Stay on your feet.
I apologize, Sire, for interrupting your prayers.
I have urgent news.
Our Lord Commander owes me no explanation.
I bring you someone you'll remember.
Sinuhe, the physician.
Sinuhe...
Yes.
He asks you grant him pardon, Sire.
And I, as Commander of the army, also urge you to be merciful.
It's is I who should ask your pardon, Sinuhe.
Once I raised my hand against you. I would have killed you.
It delights me to see you.
Sinuhe just returned from the land of the Hittites.
They're preparing for war against us.
They succeeded in making a new metal.
He brought this sword as proof.
It cuts through our Egyptian copper, like a knife through straw.
How could all this be true?
I sent the Cross of Life to the Hittite Princess.
I promised them my friendship.
Akhnaton, my mad friend,
You think they care for your "Cross of Life?"
They want loot, slaves, power!
And with this...
They'll get them.
Unless you let me strike first.
Destroy their cities, their mines, and forgers.
Are you asking me to condone slaughter?
I am asking you to show our enemies, the same mercy, they'd show us. No more, no less.
There's mercy in every man's heart.
If we can only reach it.
A man who's lived in darkness all his life, doesn't understand the light isn't evil, because it hurts his eyes.
Should we then, extinguish our lights and crawl into darkness, with him?
Such wisdom has already filled the Nile with corpses.
Sire, again this morning rioting broke out on the waterfront.
I had to send soldiers in to stop it.
Don't you see, Sire?
That a war now would unite our country?
Once again Egyptians will stand together, brothers against a common foe.
He is right, my husband.
Even you?
So near to me then is the darkness?
You should listen to Horemheb.
I can listen only to Aton.
I will write to the Hittite Princess.
Asking to make their intentions clear.
Thank you for coming.
Now, do you see what I have to contend with?
Could he prevent you from doing what you want with the army?
No, the men follow me, not him.
But he is Pharaoh, and I have sworn him a oath of loyalty.
He'll write to the Hittites!
He might as well invite them to come take his throne.
Will it matter?
I have seen rulers, great and small, old and young, warlike and effeminate.
The people suffer and die.
Whatever the ruler calls himself.
Hittite, Egyptian, Cretan.
It's bad to believe, to much like Pharaoh.
But it's worse to believe in too little, my friend.
I believe in nothing.
While Egypt tore herself in civil strife.
I doubled my fortune, as physician to the wealthy.
Send away the other patients. I'm tired.
I will see no more today.
I think you will see this one, Master.
You might find it rewarding.
Oh? Are the fees so high?
Not high, interesting.
Send them in.
He'll see you.
Come again tomorrow.
Sorry, there is nothing I can do.
Can you help me?
Tell me what ails you.
Give me your hand.
Open your robe.
I can save your life.
But I can't restore your beauty.
The trouble has eaten too far for that.
Do you want to live, Nefer?
Yes.. yes, I want to live.
Come back tomorrow morning.
I will undertake your cure.
I can not pay you.
Your collar was all I had left.
There will be no fee for my services.
Here.
For 10 years, I dreamed of this, of meeting her again.
When I would be the Master.
Of taking my revenge, slowly... savoring it.
What do you feel, now that you've had your chance?
Only pity.
Sorrow.
Because once, she was so beautiful.
A cat can't help being what it is.
It's strange, Kapta.
Revenge, leaves you as empty as fame and fortune.
Eat your fill of all of them.
And you're still just as hungry.
Master, what is it you want?
I don't know.
But whatever it is, I been searching for it in the wrong places.
Master, it is dangerous to walk in this quarter, unescorted.
Sights, and sounds, and smells, can make the past live again.
This is where I use to draw water for my father.
It was a long time ago.
Look, Kaptah!
This is the tree I learned to climb when I could barely walk.
- Leave me alone!
Come back here!
- Leave me alone!
- Don't let him get away!
- Get his Cross!
- It's my Cross!
- I got him!
- What are you doing?
Let him alone! Stop that! Go on! Go on!
Are you hurt?
No.
Where do you live?
Over there.
Toth, my poor darling!
I'm alright.
You're bleeding!
It's nothing.
Some those other boys didn't like my Cross.
I'll take you to a physician.
May I help?
Sinuhe!
Yes, my Lord, you can.
This is the Lord Sinuhe, Toth.
A very famous physician.
I must get linen for a bandage.
I'll get it.
Merit.
After all these years...
You've been in my in my prayers, Sinuhe.
I'm grateful to your God.
If it was he who brought us together.
Won't you come in?
You knew this was my father's house?
The house was cheap. I needed a place of my own.
You, and your husband?
I am not married.
I found the bandages, Mother.
Mother?
He's the child of a friend, an orphan.
But he does not know that. He thinks I'm his mother...
Sinuhe, please...
- I understand.
Your secret is safe with this orphan.
Please come in.
Here are the bandages, and instruments, if you have to use them.
When I grow up, I'm going to be a physician too.
Hope you use these with more credit than I did.
I bought them at the same time as I bought the house.
I see.
Sit down over there.
Hold the bandage.
This isn't gonna hurt.
- I'm not afraid.
Have I been in your prayers too?
Yes. I prayed that Aton would teach you humility, and manners.
Now I know that we've come home.
Only in Egypt, does a woman tongue takes so sharp an edge.
In two days you can take off the bandage.
But not before, you understand?
Why?
I mean, what will happen, if I do?
Probably nothing. I spoke sternly with you, because physicians should always be firm with their patients.
You'll find out, it increases their respect for you.
And also the size of your fees.
But I will be physician to the poor.
But the rich have more interesting ailments, and can better afford them.
No. I would work for the poor.
I'm hungry. Are you?
I could eat a hippopotamus.
Well, we're having fish.
Hurry up, Mother!
Yes, hurry!
Be quiet, both of you.
Come here!
Clean your instruments Thoth, and put them away.
Did you see so much with your one eye?
More than my Master does with two.
Did you dare to tell him...
Why should I tell him?
I like my life as it is, without a woman to pour hot water on my feet, because I displeased her.
Questioning my accounts, rationing my beer... HUSH!
Merit.
I didn't ask you to come here, to pry into my life.
I didn't expect...
Smoke!
Perhaps, you think the smoke, has blinded me too.
What does the Lord Sinuhe, the great, rich, and cynical Lord
Sinuhe, want with a tavern maid?
You call me great and rich, but I have nothing.
I am the poorest of men.
Because I wasted my life.
Everything I've touched,
I've destroyed.
My birthright, my parents.
Your life too, Merit.
But you've given me something.
Perhaps an answer to the question, I've asked myself, ever since I was a boy.
Not your God, because
I don't believe in gods.
The one thing I created, which wasn't a waste.
If it is too late to live for ourselves.
Perhaps we can begin to live for our son.
Toth, my boy.
Let me offer you a priceless jewel of wisdom.
Never peer through windows, on matters that don't concern you.
That's how I happen to have only one eye.
Did you intend to pass without speaking to me?
I beg your highness pardon.
But Pharaoh has sent for me.
I know.
It's been many years, Physician.
The look of innocence is gone.
If your Highness will excuse me...
You've heard the news?
The Hittites invaded Syria.
Their carriages are approaching the Delta of the Nile.
Then the war has begun.
No!
My brother refuses to give
Horemheb permission to fight.
Then he must be mad.
I've known that for a long time.
Physician!
After you see my brother, come to my chambers.
Your Majesty...
- Thank you for coming.
Sire.
My friend!
Sire, you must give Horemhed permission to defend Egypt.
No!
NO!
Right or wrong, I will not order death.
I can not plunge Egypt into a bath of blood.
They say I'm mad.
Horemheb, the priests.
Even my own sister.
Are they right, Sinuhe?
Am I mad?
You are mad, Sire.
But your madness is more beautiful then the wisdom of other men.
Beautiful...
Yes, my vision of Aton, was beautiful.
I thought it would give peace and happiness to all men.
I thought I could be his voice.
And bring his message to my people.
But I was wrong.
The vision has faded.
My voice was no more than the whisper of wind in the desert.
Aton has abandoned me...
...to war,
...to madness,
...to death.
If you love me, Sinuhe.
Lift the burden from my soul.
Give me peace.
A physician's task is to prolong life, Sire.
Not to shorten it.
He should rest now.
Can you do anything for him?
I'm sorry, but his illness is not of the body, your Majesty.
What is it you want?
What Pharaoh himself asked you for: "to give him peace."
You have more courage than I thought.
If Horemheb were to learn of this...
My men are ready!
The loyal Lord Commander!
You too?
Look, Sinuhe.
I love Akhnaton, as I love my own right arm.
But if my arm were gangrene, I'd cut it off.
Just as Akhnaton must be cut off from Egypt!
All Egypt knows I'm right.
And you know it.
Yes.
Yes, in your place, I'd tell myself the same thing.
Have you a potion that will give him sleep, without pain?
I'm to kill him.
When all around me there is such a talent for violence?
Do this, and the Gods will bless you forever.
I see, you speak for the Gods.
And Horemheb for Egypt.
Tell me one thing, who succeeds to the throne?
Who else but the Commander of the army that will save Egypt, and make it once more, the greatest power in the world?
Yes.
Horemheb!
You, Pharaoh?
So that's the price for your treason.
Call it treason if you like.
But there's only one thing that can save Egypt now, and that's courage.
Courage to act, courage to conquer our enemies, and put the leaders in chains.
Akhnaton is in his chamber. He is helpless.
Now is your chance to strike.
But you won't, will you?
Because no hand has ever been raised openly against a Pharaoh.
Yet if you strike him down, then the way will be clear, a precedent established, for someone to strike down the next Pharaoh.
Whose name you hope, will be Horemheb.
So, this dirty thing must be done by indirection.
As it has always been done in the past.
By a physician pretending to heal him.
By a physician, whose known to be his friend.
I'm sorry, but I'm not that man.
Wait outside.
Don't go far away.
Your Highness wished to see me?
Are you going to do what they want?
No.
You should agree. Akhnaton must die.
For his own sake.
Now it's for his own sake.
Makkurie, wants to kill him for the Gods.
Horemheb for Egypt.
And his sister for his own sake.
Any hunter would show mercy to a wounded animal.
Did they tell you how they plan to dirty the throne?
They told me that Horemheb was to be Pharaoh.
And I'm to be his Queen.
He is to come to my chamber tonight.
And tomorrow our marriage will be proclaimed, in the temple of the old Gods.
I see.
A good plan.
This marriage will make him acceptable to the people.
But not to me, Physician.
When I marry, it will be to no cheese-maker's son.
Leave!
We haven't much time.
Horemheb's men are in control of the city.
Tonight the priests will open and restore the old Gods, and make a sacrifice of blood.
But together, we can beat them.
Horemheb and all the the evil priests.
Sinuhe, come here.
This is what you'll do, pretend to fall in with their plan.
Kill my brother, and kill Horemheb too.
Two murders.
So, come to my chamber tonight, and I'll gladly open the doors, with my own hands.
Willingly share the throne with you, as Pharaoh.
Why should people accept a nameless physician, as their Pharaoh?
Because you are Pharaoh.
You're my half brother.
The only man in Egypt fit to be my husband, and rule by my side.
Why do you think my mother and I sent for you the day you first came to Pharaoh?
Before she died, she told me everything.
And left it to my judgment, if you should ever hear the truth.
She was not the first to bare my father, the Pharaoh, a son.
A few weeks before, one of his other wives delivered a boy child... You!
You were taken away from your mother, and cast adrift on the river. In a boat tied with fowler's knots.
Tied by my mother, herself.
Who was a fowler's daughter.
And the mother failed to notice that her newborn disappeared?
She was shown a dead girl later, and told it was hers.
Hundreds of babies are cast adrift, every year.
And the boats are often tied with fowler's knots.
In the Lower Kingdom; not at Thebes.
There is stronger evidence than that.
Get my chariot!
Come with me to the Valley of the Kings, to my father's tomb.
And see for yourself.
The Third Amenhotep.
The great Pharaoh.
My father.
And yours.
Look!
The finest artists in Thebes made this.
You're his exact copy.
The nose, cheek bones, the forehead, the line of the jaw.
You wanted further proof.
Look!
That is what my mother saw, when you stood before us in the throne room.
What no one else, but she, could recognize.
The face of her husband, when he was a young man.
The great Pharaoh comes alive again... IN YOU!
Now, have you any doubts?
Leave me alone here.
You know, I showed you the truth.
Yes, now I'm sure that it is true.
But would Horemheb ever accept such proof?
Of course not. He's eaten up with his own ambition.
He's gone much too far.
He couldn't turn back now, even if he wanted too.
That's why he must be killed, along with Akhnaton.
You hold Egypt in your hand, my brother.
The power of a God is yours.
If you only have the courage to seize it.
What's that?
What is it?
Horemheb has began his holy war.
Every follower of of Pharaoh's God has been marked for death.
A massacre!
Why should we care?
Let Horemheb prepare the ground for us.
With my brother dead, and we rule, we'll be better off without these fanatics.
Let them go!
Merit!
Merit!
Master, Master!
Where's your mother?
We were separated.
Kapta listen, get the boy down to the docks.
Here, take this money and these jewels.
Find a boat, buy one, steal it, if you have too.
And you?
I'll find Merit.
I'll come to you when we can.
But don't wait for us.
Get the boy out of the city.
I want to go with you.
No. You must go with Kapta, my son.
Now run.
Hurry!
Stop them!
Is this yours?
I've never saw it before in my life.
Your lying!
I saw you throw it away!
Be sensible, Captain.
Do I look like a follower of the accursed Aton?
They're simple people, honest people.
And I am the biggest rouge in all Egypt.
Is this your Cross?
Captain, you have a honest and intelligent face.
I always collaborate with the soldiers.
I'm a soldier myself.
In fact, I gave my eye to my country.
Well if that's all... - Kill him!
Kill me for a thousand crimes.
But not for one I've never committed.
I hate the Gods!
And the Gods hate me.
Oh, take everything then.
Take that, jewelry,silver, everything I have.
You've made a beggar out of me. I will starve to death, for as long as I live.
Let him go!
Come on!
What can you pay?
What can you pay?
Give me your jewels!
Go aboard. Only those who can pay, can go aboard.
Give me your jewels! Give me your gold!
Only those who can pay, can come aboard!
Come on, step up!
Kapta, how can we pay?
You gave those soldiers everything.
Not quite everything.
Savings of a dishonest life, gone.
Come on, come on!
Please, please.
What can you pay?
Take this ruby. The child won't take up much room.
All right, let him go.
Only those who can pay, can go aboard.
Come along!
- Sit there.
Well... I fear that at my age, and all innocence.
I'm becoming a father.
Toth!
Toth!
Kneel!
Aim! Shoot!
Merit!
Merit!
Sinuhe!
NO!
Merit!... Merit!
Toth?
He's with Kaptah.
With Kapta he'll be safe.
Hold me, my love!
Merit!
Take the ones who are still alive to the dungeon!
I want this temple torn down!
Every stone of it!
Yes, Commander!
Archers, follow me.
Sorry, my friend. It had to be done.
It wasn't you who killed her.
But that madman in the palace.
Him, and his one God.
She believed in his God, and she's dead.
Is he still alive?
Yes, he's at the palace.
Then, go to the palace, and I'll meet you there before dawn.
How will you give it to him?
In a cup of wine, when you and I drink with him.
I?
We're bound together in this business, Horemheb.
As we were always been bound, since we were boys together.
Since what we do is for the good of Egypt.
You should feel honored to have a direct part in it.
Go make sure he is awake.
Arranged for our audience.
Don't worry. What's needed, will be in Pharaoh's cup.
You finally came to your senses.
Why did you leave me there in the street?
Where did you go?
To bury a dream.
It's dead now and forgotten.
For Pharaoh.
For Horemheb.
For me.
What do you mean?
Horemheb's no fool.
How can I persuade him to drink, unless I drink as well?
But you'll die!
I'm a physician.
This oil will smother the poison, until I can come back here, and swallow this emetic.
And if something goes wrong?
I'll die in any case.
Be careful my brother.
I'll be waiting for you.
Let's not pretend, my sister, that our bargain is for anything but power.
Perhaps you can't be blamed for the evil in you.
It's not your fault you're wrapped and twisted, like a tree forced to flower forever, and never bear fruit.
What you are, you were made to be by others.
But I made the evil in myself.
And I know it for evil.
You must go.
Sinuhe, open the door.
Sinuhe!
Why did you bar the door?
- I couldn't be sure if it would be you who came.
Is everything ready?
He's in great hall praying to his one God.
Which cup is his?
The one he will take.
Well welcome, my friends.
We come to you as friends, Sire.
For we both love you.
I know.
We were just speaking of the time the three of us met in the desert.
Yes, it was at sunrise.
I'd hoped that day would be a sunrise for the world.
But you killed a lion, his blood spilled out in the sand.
Violence must be met with violence.
Drink, Sire!
To our memories.
Does Sinuhe invite me to drink?
Yes.
Have I drunk... death, Sinuhe?
Yes, Sire.
So be it.
The fault is mine.
You gave me what I asked for. But
I was wrong to ask it.
I was weak.
I thought my God had forsaken me.
But he hadn't, Sinuhe.
Nor have you killed him, as you believe.
Horemheb seeks to kill him by tearing down his temples.
But the house of God is all creation.
Tear down the mountains, empty the seas, strip the sky of stars.
And still you haven't touched God.
I see it clearly now.
I thought God was the face of the Sun.
And thus I made his image.
But God is more.
Much more.
The sun is just a symbol of his warmth, of his creative power.
He is no idol, no tangible thing.
But the creator of all things.
The loving spirit that lives in all our hearts.
I'm fortunate beyond other men, that He permitted me to recognize him.
Stay close to me, Sinuhe friend.
I can not see you well.
But there is no pain.
I gave you no pain, Sire.
Nor does my death matter.
I was no more than a shadow of things to come.
One voice that spoke for Him.
But there will be other voices.
Clearer than mine.
For the hearts of men will not be denied forever.
God is in us all.
And one day, in his own good time, he will speak out.
In words that can not be misunderstood.
The others lied to me, Sinuhe.
But I think you really loved me.
God forgives everything, Sinuhe.
He forgives you.
Poor soul.
He was mad till the end.
I'll make sacrifices to the Gods on his behalf.
They won't refuse me now.
For I am one of them.
I am Egypt!
Your cup, Sinuhe!
Drink with me.
Drink to the beginning of a new Egypt!
Horemheb, don't drink it.
Or you won't be Egypt, or anything.
You dared!
Put on the crown and go to the Princess.
She will be greatly surprised, for it isn't you, she expects.
But you can prevail, and make yourself divine.
You really dared!
You're the Pharaoh that Egypt wants.
But that wasn't why I spared you.
Don't thank me for your life.
Thank this poor sick fool here.
For it was he who saved us both.
Saved me?
Are you mad too?
I am Pharaoh.
Silence!
Pharaoh comes. On your faces.
On your faces before the Living God!
Sire!
The Commanders of the defeated armies beg mercy of Pharaoh.
I will deal with them later.
Let the physician come forward!
On your Knees!
- Let him stand.
What are the charges against this man?
He has publicly spoken against Pharaoh.
He has belittled Pharaoh's victories in Syria, and the land of the Hittites.
He has blasphemed against the Gods, and has committed other acts of treason, without number.
Once we stood together before this throne.
And you spoke up for my life.
Is there anyone here who will speak up for this man?
You? My devoted wife?
No.
You will have to speak for yourself, Physician.
Not for myself, Sire.
But for one whose memory, you're trying to wipe out.
Whose very name you sought to destroy.
For Akhneton!
Do you flaunt your treason in my face?
That name is forbidden!
Take care, physician.
Or I will...
Will? Will, what you will.
You will go to war, and win a battle?
You will conquer, and not know that it is defeat?
You will raise Egypt to glory, and watch her die?
We live in the twilight of our world, Horemheb.
And you will be it's sunset.
Nations rise, only to fall.
Kings build mighty monuments.
Only to have them crumble into dust.
Glory flees like a shadow.
All these things have the seeds of death in them.
Only a thought can live.
Only a great truth can grow and flourish.
And a truth can not be killed.
It passes in secret, from one man's heart to another.
It is given in a mother's milk to her child.
Are you trying to tell me, that you'll fight against me?
Oh! You'll win that too.
For if you fails to silence me, you'll know what I'll do.
What will you do, physician?
I will go among the people.
And try to answer the questions that burden their hearts.
The questions that I have asked myself, all my life.
Where ever I wondered in the world.
And which were answered for me, by a dying man.
I will wear the clothes of a slave.
And kick the sandals from my feet.
And speak to the wives, while they fry their fish before their mud huts by the river.
To the porters on the docks.
The smiths by their bellows.
To the slaves under their yokes.
And I will say:
"A man can not be judged by the color of his skin, by his clothes, his jewels, or his triumphs.
But only by his heart.
A good man is better than a bad man.
Justice is better than injustice.
He who uses mercy is superior, to him who uses violence.
Though the latter call himself Pharaoh.
And make himself Master of the Earth.
We have but one Master.
The God who made us all.
Only His truth is immortal.
And in His truth, all men are equal.
No man is alone."
The Sentence:
Exile for life!
I have spent my life in seeking knowledge.
This is all I know.
I have written this for you, my son.
Wherever you are.
And for your children, and your children's children.
It's a poor legacy.
But it's all I have.
In the year of our Lord...
... Judea, for nearly a century,
had lain under the mastery of Rome.
In the seventh year of the reign
of Augustus Caesar...
... an imperial decree
ordered every Judean...
... each to return
to his place of birth...
... to be counted and taxed.
Converging ways of many of them led
to their capital city, Jerusalem...
... the troubled heart of their land.
The old city was dominated
by the fortress of Antonia...
... the seat of Roman power...
... and by the great golden temple...
... the outward sign of
an inward and imperishable faith.
Even while they obeyed
the will of Caesar...
... the people clung proudly
to their ancient heritage...
... always remembering
the promise of their prophets...
... that one day there would be
born among them a redeemer...
... to bring them salvation
and perfect freedom.
You'll be counted at Hebron.
- Name?
- Samuel.
- What city?
- Joppa.
- What family?
- Michael.
- Move on. Move on.
- Yes.
- Name?
- Joseph.
- What city?
- Nazareth.
- What family?
- David of Bethlehem.
And the woman?
My wife.
Move on.
You'll be counted at Bethlehem.
Come on, come on.
What village is this?
Nazareth.
We should arrive in Jerusalem tomorrow night.
You're not watching the soldiers, Joseph?
We've seen Romans before.
Yes...
...and we will see them again.
My table is not finished.
Where is your son?
He's walking in the hills.
He neglects his work, Joseph.
No.
Once, I reproached him with forgetting his work. He said to me:
"I must be about my father's business."
Then why isn't he here, working?
He's working.
Trumpeters of the legion!
Welcome, Messala.
The command is yours.
Thank you.
Thank you for relieving me.
Drusus...
...when I was a boy, I dreamed of commanding this garrison.
Now the wheel has turned.
I am in command.
Attention!
Aisle one, face right!
Forward!
I'd forgotten the heat.
If it were only the heat.
I lived here until I was 14.
Jerusalem was my home.
- My father was head of...
- Yes, I know.
Your father is well-remembered.
Fine governor.
If there can be such a thing in this forsaken land.
If you want to rise, Sextus, do the difficult.
I asked to be sent here.
You'll find the people changed since you were a boy.
In what way?
Oh, won't pay their taxes, an irrational resentment of Rome...
There's nothing new in all that.
And then there's religion. I tell you, they're drunk with religion.
They smash the statues of our gods, even those of the emperor.
Punish them.
We do.
When we can find them.
Find the leaders.
You don't know. There's nothing you can put your finger on.
There are strange forces at work here.
This "messiah" business...
I know. There was one predicted when I was a boy.
A king of the Jews, who will lead them into some sort of anti-Roman paradise.
Makes your head spin.
There's a wild man in the desert named John...
...who drowns people in water.
And a carpenter's son who does magic tricks. "Miracles" they call them.
There's always a rabble-rouser stirring up trouble.
No, no, no. This man is different.
He teaches that God is near, in every man.
It's actually quite profound, some of it.
You've been too long away from Rome.
Go back, Sextus.
Go to Capri.
Bathe, rest, lie by the sea...
...and forget that
God is in every man.
- There is divinity in only one man.
- Yes, I know.
The emperor is displeased.
He wishes Judea made into a more obedient and disciplined province.
He's ordered me to restore order.
I shall carry out his wishes.
How? You can break a man's skull, arrest him, throw him into a dungeon.
But how do you control this?
How do you fight an idea?
Especially a new idea.
There's a Jew outside.
He wants to see the tribune Messala.
I assume he has a name.
- He says he's a prince, Judah Ben-Hur.
- Then treat him like one!
Tell him I will join him.
Yes, tribune.
Centurion!
This was his country before it was ours.
Don't forget that.
Yes, tribune.
Very wise. This Ben-Hur is the richest man in Jerusalem.
And the head of one of the greatest families in Judea.
We were friends as boys.
We were like brothers.
Sextus...
...you ask how to fight an idea.
Well, I'll tell you how.
With another idea.
I said I'd come back.
I never thought you would.
I'm so glad.
- Look at you.
- Look at you!
You've come back a tribune.
When I heard that news,
I drank a toast to you.
We'll drink another now.
- Your sister and mother?
- They're fine.
They've talked of you ever since we knew you were coming.
- Is Tirzah married?
- No.
Suitors come and go, but she dreams.
She's been in love with you since she was 5.
I can't wait to see them.
Do you still hunt jackals and lions?
Or have you become too dignified?
- Down Eros, up Mars!
- Down Eros, up Mars!
Where the beams cross?
Good.
After all these years!
Still close.
In every way.
I hope so.
I know.
You're a Roman, and I'm a Jew...
...whose life you once saved.
The best thing I ever did.
Judah...
...it will be very difficult to govern here.
I'm going to need help.
Your help. Your advice.
- You want my advice?
- Yes, I do.
Withdraw your legions.
Give us our freedom.
Unfortunately, the emperor is devoted to his empire.
He's particularly fond of Judea.
And Judea's not fond of the emperor.
Is there anything so sad as unrequited love?
My quarters.
A bit grim.
Not grim.
Austere. Virtuous.
Roman.
I'm going to be second-in-command to the new governor, Valerius Gratus.
He's coming in a few days with more legions.
Then the rumors are true.
The emperor does not approve of your countrymen.
There is rebellion in the wind.
It will be crushed.
But you and your family need have no concern.
I'm next in authority to the governor, and you're my friend.
- I'm a Jew.
- Ah, you are like a Roman!
What have you in common with the troublemaking rabble?
- They're my people. I'm one of them.
- Be wise, Judah.
It's a Roman world. If you want to live in it, you must become part of it.
You've changed.
I've grown up. I've seen the world since I left Jerusalem.
I've seen Rome. It's no accident that one small village on the Tiber...
...was chosen to rule the world.
Your legions.
It wasn't just our legions.
Other countries have armies, fine armies. I know, I fought them.
Oh, no.
No, it was fate that chose us to civilize the world. And we have.
Our roads and ships connect every corner of the earth.
Roman law, architecture, literature are the glory of the human race.
I believe in the future of my people.
Of course you do.
And you can help them.
How?
You're an aristocrat.
Your family's name is honored.
You're a prince to your people.
You're rich and powerful.
Your reputation is stainless.
They'd listen if you spoke out against rebellion.
Persuade your people that their resistance to Rome is stupid.
It is worse than stupid, futile!
For it can end in only one way, extinction for your people!
I'm against violence.
Everyone knows this.
I've spoken against it.
I shall do so again.
Then we're agreed!
Now, when can I come to see your family?
- We had hoped tomorrow.
- Good.
And now for our toast.
It's dreadful wine, by the way.
It's especially fermented for the Roman army.
You're very cruel to your conquerors.
It's an insane world.
But in it there is one sanity:
The loyalty of old friends.
Judah, we must believe in one another.
Will you drink to that?
With all my heart.
Here it is, the place I've remembered.
The court where we played at changing the guard.
The roof where we'd throw pebbles at people in the street and then hide.
- We were rascals, weren't we?
- No, you were good boys.
I would have that time again.
And here it is. Nothing has changed.
Except for the fountain.
- The old well would go dry, remember?
- Promptly, every summer.
A new fountain and a new Tirzah.
You've grown up.
- He hasn't changed, has he, Mother?
- No?
Of course he has. He was a boy when he left us, now he's a man.
With great responsibilities.
Come.
The emperor builds and builds, turning brick to marble.
Oh, I almost forgot.
I brought you this.
I've never seen anything like this before. It's beautiful!
- Is it Roman?
- It's Libyan. I was there last year.
A tremendous campaign.
Our armies met on the coast.
After two days of fighting, they fled.
We marched on their capital.
Barbaric city, but fascinating.
Or was, till we destroyed it.
Now it's nothing but ashes.
I'm boring you with soldier stories.
Come with me, there's something
I want to show you.
Thank you for this.
I chose the right present for you.
It's a brooch for a woman.
What do you think of it?
Magnificent.
It's Arabic.
I think he has the look of the breed.
I've raised him.
Let me try him sometime.
Whenever you like. He's yours.
Do you mean you'll give me this?
Oh, Judah.
You are good. It's going to be like old times, I know it.
Judah, tell me, did you...
...think about what I said?
Yes. Talked to a number of people already.
Spoken against violence, against incidents.
Most of the men agree with me.
Most? Not all?
No, not all.
Who does not agree?
Well, the resentful, the impatient.
Who are they?
Yes, Judah. Who are they?
Would I retain your friendship if I became an informer?
Telling the names of criminals is not informing.
They're not criminals, Messala.
They're patriots.
Patriots?!
Let me explain something to you.
Something you may not know.
The emperor is watching us.
At this moment, he watches the East.
This is my great opportunity, and yours too.
If I bring order here,
I can have any post I want.
You'll rise with me, I promise.
And do you know where it can end?
Rome! Yes, perhaps at the side of Caesar himself.
I mean it. It can happen and this is the moment.
I swear, this is the time.
The emperor is watching us, judging us. All I need do is serve him.
And all you need do is help me serve him.
- You speak as if he were God.
- He is God. The only God.
He is power, real power on earth, not...
Not that.
Help me, Judah.
I would do anything for you, Messala...
...except betray my own people.
In the name of all the gods, what do the lives of a few Jews mean to you?
If I cannot persuade them, that does not mean I would help you murder them.
Besides, you must understand this, Messala.
I believe in the past and future of my people.
Future? You are a conquered people.
You may conquer the land.
You may slaughter the people.
But that is not the end.
We will rise again.
You live on dead dreams.
You live on the myths of the past.
Solomon's glory is gone.
You think it will return?
Joshua will not rise again to save you nor David.
There is only one reality in the world today. Look to the West.
Don't be a fool! Look to Rome!
Better a fool than a traitor or a killer.
- I am a soldier.
- Who kills for Rome and Rome is evil.
- I warn you...
- No! I warn you.
Rome is an affront to God.
Rome is strangling my people and my country, the whole earth!
But not forever.
And I tell you, the day Rome falls there will be a shout of freedom...
...such as the world has never heard before.
Either you help me or you oppose me.
You have no other choice.
You're either for me or against me.
If that is the choice...
...then I am against you.
There they are.
Where's Messala?
- Where's...?
- He's gone.
Gone?
- But why?
- He couldn't stay.
- What happened?
- A new tribune must have many duties.
Come. Let us have dinner.
Blessed art Thou, O Lord, our God,
King of the world...
...who bringeth to us bread from the earth.
We shall never see him again, Tirzah.
He wanted to use me to betray our people.
- Master, the caravan from Antioch.
- Yes, Amrah, I saw.
Simonides.
- Oh, welcome homecoming.
- Master.
Simonides has brought gifts, as usual.
Amber and jade for me.
Silk for Tirzah.
And for the master, Iberian wine.
Not to mention the best gift of all, your presence.
You do your servant honor.
I also bring good news from Antioch.
- Caravans from Petra.
- Have all arrived.
- Good.
- Here is the accounting.
And what of Numidia?
The trade route is ours, guaranteed by treaty with the king.
Once a year, you bring your accounting.
And once a year,
I find myself wealthier.
Yeah, but my greatest treasure is my steward.
My life belongs to the House of Hur.
Nothing else exists for me, except my daughter.
- She must be a young woman by now.
- Yes, and your property.
She was born the daughter of your slave.
When I inherited you,
I inherited a friend, not a slave.
Still, Esther has come with me from
Antioch for your permission to marry.
It's granted. I wish you the joy of many grandchildren.
If it is the Lord's will,
I shall rejoice.
With your permission,
Esther wishes to speak to her master.
You're eager to marry, Esther?
It is my father's wish.
Your husband will be fortunate.
What is his name?
David, son of Mathias.
Of what house?
- His own, master.
- He is a freeman.
Tell me more about him.
I have seen him only once.
He is a merchant, well-thought-of in Antioch.
He will pay for Esther's freedom.
Her freedom will be my wedding gift to Esther.
You are generous, master.
Do you love this man?
I will learn to love him.
You have my permission to marry.
We'll drink to your happiness.
And a safe return to Antioch.
I disturbed you.
No.
What were you thinking?
I was saying goodbye...
...to this city...
...and this house.
You've not often been here.
What do you remember of it?
My father sometimes brought me here...
...when I was little.
It was a house where I was always happy.
Except once.
When you and your friend, the Roman boy...
- Messala.
- Yes.
You had been out hunting...
...and they brought you home injured.
I touched your face as you lay there...
...and prayed to God,
"Don't let this boy die."
I can hear how you said it.
Gently, as you say it now.
Yes, master.
Master?
Why, I've given you your freedom.
It's strange. I hardly felt a slave.
And now...
...I hardly feel free.
You know, in the old, wise days of Solomon...
...if there was among his slaves...
...some girl who filled his eyes...
...he could choose her out from the rest...
...and take her to him.
Wise days of Solomon.
Different days.
And long ago.
If you were not a bride...
...I should kiss you goodbye.
If I were not a bride...
...there would be no goodbyes to be said.
Your slave ring.
Fair exchange.
Freedom to you. The ring to me.
You will wear it?
Until you meet the woman you will marry?
Until then.
The gods favor my lord Gratus.
If it is the governor's pleasure, the wreath of office.
Thank you, tribune.
I see no delegation from the city.
- There will not be one, sir.
- No?
Jerusalem's welcome will not be a warm one.
But I pledge, my lord, it will be a quiet one.
Let us proceed.
There's Messala.
He saw you, Judah.
The new governor.
Stand back!
- Stand back.
- You, come!
Had to be the Jews!
Open up in the name of the divine emperor!
Judah! Tirzah! What is it?
What's happened?
Open up in the name of the law!
- I was watching the...
- A tile fell and struck the governor.
- It wasn't my fault.
- They won't believe her.
She won't have to say anything.
You hear? Tirzah, say nothing.
Open the gates!
I'll speak to them.
- Arrest him!
- Let me tell you what happened.
- Hold those women.
- Stop them!
It was an accident.
Let me tell you what happened.
It was an accident.
- This is the man, sir. We saw him.
- It was an accident.
- Accident?
- I swear it.
I put my hand on the ledge.
A tile was loose. It gave way.
Take him. Take all of them.
- He's telling the truth!
- It was me! Let them go!
Attention!
Messala.
In the name of God, tell them it's a mistake.
I leaned on the tile, and it broke loose.
It was an accident.
Let them go!
They had nothing to do with it!
Let the servants go.
Let them go. Return to your ranks.
Come.
Where?
Tirus.
Tirus?
I've had no trial.
I'm to die in the galleys without even a trial?
There's no truth in the charge!
Not a word of truth!
Wait. My mother, my sister.
What happened to them?
Tie his hands.
- At least tell me if they're safe.
- I can tell you nothing.
Get along. Keep moving.
Jailer!
Guard, in there!
Up the stairs!
Jailer!
Jailer!
To the right.
- Wait!
- Send them out.
Go!
The door.
Where are my mother and sister?
Where are they?
Here, within these walls.
The governor is recovering.
They won't die.
Of course, they will be sentenced.
Is it possible?
Is it possible you could do this to us?
To people you've known?
A family you've loved?
You will let them go.
You will gladly let them go!
I didn't try to kill the governor.
I'm not a murderer!
I know you're not.
You know?
You are evil.
No, Judah, I am not evil.
I wanted your help.
Now you've given it to me.
By making this example of you,
I discourage treason.
By condemning without hesitation an old friend, I shall be feared.
But not my family.
Let them go.
Please.
- Messala, I beg you.
- Beg?!
Didn't I beg you?
You chose this.
There's nothing more to be said.
Kill me, and your mother and sister will die...
...nailed to crosses in front of you!
Go on, Judah.
Kill me!
May God grant me vengeance.
I will pray that you live till I return.
Return?
Take him.
Sentries, salute.
The tribune will see you now.
Tribune, I'm steward of the House of Hur.
I remember you.
We were on our way to Antioch when we heard what had happened.
Judah Ben-Hur could not have done this thing. You knew him, tribune.
Better than you.
Then there must be no doubt in your mind, the charge is groundless.
The prisoners have been sentenced.
- Sentenced?
- But there's no truth in it.
There was never a threat against the governor in Judah's mind.
Surely you must know he would never have done this.
In your heart, you must know it.
Drusus.
This man had better be kept here until we can question him.
Hold!
Water for the soldiers.
Soldiers first!
Get away from that well.
No water for them!
Get them away from that well!
Here, you!
Come on, you! Water for the horses!
- Water. Water.
- Soldiers first!
Here.
Wait.
No water for him.
God...
...help me.
You! I said no water for him!
All right, on your feet, all of you!
Get them on their feet!
Back in line, you dog!
On your feet!
Get them going!
You there, back to your place!
Back to your place!
Forward, you dogs!
Soon, the counselor's barge will be coming alongside.
Be ready to raise oars.
Raise oars!
Down oars!
The new commander, Quintus Arrius.
- How many rowers?
- Two hundred, consul.
- And reliefs?
- Of 30, every hour.
This man is ill. Replace him.
- Change him.
- Right, sir.
- This man's been giving you trouble?
- He's insubordinate, consul.
That will stop.
What service have you seen?
Forty-one.
A month's less a day in this ship.
You keep an exact account.
And before?
Three years in other ships.
Three years.
You have the spirit to fight back...
...but the good sense to control it.
Your eyes are full of hate, 41.
That's good. Hate keeps a man alive.
It gives him strength.
Now, listen to me, all of you.
You are all condemned men.
We keep you alive to serve this ship.
So row well...
...and live.
- Ship ready, consul.
- Strike oars.
Strike oars!
You know a fleet of Macedonian galleys...
...has been raiding Roman commerce.
The emperor has honored us with the task...
...of seeking out and destroying them.
Battle speed, hortator.
Battle speed!
Attack speed.
Attack speed!
Ramming speed.
Ramming speed!
Rest.
Halt!
Rest!
Why are you here?
I was ordered to report to you during my relief.
Oh, yes.
I'd forgotten.
You could have killed me as I lay there.
You're a condemned man.
Why didn't you?
I'm not ready to die.
What do you think will save you?
The God of my fathers.
Your God has forsaken you.
He has no more power than the images I pray to.
My gods will not help me.
Your God will not help you.
I might.
Does that interest you, 41?
I can see that it does.
I'm a fighting man by profession, and in my leisure moments...
...it amuses me to train fighting men.
I own some of the best gladiators and charioteers in Rome.
Would you like to become one of them?
To die as your slave?
Better than to live in chains below these decks.
I will not be here forever.
No?
What would you do if you escaped?
Two people were condemned with me, my mother and sister...
...though they were innocent.
I won't rest...
Do not say that you were innocent.
- Would it do any good to say it again?
- No.
Consider my offer carefully. You will never escape while we are victorious.
If we are not, you will sink with this ship, chained to your oar.
I cannot believe that
God has let me live these years...
...to die chained to an oar.
It's a strange, stubborn faith you keep...
...to believe that existence has a purpose.
A sane man would have learned to lose it long before this.
As you have.
What drove it out of you?
Go back to your oar, 41.
Consul, enemy sighted.
Signal the fleet.
Prepare for battle.
All the watch to battle posts.
- Stand by to load.
- Make ready to fire.
Hurry, quick!
Hurry up with that resin.
Get some more ammunition.
Raise oars!
Down oars!
Chain rowers!
Guard.
Unlock 41.
No! I don't want to die!
I don't want to die!
41, why did he do that?
I don't know.
Once before, a man helped me.
I didn't know why then.
Normal speed!
Number 1, flame.
Fire.
Fire!
Fire!
Hold withdrawal on command.
Lift oars! Raise!
Withdraw!
Steersman, right.
Extend oars!
Fire!
- Watch out!
- Fire!
Steersman, ram course! Order below!
- Ramming speed!
- Ramming speed!
Consul, barge on ramming course.
We're going to be rammed!
We're going to be rammed!
Why did you save me?
Why did you have me unchained?
What is your name, 41?
Judah Ben-Hur.
Judah Ben-Hur...
...let me die.
We keep you alive to serve this ship.
Row well and live.
Is the sail square?
I can't tell.
Better for us both if it's the enemy.
My death.
Your freedom.
It's a Roman sail.
Face rear!
Welcome, consul.
We had given up all hope for you.
Water.
The fleet, all lost?
Five galleys.
- And the battle?
- The battle was won.
You have a victory.
- It was a victory?
- Complete.
In His eagerness to save you...
...your God has also saved the Roman fleet.
Hail Arrius!
Right oars!
You have cleared the seaways of a great danger, Quintus Arrius.
This baton of victory has been nobly won.
This man riding beside you, who is he?
The man who saved me, divine emperor, to return and serve you.
Is that all you know about him?
No. He was accused of an attack on the governor of Judea.
But he was innocent.
If not, there's a strange inconsistency in this man...
...who tries to kill my governor, yet saves the life of my consul.
Come tomorrow. We'll talk of it.
We have all the information on this man...
...a man of some influence in his own country.
His attack upon our governor is one upon the senate and the people of Rome.
I am convinced that no such attack was intended.
Consul, allow us to continue.
Allow us to be generous.
As a reward to you for your great victory...
...we shall not send him back to the galleys. Take him as your slave.
Such is the will of the senate...
...and the people of Rome.
Not long ago, I returned to Rome...
...with a young man who had saved my life.
You all know him as the finest charioteer in Rome.
Five times, he's driven my horses to victory.
I know him as one who stands in the place of the son I lost.
I have the love and pride in a son's achievements...
...which I thought
I should never have again.
Nothing could make stronger our bond...
...but tonight I wish to share it with you all.
The formalities of adoption have been completed.
Young Arrius is now the legal bearer of my name...
...and the heir to my property.
This ring of my ancestors...
...would have gone to my son.
So now it is yours.
It's a strange destiny that brought me to a new life...
...a new home...
...a new father.
It brought me here.
It may take me away.
But wherever I may be...
...I shall always try to wear this ring as a son of Arrius should.
With gratitude and affection...
...and with honor.
My old friend Pontius Pilate, young Arrius.
Before you came to this city, my horses always won.
Magnificent horses, extremely swift.
Yes, but not swift enough to defeat you.
- Tell me, you come from Judea?
- Yes, sir.
I hear that the climate is difficult to live in.
Not for Judeans.
It's a terrible prospect.
I am to be made governor.
- Of Judea?
- Yes.
I asked for Alexandria.
But it seems the wilderness needs my particular talents.
The scorpions and holy prophets can't get on without me.
Lay the dust of Judea, at least for this evening.
Goats and Jehovah.
You're leaving.
I must.
It's a journey I can't keep you from.
Your eyes have never left it all these months. I can recognize pain.
But still, my counsel is to wait.
Gratus is to be replaced.
The governorship goes to Pontius Pilate.
When?
Very soon.
It's very much to our purpose.
Nothing is to the purpose if, when
I come back to Judea, I come too late.
That is the thought which has punished me every moment I've spent here.
Will Rome see you again?
Here is a part of my life which you have made for me.
I shall remember it.
Whoever the gods are, they take small interest in an old man's hopes.
They have their way.
Forgive me.
You're a stranger here.
Would you be from Nazareth?
Why do you ask?
I thought...
...you might be the one...
The one that I have come back from my country to find.
He would be about your age.
Who?
When I find Him...
...I shall know Him.
Oh, but forgive me.
I am Balthasar of Alexandria.
I am the guest of Sheik Ilderim.
Sack of flesh without brains!
No! No! Not the whip!
That is my host.
Gently! Gently!
Fool! Headless toad!
You know nothing of horses!
Whip my children once and
I'll drain every drop of your blood.
Now, gently around the first turn, and let them run! Go on!
Keep my words in your head!
Let us see some wisdom!
Beautiful horses.
Now! Now! They are ready!
Let them go!
Watch. They'll never hold the turn.
No! No!
Abadon, stop him!
Stop that whip!
I'll kill him! I'll kill...!
Moonhead!
Give me those reins, you fool!
You think you can treat my horses like animals?!
Drive cows and goats!
That's all you're fit for!
Get off, idiot!
Drive goats, not horses!
I am doomed.
You saw what happened here?
This traveler told what would happen before it happened.
Your horses are very fine, but they're not a team.
Not a team?
But one of them held steady, the one on the outside.
- Antares.
- The slow one?
He should run on the inside where he can steady the others in the turns.
You have a keen eye.
Where did you acquire it?
In the circus in Rome.
You have driven in the great circus?
Tell me, my friend, could you make my four run as one?
I'm on my way to Jerusalem.
Would your caravan rest until tomorrow?
We have time enough to eat, drink and talk.
Come into my tent and refresh yourself.
And let me hear how you raced in Rome.
If I had a voice to sing,
I would sing you the psalm of horses.
No other animal has descended so in scale...
...from the first innocent falling of the world.
And tomorrow, I shall put Antares on the inside.
When you do, shorten the yoke.
It will help them in the turns.
Judah Ben-Hur.
You're a Jew, yet you drove in the great circus.
Yes.
By a strange choice and a stranger fortune.
Your coming here was so fit, so right.
We might have achieved wonders!
You have to go.
I make a journey which will not wait.
Ah, well, then perhaps you will come back.
And when you do, bring your friends, your wives.
I have no wives.
No wives at all?
I have six, no, seven.
I've counted eight.
And that is because he is traveling.
At home, he has more.
Believe me, it is a great advantage to have many wives.
- Someday, I hope to have one.
- One wife!
One God, that I can understand.
But one wife, that is not civilized.
It is not generous.
- Was the food not to your liking?
- Indeed.
Thank you. Thank you.
And take my advice, my friend.
Buy yourself some wives.
And now I must say good night to my beauties.
When ready for sleep, they get impatient and jealous.
They wait to see which one
I will embrace first.
- I'll make my farewells then.
- No, no, no, stay.
Stay and see them.
Come, my children. Come.
Strangers make them shy.
Come.
Come, do not be afraid. Come.
There, my children.
They are descended from the Arabians of the Pharaohs...
...and I have named them for the stars.
Come, Antares.
You are the slowest, and you can run all day without tiring.
What? Yes, yes.
Yes, I love you too.
There's my good Antares.
Come, Rigel.
We've both supped well, and the world is good.
There's my good Rigel.
Yes, you are ready for sleep.
The day's work done for you, eh?
Yes, well, you can go to sleep in a minute.
Good night. Good night, my treasure.
Steady, Aldebaran.
I haven't forgotten you.
No. You are the swiftest, but you must be steady.
Never seen finer horses, even in Rome.
You should see their mother, Mira.
I dare not bring her.
My people couldn't bear her absence.
All right, all right.
You are their friend, and they do not give their affections readily.
Come, Antares, Rigel, it is late.
Altair, Aldebaran, go to sleep.
You must be strong and swift.
Go, my children. Go.
At Jerusalem, they'll race the world's finest teams...
...and the champion of the East,
Messala, with his black devils.
He stops at nothing to win.
- Messala? In the circus?
- Yes.
You knew him?
I know him.
Perhaps without much liking.
My people are praying for a man...
...to drive their team to victory over Messala.
You could be that man, the one...
...to stamp his arrogance into the sand.
My horses need only a driver who is worthy of them...
...one who will rule them with love.
For him, they'd outrace the wind.
It's not possible.
That is a pity.
Think of it. To break his pride...
...to humble this tribune before the very people he has degraded.
Just think, his defeat and humiliation at the hands of a Jew!
I know it is not possible.
Does it not delight your imagination?
Does it not answer your purpose?
I must deal with Messala in my own way.
And your way is to kill him.
I see this terrible thing in your eyes.
But no matter what this man has done, you have no right to kill him.
He will be punished inevitably.
I don't believe in miracles.
But all life is a miracle.
Why will you not accept God's judgment?
You do not believe in miracles.
Yet God once spoke to me out of the darkness...
...and a star led me to a village called Bethlehem...
...where I found a newborn child in a manger.
And God lived in this child.
By now, He is a grown man and must be ready to begin his work.
That is why I have returned here...
...so that I may be at hand when He comes among us.
He is near.
He saw the sun set this evening, as we did.
Perhaps He's standing in a doorway somewhere or on a hilltop.
Perhaps He is a shepherd...
...a merchant, a fisherman.
But He lives...
...and all our lives from now on will carry His mark.
There are many paths to God, my son.
I hope yours will not be too difficult.
I'm ready for sleep.
Balthasar is a good man...
...but until all men are like him, we must keep our swords bright.
And our intention true.
So I must leave you.
One last thought.
There is no law in the arena.
Many are killed.
I hope to see you again.
Fine Damascus silk.
Fine Damascus silk.
Esther?
It's Judah.
You are alive.
You are alive.
What are you doing here?
What has happened?
I'm here.
I'm with you.
Where's your father?
The day they took you away, they imprisoned him.
They tortured him.
When they were sure he was hiding nothing, they let him go.
Ever since then, we have been living here, in hiding.
You never went back to Antioch?
No.
The Romans took everything.
There was nothing left for us there.
Where are my mother and sister?
Let me tell him first.
Father.
Father, something wonderful has happened.
Judah Ben-Hur is alive.
He has come home. He is here.
Judah.
Judah Ben-Hur.
My dear old friend.
Let me look at you.
Let me see you.
Yes, yes. It is true.
Praise God for His mercy.
Where are they?
Since that terrible day...
...there has been no word of them.
You should have been less loyal.
Do not pity me, Master Judah.
In fact, I'm twice the man I was.
There is Malluch, my other half.
We met in the dungeons of the citadel.
We were released on the same day.
Malluch without a tongue, and I without life in my legs.
Since then, I have been his tongue...
...and he has been my legs.
Together, we make a considerable man.
Old friend.
She always said you would return.
She never gave up hope.
Though I hoped it,
I didn't believe it.
I see that your one thought is to save your mother and sister.
But suppose that isn't possible.
If one purpose fails, it is good to have another.
Much of your fortune is safe, Judah.
They could not make me tell them where it is.
It is there still...
...to put power into our hands and buy death for the Romans.
That's not why I came back.
Judah, they are dead.
Four years. No one could live so long in the dungeons.
Who lives more than one year in the galleys?
Yes, it is true.
Judah Ben-Hur.
You have come back to us like a returning faith.
Judah, I should like to laugh again.
- Let us laugh.
- We will.
There will be joy again in this house.
We will celebrate among the dust.
I will take him.
We stood here before.
A long while ago.
Four years.
But now it seems as if...
...only yesterday...
I was saying:
"If you were not a bride,
I should kiss you goodbye."
"If I were not a bride...
...there would be no goodbyes to be said."
I am not a bride.
Why did you never marry?
My father needed me.
And also...
It's still on my finger.
I said I should wear it till I met a woman I would marry.
It's become a part of my hand.
If Messala once knew you were here...
As he must.
He will know where they are.
And if you should find...?
- If he says they're dead...
- Messala will wish they were living.
I've seen too much of what hate can do.
My father is burned up with it.
But I've heard of a young rabbi who says that forgiveness is greater...
...and love more powerful than hatred.
I believe it.
- Esther.
- Judah.
Stay alive.
Keep away from Messala.
Only if I can give up thinking and feeling.
That time isn't yet come.
The stone that fell from this roof so long ago is still falling.
Only this time you won't be sent to the galleys.
This time you will be destroyed.
You'll die.
Tribune, compliments of Quintus
Arrius. He awaits your pleasure.
- Consul here?
- Quintus Arrius, the younger tribune.
Thank him. Bring him to me.
- I didn't know the consul had a son.
- He's a champion of the great circus.
Why is he presenting me with gifts?
- Perhaps he'll race against you.
- Look.
It's magnificent.
And from a man I've never met.
You're wrong, Messala.
By what magic do you bear the name of a consul of Rome?
You were the magician, Messala.
You condemned me to the galleys.
When my ship was sunk,
I saved the consul's life.
You know his seal?
Now I have come back...
...as I swore I would.
Your gift is exquisitely appropriate, young Arrius.
You suggest I use it on myself?
What has become of my mother and my sister?
It is not my duty to keep track of prisoners.
Find them, Messala.
Restore them to me, and I'll forget what I vowed...
...with every stroke of that oar you chained me to.
I am not the governor.
I can do nothing without approval.
Then get it.
I will come back tomorrow.
Don't disappoint me, Messala.
What became of them?
It's been almost five years.
Do you suppose they're still alive?
Go to the citadel, Drusus. Find out.
- And if they're dead?
- They're dead!
"Miriam, wife. Tirzah, daughter."
Yes, they are the ones.
Are they alive?
E section...
...lower level.
Cell two.
Jailer on that level will know.
Water.
Water.
Let me out!
- How long since you've seen them?
- Never.
And I've been here three years.
But they're alive all right.
The food disappears.
Lepers.
They must be taken outside the city and released at once.
Then we'll burn out the cell.
Is someone there?
There is someone there.
Who are you?
Don't come any closer.
Who are you?
Esther.
It's Miriam.
Miriam.
Miriam?
Stay where you are.
You have come home.
Stand back, Esther.
We are lepers.
Oh, Esther.
Tirzah.
Esther...
...is Judah living?
Yes, he is alive.
He is here.
Where?
He is searching for you now.
I must find him and tell him.
- No!
- Tell my father.
No.
Tell no one.
We are going away to the Valley of the Lepers.
We won't return.
Judah has to be told.
No.
Please.
I couldn't see his face.
Is it changed?
No, he is not changed.
He's not changed.
You love him, Esther.
Promise me...
...on your love for him...
...you will never tell him you've seen us.
Is he never to know?
Let him remember us as we were.
Promise me.
There's nothing else I can hope for.
Only this.
I promise.
I am content.
Wait.
Messala will find out.
I am sure of that.
I pray to God they're alive and that Messala will free them.
He'll free them.
He wants to survive.
He cannot free them, Judah.
What do you mean?
I saw them.
You saw them?
Where?
When did you see them?
They were dead.
They were dead.
When?
When? When?!
In the prison.
When I was waiting for news of my father.
Why didn't you tell me?
I couldn't tell you.
Nor even you, Father.
I was afraid that if you saw Messala...
Judah, you have come to the end of your search.
It's over now.
Over?
- Judah.
- Over?
Judah, forget, forget, forget Messala.
Go back to Rome.
Gentlemen.
Officers.
Defenders of great Rome's Imperium...
...may I enter?
Certainly, sheik.
You do us an unexpected honor.
The noble tribune is most gracious.
And now...
...the question you're asking:
Why am I here?
As you know, I am a gambling man.
The games approach.
I am racing my whites against the noble tribune's undefeated blacks.
I will back my own poor horses.
No limits?
- Mark me first!
- And me!
- What odds?
- A moment, please...
...my lords, protectors of the far flung marshes.
May I first sit down?
Sit. How much will you wager?
- Yes, let's call his game.
- Give the Arab a seat.
A bench, quickly.
Thank you.
- Now.
- 1000 denarii.
- Mark me!
Your spirit does you credit, but do not be impatient. There is time.
First gentlemen, the odds.
The tribune has won many times. The odds should be in the same measure.
What is your pleasure, gentlemen?
Two to one.
Noble Romans, men of the Tiber, masters of the Earth...
...where is the courage that made Rome master of the world?
I can get better odds on any street market.
Three to one.
Let us not haggle. Let us be fair.
In four years, the tribune has won four victories in the circus.
- In all truth...
- Just a moment.
We know you have good horses, but who is your driver?
Did I not tell you?
How careless of me.
The Prince of Hur.
Judah Ben-Hur.
Prince of Hur?
- He was sent to the galleys years ago.
- He has returned.
Returned? Impossible.
The divine Tiberius is merciful as always.
Well?
Will no one back the noble tribune against a Jew, a galley slave?
Perhaps I made a mistake in coming here.
You, tribune...
...will you give me four to one?
Four to one.
Good.
Four to one, sheik. The difference between a Roman and a Jew.
Or an Arab.
Bravely spoken.
Now we will settle the amount of our wager. I will venture...
A thousand talents?
- A thousand talents?
- Yes, a thousand talents.
Of course, if it is too much...
A thousand talents it will be.
Agreed.
Treat them well.
They've earned it today.
You're good fellows.
If only men were this good.
Remember, Altair...
...nine times around the circus.
Aldebaran.
Rigel, did you hear?
Nine lives to live.
My swift fellow.
You must not win the race the first time around.
You win the last time around.
And you cannot win alone.
You must wait for the others.
Steady Antares.
Like a rock.
You will be our anchor.
I thought they'd never love another as they love me.
They have taken me into their family.
Rest well, my stars.
Tomorrow we go up to the city.
Then if you defeat Messala and the new governor there to see it...
...the news will scorch the streets of the Roman world.
Pontius Pilate here?
Yes, and ready to grind his heel into us.
You will make him see what men are born in this land.
I only know that
I race against Messala.
Look for the yoke.
Ease that strap.
God forgive me for seeking vengeance, but my path is set.
Into Your hands I commit my life.
Do with me as You will.
The Star of David.
To shine out for your people and my people together...
...and blind the eyes of Rome.
They are ready.
Easy, girl, easy.
Number five.
Where is number five?
This is the day, Judah.
It's between us now.
Yes, this is the day.
Look, he's driving a Greek chariot.
Judah, be careful.
Don't let him near you.
Hail, Jupiter. Give me victory.
Watch your line! Keep your places!
The formation is good.
A beautiful line.
Citizens...
...I welcome you to these games in the name of your emperor, Tiberius.
We dedicate them to his glory...
...and to the glory of Rome...
...of which you are all part.
Let us honor those who race for us today.
They come here from Alexandria...
...Messina...
...Carthage...
...Cyprus...
...Rome...
...Corinth...
...Athens...
...Phrygia...
...and Judea.
To the best of these, a crown of victory.
The race begins.
Hail, Caesar!
Come, my children, come!
The Roman pig!
Salute.
A great victory.
You are the people's one true god...
...for the time being.
Permit us to worship.
I crown their god.
I will send for you.
I have a message from Rome.
A long life, young Arrius and the good sense to live it.
We cannot wait, tribune.
He will come. He will...
We cannot wait any longer, tribune.
He will come!
He will come.
I've sent for him, and he will come.
If you wish us to keep you alive, we have to go to work now, tribune.
Do you understand?
To hack the legs off me?
Not yet. Not till I've seen him.
I don't receive him with half a body.
No!
I told you, Drusus. I told you.
Here he is.
Triumph complete, Judah.
The race won. The enemy destroyed.
I see no enemy.
What do you think you see?
The smashed body of a wretched animal?
There's enough of a man still left here for you to hate.
Let me help you.
You think they're dead, your mother and sister.
Dead. And the race over.
It isn't over, Judah.
They're not dead.
Where are they?
Where are they?
Where are they?!
Look for them...
...in the Valley of the Lepers...
...if you can recognize them.
It goes on.
It goes on, Judah.
The race...
The race is not over.
Is there a way down here?
Are you a madman?
Keep well out of this place.
Man.
I'm searching for two women, a mother and daughter.
There are many women.
Of the family of Hur.
We have no names here.
For them?
- Why did you say they were dead?
- It was what they wanted.
You must not betray this faith.
Would you do this for them?
Not to see them?
They are coming.
Love them in the way they must need to be loved. Not to look at them.
Let them be as if you had never come here. Please!
Is Judah well?
Is he happy?
Yes, he is well.
Your mind can be at rest for him.
He is well, Miriam.
God be with you.
They have gone.
We can go back.
Go back to what?
Judah, they have one blessing left.
To think you remember them as they were...
...and live your own life.
Forget what is here.
Forget?
It's as though they're alive in a grave.
- But what can you do?
- Undo what you've done.
How could you have suffered them to come here? I must see them.
No, Judah, please! Judah!
Think, Judah, think. It would tear them apart if they see you.
He is here. I have found Him.
The child has become a man.
And the man, I know it now, is the Son of God.
The promise is true.
Happy Balthasar.
Life has answered you.
Life has been answered.
God has answered it.
Come. Come with me.
When the Romans were marching me to the galleys...
...thirst had nearly killed me.
A man gave me water to drink.
I went on living.
I should have done better if I had poured it into the sand.
No.
I am thirsty still.
Come and listen.
I have business with Rome.
You insist on death.
Goodbye, Judah.
You sent for me?
I hope I bring you a good conclusion to your victory.
I have a message for you from the consul, your father.
- I honor him.
- As you may honor yourself.
You have been made a citizen of Rome.
Do you say nothing to this?
I have just come from the Valley of Stone...
...where my mother and sister live what's left of their lives.
By Rome's will, lepers, outcasts without hope.
I have heard this. There was great blame there, very deeply regretted.
Their flesh is mine, Lord Pilate.
It already carries Rome's mark.
Messala is dead.
What he did has had its way with him.
The deed was not Messala's.
I knew him, well.
Before the cruelty of Rome spread in his blood.
Rome destroyed Messala as surely as Rome has destroyed my family.
Where there is greatness, great government or power...
...even great feeling or compassion...
...error also is great.
We progress and mature by fault.
Rome has said she is ready to join your life to hers in a great future.
There are other voices.
The voice, for instance, of Arrius waiting for you in Rome.
He would tell you, if I may speak in his place...
...not to crucify yourself on a shadow such as old resentment...
...or impossible loyalties.
Perfect freedom has no existence.
A grown man knows the world he lives in.
And for the present, the world is Rome.
Young Arrius, I am sure, will choose it.
I am Judah Ben-Hur.
I cross this floor in spoken friendship...
...as I would speak to Arrius.
But when I go up those stairs,
I become the hand of Caesar...
...ready to crush those who challenge his authority.
There are too many men of envy and ambition...
...who try to disrupt the government of Rome.
You have become the victor and hero to those people.
They look to you, their one true god, as I call you.
If you stay here, you will find yourself part of this tragedy.
I am already part of this tragedy.
Return this to Arrius.
I honor him too well to wear it any longer.
Even for Arrius' sake,
I cannot protect you...
...from personal disaster if you stay here.
You are too great a danger.
Leave Judea.
You have my word.
I was afraid you would never come back...
...afraid of what would happen to you.
But I see you again.
Your father's waiting for me.
Where is he?
What do you mean to do?
Rest, sleep.
For a few hours of the night let your mind be at peace.
Peace?
Love and peace.
Do you think I don't long for them as much as you do?
Where do you see them?
If you had heard this man from Nazareth.
Balthasar's word.
He is more than Balthasar's word.
His voiced traveled with such a still purpose.
It was more than a voice.
A man more than a man.
He said, " Blessed are the merciful...
...for they shall obtain mercy.
Blessed are the peacemakers...
...for they shall be called the children of God."
Children of God?
In that dead valley where we left them?
I tell you every man of Judea is unclean and will stay unclean...
...until we have scoured off our bodies the crust and filth...
...of being at the mercy of tyranny.
No other life is possible except to wash this land clean.
- In blood?
- Yes, in blood!
I know there is a law in life.
That blood begets more blood as dog begets dog.
Death generates death...
...as the vulture breeds the vulture.
But the voice I heard today on the hill said:
"Love your enemy.
Do good to those who despitefully use you."
All who are born in this land hereafter can suffer as we have done.
As you make us do now.
Are we to bear nothing together?
Even love?
I can hardly draw breath...
...without feeling you in my heart.
But I know...
...that everything I do from this moment...
...bears greater pain than you have ever suffered.
It is better not to love me.
It was Judah Ben-Hur I loved.
What has become of him?
You seem to be now the very thing you set out to destroy...
...giving evil for evil.
Hatred is turning you to stone.
It's as though you had become Messala.
I've lost you, Judah.
No further.
What are you doing here?
I was here last evening waiting for you.
I have waited all night.
What has happened?
Where is Tirzah?
Leave the food.
I am coming closer. Don't be afraid.
- What are you doing?
- Don't be afraid.
I've heard Him again, the man from Nazareth.
If ever words were from God, they are in everything He says.
I cannot bear that you should have never known...
...this hand of quiet reaching towards us.
He is going to Jerusalem.
We can find Him there.
Bring Tirzah and we can go together to find Him.
Tirzah is dying.
Leave the food and go.
It's Judah.
Why did you tell him?
Yes, Judah, yes.
No nearer, please, God, no nearer.
Mother.
Wait, Mother, wait.
Let me talk with you.
Please.
No, no further. Please.
No, Judah. Son, no.
Mother, let me see Tirzah.
Tirzah is dying.
Judah, if they would see Jesus of Nazareth they will know...
...that life is everlasting...
...and death is nothing to fear if you have faith.
I will take them to Him.
No!
God, no!
No, no, dear son.
Mother...
...where is Tirzah?
Judah, no.
Judah, no.
You must not go to her, dear son.
Please.
Dear son.
I am afraid.
No cause.
The world is more than we know.
Tirzah, it's Judah.
No, Judah.
Alms for the blind?
Alms for the blind?
Alms for the blind?
- Why are the streets deserted?
- They have gone to the trial.
Trial? Whose trial?
The young rabbi from Nazareth.
They are wanting his death.
- This cannot be true.
- Alms?
What has he done?
Nothing I know of.
For the blind, for the blind.
Help for the blind.
- Look, lepers!
- Lepers!
Get away! Stay away!
Go away!
Lepers! Lepers!
How can this be?
I know this man.
Will someone help Him?
Take pity on Him.
Have mercy.
In His pain...
...this look of peace.
Watch over them, Esther.
We must go back.
I brought you here to this...
...when I hoped...
You haven't failed, Esther.
Hail King of the Jews!
This is where your search has brought you, Balthasar.
He gave me water...
...and a heart to live.
What has He done to merit this?
He has taken the world of our sins onto Himself.
To this end He said He was born...
...in that stable...
...where I first saw Him.
For this cause,
He came into the world.
For this death?
This beginning.
I have lived too long.
As though He were carrying in that cross...
...the pain of the world.
So fearful, and yet why is it...
...I'm not afraid anymore?
The shadow of a storm.
A strange darkness...
...but still day.
His life is over.
What is it?
This tearing.
I am in pain.
I feel it too.
Do you see your hand?
Almost at the moment He died...
...I heard Him say,
"Father, forgive them...
...for they know not what they do."
Even then.
Even then.
And I felt His voice take the sword out of my hand.
English Subtitles by
SDI Media Group
- Evenin', doc.
- Hello, Rimfire.
Doesn't the navy ever run out of potatoes?
This ship sure don't.
- Evenin', Doctor.
- Ellis. Johnny. Hot below.
Sure is. I'm gonna sleep topside tonight.
Not for long. We're getting the tail end of a storm in the midwatch.
A man can't plan much ahead at all, can he?
Not much.
All right, break it up.
Make room for a workin' sailor.
Just keep workin', man.
You're lucky you don't get it on your heads.
Come and get it, you hungry buzzards.
Here's another one.
Who's got a light?
Those sharks.
- Ain't they nasty things?
- They're just fish.
Corky, what do you think of the captain they sent to take old Pinky's place?
I ain't supposed to think.
You know somethin'? He ain't left his cabin since we left Trinidad.
What's he doing?
Playing acey-deucy by himself?
I'll tell you what he's doin'.
He's seasick!
That's what the navy's comin' to.
Seasick feather merchants takin' the place of regular navy.
Man, I just hope this guy knows port from starboard, that's all.
You know what I'd do if I was you,
Robbins?
I'd just put in for the skipper's job if I was you.
All right. Did you have your laugh?
Well, now I'm gonna tell you somethin'.
The guy who walks that bridge has got your neck in his hands, and don't you forget it.
Thanks, Salvador.
- You've got us down 200, partner.
- Sorry, sir.
- Six spades.
- I thought I could do it, sir.
- Well, don't go off half-cocked again.
- No, sir.
- Any sign of the weather, doc?
- Filling up in the east.
Jolly, jolly. And I've got the watch.
- I pass.
- What? Haven't you got anything?
- Why don't you just look at his hand?
- Well, I have to help him along.
- I suppose I could try a heart, sir.
- He supposes he could try a heart, sir.
- Two clubs.
- Captain Murrell still holed up, doc?
- Far as I know.
- Three diamonds.
They might have sent us a captain who had his sea legs.
I guess they do the best they can.
I don't see why they didn't move Ware up,
He's been exec long enough.
Mackeson, the only craft I ever commanded was a yawl in the Miami yacht races.
The nearest I ever came to winning was 29th.
The navy was desperate enough to take me, but not foolish enough to let me sail away by myself.
- Beats me how I ever got this far.
- Money.
- I know you're rich.
- Don't be bitter, grandpa.
Your bid, Mackeson.
- Four spades.
- I'm not bitter. I just wanna go home.
When I've bought a ranch in Nevada,
I never expect to see water again.
- Ensign Merry?
- Sir?
Your bid.
- Careful.
- Yes, sir. I'm thinking about it.
- Your mouth's open, Ensign.
- Sir?
- Are you gonna bid?
- Six diamonds.
- Six diamonds?
- I'm just backing you up, sir.
You are deliberately distracting my partner.
Pass and double.
All right, Mr. Merry. Dummy.
This Murrell seems like a cold sort of a fish.
Captain Murrell oughtn't to be here at all.
He's as weak as a kitten.
A man who gets his ship torpedoed and spends 25 days on a raft in the North Atlantic oughtn't to have to hit the ball again with only a few weeks in the hospital.
I guess there aren't enough commanding officers to go around.
Well, at least they gave him an easy ship.
Boy, easy's no word for it.
Listen, he'll get more rest on this boat...
- Ship.
- Ship, boat. What's the difference?
He'll still get more rest here than he would if he were in a feather bed.
Now, me, I'd like something to happen once in a while.
If the navy ever gets a load of this crew in battle, they'll send us back to boot camp.
I'll look ridiculous with my head shaved.
Kid, couldn't you have indicated clubs?
Then I could have gone to no-trump.
We are going down again. And doubled.
Sorry, sir.
All right.
- Your lead, Mackeson.
- Now hear this.
Lay before the mast all eight o'clock reports.
Darken ship. The smoking lamp is out on all weather decks.
We'll slow her down a little.
All engines ahead two-thirds.
Bridge, Radar. I've got a spook.
- Radar contact, Mr. Ware.
- What?
- Radar contact.
- Good heavens.
- Bridge, aye?
- Definite spook, sir.
- Strong enough to plot?
- Range: 12,000 off the starboard bow.
- Get on the plot, Mackeson.
- Captain, aye.
Radar reports a contact off starboard bow, sir.
- Run a plot on it.
- Plot's working, sir.
- Then head for the target.
- Aye aye, sir.
- Zigzag, sir?
- What would you say, mister?
Me? Well, negative zigzag, sir.
Give the plot a chance to steady on.
That's right, mister.
- Give me that again, Radar.
- Did you get it?
Estimated target's course 140, speed ten knots, bearing 124 true.
Bring her around to 124.
All engines ahead flank.
- Can't seem to make up his mind.
- Maybe he wants to see if I'm awake.
- What's the rush?
- I don't know, but we're sure juicin' it up.
What's the word?
Radar's got somethin'.
We're going after it.
- What's up?
- He says they got a bogey.
Hurry. Come on, wake up.
- We're going after it.
- You don't wanna miss it.
Gangway.
Gangway, please.
I was here first. Gangway yourself.
Excuse me, sir.
Break it up. Let the captain in.
- What's all the crowd about, sailor?
- Well, sir,
I guess we don't get much excitement aboard this ship.
- Keep your seat. What's your name?
- Andrews, sir.
- What do you make of it?
- I don't know, Captain.
- Our speed's rattling the set.
- Guess. You're the operator.
It's doing ten knots.
It's got some power, but it's too small a spook to be a heavy vessel.
It might be a fishing smack, or it might be the conning tower of a sub, sir.
- Bridge. Lieutenant Ware.
- Mr. Ware.
We're about to lose radar contact at the rate we're going.
Reduce speed to speed of target and get on its tail.
At this distance, we'll make visual contact at daybreak.
- Shall I shake the ship out for a standby?
- Not much shaking out to be done.
But ready underwater search gear.
If this spook is a U-boat, he might pull the plug, and we'll have to go after him.
- Who's the senior radarman, Andrews?
- That's me, sir.
You track the target.
Any turn or change in speed, no matter how small, don't miss it.
I'll stick on him, don't you worry, Captain.
All right, I won't.
If anybody's gonna be caught with his pants down, it oughtn't to be us.
Seems like he knows his business, to me.
Feather merchant, that's all I got to say.
Signal is to stern,
Herr Kapitän. 8,000 meters.
It's either a ship or a false echo.
You've lost it.
It comes and goes.
The sea return makes it difficult to keep the image.
There, Kapitän. There it comes.
Port 20 degrees, Schwaffer.
- Target's course changing to port.
- Target's turning left, Captain.
25... 20 degrees.
Maintain your present speed.
Steady as you go.
May I ask what your procedure is, sir?
If this is an enemy ship, our signal may be on his oscillator and he's trying to feel us out - make a couple of turns, see if we change position.
If we can hold an unchanging position behind him, he may mistake us for a ghost echo on these heavy seas.
- The signal does not change, Herr Kapitän.
- Starboard 40 degrees.
- Target's turning sharp starboard, sir.
- Can you estimate the degree, Andrews?
- 40... 45 degrees, Captain.
- All engines stop.
You think it might be a U-boat, sir?
Wiggling like one. He may take the bait.
- If he doesn't, he'll crash-dive.
- Excuse me, sir.
It holds the same place, Herr Kapitän.
Resume course 140.
Yes?
He's on the hook.
He's come back into course 140.
- All engines ahead two-thirds, steer 140.
- Aye aye, sir.
Good, Andrews. The target won't be satisfied with one check.
Look for him to make a turn.
Or he may slow down or speed up. Thank you.
- Sir?
- Well?
- Do you wanna send a dispatch, sir?
- Why? Are you anxious to take one?
- No, sir. I just thought...
- We have to keep radio silence tonight.
We might tip our hand to the target.
But I'll get one out in the morning, OK?
Yes, sir.
This is the captain. I guess you're all waiting for some kind of word.
We're tracking an unidentified ship.
We're going to try to stay on his tail until morning.
We will breakfast early, and go to battle stations at 0530.
Don't be surprised if we tangle with a pig-boat a little after dawn.
Do your jobs efficiently and we'll chalk one up for the Haynes. That's all.
I reckon we'll just drop an egg right down his periscope.
That'll be the end of one more Nazi, huh?
Or he'll just pop a fish right in our guts, and that'll be the end of this tin can.
- Man, a sub ain't no match for us.
- They ain't?
Then how come they hunt U-boats with three destroyers workin' together up in the North Atlantic?
Yeah. How come?
Your bet.
- Whose watch is next?
- Lieutenant Kunz, Herr Kapitän.
Have him come here.
Lieutenant Kunz, report forward.
You wanted me, Herr Kapitän?
Ja, Kunz.
Yours is the next watch on topside.
We have a signal on the FMB.
I think it's a false echo.
But to check its reaction, you will zigzag twice an hour until daybreak.
If it moves in closer, you will awaken me immediately.
Schwaffer.
Come in, Heini.
That Kunz annoys me.
Remind him that we do not salute at sea.
He is new, Herr Kapitän.
He will tire of it.
He is new?
Like our new Germany. A machine.
Herr Kapitän. You think we are wise in risking that image to be a false echo?
Wise? Expedient.
Time is important, Heini, and we would travel too slowly underwater.
In 48 hours, we rendezvous with Raider M.
We take the captured British code book and we go home with it.
And this is the important thing.
Not the code book, but because, when we have it, we can go home.
Tastes like oil and bilge and green mold.
Sit down, Heini.
Tastes like a U-boat.
I've been in the U-boats too long, Heini.
There was a time when
I went to sea with a fresh heart.
That was many years ago.
Now I can only think of going home.
- You want more?
- No more, Herr Kapitän.
You think I take too much?
Just enough to sleep.
I cannot rest without it.
I think too much.
Never think, Heini.
Be a good warrior and never think.
You pay a penalty for thinking.
You cannot rest.
I taught these sons of mine to be good warriors.
Country. Duty. Ask no question.
One is at the bottom of the sea, and this one is a cinder in a burned airplane.
And I'm glad.
That's the way for warriors to die.
Young, and with faith.
I have lived too long.
- We are friends, Heini?
- I have been with you since I was a cadet.
That's not what I asked you.
I do not know.
Sometimes I am afraid of you.
Many times I do not understand you.
- I am not certain we are friends.
- We are friends. Believe that.
We are friends. Because we are friends,
I'll tell you something.
I am sick of this war.
It's not a good war.
You don't remember the first one.
I was a Fähnrich in the U-boats.
And how proud I was!
We went out in those little sardine tins, and if we submerged, we couldn't always be sure we'd come up again.
It was a good game we played.
The captain would look through his periscope and sight a target, and then he did arithmetic in his head and said "Torpedo los."
And you know something? Sometimes the torpedo wouldn't even leave the tube.
And if it did, we were most lucky to hit something.
And now I look in the periscope and it gives me the distance and the speed.
I pass this information to the attack table, and the machinery turns and the lights flash, and we get the answer.
The torpedo runs to its target, and there's no human error in this.
They've taken human error out of war, Heini.
They've taken the human out of war.
War was different then.
It put iron in the country's backbone, gave them brave memory.
And even in defeat, it gave them honor.
There is no honor in this war.
The memories will be ugly, even if we win.
And if we die, we die without God.
You know that, Heini?
I listen to what you say, Herr Kapitän.
It's a bad war.
Its reason is twisted.
Its purpose is dark.
It's not for a simple man.
Lieutenant Crain is coming up, sir.
Port side.
What's your best time on reloading depth charges?
It's not so hot, Captain.
Some of my boys are pretty green, but I'd say three minutes, or four.
- Well, you've got to do better than that.
- I can try, sir.
That's not good enough.
It might be the difference between stopping the enemy and getting stopped ourselves.
If that's the case, sir, we'll be good enough.
I'll depend on it.
Mr. Ware? I'd like you to stick with the plot in the pilot house for the time being, please.
Aye aye, sir.
Looks like we've run out of the squall.
Yeah.
Why don't you lay in your cabin for a while?
I'm all right, Doctor.
You getting the feel of a ship again?
Either that, or that pig-boat out there is strong medicine.
I don't see how you can know it's the enemy.
Well, call it a sixth sense if you want to.
I always know when a mind is working the other end of that radar beam.
Interesting. I've heard hunters say the same thing.
They can sense the presence of game.
In any case, this is going to be a disappointed ship if it isn't the enemy.
Yes, they all seem to be a bloodthirsty crew.
The men would like a chance to do what they're here for.
Not much other reason for existence.
Not now, anyway.
No, I sometimes wonder if there ever was another reason.
I know what you mean.
I had a baby clinic up in Ohio.
It was pretty important to me.
Now it seems like something that happened on another planet and in another century.
- What was your work, Captain?
- This. The sea.
- You were a sailor?
- Third officer on a freighter out of Boston, to Liverpool,
Le Havre, and back again.
Some of our crew will be glad to know that.
Our saltiest boys were complaining mightily about getting a civilian skipper.
- Feather merchant, I think they call it.
- Well, I am a feather merchant.
- Well, yes, but not exactly.
- No, exactly.
On the freighter, we were men against the sea. Here, we're men against men.
Like every other civilian in the war,
I had to learn a new way to think.
Why did you change over to the navy?
The freighter I was on was cut in half by a torpedo.
Thought I'd be on the shooting end for a change.
Captain.
- Captain, aye?
- Target's increased speed to 13 knots, sir.
Ring up a compensating speed, Mr. Ware.
Aye aye, sir. All engines ahead standard, 203 rpm, sir.
Very well.
Well, in time we'll all get back to our own stuff again.
The war'll get swallowed up and seem like it never happened.
Yes, but it won't be the same as it was.
It won't have that feeling of permanency that we had before.
- We've learned a hard truth.
- How do you mean?
That there's no end to misery and destruction.
You cut the head off a snake, it grows another one.
You cut that one off, you find another.
We can't kill it because it's within ourselves.
You can call it the enemy if you want to, but it's part of us. We're all men.
I suppose there is some reason to lose hope, but I reject it.
I have a family, and I want something better for them than war, and I think it's possible.
Have you any children, Captain?
- No.
- Married?
I married a girl in England.
She was killed.
Bombers?
No. When the war broke out, I got passage for her on my freighter for home - the one that was torpedoed in half.
I was aft when it happened. I watched the other half of the ship just slide away.
There wasn't anything
I could do about it.
I saw her run out on the foredeck, and I heard her call my name, then that half of the ship just turned over and went down.
We hadn't been married very long.
Ring up the fire room.
Tell 'em we're making smoke.
- I don't wanna see that at dawn.
- Aye aye, sir.
You got more reason than the rest of us to wanna catch this submarine.
- It might be the one that...
- It might be, but this isn't my private war.
I'm just doing what I have to do.
Like that German captain out there.
I don't like the job, and maybe he doesn't either.
- Weather from Fleet Weather Control, sir.
- Thank you.
We're moving into a high-pressure area.
We're going to have a clear day.
Set ASW condition one.
All hands, man your battle stations.
All repair parties manned and ready.
Condition able.
- Quartermaster Quiroga at the helm.
- Quartermaster Spencer on annunciator.
Engineering spaces manned and ready.
All boilers on the line.
Maximum speed available, 24 knots.
- Sonar gear manned and ready.
- Magazines manned and ready.
Sky one, mount 33, manned and ready.
Sky one, mount 32, manned and ready, sir.
- 41, manned and ready.
- Mount 31, manned and ready.
- All guns manned and ready.
- Very well.
- The ship is smart and quick, Mr. Ware.
- We've a willing bunch of boys.
Messenger.
When that U-boat pulls the plug, code this dispatch for Fleet Operations.
"Have tracked U-boat 130 miles, bearing 140. Now engaging enemy."
And give our grid position.
Let's get after the target.
Mr. Merry, ring up flank speed.
All engines ahead flank.
I've got him, sir! A conning tower!
Where away?
Three degrees off the starboard bow. 6,000 yards.
- Main batteries ready?
- Reported ready, sir.
We might get close enough for a shot before he pops under.
Ship off stern, Herr Schwaffer.
Alarm.
Target diving.
Right ten degrees rudder.
Steady up on 170.
Slow to two-thirds speed.
Slow to two-thirds speed, sir?
It's not necessary to repeat the order, Quartermaster.
- Aye aye, sir.
- Zigzag, sir?
- Negative zigzag.
- Aye aye, sir.
170 at ten knots.
We're a sittin' duck, that's what we are.
- We're presenting our beam to the enemy?
- I'm giving him a shot with the stern tubes.
You can't reload those tubes.
We can attack up his tail when we want.
Yes, sir. How will we know when he's firing, sir?
I'll give him five minutes to get to emergency depth, three to come up to periscope depth, another two minutes to get us in his sights.
If he's any kind of a captain, he'll spit the fish out ten minutes from now.
Level.
Seal.
Engine room clear. Forward torpedo room clear. Aft torpedo room clear.
U-boat all ready for action.
Silent routine.
He is crossing our stern to starboard, Herr Kapitän.
He does not approach.
I do not understand, Herr Kapitän.
He doesn't zigzag, and he holds course away from us.
Give them to me.
He is clever, or he is a fool.
Maybe he is too clever, or too foolish.
We'll see. Bring the ship up to periscope depth.
18 meters, Herr Kapitän.
American escort destroyer.
One stack.
Three-inch guns fore and aft.
Antiaircraft midships. No tubes.
Buckley class destroyer escort.
Maximum speed 25 knots.
Carries stern racks and K-guns.
Capable of dropping 17 patterns.
Carries latest underwater detection gear.
I think we use the stern tubes.
Ready stern tubes for underwater attack.
Target red 90.
Range 1,000.
- Torpedo speed 30 knots.
- Red 90. 1,000. Speed 30.
Firing position six degrees, torpedo deflection ten.
Running speed 30, depth two meters.
Fire both torpedoes.
On.
- Yeah.
- On.
On.
- Yeah.
- On. Standing by.
Port six degrees.
Firing position, Herr Kapitän.
Torpedoes ready?
Ready.
- Count.
- Ten, nine, eight, seven, six, five, four, three, two, one, zero.
Torpedoes running.
Running time?
One minute, 40 seconds, Herr Kapitän.
Left full rudder.
High-speed propellers coming in from port side.
Stop port engine.
Starboard engine ahead full.
Torpedoes off the port bow.
All ahead standard.
Stop your swing and steady up.
The Miami yacht races were never like this.
Hey, Corky. How do you suppose the captain knew when to turn this old tub?
Because he's the captain, and that's the reason he is and you ain't.
All right, let's go get 'em. All engines ahead full. Ring up 18 knots. Steady as you go.
All engines ahead full.
Ring up 18 knots. Steady as you go.
Aye aye, sir.
Down to 100. Emergency.
Steer 140.
I do not see how we missed at that range.
We shouldn't have.
I think this American captain is no amateur.
Well, neither am I.
Sonar, Captain.
Commence underwater search.
Make sure it's piped through onto the bridge speaker.
Aye aye, sir. Lowering sonar projector.
Sonar searching beam to beam, sir.
- Who's on sonar, Mr. Ware?
- Lewis, sir. He's good at the job.
That's him.
Got him, sir.
Keep that open.
Target's still on the old course of 140.
We'll turn to 140 when we're astern of him.
Sonar lash, Herr Kapitän.
He has made contact.
- Do you wish to change course?
- No, not yet.
We wait until he thinks he has our depth.
- We're gonna be on him pretty quickly, sir.
- Depth-charge party wants depth setting.
Set to 75. But I may want to alter that before we fire.
Set pattern for 75.
- Set.
- Load.
Loaded.
Range 500, closing fast.
- 300 yards, sir.
- Pattern set to 75, sir.
Stand by to fire.
Port red three. Down to 150.
He's going deeper.
Mr. Ware, reset depth charges to 150.
Aye aye, sir.
Reset at 150.
Secure it.
Fire one.
Fire two.
Come on, Ellis. Get the lead out.
Get up off your dime.
- Casualty here.
- Fire three.
Mr. Ware.
Stand by.
- Time the reload.
- Aye aye, sir.
Get a replacement.
Port red three. Release Bold.
Sonar, Captain. He's using some kind of a decoy. Can you pick him out of it?
He's coming out of it now, sir, heading about 080 degrees.
Left ten degrees rudder.
Reset depth-charge pattern to 150.
Increase rudder to 30 degrees left.
Steady up on 080.
Reverse course and take it up to 50.
Level.
Echo faded. I've lost contact.
- Lewis can't find him, sir.
- Secure underwater search.
Reduce speed to two-thirds.
Mr. Mackeson.
- I'm giving you a hypothetical problem.
- Aye, Captain?
Take our last contact with the target as a start.
Our course was 164, sir.
Give the target a course of 260, keep him on it for 30 minutes at a speed of four knots.
260, 30 minutes, four knots.
Bring him back on course 140 for 30 minutes at a speed of eight knots.
140, 30 minutes, eight knots.
We'll hold our present course and speed for half an hour.
30 at 18.
From there, give me a course and speed to intercept the target.
Will we make a lost-contact search?
We won't catch this bird in a search pattern.
I'm sure he's come off our keel and scooted in the opposite direction.
Our course would be 239 degrees, speed 19 knots.
We would intercept in 28 minutes from the beginning of the run, sir.
All right, we'll try it.
Target might not come back on course 140.
I think he will.
He's got an important mission.
Nothing'll stop him short of being sunk.
Pass the word to battle stations: stand easy.
Aye aye, sir.
He fades, Herr Kapitän.
He goes away.
You think he's given up, Herr Kapitän?
It's possible.
But, to be certain, we hold this course for a while, before we turn again to 140.
- Captain, sir?
- Well?
- How're we doin'?
- You're doin' all right, sailors.
That guy Robbins is 180 out.
- This guy is no feather merchant.
- You said it.
I had to amputate his fingers.
What was your time on reloading,
Mr. Crain?
Three minutes three, the first time.
Two minutes 40, the second.
Right on. Give your crew a "well done" for me.
Thank you, sir.
Lie still, sailor.
You're out of the war now.
Is it bad?
You've lost your fingers. It's my fault.
I shouldn't have tripped the racks so quickly.
No, sir. I oughtn't to have had my hand on the rail.
I guess I got excited, sir.
We'll get you flown stateside as soon as we put back into Trinidad.
You'll be back in your civvy job in no time at all.
I was a watchmaker.
Operational priority dispatch coming in, sir.
Ask the executive officer to join me in the crypto room.
Well, you won't be making any watches again.
No, sir. But I'll make out all right.
I'd bet on that.
- All right, let's get him to bed.
- Did we get the sub, sir?
No, we missed him.
I'd have given my fingers to get that sub.
I don't know anything about sub-chasing, but I rather think our new captain does. Joe.
If that U-boat is still in the ocean.
I wouldn't give a plugged duck for its chances.
The dispatch is just coming through the decoder, sir.
"Destroyers Luckman, Wald, Green, detached to aid you."
"Anticipate U-boat may be attempting to rendezvous with German Raider S, U or M."
"Reduce radio traffic to position signal once every hour. End."
But it'll take 14 or 15 hours for the destroyers to catch up with us.
Yes. If we're lucky enough to find that U-boat, he may tow us up against a raider before help comes, and that wouldn't be so lucky.
Those murdering wolves can outgun and outrun us.
How do you feel about it, Mr. Ware?
We're closing the triangle in 14 minutes, sir.
Well?
Let's push our luck.
- Alert battle stations, Mr. Ware.
- Aye aye, sir.
Voltage is low on port generator.
- I'll call the LE.
- More soup, Herr Kapitän?
More power on the port generator.
It does not taste like tennis shoes, Herr Kapitän?
It's very good.
The men mistreat you, Cookie.
They make jokes when they are happy.
I don't mind.
- Are they happy now?
- They are proud of you, Herr Kapitän.
Thank you, Cookie.
- It's now nearly 50 minutes, Herr Kapitän.
- Kunz.
Bring the ship up to periscope depth.
Herr Kapitän, the maneuvers were brilliant.
The Führer would be pleased.
Herr Kapitän? Propellers. 1200 meters.
- Which quarter?
- Port.
- 18 meters.
- Be ready for emergency dive.
Emergency. Down to 80.
The American has read my mind, Heini.
- Water bombs.
- Port red three, down to 150.
- Target turning left.
- Left standard rudder.
Set depth charges to 150.
- Where is the bottom?
- A plateau, Herr Kapitän.
About 310 meters.
It's not possible, Herr Kapitän, to go that deep.
The pressure would crush the hull.
Port red three. Release Bold.
- The bottom.
- Herr Kapitän...
Level.
Stop engines.
We build them good in Germany, Heini.
He's given me the slip again.
I'm only getting bottom echoes.
Sonar's lost him, Captain.
Give me a Fathometer reading.
150 fathoms, sir.
That's 310 meters.
That's over a thousand feet.
Can he go that deep?
He might like us to think he can't.
Slow down turbines easy until stopped.
I want absolute silence on this ship.
Sonar, this is the captain. Secure, but keep a close listening watch on the hydrophone.
If he is down there,
I don't think he'll have time to linger.
His engines are fading.
He's not circling?
He's gone, Herr Kapitän.
We will listen for a while.
Doc, this is really a hot one.
At least they're keeping cool down there.
- "A painted ship on a painted ocean."
- What's that, doc?
I was reminded of "The Ancient Mariner."
It rather fits us right now.
Something unreal about this waiting out here on a deserted sea.
It'll be real enough if that pig-boat puts a fish in us.
- Any luck, Rimfire?
- No, sir.
Them fish are afraid they'll make some noise if they bite.
Here, let me try it.
I guess you're finding this sun hard to take after the North Atlantic.
It doesn't matter. It's always either too cold or too hot wherever there's a war on.
- Well, have a salt pill.
- Thanks.
We've been floating around for quite a while.
Think the U-boat's gotten away from us again?
No, he's down there all right.
- Beats me how they get men to do it.
- Do what?
Go and sit in that coffin down there.
They're not so bad off.
Actually, they stand a better chance than we do, in this case.
Pretty hard for one ship to surprise them.
Their commander might be able to knock us off if he's smart enough.
- D'you think he is?
- What, smart enough?
We'll know that when it happens.
I wonder what sort of man he is.
Well, he's got his share of guts,
I know that.
If he weren't so bullheaded about coming back on course 140, he could have kissed us goodbye a long time ago, that's all I know.
I have no idea what he is, or what he thinks.
I don't wanna know the men
I'm trying to destroy.
Yes, I know.
The American must be far away by this time.
It's a curious thing, but I know he's there, waiting.
All right, we go. Silent routine, 140.
Level.
Course will be 140.
Continue silent routine.
Lewis, get up. We got somethin'.
- Bridge, Sonar.
- Go ahead, Sonar.
- Propeller cavitation, deep and slow.
- Can you get a heading?
Can you figure a heading?
Lewis thinks he's moving southeast.
Coming back on 140 again.
Alert battle stations.
Commence underwater search.
Give me minimum rpm on both shafts. Steer 140.
Propellers, Herr Kapitän.
He's a devil, Heini.
Somehow... somehow we must lose him.
Or kill him.
- He's pinpointed.
- Ready to close in?
No. Pass the word:
I want a conference with all officers and chiefs in the wardroom.
Boatswain's mate. Pass the word.
All officers and chiefs in the wardroom on the double.
We're at a disadvantage because he can turn sharper than we can.
We can shake him up, but a death blow'd be pure luck.
We've expended a third of our depth charges.
The U-boat can stay underwater for another 24 hours if he wants to.
If we run out of depth charges, the offensive will be theirs, and we'd have to break contact to get away from his torpedoes.
But we can't follow him and wait for our ships to join us because we might get pulled into a trap with a German raider before they get here.
What we're going to do is to fight a delaying action.
The enemy's about a thousand yards ahead.
We'll hold this distance for a little while.
Then we'll run in, lay one pattern of charges, drop back, wait for one hour, and attack again.
We can keep this routine up for seven hours.
He can't get anywhere very fast, and our ships should be here by the end of that period.
He might even surface.
Being inside a submarine under attack is the worst experience you can imagine.
After they see what we're doing, they might prefer to surrender, or at least shoot it out.
I want you all to get as much rest as you can.
Stand easy at your stations, but be ready every time we lunge.
It's going to be a long, dull job, but it's a damn sight worse for the Germans.
We'll begin the routine at 1500.
Herr Kapitän, aft torpedo room.
We've got trouble here.
Take command.
Stay away from me.
We can do nothing with him,
Herr Kapitän.
Come here, son.
Give me the wrench.
Give it to me.
You will come to attention.
It's a part of our work to die.
But we are not going to die.
Do you believe me?
He gets more accurate.
He will tear us apart the next time.
- What do you suggest, Kunz?
- Surface, Herr Kapitän. Surrender.
- Holem?
- I am not concerned, Herr Kapitän.
- Schwaffer?
- I say go on.
- The condition of the ship?
- We are not yet hurt.
But we cannot escape.
It will be your privilege to die for the new
Germany. Put this on the ship's turntable.
But the sound will carry, Herr Kapitän.
It will help the American to know our position.
Put it on.
- Herr Kapitän, you cannot do this.
- Sing it, Heini.
For you, my friend, and you...
Sing it, Heini.
...all of us together, here's a toast to life and to laughter and song
Good beer, my friend...
Sing it, Kunz. Sing it, Holem.
Sing it, everybody.
...as we sing loud and strong
Fill up the flowing steins again with foam on every lip
We'll give a skol and shout "Jawohl!" in lasting fellowship
And when we eye a Lorelei with captivating ways
May we drink to love all our livelong days
To you, my friend, and you, my friend, and all of us together
Here's a toast to life and to laughter and song
Good beer, my friend, good cheer, my friend, through every kind of weather
Make the welkin ring as we sing loud and strong
Fill up the flowing steins again with foam on every lip
We'll give a skol and shout "Jawohl!" in lasting fellowship
Bridge, Sonar. I'm getting screwy noises from the hydrophone.
Sonar reports screwy noises from the target.
Tell him to cut it in on speaker, Ensign.
Put it on the line, Lewis.
And when we eye a Lorelei with captivating ways
They're havin' a ball down there.
I don't think our psychology's working,
Captain.
No, it's working all right.
I almost wish it wasn't.
All ahead for attack, Mr. Ware.
Maybe we can rip him open in the middle of a waltz.
Schwaffer.
Secure oil valves two and three.
Number four.
The valves will not contain the oil, Herr Kapitän.
Empty belly tanks into the sea.
Oil slick off the starboard quarter, sir.
It's a big one.
Sonar, we may have hit him hard.
Are his props turning?
Sorry, sir, he doesn't seem to be a bit dead.
He's going away at a good clip to starboard.
- Right ten degree rudder.
- Stand by to fire, sir?
No, we'll ride his tail again.
Let him digest that last one.
He can't stay down much longer.
Come back on 140.
- Schwaffer?
- Yeah?
Ask Braun which way the American turned after the attack.
He turned to starboard, Herr Kapitän.
Now I will show you something.
Each time he has attacked, we have turned off to port or starboard to avoid the attack.
He drops his water bombs and runs on for 300 or 400 meters, and then turns, to fall back on our stern.
He doesn't always turn the same way, but twice he did, to run parallel with our course for a very few minutes.
In those minutes he was vulnerable.
If he does it again, we will be ready.
There will not be time to come up to periscope depth.
But it's possible.
If we spread the four bow torpedoes, fired all at once, angled a few degrees apart, one may hit.
One will be enough.
But if he does not turn parallel to our course, what can we do?
We will survive until he does.
Weather from Fleet Weather Control, sir.
- Mr. Ware.
- Yes, sir?
The weather's gonna get worse before dawn. There's wind in it.
It's gonna be difficult to keep a fix on the target in the heavy sea.
- We may as well try to finish him off.
- Immediately?
Immediately. Inform Mr. Crain we'll throw everything we have left at the target.
- You understand?
- Herr Kapitän, the destroyer is closing.
- He comes early.
- We are ready, Herr Kapitän.
You understand there will not be the usual routine?
Seal torpedo.
- Mr. Ware, set depth charges to 100.
- Aye aye, sir.
- Target turning to port, sir.
- Stand by to fire.
Left ten degrees rudder.
Fire.
He fires too shallow. Up to 50.
Now, American, turn the right way and I'll give you a pretty present.
Plot reports he's off our stern.
Course still 140.
Give her a right 15 degree rudder.
We'll make a beam attack.
He is turning. Starboard 20 degrees.
Halt course.
Go ahead, Sonar. High-speed propeller effect, all on starboard side.
Stop port engine. Left full rudder.
It's a hit.
Silence.
Come on now. Under both arms, man.
- He's only got one arm, sir.
- Get him to starboard. Easy, boys.
We took the fish to forward fire room.
Fore and aft bulkheads, blown out.
- Fire room and engine room, flooded.
- Can the pumps keep us afloat?
- If they can, it won't be for long.
- Well, make it as long as you can.
- Aft engine, what's your damage?
- A few valves loose, and we're taking water, but we're still getting steam.
- How long before you flood out?
- 30 minutes, maybe a little more.
Stop your engines, but be ready to give me all the power you have the instant I ask for it.
Mr. Ware, get a party and light some fires on deck. Use mattresses and gasoline.
I want it to look as if the ship is burning.
The pumps are operating, but it's hopeless.
I'm sure it is. You go along with Ware and see if you can give him a hand.
Radio, this is the captain. Send this emergency dispatch to Operations.
"Hit by torpedo.
Request immediate assistance."
His engines have stopped.
We'll go up to periscope depth.
- Periscope depth.
- 18 meters.
That's enough. Get out of here.
Attention, everyone. This is the captain.
I want all of you to listen carefully.
They got one in where it would do the most damage and we're going to lose the ship.
But we still have a kick left.
We're going to try to use it.
I am hoping that playing dead and the fire will bring the enemy to the surface.
Except for securing crew and the gun crew of mount 31, I want you all to abandon ship.
Repeat: abandon ship.
Get as far away as quickly as you can.
It's possible the enemy will put another fish into us without warning.
Now get going. Good luck.
- 18 meters, Herr Kapitän.
- Steady keel.
We torpedo on the surface. Take it up.
- Captain.
- Submarine off starboard bow.
This side.
I'm half-surprised he took the bait.
The first foolish thing he's done.
That makes us even.
Tell him that in five minutes
I will finish off his ship.
Ready, Herr Kapitän.
He's given us five minutes. Signalman.
Take this message. Say
"Message understood." Add a "thank you."
Mount 31, this is the captain.
That sub'll come close abeam.
As soon as he's broadside, give him a shell in the stern.
If we're lucky, we oughta have a sitting duck.
Your second target is his deck gun, but be quick,
'cause he'll start shooting when we do.
When I give the command to fire, continue at will.
Signalman, no point in you and the talker staying aboard any longer.
Aye aye, sir. Good luck, sir.
Mr. Ware. Your papers say you were captain of a racing yacht before the war.
You must have a good eye for speed and distance.
- I think I do.
- Would you like to take the helm?
My pleasure, Captain.
This will not take long.
Use only one torpedo, Schwaffer.
Engine room, this is the captain.
Can I still depend on you?
Say the word, and I'll give you all we've got.
- Crack your throttle wide and get out.
- Turn it on full and get outta here.
Fire.
Fire, Kunz.
Secondary, fire at the bridge.
Set the automatic detonators and get the men out of the ship.
Get going.
- Where's Schwaffer?
- I don't know, Herr Kapitän.
- But the detonators are set, Herr Kapitän.
- Get overboard.
I'll take you up, Heini. Come on.
- Hurry up.
- Come on, let's go.
Come on, Heini.
- All clear. The boat's laying off stern for us.
- Right behind you.
Can't you get in closer?
The captain's behind me.
The captain's still aboard.
There, on the deck.
- We gotta help him. Get in there.
- Those U-boats have detonators.
I don't care what they have.
Take this boat in - now.
There's no fire on the port side.
We go over that way.
Do you understand English? Port side.
Not much time. You go.
I'll bring this man.
Can't you see? This man's dying.
He is my friend.
Stay where you are, Captain.
Come on, you guys, let's get up there.
This way. Get up there.
Hurry, sir,
I'm double-parked downstairs.
- That's it, Mr. Ware. That's everybody.
- OK, get this thing outta here.
Remember our talk on the bridge, the weighty one? Death and destruction?
You might be interested to know that I've seen another reason for hope.
Found it in a funny place, too.
In the middle of an ocean, right in the middle of a war.
You had to come a long way to find it, didn't you, doc?
It was worth the trip.
Maybe.
I should have died many times, Captain, but I continue to survive, somehow.
This time, it was your fault.
I didn't know. Next time,
I won't throw you the rope.
I think you will.
A "MASTERPIECE APPRECIATION
SERIES" SPECIAL SELECTION
GRANDSCOPE
A SHOCHIKU FILM
THE HUMAN CONDITION
Developed by BUNGEI PRODUCTION and NINJIN CLUB
Produced by
SHIGERU WAKATSUKI
Based on the Novel by
JUNPEI GOMIKAWA
Screenplay by ZENZO MATSUYAMA and MASAKI KOBAYASHI
Director of Photography
YOSHIO MIYAJIMA
Production Design KAZUE HIRATAKA
Sound Recording HIDEO NISHIZAKI
Music CHUJI KINOSHITA
Lighting TAKASHI KATO
Editing KEIICHI URAOKA
1st Ass't Director YUGORO IMAI
Ass't. Director KOICHI INAGAKI
Ass't Camera TOSHITADA NAGUMO
Ass't Production Design JUSHO TODA
Set Decoration KYOJI SASAKI
Set Design
YOJI MURO
Production Manager
TATSUO OSAWA
Starring
TATSUYA NAKADAI as Kaji
MICHIYO ARATAMA as Michiko
CHIKAGE AWASHIMA as Jin Tung Fu
INEKO ARIMA as Yang Chun Lan
KEIJI SADA as Kageyama
SO YAMAMURA as Okishima
AKIRA ISHIHAMA as Chen
SHINJI NANBARA as Kao
SEIJI MIYAGUCHI as Wang Heng Li
TORU ABE as Sergeant Watai
MASAO MISHIMA as Kuroki
EITARO OZAWA as Okazaki
KOJI MITSUI as Furuya
AKITAKE KONO as Captain Kono
NOBUO NAKAMURA as Head Office Chief
KYU SAZANKA as Cho Meisan
Directed by
MASAKI KOBAYASHI
SOUTHERN GATE OF PEACE
This isn't like you.
- Why?
- You're running away.
Don't you want me?
Of course I do.
And I want you too.
Yet we can't marry -
How many times must I explain?
Because you might be called up?
I wouldn't care if it was the day after.
Of course I'd cry.
I'd cry bitterly.
But happiness only lies in marrying the one you love.
All right.
I'll take you back to my dormitory.
You'll stay with me tonight.
All right?
Yes... I'll go.
No, you better go back to your own dormitory.
I can't take you to mine.
You were just testing me.
You shouldn't have done that.
You're a coward and a weakling!
Now I see that!
SOUTH MANCHURIA STEEL CO.
RESEARCH DEPARTMENT
Hey.
Well, what a surprise.
I came to say good-bye, as sentimental as that may sound.
You got called up?
When do you leave?
- Tomorrow morning.
The papers came five days ago.
I've been drinking ever since.
Oh, yes.
I ran into Michiko last night.
Aren't you going to marry her?
It's you today.
Tomorrow it could be me.
Being called up isn't a death sentence.
I'm a born optimist.
Unlike you, I've had my share of earthly pleasures.
My only regret is not having left the seed of life in the womb of a woman I love.
I'll probably regret it too, but I can't be as optimistic as you.
The manager wants me.
Wait for me inside.
No, I'll see you tonight.
Tonight? All right.
Kaji looked a bit angry.
Is anything wrong?
Are you going to be platonic friends forever?
You had the spunk to come out here to Manchuria alone.
Throw yourself at him!
I did.
He rejected you?
No. 12 and 13, stop your chatter... or I'll report you.
THE SUPERVISION
OF COLONIAL LABOR
I read it twice.
Very interesting, though it does smell of leftist tendencies.
What are you trying to say?
That men should be treated as men -
I suppose that's the gist.
But in colonial territories it's -
- A challenge?
Yes, sir.
We profit by exploiting
Chinese labor - isn't that the idea?
That's right.
And that goes against your thesis.
Yes, it does.
Mind if I take a cigarette?
- Help yourself.
So how about it?
Without that contradiction, there'd be nothing to write about.
So it contradicts your thesis, but there are still ways to improve performance, is that it?
Yes, perhaps there are.
Listen, I want you to take over at the Loh Hu Liong mines.
Any objections to being sent off to the hinterlands?
I'm not trying to force you.
You've analyzed the local situation quite well on paper.
Would you want it to end up only on paper?
No.
When you're ready to put your theories into practice,
I'll help you get a fair chance at exemption from military service.
An exemption from military service?
You're not the only one to get an exemption.
There are dozens of others.
But it's the idea of accepting an exemption in exchange for the Loh Hu Liong job.
You always complicate things.
It's a bad habit.
The war is escalating, and there's only one way to oppose it:
A life sentence in prison.
Neither you nor I have the courage for that. Am I right?
Yes... you're right.
I humbly accept your kind gift.
Not even the commander of the
Kwangtung Army ever dared slap me.
Take Michiko and go to Loh Hu Liong.
Michiko... his sweetheart?
Is pretty?
The most beautiful girl in the world.
But you're the most beautiful girl in my world.
Listen.
So you think you'd just be a shepherd's dog.
What's wrong with that?
A good dog can lead the sheep to greener pastures and earn their gratitude.
If such things are possible.
As for me,
I'll take this one.
My little Manon, your hair smells like dried grass.
Michiko-san!
Kageyama-san, take care.
Michiko-san, go with Kaji to Loh Hu Liong.
Let this damn war go to the dogs.
If you let happiness slip through your fingers...
He may never return.
I won't be called up.
Loh Hu Liong is a tiny Manchurian village.
All we'll find there are iron ore and labor camps.
Would you go with me to a place like that?
I'd follow you anywhere.
This will affect your whole life.
Think it over carefully.
Even if you were called up...
I'd still want to have your child.
Is that crazy?
What a honeymoon!
What did you say?
It's all this wind and dust.
I don't care! It's wonderful!
It feels like gravel in my mouth.
LOH HU LIONG
Step up.
All right.
Bastard!
Why, you!
Think I'm blind?
Trick me into giving you special rations?
Oh no, you don't!
Come here.
- Kaji from the head office?
- Yes.
I'm Okishima.
We'll be working together.
We can dispense with the formalities.
What ever made you come out to the boonies?
Following Kaji-san through thick and thin?
Nice to meet you.
This way.
Hey, take their bags to their new quarters.
I read your report on the supervision of colonial labor.
Lots of fancy words.
Please, ma'am.
The men here are plain speakers.
You'll be fundamentally incompatible.
- Thanks for the advice.
- What's so funny?
Sorry, but your own fancy words sound out of place.
Anyway, it's very well-written.
Touches the core of the matter.
Touches... but doesn't quite grasp it.
Why?
If I knew, I'd write it myself.
I'll show your wife around.
You go see the boss.
Furuya, show him the way.
I know this is nothing new, sir, but our first shift requested 2,500 men.
Only 1,500 turned up this morning.
We can never meet our production goal that way.
We're at war, Okazaki.
We must expect such shortages.
You can't do your work unless all conditions are perfect?
I didn't mean that, but if Labor would do something -
MEETING IN PROGRESS
I'm Kaji. I just arrived.
So you're Kaji?
I'll introduce you.
Mr. Higuchi, supervisor of Pit No. 2.
His foreman, Mr. Kawashima.
Mr. Koike, supervisor of Pit No. 1.
And his foreman, Mr. Okazaki.
The head office sent Mr. Kaji here as labor supervisor.
Pleased to meet you.
You're just in time.
Please sit down.
We're discussing labor problems.
Any good ideas?
I'd like to speak with Mr. Okishima first... and find out how many men are available.
If labor conditions are improved, all available men will report for work.
And in more concrete terms?
Our employment system must be radically revised.
The labor boss must be replaced by a direct employment system.
Ridiculous!
You'd be throttling the mines.
Right, Kawashima?
Why is that?
Because -
Kaji's the name, right?
Think about it.
We have
200 labor groups here.
You think a single one has no system of skimming or doesn't cheat on food rations?
I doubt it, but the matter under discussion is how to improve the work attendance rate.
Laborers lose the desire to work because labor conditions are basically no good.
Regardless of how things are "basically," workers aren't what you make them out to be in theory.
They squander any surplus in idleness or gambling or pour it into women's crotches.
We have a difference of opinion.
Mistreating the men won't yield good results.
You know, Kaji, theory may be correct and yet not always apply in reality.
Then either the theory was wrong or it was incorrectly applied.
Never mind.
Do what you think is right.
I respect revolutionary ideas.
Now, your work here won't just be a desk job.
It will cover all aspects of the men's lives.
Rationing food, disposing of excrement from 10,000 men, handling menstrual cases among the women.
The women?
We have comfort quarters for our men.
Okishima will show you.
There are about 60 Manchu women.
Starting today, you're their boss.
I'm relieved you're not a bachelor.
Go home now and do your duty by your wife - but don't overdo it, eh?
But why must our group be disbanded?
Poor yields.
You've been raking off too much.
Are you kidding?
What's this all about?
Shall I show you the evidence?
Why should the company make trouble over our contracts with the men?
The company's money is meant for the workers.
But Mr. Okazaki says our men work very hard.
Yes, but your rolls have been padded.
But Mr. Okazaki -
I'm not Mr. Okazaki!
Mr. Okishima, put in a good word for us.
We've been associates a long time.
And it's made me moldy.
Kaji's been scraping away the mold until I'm practically raw.
Mr. Supervisor, it's the poor living quarters and poor food that make our men sickly.
I know.
Bad quarters, poor food.
Men can't work on beans alone.
But there's a still greater evil.
You know what that is?
You men.
Now get this:
I give the men my word.
The food situation will definitely improve.
Better quarters will be considered.
But it's no use as long as you exploit them.
You lend money to transient laborers to bind them for life.
And that's not the worst.
You try to squeeze even more from your investment.
You hire slave-drivers to practically murder those who try to escape.
I won't allow such methods.
Allow them?
What do you mean?
You're just an employee yourself!
You have no right!
Won't allow it, eh?
Try and stop us!
Hey!
Any more threats and I'll kick your nuts in!
The gentlemen seem to be having a bad day.
We'll come back.
Mr. Muta.
I'm returning this.
Your other gifts have been returned to your home.
Sons of bitches left too peacefully.
They must be up to something.
Making a tour of inspection?
Much obliged.
Mr. Okishima, please see that we get the men we need.
I have to face the old man.
You'll get 'em.
Just don't kill 'em off too fast!
Son of a bitch!
What's going on?
The dog refused to work!
Beating him won't help.
They're not horses.
Get up, scum!
Beating them only lowers productivity.
I take orders from Okazaki... not you.
What goes on here doesn't concern Labor.
- So you'll keep beating them?
- That's right!
Fine. Then tomorrow you'll have no men to beat.
What?
You're in the pit now.
You can't pull rank down here.
You men don't want to work?
Then don't!
But you needn't come back tomorrow.
Stay by the cozy fireplace in your barracks.
But remember:
You'll get no food!
Just getting home?
You want something?
Just one question.
Did you threaten to shut off our supply of labor?
Well? Say something.
Can we talk about work in the morning?
In the morning?
I can see why you'd prefer that.
Can't have your loving wife seeing your weaknesses.
- Do I have any?
- Answer my question!
What have you got to be so proud of?
You may brutally beat your laborers, but it doesn't mean others will be intimidated.
I just warned your assistant.
Mr. Kaji, you know how important that ore is to us.
What's wrong with slapping a cheek or two if it keeps the ore coming out and helps the war effort?
What's more important:
The ore or the workers?
I don't think in those terms.
It's ridiculous to compare men with ore.
Take care of your men and the ore will come out.
Let me make it very clear that Okazaki of Loh Hu Liong won't be changed by any of your half-baked theories.
I'll stick to my own ways.
Remember that.
I will. And I'll stick to my ways too.
Son of a...
KENPEITAI - MILITARY POLICE
These gentlemen from the Kenpeitai are offering us 600 special laborers to achieve our goals.
Special laborers?
War prisoners from North China.
All you need do is keep them fed.
With the labor shortages, it's a heaven-sent blessing.
A stroke of good fortune.
Yes! Our head office will certainly be pleased.
Kaji, discuss the matter with Okishima.
Discuss what exactly?
I'll tell you what.
I never repeat my instructions.
Got that?
First: Special laborers must not mingle with ordinary laborers.
Second: Their quarters must be enclosed by barbed wire... electrified barbed wire.
Understand?
You'll handle matters of food and labor, but they must not escape!
What voltage can you supply for the fence?
About 3,000 volts.
Good enough.
The laborers will be delivered one week from today.
The exact time will be specified later. Understand?
We may not be ready in a week.
What?
You don't seem terribly grateful.
Kaji!
Why should civilians take over POWs -
Make preparations immediately!
Wait!
I haven't heard your answer.
We understand.
We'll be ready.
It could take an armed platoon to return safely with these men.
I want to be neither aggressive nor defensive with them.
You go on if you want.
Don't waste your heroism on me.
Someday you'll appreciate me.
Chen, how's your mother?
She says she's sick.
She lies in bed all day.
Sick, huh?
Take good care of her.
Mr. Kaji, I have a request.
May I have some flour from the storeroom?
For your mother?
I wish I could help, but I can't make any exceptions.
Here they come.
Chen, how do you feel about all this?
These are your fellow countrymen who lived in anti-Japanese areas.
Your mother's from Shantung.
Her friends might be among them.
My mother raised me not to be anti-Japanese.
In a battle zone, you'd be killed as a sympathizer.
The key!
We don't have it yet.
- You in charge from Loh Hu Liong?
- Yes.
- Your name?
- Kaji.
Oh, right.
I never forget a name.
Very well. I hereby transfer the special laborers to you.
Never forget that these men are prisoners of war.
You must deal with them like a soldier.
Civilian negligence will not be tolerated. You understand?
I do.
No, you don't!
You think your seven men can handle 600 prisoners?
What if they try to escape?
We received no special instructions about the transfer, so we anticipated no special danger.
You're a bold one.
How old are you?
I'm 28.
You married?
May I please have the key?
You don't back down.
I like that.
Will you witness the transfer?
Don't be ridiculous.
I'm now on leave.
You seem to believe that the army can make mistakes.
Don't worry.
When the army says 604, it's 604.
Submit a transfer receipt immediately.
Let those who die, die, but they must not escape!
Filthy bastard!
Get up!
What a mess to unload on us!
Open the other cars!
Out! Everyone out!
Hurry up! Everyone out!
Everyone out!
Line up! Double file!
Mr. Kaji!
This is bad.
What is it?
Hurry!
Line up quickly!
They baked to death.
Help!
Don't let them eat all of a sudden!
Stop them!
If you gorge yourselves now, you'll die!
Kaji!
Get back!
Don't eat that!
Don't eat that!
Don't eat that!
Get back!
You'll all die!
Throw me the whip!
Kaji, the whip!
The special laborers are unfit for work.
Please give them a month's rest.
They're half dead.
These anti-Japanese elements should be fed without working?
If you'd witnessed the scene,
I'm sure you'd agree, sir.
Twelve of them were allowed to bake to death.
If you want to kill them, stuff them with raw beans - they'll die for sure!
Listen here.
Be careful what you say.
What you're saying amounts to denouncing the military.
I'll defer to your opinion one last time.
- One last time?
- That's right.
One last time.
May I ask why?
You really want to know?
You're a man of strong convictions, but I just got a report from Furuya.
150 men under your supervision were just snatched away.
But I'll overlook the matter this once.
Everyone up!
I give you all warning.
I know you all want to escape.
But you cannot.
If you even try... you'll meet the same fate as this dog.
Chen, show them.
Tomorrow begins a month of still higher production goals.
The directors have even discussed replacing all the top men here.
I'll accept this disgrace if we cannot increase production.
However, we have not yet done our utmost.
Until we attain the 20% increase demanded of us,
I will extend the higher production goal every month.
If there are dissenting opinions, air them now.
In the name of final victory,
I refuse to listen to any excuses hereafter.
Mr. Koike, tell him we'll see it through.
I, Okazaki, vow that Pit No. 1 will achieve the new goal.
I'm sure you'll permit me to use any means necessary.
Use all means available.
Increased production is the main thing.
Listen here:
Lash them on with all you've got.
If any Chinaman balks, kill the scum!
Push them! Whip them!
We need that extra 20%.
Those of you who top your quota will be amply rewarded.
Remember: We're at war here.
If anyone feels he can't do this, let him step forward!
Good. I have your word.
I'll assume all responsibility.
Don't worry... and do your best!
You will start work tomorrow.
Your rations will be sorghum wine and soy pulp, same as the regular laborers.
You don't smoke?
I used to.
You stopped?
When we run out of tobacco, we suffer again.
The Japanese won't keep us supplied.
We restored your health, yet you still hate us?
We are not soldiers.
We have the right to be released.
I don't have the authority to release you, only to detain you.
Master, when we be free?
We all not soldier.
We don't fight.
Japan soldiers come... do bad things to Chinese women.
Take away all men... bring here.
Nothing to eat... many die.
Not die... killed.
I can't set you free, but I can promise that you will not be killed.
The Japanese say pretty words... and write pretty words... but never keep their promises!
Your name was Kao?
Remember this:
You've been placed under our supervision.
Whether that barbed wire stays up or not depends on you.
Faster!
Move it!
Step along there!
Come on!
Move!
You'll be in trouble if any men escape, won't you?
Why should they escape?
They used to work in their own villages.
Why would they want to work here?
Here they have no mother, no wife, no children.
Kaji, why are so many special laborers left in camp?
They're the sick ones.
Make sure they're not just malingerers.
I didn't come to find fault.
I'd like to see their camp.
Certainly.
No danger of escape?
I don't think so.
We must give them some incentive to work.
I think so too.
What does a man in a cage dream of most?
Freedom, I suppose.
Freedom?
You must be a poet!
It's women.
Men dream of women.
Women dream of men.
What did you dream of as a bachelor?
The ways of the empire?
I doubt it.
The way to make caged men work is to satisfy
70% of their bodily lust.
With what women?
It's very simple.
You're in charge of the comfort women.
Send them in here.
Is that necessary?
Do you want a woman?
See that?
Just the word brings joy to their hearts.
What is a man?
Not poetry or morality.
He's a mass of lust and greed that absorbs and excretes.
I'll ask their leaders' opinion.
Who gives you orders?
POWs or me?
I'm more concerned about escapes than you are.
Carry out my orders.
Stop loafing!
Hurry up!
Hurry up!
Son of a bitch!
Get up!
You dog!
Master!
This man sick!
He maybe die.
Have mercy... he sick man!
Save your whining for Kaji.
I don't care if I kill a few of you dogs.
Here he comes!
Ah, Kaji-san!
No want to see?
Sister Jin!
Mr. Kaji... welcome!
Mr. Kaji, wanna have some fun?
I won't charge you.
I'm sorry... but I need 30 girls for the special laborers.
The Labor Office will pay.
They go inside barbed wire?
Just like dogs... sleep together... everybody watch?
If you don't wish to, just say so.
You don't, do you?
We no have choice.
It's our job.
I send 30 girls tomorrow.
Don't be crazy!
We can't work with everyone watching.
Know how many men are in that compound?
If you don't wish to go.
Then don't.
Even if the others go,
I refuse.
Think you can get out of working?
What do you mean?
I was speaking for all of you.
You talk real big.
If you want to go, then go.
Don't act so big!
What about you?
Stop arguing.
You don't make the decisions here.
I'll decide what to do.
Thirty girls will go tonight.
All right?
Yes, please do that.
- What happened?
- The foreman let him have it.
- Where?
- Pit No. 3.
Okazaki!
Get him to first aid quickly.
If this is ignored, supervision will be impossible!
I'll charge Okazaki with manslaughter.
Come now! Relax!
It wasn't wise to use force, but he was only following orders to increase production.
So he actually acted out of patriotism.
Listen here.
Okazaki may be a brute, but his brutality lets him run that large pit.
We need him just like we need you and Okishima to keep our 10,000 men in line.
Understand?
We're at war.
To achieve the greater goal, we must overlook the small mistakes.
Small mistakes?
A human being was murdered!
Kaji, I'll tell you just once more:
Calm down!
Think it over.
I'm sure you'll see.
Can we exchange a good, hard-working Japanese man for the life of one mere prisoner?
That's not the point.
If you insist on pressing charges, include me as an accomplice.
I'll see that the suit goes unfavorably for you.
I can do it, you know.
You'd dare distort the truth?
Sir, will you see that this never happens again?
How should we report it?
As an accidental death.
Say he fell off a ledge.
It does happen, you know.
Sir!
You think I'll falsify the report?
What else can we do?
- Well, I won't!
- Yes, you will!
Then I become
Okazaki's accomplice.
What will you do?
I'll get Okazaki!
You fool!
Why play the hero?
Fight so hard and you'll just run out of steam.
You're a fool to ruin your future with his.
Mr. Kaji.
One of our men was mistreated.
What became of him?
He died.
I assume the culprit was arrested.
- He's still working.
- Will there be no trial?
I suppose not.
If that's why you're here, come inside and explain to all of us.
No, I came to wait for some women.
You promised not to kill!
You're like all the other Japanese!
If you treat me like a murderer just because I'm Japanese, you'll be losing the only friend you have.
Friend?
You don't have to believe me!
Wait.
Does this man's death mean others may also die?
I won't allow it.
Women!
Women!
Women!
Open the gate.
Let the women in.
Ten girls to a barrack.
Have them out by 10:00.
Look! Women!
I'm coming!
Women!
We're here, just like I promised.
Why do you send us women?
Think as you please.
I'm just obeying orders.
You send whores to sleep with us like dogs so we'll work harder?
Is that it?
What's that about whores?
I wouldn't talk so big!
You wouldn't understand!
Oh, I understand.
You're no better off than us.
Look at your friends over there.
Have you no shame?
You think I like coming here?
I told him I refused!
Aren't you the same, beaten down by the Japanese every day?
Then why so cocky?
You love it here so much?
I'm sorry.
We all suffer the same misfortune.
Welcome home!
You must be tired.
Look at this!
Isn't it wonderful?
Her first egg!
She cackled so loud
I thought a dog had gotten inside.
But right there was this great big egg!
What is it?
Are you in a bad mood?
No, it's nothing.
It's like you hate coming home.
Is something wrong?
Why won't you tell me about it?
Would you want a husband who runs a whorehouse?
What does that mean?
You'd vomit if I told you!
What happens to 30 women in a camp of 600 men?
And now I'm an accomplice to murder too.
That can't be.
The workers don't believe a word I say.
With time you'll gain their trust.
Could you just be quiet for a while?
It's a shame.
What is?
Since those prisoners came, you seem so far away.
I guess I do.
I hate feeling like I'm fighting a Ione battle.
You leave early every morning and return late at night.
During that time, you work.
Meanwhile,
I clean the house, putter around the kitchen, and do the shopping... but it's like doing nothing.
Still I try to convince myself that the little things I do help keep you going.
Otherwise, there's no difference between a housewife and a housekeeper.
I'm sorry. Forgive me.
I'll letting my work get the best of me.
Let's stop worrying about it... just for now.
It was nice talking to you.
Locked up in here, we lose touch with the outside world.
Thank you.
Don't you want to have a good time?
I came here for business.
I'm sorry to take your time.
I just wanted to talk.
You plan to escape, don't you?
It's impossible with all that barbed wire.
It's charged with electricity, that's all.
It's men who run the electricity through it.
Don't talk like that.
Human beings are weak creatures.
Go where you're told to go.
Do what you're told to do.
That's the only way to survive.
You're wrong.
Man can become as strong as he wishes.
He need only find the cause of his unhappiness.
Want to make some easy money?
You mean selling my girls elsewhere?
I don't go for that kind of deal.
This isn't about women.
Laborers?
I have something else in mind this time.
You mean behind the barbed wire?
Too dangerous.
If anything goes wrong, it's my neck.
It's not like the others.
Escaped prisoners mean big profit.
Help make arrangements and I'll split it with you.
It's easy money.
What kind of arrangements?
The easiest way... is like this.
You just flick off the electric switch.
Did someone put you up to this?
My buddy Muta, the Japanese assistant who was just fired.
How sad, selling men like that.
Don't expect any sympathy from me.
I'm just a Korean. The Japanese and Chinese both look down on me.
Hurry it up!
Mr. Wang!
I just heard the Japanese say that the Italians have surrendered.
Defeat for Germany can't be far off.
Our time is coming.
When?
Six months, maybe a year.
We must be patient.
What's going on there?
You scum!
Thank you.
This'll really invigorate my man and the young folk.
If Okazaki gets any more invigorated, ma'am, you'll be in trouble.
Didn't you know?
We women prefer our men that way.
Ma'am, I'm sure you've seen to everything, but it might be wise to send some of that flour to Kaji's wife.
A very good idea!
I'll do just that.
Your food.
Good day, sir.
Ah, it's you.
You want dumplings?
Can you loan me a bag of white flour?
I'd like to make my mother happy.
She hasn't long to live.
One bag?
Why don't you go get some yourself?
The Japanese steal the flour they ration to us... and eat their fill.
I can't do that.
But Mr. Kaji trusts you.
This flour was stolen from the warehouse by the warehouse guard with the big mole.
It's stolen property.
You still want to buy some of it?
Let him have half a bag.
No, I won't.
Young man, don't forget you were born of a Chinese mother, of Chinese seed.
Go ask the man with the big mole!
Try not to be so obvious.
About what?
Okazaki's wife just left here with a big sack.
I hate to interfere, but you're making a mistake.
People around here appreciate my mistakes.
It's an old custom.
Well, it's one that should be abolished.
Unpleasant as it may seem, that's my job.
If it happens again,
I'll have to order an inventory.
Mr. Kaji... the men in the pits wonder if you're one of us or just a puppet of the Chinese.
And?
That's all.
But I do think your acute sense of justice is inflamed by the fact that you can't take some extra flour to your own wife.
Take your filthy feet off your desk when speaking to me!
Or do you need my help?
You fool!
They'll see your light!
Go easy tonight.
Hurry!
It's the night watchman!
What's taking so long?
Get going!
I like you a lot.
You did very well for your first time.
You'll do it for me, won't you, Chen?
Talk to Sai at the power station.
Just have him shut off the current for three minutes.
I'll see that you're well-rewarded.
Then you can buy all the flour you want without playing the thief.
Still can't make up your mind?
Hey, Big Mole!
Well, Chen, how'd it go?
Did you get a good price?
Or did you eat it yourself?
Free white flour must taste good.
What's going on, Matsuda?
What indeed.
Seems even saints have thieves for underlings.
Flour thieves.
Mr. Kaji...
I'm willing to overlook it this time.
But just for future reference,
I'd like to see how you handle this.
Chen, stand up.
Look at me.
You didn't do it, did you?
I did.
Alone?
Matsuda,
I hope you're satisfied now.
Now get out before I expose all your dirty doings!
Chen, what's the matter?
I stole something... and Mr. Kaji struck me.
Kaji struck you?
But no matter.
Mr. Kaji is Japanese, and I'm Chinese.
It's that simple!
Sister Jin is busy now.
I think he's Korean.
Korean?
Hi, cutie.
Get in a fight?
Yang, let me use your room awhile.
What's wrong?
I don't understand it myself.
Foolish girl, acting like an amateur in love for the first time.
I can't seem to forget Kao.
Love at first sight... with a man behind barbed wire.
Why not use your room?
It's such a mess.
Why do you ask?
The Japanese are all the same.
They don't consider us human beings.
Chen... go to the power station and work it out with your friend.
I'm not Korean.
I won't betray my friend for money.
I know that.
You're a good man.
But those men in there are prisoners.
The Japanese will exploit them and then kill them.
Can they really be saved?
Of course.
But the only one who can do it... is you.
This can wait, Chen.
First go do as I ask.
I understand.
I'm Chinese too.
I'm ready to do my part.
At exactly 1:00 a.m.
When the siren sounds,
I'll cut the current.
But only for two minutes.
That's the best I can do.
Two minutes?
Watch out!
That's 3,300 volts!
Be careful.
Don't let them see you.
Sai!
Go now, and don't let them see you.
My regards to our brothers behind barbed wire.
They're in love.
This isn't business.
In that case, we don't pay.
Stop kidding around.
A prisoner and a prostitute in love - it's like a novel.
But what will come of it?
Nothing can come of it while there's a war going on.
They have their love today.
That's all.
Can't you let them marry?
I would if I could.
I'm sure you'd want to help them.
I do, but it ends right there.
Have some.
They're delicious.
What are they?
A rare treat.
They were given to us.
By whom?
Try and guess.
Mrs. Okazaki.
Send them back!
But...
I can't send them back now.
Return them!
Tell her I was furious.
But why?
Why?
Why do you glare at me like that?
She wanted to make up for earlier.
The murderer stole that flour!
It's time you showed more sense.
Can't you understand my position and what I'm trying to do at this mine?
No, I can't.
How could I, when you never tell me anything?
Of course, even I can guess where the flour and sugar came from.
But women can't always live by unbending rules.
I didn't accept them for myself.
So you accepted them for me?
I don't need that kind of thoughtfulness.
Because it was the Okazakis?
What if it had been
Mrs. Okishima?
I'd still refuse.
Yes, you're just the kind who would!
You struck Chen, didn't you?
I know you didn't want to, yet you did.
Why?
Because he did something wrong?
That's not why.
You could have forgiven him for such a minor matter.
It was because you lost face in front of others.
For a man who aspires to great things, you have a small mind!
You wouldn't understand.
But I do!
I know what people think of you.
It's reached my ears too.
What do they think?
That you try to look better than everyone else.
I didn't believe them.
I thought it was just spite, but now -
- Think what you want!
- Where are you going?
I've kept 30 women waiting.
Marriage?
Impossible!
We can marry after the war is over.
Is the war going to end?
It won't be much longer.
But they'll take you away again.
No, Chun Lan.
It will end in victory for China.
We'll be free.
I...
I can only hope that things stay as they are.
Why, Chun Lan?
When that day comes,
I'll never see you again.
But I'm asking you to marry me.
There are plans to escape from here, but I will not run away as long as you're here.
You won't run away?
You promise?
I'm sorry.
I went too far.
You brute!
I'm thinking of letting those two get married.
Hello.
What? Escaped?
I'll be right there!
- How many?
Eleven men!
I won't bother
asking for information.
We'll soon know who planned the break.
I won't ask for details.
But you must understand one thing.
We've tried our best to help you.
If you cannot trust us, and if you continue to try to escape, those who remain behind will face reprisals and even more hard labor.
And I will not raise a finger to protect you.
You think we can't bring you before a firing squad.
But if Kaji and I decide to, we can always pack you into those freight cars and send you back to the army!
They acted on their own.
We only serve as liaisons for the prisoners.
We couldn't stop them even if we knew of their plot.
I see through your lies!
What if I said that
Wang Heng Li plotted this break?
It no lie... we don't know.
I no run away.
You fools!
You think we'd take your word for it?
Why don't you all run off somewhere!
I will not run.
I'll walk out of here with dignity.
And just where will you go?
Don't think all Japanese are as forgiving as me.
If you want to die, just try to escape.
Wang, the safety of your men depends on all of you.
I'm the one who has to answer to the Kenpeitai - not you!
Investigate the situation and take adequate measures.
Oh, and think up a good story for the Kenpeitai.
Where's Kaji?
You stood by while those men escaped?
We didn't stand by.
So you took all precautionary measures?
Let me remind you once more:
Those prisoners are spoils of war, obtained at great sacrifice.
You allowed them to damage the prestige of our Imperial Forces.
I demand an explanation.
- I have none.
The only explanation is their desire to escape.
Why did you stand by and let them?
Answer me!
I can hear you.
You don't have to shout.
We have
10,000 other laborers here, but these special prisoners have taken all our attention.
No matter what, they'll manage to escape.
What are we supposed to do?
One question!
Go ahead.
We reported the truth.
I could have reported them dead and avoided trouble.
Does the Kenpeitai not want the truth?
I acknowledge your honesty.
But shortage of personnel is not an acceptable excuse.
Though your negligence is inexcusable,
I shall overlook it just this once.
No more men must escape.
Tell them that if they do,
I will personally kill their leader.
Understand?
I understand.
How about it?
Want me to scare them a little?
That won't be necessary.
You must be quite sure of yourself to refuse aid from the military.
Very well.
I'll hold you personally responsible from now on.
I never go back on my word.
- I understand.
And you?
Do you understand?
I understand.
That will be all.
No! Wait!
Wait!
Let me go!
- Don't take it out on the men.
- What about you?
You lost your temper and struck Chen, and now you lecture me?
Don't pull your humanism on me.
I struck Chen, and I regret it.
But should you do the same?
Don't let your feelings ruin my work.
Your work?
Yes, my work.
You've kept in step so far, but now you're going your own way.
Can't you see?
Force has meaning only when overcoming tyranny.
I know that.
I've had enough of your lectures.
You intend to let them do as they wish?
I'll talk to them.
I won't mince words.
I don't want your men trying to escape.
As far as you men are concerned,
I am your friendliest enemy.
I pride myself on supervising you without hostility.
Despite the conflicts of interest that result from our being at war,
I've tried to protect your interests.
What you say is difficult.
I see.
Eat your fill.
We can talk at our leisure.
When one of your comrades was killed, we didn't take adequate measures to protect you.
Therefore you no longer trust us.
That's only natural.
However...
I shall do my utmost to correct this mistake.
It may take time... but I hope you'll trust me and be patient.
No one wants to risk the danger of escaping.
Let me speak for my friend Kaji.
Since he arrived here, the regular laborers' conditions have greatly improved.
This also applies to you.
However, if there's another escape,
I cannot say what the Kenpeitai might do.
I don't know how Kaji feels, but the only way to save my own neck is to send you back to the Kenpeitai.
It's true what he says.
We can reach an understanding by talking.
How about you, Kao?
If you can marry
Yang Chun Lan, will you stay until the war ends?
I don't like propositions that start... with the word "if."
Can't you understand?
We're talking things over.
Bootlicker!
It's the same old
Japanese trick.
They always promise to do this and do that... but they never keep their word.
Stand up!
You dog! You wouldn't understand what men say.
Go to Yang Chun Lan and learn the ways of human beings!
By the way, Wang, if I -
There's the "if" again.
If I gain the freedom for you enjoyed by the regular laborers, will you trust me?
To wait seems to be the only safe liberty.
You promise?
Wang, you must trust me.
I wonder if they trust me.
You want to believe they do, don't you?
I want to believe Wang when he says he'll wait.
You plan to continue sending the women inside. Why?
Just a hunch.
I also plan to take 50 of them for outside labor.
- Under armed guard?
- No, just by myself.
These strange hunches aren't like you.
Why not be honest?
- About what?
You'd let them escape if you could.
That's nonsense.
When that happens,
I stand to lose my neck.
Remember that.
On days they come out here, they seem happy.
Is your mother still ill?
I suppose she still longs for some white flour.
She's given up hope.
I'm sorry I struck you that day.
I'm hardheaded in some ways, I know.
It's all right.
Is Sai at the power station a friend of yours?
Somebody shut off the current.
Sai was on duty that night.
If he did it, tell him not to do it again.
Well, back to work.
They could escape whenever they want.
Maybe they're starting
to trust you.
No, they're just wary of a trap.
Then you'll stop taking them out?
No, I'll keep doing it.
Isn't it dangerous?
They might kill you and escape.
I doubt that.
This bath feels good.
Why don't you come in?
I think I will.
If the workers settle down, let's go into town on vacation.
Let's do it!
How many days can you take off?
Three at the most.
That would be wonderful!
Well, if they really settle down...
Someday you'll be a great supervisor, but by then our youth will have vanished.
That's not for me.
I'll take that vacation.
You're probably right.
Please do, all right?
I will.
See to it, Cho.
We need a break in that barbed wire.
Kaji will be off on a three-day leave.
Okishima will be busy.
We'll do it then.
Releasing prisoners is more profitable, but more dangerous too.
With things going smoothly,
Kaji has let down his guard... but watch out for Okishima.
The timing is ideal.
Let's pull another fast one and then make ourselves scarce.
That's right. Getting away clean is the important thing.
Is Jin Tung Fu in?
She's in bed with the cute boy.
How about you?
There's a problem.
Chen won't help anymore.
Won't help?
Once is as bad as 100 times.
He doesn't want that risk with you and me.
But he'll risk sleeping with you.
He wants me to break away too.
Has that dog squealed on us?
- He'd never do that.
- You never know.
Don't let him spend the night.
Send him home.
Jin Tung Fu is some woman, eh?
How was it?
I hear Kaji will be away starting Saturday.
Have the power cut off while he's gone.
Sai isn't on duty those nights.
Then when is he?
Friday night.
Then make it Friday night.
He can't!
They already suspect him!
Who does?
Mr. Kaji.
What can he do without evidence?
Listen carefully, punk.
Play it straight and I'll fix it so Jin Tung Fu will be yours alone.
You little scum!
You'll do it, won't you?
Be a good boy.
If you refuse, you and Sai will die.
END OF PART 1
GRANDSCOPE
A SHOCHIKU FILM
THE HUMAN CONDITION
Developed by BUNGEl PRODUCTION and NINJIN CLUB
Presented by
KABUKI PRODUCTION
Produced by
SHIGERU WAKATSUKI
Based on the Novel by
JUNPEl GOMIKAWA
Screenplay by ZENZO MATSUYAMA and MASAKI KOBAYASHI
Director of Photography
YOSHIO MIYAJIMA
Production Design KAZUE HIRATAKA
Sound Recording HIDEO NISHIZAKI
Music CHUJI KINOSHITA
Lighting TAKASHI KATO
Editing KEIICHI URAOKA
1st Ass't Director YUGORO IMAI
Ass't. Director KOICHI INAGAKI
Ass't Camera TOSHITADA NAGUMO
Ass't Production Design JUSHO TODA
Set Decoration KYOJI SASAKI
Set Design
YOJI MURO
Production Manager
TATSUO OSAWA
Starring
TATSUYA NAKADAI as Kaji
MICHIYO ARATAMA as Michiko
CHIKAGE AWASHIMA as Jin Tung Fu
INEKO ARIMA as Yang Chun Lan
SO YAMAMURA as Okishima
AKIRA ISHIHAMA as Chen
SHINJI NANBARA as Kao
SEIJI MIYAGUCHI as Wang Heng Li
TORU ABE as Sergeant Watai
MASAO MISHIMA as Kuroki
EITARO OZAWA as Okazaki
KOJI MITSUI as Furuya
AKITAKE KONO as Captain Kono
NOBUO NAKAMURA as Head Office Chief
KYU SAZANKA as Cho Meisan
Directed by
MASAKI KOBAYASHI
PART 2
I feel wonderful!
We arrived in a whirl of dust, but it's so nice today.
Worried about work?
- No.
Just wondering why I didn't do this before.
- Really?
- I mean it.
I'll phone Yasuko first thing and tell her to take the day off.
Would you mind?
And then what?
We'll have lunch together and then go to the apple orchard.
It's so wonderful!
I feel as light as a balloon!
Allow me just one thing.
What?
Let me go for just one hour?
What for?
With our increased production,
I'd like to talk to the main office about treating the special laborers like the ordinary laborers.
Just one hour?
- The rest of my time is all yours.
- All right.
I'll give you two hours, but not a minute more.
Mr. Kaji!
- They broke out again.
- What?
Where's Okishima?
- At their camp.
All right.
I'll be right there.
I don't want you to go.
I have no choice.
You go have a good time with Yasuko.
Yasuko isn't you.
- But this is my job...
- I don't care!
You're officially on vacation.
They can't make you go back.
Leave it to Okishima.
I'll wait till after lunch, okay?
I'll never finish by then.
You just don't want to go.
Don't be foolish!
Your work's important, but don't you see how important this is for us?
I'll make up for it next time.
You needn't bother!
Why so angry over such a small thing?
Such a small thing?
You don't seem to care how I feel.
At any rate,
I can't just leave now.
I see.
Then I'll go on alone.
Stop it!
From now on,
I do things my way!
- And ruin everything?
- They'll understand my fist!
Hitting them won't bring back the others!
Do you realize how many got away?
Eighteen men, led by Hwang and Sung!
Still think words will help?
- I'll assume all responsibility.
- You fool!
If you don't like my methods, you can quit.
You won't be dragged before the Kenpeitai.
Fine!
Wang!
Stand up!
I've given up on all of you.
You said you'd wait.
You might think I'm a fool, but even a fool has limits!
Another escape and you'll all go without food for three days.
I'll turn your men against you and break your authority in this camp!
You Japanese are all the same!
Fine!
Then I'll act accordingly.
All promises are hereby retracted.
Now I realize there can be no trust between us.
Mr. Okishima!
How will you report this to the Kenpeitai?
They won't let us off easy this time.
- I won't report the incident.
- What?
If it leaks out,
I'll assume all responsibility.
I don't think it was all your responsibility.
You think someone shut off the power?
I couldn't say.
Shall I put only Japanese on night duty there?
You can't do that without evidence.
Shall I increase the night watch around the fence?
I'd have to check that they're at their posts.
Eighteen men... that's a big loss!
I've achieved the 20% increase in production.
I don't want trouble now over something like this.
I forgot: Okishima is hereby relieved of all responsibility for the special prisoners.
I don't know!
Damned Chinaman!
Son of a bitch!
Tell me!
Who paid you?
Okishima favors drastic measures, but Kaji always stops him.
Meaning he gives tacit consent to the runaways?
I wouldn't say that, but it does all seem rather suspicious.
There is one way to teach them a lesson.
How?
We let them plan another break and then foil them.
With your permission,
I'd like to try.
Sounds intriguing.
I'll try anything that brings results.
Give it a try.
Boss's orders.
We're distributing flour and oil.
Only to the Japanese, of course.
I'm sure you don't approve.
I do not.
Unfortunately, you're not the manager.
I'm sure you're happy I'm not.
Mr. Kaji, it's Mr. Okishima!
Filthy scum!
Son of a bitch!
Kill the rat!
Let him have it!
Mr. Okishima, let us handle that Korean dog!
Stay out of this!
Filthy dog!
Swipe men from under my nose, eh?
Bastard!
Not stopping me today?
You want me to?
Don't look so disapproving.
Should I go easy on the regular workers too?
Your clumsy humanism kills good men and lets scoundrels run wild.
Chen, take him to the medical ward.
Do no such thing!
His boss will pick him up.
Take him!
Go call Furuya.
Don't worry, young one.
I won't talk.
Chen, it seems I know more about you than you do about me.
Go back and tell Kaji his wounds aren't serious.
It's better if Kaji doesn't come around here.
Well? How is he?
He seems all right.
Mr. Furuya is with him.
Furuya?
Furuya, send a telegram to Muta.
That rat Okishima!
He says he's going to sue Okishima.
Help him arrange it.
You two seem friendly enough.
Don't bother explaining!
Think I'm that stupid?
Was it the money?
Or just to make trouble for me?
Don't worry.
I won't tell the boss.
See that your buddy is hospitalized.
But you're paying for him... not Labor!
You probably made plenty.
Where you been hidin'
What's wrong with you?
Drunk, I see.
Think I got drunk and came to make trouble?
I had a drink with the boss, but I'm not drunk.
I have some hot news.
They're issuing commendations for the increased production.
Okazaki will surely be included.
I told the boss you were the only one in Labor who deserved a commendation.
The boss felt the same way, but he feared that this old-timer might feel slighted.
You don't think
I'd feel slighted, do you?
Why have you suddenly turned to brute force?
The boss asked the same thing.
I was born a brute... good enough?
How long do you plan to keep on like this?
Meaning what?
Straddling a fundamental contradiction and trying to justify it.
I'm out of breath.
If I'm being a nuisance, just say so and I'll back off.
Kao!
Chun Lan!
I was afraid you might have escaped.
That's all I could buy today.
Thank you.
Thank you!
We can't meet for the time being.
We can't come here.
If you run off by yourself...
I'll kill myself.
I'll take you with me when I escape.
When?
After I learn how the others have fared.
I can't take any chances if I take you along.
Stay here.
They might let us marry.
Don't believe them!
Wang says the war will end soon.
Japan will be defeated.
Now that I have you...
I'm willing to bear anything.
Kao!
I wish we could meet like this every night.
But if they start suspecting us... then it's all over.
This cursed wire!
Careful!
Why do the gods torment us like this?
Chun Lan...
I love you!
And I love you!
Can't you sleep?
Kaji would have been happier married to a girl like you.
You're too much the wife, Michi.
You're forgetting to be a woman.
What do you mean?
Being a wife is a kind of profession, but it's the woman that men love.
When you typed Kaji's reports, you studied them like one possessed.
I never understood a word.
And now? Do you ask him about his work?
He doesn't like me asking questions.
If I were you, I'd pester him until he told me everything.
Then I'd ask even more questions.
What's wrong?
Did I go too far?
I'm sorry about yesterday.
I failed as a wife and as a woman.
I couldn't sleep.
This is your home.
You can sleep soundly here.
Promise you'll share both your joys and sorrows with me.
Sorrow for one is enough.
It's not!
I'm walking down the same path you are.
It's okay if I lose my way.
Just tell me we might get lost and take me along.
I'll follow you... and do my best to keep up.
I understand.
If I don't walk fast enough, will you wait just a tiny bit for me?
Just a very tiny bit?
Of course.
I'll never ask you the same question twice.
"Through fitting leadership in the pit, you have helped achieve a 20% increase in ore production.
At this hour of dire national emergency, you've rendered a valuable service to our armed forces and set a fitting example for other employees.
You are hereby officially commended.
September 23, 1943.
Chairman of the board
Jushiro Kitada.
Read in proxy by Junichi Kuroki."
Looks like we'll have rain.
Rainy nights are ideal for escape attempts.
When you deliver their dinner, tell them arrangements have been made.
They can break out tonight.
Tonight?
Then go to the power station and tell them Kaji says to cut the power.
But Mr. Kaji would never...
I'm acting under direct orders from the boss.
You want me to tell the Kenpeitai about you?
About how you and Jin Tung Fu aided the plotters, and how Kaji knew but pretended not to see?
It's the only way to save your neck.
As ships at sea
part the great white waves
So do I part
my loved one's thighs
Mr. Kaji, I look forward to your continued favor.
You're young, but you're quite a fellow!
No, a great fellow!
The day you arrived it was snowing...
No, it was windy.
Really? Windy?
That day I thought a young squirt like you could never handle this mine.
But things really did work out as you said.
You're really something!
But Mr. Kaji...
I've been watching.
You haven't been drinking.
Give me a hand?
If you want to try, tonight is your last chance.
Why the sudden rush?
If the timing's no good, just forget it.
But my friend's being moved to the day shift tomorrow.
You sure about this?
On behalf of the men in the pit and in the spirit of friendship,
I challenge Mr. Kaji to a friendly drinking bout.
Hear! Hear!
I concede defeat.
No, you can't!
We haven't even started yet!
No, I really do.
Mr. Kaji... do you only show spirit when you're snarling at me?
Come on. Be a man!
All right! I'm ready!
Use this.
Get drunk and let down your guard for once.
That's right!
Okay, let's begin.
Show 'em, Mr. Kaji!
- That's the way!
- More!
Those boys in Labor are used to being wined and dined by the bosses.
They get the women too!
They run the whorehouse and have their pick.
So we're wined and dined, eh?
And the whores are ours for the taking?
Fine! Bring on your wine and women!
I'll take 'em on!
Chen.
All done delivering their meals?
This is a special ration ticket for Japanese only.
You're welcome to mine.
- But your wife...
- She's given up hope.
Mr. Kaji.
No, nothing.
I just wanted to say thank you.
It's me who should thank you.
I was afraid you wouldn't accept it now.
There's a nice ass!
Hey, lady-killer!
Tops in Japan!
Back off!
Still in heat at your age?
What if I am?
Go sow your seed in your own rice paddies!
I wouldn't act so big,
Okishima.
If you and Kaji would mind your own business,
I could have topped our production goal long ago.
And you'd have 10 murders on your record now.
You'd be having dinner in jail!
Bastard!
If you want trouble, come on.
Chen, what's the matter?
What should I do?
I won't be able to see you again.
I've fallen into a trap!
Go to the station and have him cut off the power.
If I do that... and the men are captured... they'll kill me!
This is a Japanese plot.
No matter what happens, you won't be killed.
You speak as if this didn't concern you.
If I'm caught,
I might confess everything.
Don't threaten me.
You dragged me into this!
- Where are you going?
- To warn them.
You'll never get word to them.
I can try.
Wait! I have a better idea.
Chun Lan.
Kao is breaking out tonight.
Kao is breaking out?
Go tell him it's too dangerous.
I won't let him escape alone!
Drink. It'll relax you.
I couldn't contact him.
Are you sure he plans to escape?
You met no one?
With this downpour,
I couldn't see a thing.
Not a soul?
Is he really breaking out?
What'll we do now?
If he runs off by himself...
I'll kill myself!
The power must be cut off!
We mustn't anger the Japanese.
What should we do?
The best way is to confess the whole thing to Mr. Kaji.
No! He's the worst of them all!
Where are you going?
Go to the power station!
You little punk!
I expected as much.
Did you do as I told you?
Yes.
You didn't mention the matter to Kaji, did you?
No.
We'll find out in a moment... whether you did as ordered.
If you betrayed us, it's a bullet in your head.
We'll report that we caught you helping the men escape.
It'll even mean a reward.
They're coming!
Mr. Furuya.
The power... I didn't...
What?
Son of a bitch!
Bastard! You want to die?
I never dreamt that Chen might plot something like this.
I've been blind.
Furuya!
Blind because I never thought you capable of such a diabolical plot!
Go brag to the boss of your brave deed!
Wang!
You're not always right either.
Your failed leadership caused this.
You refused to trust us.
The result is charred human flesh.
It serves you right!
Kao!
Why did you do it?
It was so foolish!
Kao!
You're alive!
You're alive!
Chun Lan!
Look at the man whose mistake killed his own friends!
Okishima came to tell me about it.
Why didn't Chen come to me?
He was probably afraid to.
Because I hit him?
Okishima told me you'd take it really hard.
It's not my fault that I'm Japanese... yet it's my worst crime that I am!
Chen was kind to you even though I struck him.
He understood how I felt.
Yet look what happened.
That son a bitch Furuya!
The boss put him up to this.
They'll never meddle in Labor affairs again!
Let's go home.
Some nice hot soup will help you feel better.
Yes, let's.
Let's go home.
I wish you'd ask the main office about getting the Kenpeitai to let us treat these prisoners like ordinary laborers.
But I know I asked you to stay out of my affairs.
Don't worry. I'll do it.
My trip will cool us both off.
It'll be my present to you.
Seems the boss considers Okazaki more indispensable than me.
I'm boarding this run-down truck, but you're trying to catch the train of humanism before it's too late.
I won't stop you.
You seem willing to pay the fare, no matter how high.
Am I making trouble by coming here?
I already offered my apologies.
Leave us alone.
From now on, we'll have to escape from the work areas.
Wang wants us to lie low for a while.
And there's been no news from the others.
What's going on here?
Run!
Bastards!
You dare resist?
Get back here!
Come back!
Escape attempt!
Escape attempt!
How about it?
They're offering us
500 more prisoners.
We lack accommodations.
Accommodations?
Don't you mean supervision?
We just caught seven prisoners trying to escape!
You caught them?
Good work!
- Did they resist?
- The bastards almost got away.
- From the pit?
- The ore dump.
That's strange.
You were eating Chinese food here.
How would you know?
How could they escape in broad daylight?
Look at this. Only desperate men would throw ore at me.
That makes it a break?
I'm not the only witness.
It took 15 men to capture them.
Inside the compound? Running inside the compound is a break?
- Why do you defend the chinks?
- I'll investigate this.
You needn't bother!
- Where are they?
- The guard house.
Good.
Captain, what are your instructions?
Well, let's see.
Shall we try the method you've been suggesting?
He's a master swordsman.
How many men did you slay in China?
Wait! How can you be sure it was a break?
Silence! We have a witness.
Any more objections?
Yes! An impassioned witness can't be trusted.
All those men want to escape.
Would you execute them all?
- Why you...
- Enough!
Whether it was or wasn't an escape attempt isn't the point.
All that matters is that we say it was!
Arguments will not be tolerated.
Sergeant!
They're to be executed tomorrow.
You decide how.
They will be executed tomorrow, sir!
I assume you approve.
You shall officially witness the execution!
You'll save seven men's lives if you testify they weren't trying to escape.
They were trying to escape.
They ran.
They should have stayed and taken their beating.
What's going to happen to us?
If injuring Okazaki was a crime, why not just investigate me?
Listen to me.
You're all guilty of attempted escape.
- Lies!
- You're wronging the innocent!
Quiet!
Dog!
An investigation will reveal the truth.
Investigate it!
Immediately!
The investigation is over.
But I don't believe you tried to escape.
You're turning us over to the Kenpeitai?
I don't intend to.
But you never had faith in me before.
Perhaps it's best to doubt me now as well.
Those men have all the power!
I have none!
I'll do everything I can until tomorrow evening.
Sir, if you ask them, the Kenpeitai will listen to reason.
This is an object lesson, Kaji.
Personally I don't approve, but the head office says to leave it to the Kenpeitai.
Why?
Must there be a reason?
Please wait! You're about to chop off men's heads!
If the company protested strongly...
This is wartime.
Peacetime reasoning doesn't apply.
That's no reason!
You may not think so, but I do.
You're wasting your breath.
If you're not satisfied, speak to the head office.
I will!
There's no answer.
He's in a conference.
Shouting like a madman!
Hello? One moment, please.
Someone else will take your call.
Okishima?
We're in real trouble.
You've heard?
Hello? Hello?
I can't hear you!
Speak louder!
I can't hear you at all.
What's that?
Give up?
That's ridiculous!
Okishima, please talk to them again.
Please try again.
I'll be waiting.
I'll be honest. There's only one chance in a hundred.
This does not concern us alone.
Just as my companions stand between life and death, so do you now stand at an important crossroads.
You're right.
If you fail now, no one will ever trust you again, and you too will lose faith in yourself.
It's true.
Yet you would do nothing?
What can I do?
Must a man outside this barbed wire ask me such a question?
Not all the Japanese working here are murderous devils.
Their combined opinion objecting to this execution will be more effective than one individual alone.
If I'd always acted as you wanted me to, there'd be no Kaji here today.
I'd like to see what you'd do in my position.
You and I will both make minor mistakes.
Such things can be forgiven.
But an error made at a crucial moment is an unforgivable crime.
Your life has been a series of errors stemming from the conflict between your work and yourself.
Such errors can possibly be corrected.
But this one cannot.
Meaning?
You'll either be revealed as a murderer wearing the mask of humanism or as one worthy of the beautiful name..."man."
I know that.
You have less faith in man than you try to believe.
Regardless of how you might feel, true men will always find kindred spirits!
What will happen to Kao?
I wish I knew myself.
When will you release him?
You won't kill Kao, will you?
You won't, will you?
Hello? Okishima?
What's the decision?
Calm down and listen.
The manager is no help,
the old fool.
Wait until morning.
I'll talk to the chairman.
The chairman?
Yes, the chairman!
I'll make him listen to me.
Please go away.
I want to be alone.
Mr. Kaji!
Please save him!
Save him!
He wouldn't try to escape!
We planned to be married after the war ended.
You won't kill him, will you?
You're a good man.
You won't kill him, will you?
Go to sleep and stop worrying.
I won't do anything.
There's nothing I can do.
Can I really set my mind at ease?
Really?
Go to sleep and don't worry.
I'll try to sleep too.
Where are you going?
Where are you going?
To free those men.
You can't!
Think what might happen to you!
I don't care!
You did everything you could.
Don't you care what happens to you?
Well, I do!
Michiko, don't torment me!
I'll call for help!
I won't let you do it.
You always go your own way, and perhaps you're right.
But if you free those men, they'll kill you for sure!
Please don't go!
I'll follow you!
I'll shout for help!
Michiko, if I don't,
I'm no longer a human being!
How can you ignore me like some stray dog?
Even you don't want to give up this life, do you?
Remember: You promised!
I'm sorry.
Go and do as you see fit.
Perhaps it's me who's wrong.
I can't have you feeling
I stood in your way.
I don't want you hating me, not loving me anymore.
There's no hope for me!
- All ready!
- Good work.
Spare us!
It's best to wet the blade.
Keeps off the fat.
Kaji!
Stay right there.
Thanks for being my witness.
Get up!
On your knees!
Kaji... you can tell them all later:
If they want to die, they can run all they like.
Next!
Spare me!
Want to try?
Next!
I don't want it!
I demand an explanation!
Why are we being executed?
Son of a bitch!
Japanese devils!
Stand up!
I'll go by myself!
Inhuman wretch!
This is your true form!
The face of a man... but the heart of a beast!
Good! You show some grit.
Stay calm! Slash him!
The Chinese nation... will live forever!
Don't think of it as a human head.
Take a rest and try again.
Next!
Spare my life!
Wait!
No more!
What?
Please stop!
Stay out of this or I'll kill you too!
I'm not afraid any longer.
Kill me if you dare!
I'll be happy to oblige.
Enemy sympathizers deserve to be killed.
We won't let them kill our countrymen!
Stop them!
You're killing innocent men!
Murderers! Murderers!
Murderers! Murderers!
Private!
Very well.
The execution is called off.
Go back and join the others, quickly!
Take them back!
Kaji!
We're taking you to headquarters.
Pvt. Tanaka, take special care of our honored guest.
I'll return later. Go.
Kaji won't be coming home today.
Did something happen?
Did something happen?
He refused to let me behead those enemy dogs.
He may not be back for a while.
It all depends.
Did he hide anything?
No.
No wonder.
Books by damn Westerners.
Open the desk drawers.
Place everything on top of the desk.
Son of a bitch!
How about it?
Wouldn't it be smarter to confess everything?
I only regret that I let you behead the first three.
You don't say!
You're a hopeless case.
Pvt. Tanaka... you should show our guest more courtesy.
Kaji, don't you miss your wife?
She was crying. She'll have no one to ride her at night.
What have I done?
I'm no monster.
I'd like to put you back on top of your wife tonight, but for that I'd need more cooperation from you.
What's so funny?
I don't pick pockets. I don't steal.
I have nothing to confess.
Very interesting.
Then don't confess until I make you.
Show off your bravado while you can.
You let 18 POWs escape and failed to report it, didn't you?
Is it so funny you can't even answer?
I didn't report it, but I never let them escape.
You used that chink Chen to contact the prisoners.
Show me evidence. Or will you lose face if you can't prove it?
Son of a bitch!
Did you want something?
No.
I just didn't expect things to come to this.
Quarrels over work are one thing.
I didn't intend for others to do my fighting for me.
So I came to...
I understand.
I never thought
Kaji would do such a thing.
Do what?
Oh... nothing.
I don't know what other people think, but I know that whatever Kaji did, he alone could do.
I see. If that's how you feel, you can do as you please.
I just dropped by to see if I could help in any way.
I won't be asking for your help.
What you can do is admit that those men were not trying to escape.
Admit it! You and Wang Heng Li plotted their escape.
Didn't you?
Why don't you answer?
Wang Heng Li was arrested.
He confessed everything.
Wang was arrested?
Only his execution remains.
When will it be?
Worried?
He was your friend, wasn't he?
He instigated the uprising at your suggestion, didn't he?
When is he to die?
Why don't you answer?
Very well.
Today I'll make you weep like a woman.
That'll be something for your wife to hear!
WANG HENG LI
In Memoriam
Wang... in the end you died without seeing the dawn.
But your countrymen... will surely bury you by the light of the newborn day.
Get out here.
Come on.
Go inside.
Kiss her.
Don't let me stop you.
Michiko, you mustn't come here.
Don't worry. Go home.
I brought some sushi.
May I give it to him?
Go ahead.
Won't you have some?
Michiko... if you ever need help, talk to Okishima.
Okishima,
I'm counting on you.
Mr. Okishima... is being transferred.
I came to say good-bye.
I see.
I'm sorry I wasn't any help on the phone.
I argued with the manager.
I'm being shipped out to a smaller mine.
So that's how it is.
I'd have liked to stick around and fight with you some more.
Furuya's taking over my spot.
We're back to square one.
Is there anything you'd like?
Nothing.
So... I won't be seeing you again?
I learned so much from you.
No, it's me who learned from you.
Though you've paid a bitter price, you finally caught the humanism train.
Oh, yes. Wang Heng Li...
No unauthorized conversation!
Your time is up.
Private!
Michiko!
You're hereby released by special permission.
But don't think you're out of the woods.
Remember:
I'll always be watching you.
Wherever you go,
I'll be there first.
Reporting back, sir.
It arrived, Kaji.
EMERGENCY SUMMONS
TO MILITARY SERVICE
I knew something was up.
So you use me up and then throw me out.
I can't afford to lose you, but there's nothing I can do.
Forget the smooth talk!
Nice way to get rid of those you don't want.
There's nothing I can do.
Now I see the light.
I should have trusted the whores instead of the managers here!
I know you're tired, but turn your duties over to Furuya.
He needs to find a new leader among the special laborers.
Since Wang Heng Li escaped, no one wants to lead them.
Escaped?
Wang Heng Li escaped?
Thirty of them got away.
So he made it after all!
Good for you, Wang!
I hope they all get away!
Sir, please inform Furuya that he's been spared a thorough beating thanks to Wang's escape.
I was going over there to thrash him, not hand over my duties.
But I've suddenly changed my mind.
I guess a man finds kindred spirits after all.
Japanese devil!
Japanese devil!
Kill me... like you murdered Kao!
Why don't you kill me,
Japanese devil?
He murdered an innocent man!
He murdered an innocent man!
Mr. Kaji.
Don't be angry.
I know you have a good heart... but you weren't able to save Kao's life.
Michiko, you'll fall!
Welcome back!
I heard you'd come back in terrible shape.
But it's not true.
You look well.
I'm so happy!
So very happy!
What's this?
They wouldn't!
No, it's not fair!
They promised you an exemption.
This is a dirty trick!
This is too much.
It's not fair.
Nothing can be done now.
What did you do to deserve this?
Nothing.
But I'd hoped to accomplish things with you when I returned.
Why must these terrible things happen to you?
What have you done to deserve this?
You're so thin, so covered with scars.
And now they're dragging you off to war.
You mustn't die.
We must live again.
When will we meet again?
You'll come back.
I know you will.
Japanese devil!
Japanese devil!
Japanese devil!
I hope you die!
Michiko, let's go home.
We still have
24 hours together.
Japanese devil!
END
As long as ignorance and misery exist in this world, stories such as this one will not be told in vain
Victor Hugo
1802.
A chain of galley slaves on their way to the penal colony of Toulon.
The last galleys of the king had rotted long ago
in the port waters.
But the last convicts remained for everybody galley slaves.
They were kept busy with hard labor, often of no use.
That's what they called
"going to penal servitude."
Go ahead, fast.
You, move.
Father and son come to inspect.
Good morning, chief.
See this one? One couldn't tell, but he tried to escape two times.
Fire in the hole!
Watch it, you guys over there!
It's over for them.
They were here for life.
Now they are at peace.
Hey, there.
Stay there.
Come here. Lift your foot.
You've filed your chain, you bastard.
You want to escape?
You'll do three more years.
Meanwhile, off to the pontoon, double-chained to the bench.
Go ahead, take him away!
This convict was called Jean Valjean.
He had been condemned to five years of penal colony
for stealing one loaf of bread.
Jean Valjean tried two more times to escape...
and when, at last, came the day of his release...
Go ahead!
He had served 19 years.
Here are your things.
You go to the shower, the hairdresser, the delouser.
Here is your count.
One hundred and nine francs and 15 sous.
Sign here.
No, it's not my count.
I calculated, it is 140 francs.
Less 24 francs for Sundays and holidays, and 5 francs of city taxes.
Go ahead, sign.
Here is your passport.
You will have to go to the local police station wherever you go.
Otherwise... you'll be arrested and sent back here.
Understood?
Hey... if you get caught stealing again, you'll get life.
If you threaten with a knife, even with a stick-- armed in any way-- it's death penalty.
Think about that, unless you want to come back and see us.
Freedom. Yes, they were given back their freedom,
but their old convict's passport that had to be stamped everywhere
was bound to their steps like ball and chain.
It was almost impossible for them to find work,
and the houses and the inns remained closed for them.
Not far from there, in the little town of Digne,
in the department of Basses-Alpes,
a carriage bearing the coat of arms of the papacy
was coming on the place de I'Evéché.
The visitor wanted to spend the night in the bishop's property.
They told him that Monseigneur Myriel
had left the palace
because it was going to be changed into an hospital,
and that he was living over there.
The little house on the square.
- ls Bishop Myriel here?
- He went to do his visits.
He shouldn't be long, if you want to come in.
- Thank you.
- Look, here he comes.
- Where?
- On the donkey.
What? This poor little priest?
You are right, Father, we tell him often his sister and me.
His Grace doesn't take enough care of himself.
He never keep any money for himself.
If you could reason him a little bit...
Good evening.
- Your Eminence.
- Please, don't.
It is the first time I ever met a bishop with this sort of carriage.
Yes, I understand why Your
Eminence would be shocked.
If you will allow me.
He trotted a fair amount.
You think a humble priest shows too much pride by borrowing a mount which has been used by our Lord.
But I do it by necessity,
I assure you, and not by vanity.
- I don't doubt it.
- Come.
Come in, Your Eminence, come in.
He is hungry.
But maybe you are, too.
I wanted to stop in your house tonight with my people but
- I am afraid...
- Don't be afraid.
Your escort can go to the inn, but I insist on keeping you.
I have an excellent bed for you.
Can I have a look at it?
I have such a hard time to sleep.
- Please. Excuse me.
- Thank you.
The supper will be ready in a minute.
When there is enough for three, there is enough for four.
You would deprive me of a great honor if you refuse.
You know how proud I am.
- Here is my bedroom.
- Thank you.
Be careful, there is a small step.
Here you are.
We'll be neighbors.
It is stocked with fresh oat straws.
It still smells like harvest.
Thank you, but this trip exhausted me.
I need to rest.
If you don't mind,
I'll go to the Mayor's house.
- I am not a monk.
- As you wish.
We are serving the same cause but not in the same battalion.
The same night...
Come in.
Good evening.
I am sorry, they told me to come knock on this door.
Can I have some soup and a place to sleep?
Of course, come in.
My name is Jean Valjean and I come from the galleys.
Yes, lady, the galleys.
Come in.
I left Toulon three days ago.
Today I covered the miles on foot.
I am tired.
Give me your things.
Mrs. Magloire will put down an extra plate.
We will have supper in a moment.
We will make your bed while you'll have your supper.
- Come in.
- I have money.
I am not an innkeeper.
Keep your money, sir, you will need it.
You are the priest of the village.
I can't put anything past you.
Miss Baptistine, my sister, and Mrs. Magloire, my governess.
Go ahead, give this gentleman a chair!
Mrs. Magloire, go look for the silverware. We have a guest.
Silverware.
The same that would have been used for the cardinal.
How could they have better shown an unexpected guest
that here he was not considered a galley slave,
but a man?
These ladies are very happy to have you among us.
When we have a guest, we embellish daily life a bit.
And we drink wine.
- Can I serve the soup, Your Grace?
- Of course.
This gentleman said he was hungry.
Give me a chair.
I am not tall enough to reach the shelf.
You are surprised to see this wealth in the house of a man who should be the poorest in the land?
This silverware comes from my grandmother. I am attached to it.
Ah, it's a weakness, I know it.
In the name of the Father and the Son and the Holy Spirit. Amen.
Could you give me the ladle, please?
Give me your plate, sir. You are probably eager to go to bed.
Mrs. Magloire... you will put white sheets on the alcove bed.
The next day, as always,
Monseigneur Myriel
began his day by visiting his garden.
He was leaving Mrs. Magloire responsible for the vegetables
and taking care of the flowers himself.
He used to say that beauty is as important as utility,
maybe more so.
Monseigneur! Monseigneur!
The silverware basket!
I had put it away last night, but it disappeared!
Do you know where it is?
Yes, here it is.
But it's empty!
And the silverware, the big ladle-- where are they?
This I don't know.
It is the man from last night, the convict!
He is not in his room anymore.
I was bringing him a glass of milk.
His bed is empty.
Good thing I took the candlesticks up to my bedroom.
Go ahead, move, go on!
Monseigneur! Look what this man had in his bag.
We called him out to check his passport and to search him.
This is what he had.
As we knew that last night you had him for dinner, well, we arrested him.
What did you answer back to them?
Nothing.
Why didn't you tell these gentlemen that I gave them to you?
You even forgot your candlesticks.
I had given them to you with the silverware, why did you leave them?
Mrs. Magloire, go look for this gentleman's silverware.
Go ahead!
Go ahead!
- You had given them to him?
- Of course.
- So, we can let him go?
- Yes. And give him back his goods.
I'll obey if you say so,
Monseigneur.
Why Monseigneur?
He is not the priest?
No, it's Monseigneur the bishop. Here.
Thank you, Mrs. Magloire.
Can I offer you a glass of wine, Sergeant?
I would hate to refuse,
Monseigneur.
Mrs. Magloire, show them the way.
- Follow me, sirs.
- I will be right there.
Thank you.
Wait!
You forget your candlesticks again.
Come on, take them.
Jean Valjean, my brother, I don't believe in the power of money.
But this could help you to become another man.
You don't belong to the bad anymore, but to the good.
It is your soul I am buying.
Jean Valjean left town as if he were running away.
He walked straight ahead all day
and then he collapsed, exhausted, on a log.
He was feeling some kind of rage because he didn't understand
the generosity of this man he had stolen from.
So this was the truth.
During twenty years at the penal colony,
they had taught him a different one.
- What do you want?
- I don't want anything.
- Then why are you here?
- I was passing by.
So pass.
It's beautiful.
- My coin, sir!
- Go away.
- Give me my coin back!
- Go away.
- Give it back to me!
- Go away, I say!
Eh, listen!
Stop!
Thief. He was a thief.
He understood that he would pay for the silver coin his whole life.
Complaint of Pierre Burloz called Petit Pierre.
Armed robbery.
Dangerous recidivist.
Didn't have his passport stamped any more.
Wanted.
A few years later,
the little town of Montreuil sur Mer in northern France
rose unexpectedly.
A humble craftsman of mysterious origin, Mr. Madeleine,
was applying a new craft process to the manufacture of jewelry.
Soon, he bought the most beautiful house in the region
and transformed it into a hospital,
while he came to live humbly on the other side of the square.
After your hospital, it was a pharmacy free of charge.
Then, an old people's home.
A school for boys.
Another for girls.
At last, a help fund for the workers, which demonstrates your endless generosity and your relentless commitment to the public welfare.
Your industriousness has brought prosperity to the entire region.
Your big heart is chasing misery, ignorance, and illness.
For these services, despite your dislike of honors, in the name of His Majesty,
I appoint you mayor of Montreuil sur Mer.
He had become Mr. Mayor.
People said of him,
this is a rich man who doesn't look pretentious,
and this is a lucky man who doesn't look happy.
When a little chimney sweep was coming into town,
he asked to take him in and gave him some money.
Word circulated, and many more came.
But one day, another visitor came to Montreuil.
All right. Thank you.
Mr. Mayor.
Mr. Mayor, I wanted to introduce myself as soon as I arrived.
I am the new Police Inspector.
I was waiting for you.
You will be the head of the City Police under my supervision.
- I will be proud of it.
- What is your name?
Inspector Javert.
Javert.
Yes. Javert.
Here is my nomination.
Thank you.
What is your service record?
I joined the police 10 years ago.
I did three years in Montauban, four in Moulin, four in Béthune.
I am hoping to be appointed in Paris after my stay here.
I hope it for you. In the meantime,
I hope we will get along.
I got the best training.
My father was the head locksmith of the penal colony of Toulon.
I spent my youth among the worst rabble.
We had the indomitable, the headstrong.
Mr. Mayor can't imagine.
- I imagine.
- No, you had to be there.
First of all, do you know the rabble, Mr. Javert?
It is simple.
First, there are honest people, established people, then the ones who have no work, no family, no home.
The first group makes up society and respects the law.
The others respect nothing and attack everything.
My duty is to defend the former against the latter.
- It is not difficult.
- Not so easy.
Mr. Mayor, there was an accident.
Old Fauchelevent just fell under his car.
Oh, my God,
I don't want to see this!
We have to go look for Mr. Mayor!
Good morning, Mr. Mayor.
We'll have to wait
15 minutes for a hoist!
Go look for a beam to use as leverage.
I will never be able to.
- You are going to hurt yourself.
- Take this.
Wait, you guys.
That's it, he is lifting it!
Come on, put the lever there.
Quickly, guys.
- Be careful.
- He is in a bad way.
It's nothing, buddy, you'll get out of it.
It's nothing.
- It's great, Mr. Mayor.
- God bless you.
I have known only one man capable of doing what you did.
He was a convict at the penal colony of Toulon.
His name was Jean Valjean.
So now you know a second one.
Like in all the little towns,
there was in Montreuil sur Mer a class of young men
who were nibbling on their private income, being deeply bored
while they thought they were having fun.
They had contempt for women, were drinking, yawning,
smelled like tobacco, were playing pool,
were not working, didn't have any use at all.
They spent most of their time at the cafe,
summers... and winters.
- Spade.
- The doormat girl is ready to work.
She is probably freezing her butt off.
- I bet you Louis is going.
- Goodbye!
- You've lost, buddy.
- Ah, the bitch. Stupid girl.
- Wait, it's going to cost her!
- Good luck!
Are you coming, darling?
Don't pretend to be shy.
Hey, we'll have a good laugh.
Bastard!
Don't touch me, brute!
Bastard! Swine!
Let me go, let me go!
It's the Magistrate's Court.
Here, sign.
You don't know to do it?
All right.
You're good for six months.
Take her away.
Six months in jail!
It's impossible!
I have my little girl's boarding to pay!
My little Cosette, what will happen to her?
They will throw her outside in the winter's cold!
There is nothing
I can do about it.
If I do this work, it is not by vice, I swear!
I swear, I had no more money!
I sold everything...
I have a little girl in the countryside!
She is sick!
I need some money.
Every whore says the same thing.
- Alas, it is almost always true.
- Mr. Mayor...
Ah, it's you, Mr. Mayor?
You came to see your work.
What I have become is because of you.
Well, are you happy? lam going to jail!
I was earning a living in your factory and you threw me out because I had a little girl without being married.
What did she do to you, my little Cosette?
She is not allowed to laugh and eat like the other children?
I was not aware of all this.
Why didn't you come to see me?
Oh, it's so easy, what with the foremen who bar the way.
A boss? What's the use?
I don't know you, and you neither.
All men are pigs!
I have sold all my things, my furniture.
I have sold my hair!
I have sold my teeth!
And you know what they told me?
Well, sell the rest!
Well, look at her, look at the whore!
Look at your work!
Bastard!
Give this woman back her freedom.
Come now, Mr. Mayor, this woman has insulted you, and a moment ago she insulted a bourgeois.
Regarding the bourgeois,
I investigated.
He was wrong, and a good policeman should arrest him.
I am sorry to contradict Mr. Mayor, but this girl committed an offense on the public road.
It's in the police report.
I do my duty, and I am keeping the Fantine woman.
She'll be punished as required by the law. It's not as bad as that.
She won't go to the penal colony.
She won't go to the penal colony and she won't go to jail.
This concerns the City Police.
I am your boss, and I ask you to release her.
- I refuse.
- I am asking you to obey.
Get out.
Thank you sir, am I free to go?
Oh, forgive me.
It is me who ask you to forgive me.
Unfortunately, I don't always know what's going on in my town.
One thinks he is acting for the best and there are still injustices, but you could have come to see me.
You know I am a man to whom you can explain everything.
- So, you have a little girl?
- Yes.
My little Cosette.
We'll take care of her both of us, you'll see. You'll be happy.
I don't think so.
I wish I had known.
I wish I had known.
I left Paris five years ago.
I couldn't stay there no more.
You can probably guess why.
But I was filled with hope, the weather was so beautiful.
I wanted to go back home.
- Sir! Sir!
- Whoa!
- Can you take us for a little bit?
- Yes, of course.
Come up.
You're going far?
- To Montreuil sur Mer.
- To Montreuil sur Mer?
Where is that place?
- In the North.
- You're nowhere close to it.
- You're going to tire your legs.
- I'll find a way.
I'll bring you to the entrance of Montfermeil.
You'll surely find someone else.
So, you're going to see your daddy?
Yes, he is waiting for us.
Go on, whoa! Whoa!
No, no one was waiting for us.
I was not married,
and Cosette's dad has abandoned us.
To arrive in Montreuil with a fatherless child was impossible.
I wouldn't have found work anywhere,
I wouldn't have found a home.
This good farmer left us in Montfermeil.
Montfermeil.
I arrived near the Thénardier Inn.
There were these huge wheels with a chain underneath.
It was used to carry trees.
It looked like a canon barrel.
But a mother had found a way to make a toy of it for her kids.
That's what made me trust them.
Bring your white sheep in
Let's go to the cottage
The good farmer had told me,
"Oh, I think they are honest.
He used to be a soldier, a sergeant at Waterloo."
You have two beautiful little girls, Madame.
Yours is very cute, too.
Look at them, they look like three sisters.
Madame, the Good Lord brought me to your home.
I can see you're a gentle mom.
Say, would you want to keep mine?
Keep her?
Yes, her father died.
I have no more work in Paris,
I am going home, but... with a child, it's not easy to find work.
When I have earned some money,
I'll come back to pick her up,
I will be able to give you six francs per month.
If it helps you. Between women, we have to help each other.
First, I have to talk about it to my husband.
My darling. My little Cosette, you're going to leave your mommy.
She says she would give six francs per month.
It's not enough. Seven.
And six months in advance.
Six times seven, forty-two.
- Good morning, sir.
- Good morning.
Your wife spoke to you?
You would agree?
I am square in business and sharp about details.
You have to pay in advance.
Six months at seven francs.
Six times seven is 42.
I will give them to you.
This is my count.
I leave you to your calculations.
My horses should be rested now.
With all the water they drunk...
- Which way are you going, sir?
- Compiégne.
Compiégne! It's on my way.
Do you have a little place for me?
- Of course he has a little place.
- If that can help you.
All right, goodbye.
But hurry up, I am late.
Send her to me right away.
Ah, right away, right away.
You'll give me 15 francs more for the first expenses.
Forty-two plus 15 makes 57.
I can give them to you.
I have 80 francs.
Go ahead, I am not watching.
- She has some clothes?
- Of course.
You must give them to us!
I wasn't going to leave my little treasure naked.
They're in my baggage outside.
So? If you want to leave,
I am on my way.
Yes, she's coming, right away!
Don't worry.
You can leave reassured.
Your little one will be like our child.
What's the name of this cutie?
- Cosette.
- Cosette?
It's pretty. Why not? And you?
Madame... Madame Fantine.
I'll have a letter written for you as soon as I arrive.
Thank you.
You're welcome. When one can help people... go with her.
I left her there, my little Cosette.
And I never saw her again.
And they ask me for money, always more money.
Don't forget the clothes.
I have worked. I sold myself.
I have no more strength.
It's too late.
Doctor.
How is she, doctor?
Still in the same condition.
She asks for her little girl.
She is going to see her soon.
I hope even tonight.
May be then she'll feel better but... it is the last step of phthisis.
And now, it's probably going to go fast.
All these girls, they end up like this.
She's not the first one we've seen here.
Don't be too hard, sister.
Do we do always what we should for these unfortunate souls?
Even you. Even me.
So you see...
Mr. Madeleine,
I am so happy you came.
When you are here, it seems to me everything is better.
And... Cosette?
They went to look for her.
When she'll be her, you'll feel better, I promise you.
Mr. Mayor.
What is it?
You are alone? And the child?
They refused to let her go.
Mr. Thénardier is asking another 500 francs.
But I think the more we give, the more he'll ask.
- I should maybe go.
- He won't give her up.
We have to ask for her before going to pick her up, otherwise...
Ask for the carriage to be made ready with a good horse for tomorrow morning,
4:00, in front of my house.
- She knows how to write?
- No, I don't think so.
Ask for a letter to be written, explaining that the child should be given to the carrier, and tell her to sign it.
Do what I asked and come to confirm it at my office.
Yes, Mr. Mayor.
I will be absent a few days.
Here are the orders for Spain and England.
See to it the fabrication starts right away.
Very well, Mr. Madeleine.
It's done, Mr. Mayor. The car will be ready at the time you asked.
Very well, thank you.
Here is a letter that Sister Simplice asked me to give you.
Thank you.
Come in.
Mr. Mayor, Inspector Javert wants to see you.
Send him in.
What's going on, Javert?
Mr. Mayor, a culpable action has been made.
An inferior officer was disrespectful with a superior magistrate in the gravest manner.
I am asking you to punish him as much as he deserves it.
- Who is this man?
- Me.
And who is the magistrate who has a complaint with you?
You, Mr. Mayor. I come to ask you to discharge me.
What are you talking about?
I could have given my resignation, but it is not enough.
A resignation is honorable, and I must be punished.
I have to be discharged.
Javert, you are a genius in the art of complicating things.
What did you do to me?
I denounced you to the police department of Paris.
You accused me of interfering with the laws of the police?
No. I accused you of being the convict Jean Valjean.
- Who?
- I didn't have any doubt.
I had known Jean Valjean at the galleys when I was a child.
I couldn't be wrong.
- You are crazy.
- That's what they told me.
You cannot be Jean Valjean because the real Jean Valjean has been arrested.
Arrested?
Yes, for a trifle.
He stole an apple. He pretended his name was Champmathieu, but was recognized at the penitentiary of Arras by an ex-convict who was with him in Toulon.
As I thought I was holding him here,
I wanted to see him to be sure.
I went to Arras, they brought me Champmathieu.
So what?
Mr. Mayor, the truth is the truth.
It was Jean Valjean.
I recognized him.
- You are sure about it?
- Sure.
And what does he say, this Champmathieu?
He says he doesn't understand a thing.
He plays it dumb, simpleminded, but his future is sealed.
What punishment does he face?
There is an old story of armed robbery on a young boy from Savoy.
When he was arrested, he had just jumped over a wall to steal apples.
For a child, it's a mischief, for a man, it's an offense, but for a convict, it's a crime, it's the galleys for life.
All right, you can leave, Javert.
Mr. Mayor, I remind you that you must discharge me.
No, you thought it was your duty to do so, I am keeping you.
I don't need your kindness-- the kindness that makes you side with the prostitute against the bourgeois, with the policeman against the mayor.
This kindness has no value.
If I had not been mistaken about you, if you really were Jean Valjean, be assured that I wouldn't have been kind to you.
We'll talk about it later.
- Javert!
- Mr. Mayor?
When is this Champmathieu going to be judged?
In Arras, tomorrow.
There is a scenery larger than the sea.
It's the sky.
There is a scenery larger than the sky.
It's the depth of a soul.
In the name of His Majesty,
I appoint you Mayor of Montreuil sur Mer.
What punishment does he face?
For a child it's a mischief, for a man it's an offense,
but for a convict it's a crime, it's the galleys for life.
Jean Valjean comes back...
and Mr. Madeleine will sink into scandal and shame.
Is redemption impossible?
After your hospital, Mr. Madeleine,
it was a pharmacy free of charge,
then, an old people's home, a school for boys,
another one for girls.
At last, a help fund for the workers.
After all, this
Champmathieu is a thief
recognized, condemned as Jean Valjean.
I just have to stay quiet and
Mr. Madeleine will be safe forever.
Jean Valjean, my brother, I don't believe in the power of money.
But this can help you to become another man.
You don't belong to the bad anymore, but to the good.
It is your soul I am buying.
When is this Champmathieu going to be judged?
In Arras, tomorrow.
Monsieur... the Royal Prosecutor...
My little girl, what will happen to her?
They will throw her out in the winter's cold.
When you are there, everything seems to go better.
Defendant, do you have something to add for your defense?
Do you still deny being the convict Jean Valjean?
My name is Champmathieu!
Tell them, I was working at
Mr. Baloup's as wheelwright.
You can just ask.
Gentlemen of the jury,
I remind you that Mr. Baloup has been subpoenaed in vain.
He was bankrupt and has not been found.
The gentlemen of the jury will appreciate a system of defense that subpoenas for testimony people who cannot be found.
You are really something.
I have been in jail for three months.
I have been pushed here and there.
People talk against me.
They tell me "answer."
The gendarme pushes me and says "answer!"
They always talk about Jean Valjean, but I don't know this person!
Mr. President, we would like to call again to the bench the convicted
Brevet, Cochepaille, and Chenildieu to confirm their testimony on the identity of the defendant.
Get up! Come closer.
We are still doubting the testimony of idiots who have been offered a trip as witnesses for the prosecution.
Do you recognize the defendant as the convict Jean Valjean?
- Sure, it's him.
- It's him all right.
I recognize him well.
That's really something!
What are you saying?
I say it's something!
Mr. President! Are we going to tolerate longer such a comedy?
A comedy, indeed!
- Who is this?
- Mr. Madeleine, Mayor of Montreuil.
Mr. President.
Jean Valjean, criminal at odds with authority, ex-convict.
I am he.
Look at me carefully.
You don't recognize me?
Now you are witnesses for the prosecution!
You'll have done it all.
You, Brevet, you dirty little crook.
Do you still wear the wool suspenders you were wearing over there?
And you, Chenildieu?
You have a date tattooed on your left arm.
The Emperor's landing.
First of March, 1815.
Pull up your sleeve.
Cochepaille,
I don't ask to be thanked, but do you remember the quarry and the rockslide?
- Yes.
- And Montenet, chained next to me?
- Who was called the Professor?
- Yes.
You remember, now? He was making necklaces with shellac bought from the sailors going to penal servitude.
Of course!
He had them sold back.
He was making a good profit.
That's something!
Mr. Counsel General,
Mr. President, this humble industry of a convict gave me the idea that originated my prosperity and that of Montreuil sur Mer.
I think you won't have any doubt left of my identity.
Now I have to leave,
I have several things to do.
You know whom I am, where I go.
I wouldn't have come to give myself up if I wanted to avoid justice.
Have me arrested when you want.
You shouldn't sing like this, it hurts you.
I can sing now that Mr. Madeleine will bring me back my little Cosette.
Montfermeil is far from here.
He won't be back today.
Tomorrow or the day after.
Be patient and everything will go well.
I am patient.
I have waited so long.
Five years.
My little girl is now... eight.
I cannot believe it. I still imagine her little, as when I left her.
Yes, I am patient.
There he is!
- No.
- Yes, listen!
I recognize his steps.
- It's Mr. Madeleine?
- Yes.
You see, he hurried up.
He knew I couldn't wait any longer.
And Cosette, how is she?
What's the matter?
- Back already?
- And the child?
I am not coming from Montfermeil.
I am afraid I won't be able to go.
It will be a cruel deception for her.
Good morning, Mr. Mayor.
Good morning, Mrs. Devos.
She comes to see her grandmother.
Say good morning to Mr. Mayor.
- Good morning, beautiful.
- Good morning, sir.
Good morning.
Tell her that the child is here, and that the doctor doesn't want her to see her right away.
Don't count on me,
I cannot say this.
Sister Simplice has never lied.
- Such a small lie, come on.
- There are no innocent lies.
A lie, it is a demon.
Very well.
And Cosette?
Where is Cosette?
Calm down. Calm down.
Calm down.
She is here, your child.
She's playing, you hear her?
Oh, she is here.
Oh, I want to see her!
No, not right away.
The doctor said you could give her your illness.
You need a lot of rest, a lot of calm.
In a few days when you're better, you'll see your little girl.
But I feel just fine.
I don't hurt at all anymore.
I am even... very hungry.
You have no idea how much children help you to go on.
So, you covered all this road by carriage?
I know it well, I did it by foot, in the old days.
Mr. Madeleine, save me!
Don't be afraid.
He is not coming for you.
I see you didn't waste any time.
Come on, quickly.
- Come on.
- Mr. Mayor!
There is no more Mr. Mayor.
- Listen, Javert.
- Mr. Inspector...
I am asking you three days to go pick up the child of this woman.
You'll come with me if you wish.
Do you take me for a fool?
Three days to go pick up the child of this girl?
Cosette isn't here? Mr. Madeleine, give me back my daughter!
Give me back my little girl,
Mr. Madeleine!
There is no more Mr. Madeleine.
There is Jean Valjean, thief and galley slave.
No! Cosette! Cosette!
Are you pleased with yourself?
I would advise you not to disturb me now.
I will take care of your child,
I promise you.
Now I am at your disposal.
To be an ex-convict is sometimes an advantage.
The same night,
Mr. Madeleine's servant....
Mr. Madeleine!
But I thought you were...
In jail. As you see,
I am not there anymore.
I knew you were not a scoundrel.
Did they let you go?
Not quite. But listen,
I never came here tonight and you never saw me.
- Is that clear?
- Yes.
- Sister.
- Mr. Mayor!
There is no Mr. Mayor anymore.
- Is it true, you have...
- Yes.
But then...
To pick up her child,
I needed my freedom, I took it.
Take this money to bury her decently, the rest is for those without work.
You must take it.
It has been honestly earned.
All my life, I only stole one bread and 2 francs.
Thank you.
And the little one, what will you do with her?
I don't know.
Javert will chase me.
I hope the police formalities will allow me to get before him at Montfermeil.
But after that...
Go to Paris, 62 Rue de Picpus, at the convent of the sisters of Saint-Benoit.
Tell the Reverend Mother that I am sending you.
You will tell her... the name
I abandoned 20 years ago.
Eugénie de Blémeur.
It will be enough.
Excuse me, sister.
The convict Jean Valjean, alias Madeleine, has escaped.
He stopped at his house a few minutes ago.
He has been seen near the hospital.
You have been here for a long time?
Yes.
And you haven't seen him?
No.
In Montfermeil, there was a very old belief.
People said that in the forest near the village,
the devil came on Christmas night to bury his treasures.
But that night...
one could have seen a strange hobo digging the ground.
Well, me, if I was lucky enough to meet him digging a hole,
I wouldn't escape.
I would tell him... can we share?
Don't be afraid my loves.
If the devil comes, mommy will chase him.
Work, you!
- What? My horse didn't drink?
- Cosette!
You didn't give water to this gentleman's horse?
Oh, yes, Madame, the horse drank a full bucket.
A tiny thing like this who such big lies.
It's not true.
This is no way to speak to a client.
Go, toad, go give something to drink to this horse.
Yes, Madame.
But, Madame, there is no more water.
- Then pump it.
- But the pump is broken.
So go to the source, go on.
- In the wood?
- Yes, hurry up.
Don't be afraid.
The devil won't eat you.
You want to buy it?
- No.
- Why? You have no money?
- That's it?
- Yes.
It's your mommy who sends you for the water so far away?
I think I have no mommy.
What do you mean, you think you don't have any?
- I never saw her.
- So who is this water for?
It's for my boss, Mrs. Thénardier.
Thénardier?
What's your name?
- Cosette.
- Cosette?
It's you, Cosette?
Well, it took you a while.
Madame, I found a sir who came to the house.
- Do you have a carriage, sir?
- No, I am walking.
It's this way.
He wants to eat.
Strange weather, hey?
Do you want a room?
No, it's for dinner only.
You must pay in advance.
I Will pay.
- It's 40 sous.
- All right.
It's 20 sous, the price.
Not for the poor. It stains a house to have these people.
He's not even from around here.
Work a little bit instead of looking.
So, you have a good time, my loves?
Yes, Mommy.
Look how her little hat suits her.
Such little treasures.
Your horse has enough to drink.
He is like his master.
Here you are.
What does she do here, the little one?
She's darning my socks, of course.
She must earn her keep, poor thing.
A child we took as charity.
How much do you sell your socks for?
Sir, my socks are not for sale.
And if I were giving you a Louis for it?
A Louis?
Here.
Here, sir, they are yours.
- With the meal, we're even.
- They are beautiful socks.
You can keep them. But now... this child's time belongs to me.
Have a good time, little one.
She wants to take my doll.
You are leaving, sir?
I am coming back.
- Look what he gave me.
- Who is that man?
It's Rothschild!
We must make him spit out some more of them before he goes.
He left.
It's a good one, at least.
On my way out,
I met Santa Claus.
He asked me if I knew a Mademoiselle Cosette, and if she was well behaved.
I answered yes.
I am not sure I was right.
It's a banker!
Well, my Cosette, this gentleman gives you a doll!
Take it, it's yours.
What do you say to the gentleman?
She doesn't need to tell me anything.
I am just the messenger.
Now it's may be time to put these little girls to bed.
If Monsieur doesn't mind... holidays are work days for us.
This cutie has to get up early.
Go to bed, my lovelies.
Say something, you, for God's sake.
Yes, darling, we are going to bed.
Eponine, Azelma, come too, my darlings.
I am going to call her Catherine.
It's also time for us to go to bed.
You are waited for in your place.
It's one hour you haven't drunk anything.
Come on, go out.
We haven't paid!
Never mind. It's not
Christmas every day.
- Thank you.
- You're welcome.
I'll put it on your account.
Drink this. It's the wine I sell to the customers, a good one.
Monsieur gives me a great honor.
So you are coming from far away?
- Paris.
- Ah.
Not a lot of people for a Christmas night.
Ah, Monsieur, times are hard.
We don't have a lot of bourgeois in our region.
If we didn't have rich and generous travelers from time to time...
You have a little servant who doesn't cost you too much.
A fortune, she costs us.
It's small, but it eats.
It's incredible, how much it eats.
And it's not strong.
It cannot do much hard work.
We keep her because she has no family.
By charity. And she needs clothes. Winters are cold.
And I have two more little girls, not to mention the very last one, a boy who came I know not how.
Because of the cold.
All of this costs money.
And if someone would help you by taking her away?
Taking who? Cosette?
Ah, Monsieur, take her, keep her, eat her, and be blessed by the Virgin Mary and all the saints in Heaven.
Very well, go look for her.
I am taking her with me.
- Right away?
- Right away.
- I am going.
- One moment.
Go to the kitchen, I have to discuss all of this with Monsieur.
I truly adore this child.
I noticed.
We are not rich, but one has to do something for the Lord.
I have bread for her.
I love this little one.
My wife has a temper, but she adores her, too.
No, I cannot accept.
We would miss her.
I need to hear babbling in the house.
Or... it's 1,500 francs.
Go look for her.
- Here you are.
- Thank you.
You're missing all the good opportunities.
Fifteen hundred francs!
He is stinking rich.
You are right.
- Here are your 1,500 francs.
- What does that mean?
I keep Cosette. I thought about it, and I cannot do this.
It's her mother who entrusted her to me.
I can only give her back to her mother.
Or... it's 5,000 francs.
You won't have one franc more.
You mention her mother.
You're right.
Do you know this signature?
It's a good imitation.
Well, all right.
Why you didn't show me this in the first place?
Because I have my reasons.
I have to think about this.
Ah, no, I have to leave right away.
You have time. You will leave tomorrow morning.
All right. Show me my room.
I am sure we will reach an agreement.
Sergeant of Waterloo.
Keep the carriage and watch the door.
You, go behind the house and wait for me.
I am coming in. Come.
- Police.
- Oh, my God.
You are keeping the daughter of a so-called Fantine. She is still here?
- Everybody is asking for her today.
- Everybody?
Everybody, indeed. A man came with a paper from the mother.
- He left?
- No, he is upstairs.
- We come just in time.
- You are not going to arrest him!
- He owes me money.
- Shut up, take us to him, quietly.
Be careful, he is dangerous.
Dangerous? I follow you, then.
You, stay here.
It's his room.
You're caught!
Nobody.
I don't understand.
I took him here myself.
Shut up.
We have to search all rooms.
Not here, it's a married couple.
Be careful, watch the doors.
Don't be afraid. I am taking you with me. You want to?
Quietly or the Thénardiers would take you back. Come.
- Come on.
- And Catherine?
Where did you leave her?
Downstairs?
Hide here, I'll go look for her.
There is this. It leads to the stable.
She may have gone that way.
He cannot escape.
He is trapped. I am going.
- Show me the way.
- Nothing is burning!
If you are here, say it, we'll negotiate.
What a surprise.
Let's share and I'll shut up.
There is no one in the stable.
He didn't go this way.
Virgile!
And this room, what is it?
My little girls' room.
I was just there.
I am downstairs, where are you?
What's the matter? You have him?
What are you doing downstairs?
Wait.
Come on my shoulders. Go on.
Some horses and a carriage, quickly!
Go to Paris. 62 Rue de Picpus,
at the convent of the sisters of Saint-Benoit.
Tell the Reverend Mother that I am sending you.
You will tell her... the name
I abandoned 20 years ago.
Eugénie de Blémeur.
The convent's groundskeeper was wearing on his knee a bell that was chasing the nuns away,
because they were forbidden to look upon a man, even from far.
Cosette! Come!
Come!
I am sorry, Mother.
Don't apologize, Mr. Fauchelevent.
Fatherly love is blessed by God, but nevertheless...
You shouldn't distract her from her studies.
First, she has to forget she has been very unhappy.
Where would be better than here to forget?
You know, life is so hard.
Here, she'll be safe, away from the world's temptations.
She'll become a good servant of God.
In any case, she'll be ugly.
Not far from there,
another groundskeeper was also dreaming
while taking care of his flowers.
He used to be an officer of Napoléon,
Colonel Pontmercy.
Since the Restoration, he was getting half his pay
and was forbidden to wear his Legion of Honor.
He was only allowed to show his scars.
His father-in-law, an ultra-royalist, had told him,
"I will raise your child.
He will be my heir,
but on one condition: that you disappear."
The officer was poor. For his son's sake, he had accepted.
Marius Pontmercy had become a man
without having seen his father again.
Mr. Marius's grandfather asks for
Mr. Marius in the living room.
After 50 years in this house,
I change servants very often, and their name is Nicolette.
It's more practical to keep the same name.
Your name will be Nicolette and you will have 50 francs per month.
For the service, you will ask for Mademoiselle Gillenormand, my daughter.
What is your nephew doing?
Go check.
In the room of this young man?
The height of prudery is to multiply defenses in the places least likely to be attacked.
- Yes...
- You asked for me?
Marius!
Your father writes to us. He says he is sick, he wants to see you.
You want me to go there?
I know what you think, my poor child.
It's not your fault if you are the son of one of these scoundrels who killed our king and bled France.
But it's our duty to defend the family's traditions.
It looks serious. It's not him who writes, it's the doctor.
It's your father.
Even if he was in the galleys, you would have to go.
You will take the stagecoach tomorrow morning at six.
This letter has been in my pocket for two days already.
When he arrived in a dark room, he found three men.
One was standing up.
One was sitting down.
And a third one was laying down
and didn't wait for him anymore.
And facing this deceased man,
Marius learnt who was his father.
Simple soldier, one arm broken fighting beside General Kleber,
Second Lieutenant in Lodi,
Legion of Honor in Austerlitz,
one of the three survivors of the Eylau cemetery.
Captain in Friedland for his 12th wound,
Colonel at Waterloo.
The Thénardiers were also at Waterloo.
The wife was canteen keeper and he was sergeant.
Can I come out? ls there any danger?
- No.
- And what's going on?
The English are still resisting.
Wait. I want to see this.
Come! It seems to be going badly for the Emperor.
Each of these lines is a regiment?
And these others who walk and shine under the sun, it's the white cuirasses.
It's at least 60,000 Prussians.
And they are all fresh.
The guard!
Lay down or you'll go to your death if the officer sees you!
- It's his last reserve, he is done.
- Be quiet.
Tomorrow, sweetie, we'd better become royalists.
Close the ranks!
Close the ranks!
Close the ranks!
Close the ranks!
Hold firmly!
And the night fell on 60,000 corpses.
Great, an officer.
Who won?
The English.
I have a broken leg.
Don't let them take you.
Me, I am done, but you, go away.
They don't scare me.
I'll get you out of here.
I could even find a carriage, but I need money.
- Your name?
- Sergeant Thénardier, and you?
Colonel Pontmercy.
I will never forget.
Don't worry.
There.
For my son.
At Waterloo, a man saved my life.
His name is Thénardier.
I could never find him again.
If my son meets him, he has to be as generous as possible with him.
The Emperor made me a Baron on the battlefield.
The Restoration is contesting me this title.
My son will take it, and he will carry it,
and he will deserve it.
Baron! You are baron, now?
What does that mean?
My father bequeathed me this title, earned with his blood.
And I will be proud to carry it.
Your father? It's me!
My father is a man who gloriously served the Republic, the Emperor, and France.
And he made only one mistake: to love too much two ingrates, his homeland and myself.
Marius! Abominable child!
All these people were rogues, murderers, red bonnets!
Thieves! Baron!
You are about as much a baron as my slipper!
All bandits who betrayed their king and served Robespierre and Bonaparte!
All cowards who ran away from the English and the Prussians at Waterloo.
Traitors and cowards, all of them!
All of them, you hear?
Down with the Bourbons, and this pig, Louis XVIII.
A baron like Monsieur and an old emigrant like me cannot stay under the same roof.
I am asking you to leave this house today.
I'll be thrilled to do so.
Father, you are quite right.
Daughter, you are an ermine of stupidity without one stain of intelligence.
Marius, without any money,
went to live in a shack, not far from the gate of Italy...
not far from the district of the horse market.
Without quitting his law studies,
he started doing translations to earn his living.
But his neighbors didn't respect his work.
Are you going to shut up?
One cannot work here!
You'll see, if I lose my temper!
Only their daughter, Eponine, seemed to be interested in him.
Here you are, finally.
It took you a long time.
Next time you'll hire me a hackney-coach.
How she speaks to her dad, this one!
My legs are killing me.
I went up and down the floors, and everywhere it smelled like cooking.
Everywhere the same answer: we have our poor.
Here. 20 sous. That's all I got.
And he wanted to caress my hands.
To caress your hands, 20 sous?
The world has fallen real low.
I'll read you something that may be bring us more.
Listen.
"Mrs. Comtesse de Montvernet,
9 Rue Cassette."
Cassette. It means big bucks.
What a load of lies.
"I am an unfortunate mother of six children.
The last one is only three months old.
Abandoned by my husband, ill, in bed in the worst misery.
I send you my oldest daughter, hoping you'll have a good heart, with my deepest respect.
Signed: Femme Balisar."
They wouldn't have any heart.
I hope to get at least three francs out of it.
Here Gavroche, take this.
You'll say your sisters are sick.
- No.
- That's how you speak to your dad?
In the days of the Emperor, they would have straightened you out.
You would be in the army, and they would teach you life.
I said no. I am fed up with begging everywhere.
If you wanted, you could work.
I am not a man who does just any kind of work.
- I used to be in the military.
- Well, military salute, then.
Beat it or I'll knock you out!
There is someone next door, a student.
A student!
He should go to work.
Good morning, Mr. Marius.
Good morning.
As many students, Marius was coming to work in the Luxembourg.
He noticed the young girls looking at him.
It used to make him at once shy and furious.
He thought they were looking at him for his old clothes,
and that they laughed about it.
But they were looking at him for his charm,
and dreamt about him.
One day...
on the next bench...
One day, the eyes of a young girl
have the power of creating in a soul
this dark flower filled with perfume and poison
that one calls love.
He was missing a button and his shoes were dirty.
He didn't dare follow her.
The man and the young girl lived in a remote house in the Rue Plumet,
where they were known as
Mr. Fauchelevent and his daughter.
And often, they saw him gardening.
From a fellow student, richer than he,
Marius borrowed a frock, some gloves, and a hat.
And she was wearing a new dress.
She is looking at me.
If I dared, I would get up and walk in front of her.
She is looking at me, too.
I would like to be handsome, to wear the war cross, to be on a horse.
I am ridiculous.
That young man looks very knowledgeable.
- This young man?
- Yes.
Cosette.
What are you thinking about?
Nothing.
Mr. Fauchelevent took a different path,
but Marius followed them.
So, Fauchelevent came alone.
The next day, the bench remained empty.
And the next day.
And the following days.
And all the other benches where he had seen her sitting.
Not far from him, another man seemed to be also looking for someone.
It was Javert, looking for Jean Valjean.
The weeks passed, and Marius didn't again see this young girl,
whose name was still unknown to him.
But facing him were coming events
that were going to shatter his life
and inflame the heart of Paris.
Down with Louis-Philippe!
Down with Louis-Philippe!
Wait a little bit!
Oh, my God, the Reds!
We'll go to all the schools!
END OF THE FIRST PERIOD
SECOND PERIOD
The 1830s Revolution didn't bring forth the Republic
but Louis Philippe instead, and France was restless.
Citizens, General Lamarque is ill.
They say he's going to die.
He was the last defender of our liberties at the Assembly.
If we lose him, we must fear the worst.
Everything will reverse back to before '89.
Marius had made friends among the Latin Quarter's generous youth.
Thus, he started spending time with revolutionary groups.
The Friends of the ABC met in the back room of the Cafe Musain,
on the Place Saint-Michel.
Gentlemen, here's your new friend.
Their leader was named Enjolras.
We're glad to have you among us.
You've come a long way to get here, I think.
Bahorel.
Sir.
Joly.
You know General Lamarque is very ill.
If he dies, the Republicans will stir and so will the Bonapartists.
The rabble will try to take advantage to plunder and kill.
Anywhere there is lead in Paris, roofs, monuments, gutters, that lead is being torn down to be made into bullets.
That's right.
Keep an eye on it and put a stop to it when the time comes.
Each one of you will be assigned to a local police station.
Here are the files on the suspects.
Javert, you'll be at the Val-de-Grâce station.
Some students there belong to the Friends of the ABC; some rabble-rousers I'd like to see behind bars.
The Claquesous Gang.
I know them.
Take care of them.
In the hovel where he lived,
Marius dreamt less of the Republic than of that young woman met in the Luxembourg and whose name he didn't know.
Come on in.
Hello, Mr. Marius.
Don't you recognize me?
We know each other, though.
We meet everyday in the stairwell and in the hallway.
You don't notice me.
I'm your neighbors' daughter-- the Jondrettes.
The room next door.
You must hear us, though.
A mirror!
Look at me. No wonder you don't notice me.
May I?
What can I do for you?
I was bringing a letter.
- A letter?
- Yes, from my father.
No need to read it.
He says the same thing to everyone; he's asking for money.
It's all a joke.
But we did used to have an inn in the countryside.
Then, bankruptcy.
Now, we eat when we have time.
May I?
It's good.
It's hard, it breaks your teeth.
We're used to it.
We can't complain, though; last winter, we slept under bridges.
We huddled together so we wouldn't freeze.
My sister was crying.
Sometimes, I felt like drowning myself.
When I looked at the water,
I thought it was too cold for that.
I, too, had some rough times.
I write copies at night.
I unloaded bags in the Halles.
You?
You have nice hands, though.
They're white.
You're quite handsome, Mr. Marius.
You're not any richer than us to live in such a hovel.
But destitution is what we're fighting against.
To each according to his needs.
We would like bread and work for everyone.
You know that General
Lamarque is dying?
- Who is he?
- Our last defender.
- Then we are doomed?
- No, since we're here.
We're preparing the revolution.
The Republic.
My father always tells us about the Emperor.
That's all he talks about.
That's not going to feed us.
I still have this.
I already had lunch.
Louis the Eighteenth!
Long live the King!
A few days later,
the young woman, hungry, walked by a bakery
and succumbed to temptation.
Thief! Stop her! Thief!
- What is it?
- Thief! Stop her!
- Stop her!
- She stole a loaf of bread!
- What's going on?
- A girl stole a loaf of bread.
I'll take you to the police.
Go get a police officer.
No need to get a police officer.
- Will you pay for the bread?
- Of course.
It's all well and good, but she's still a thief.
She didn't rob the whole bakery.
A loaf won't bankrupt it.
Come on.
Here.
At this price, I'll sell you bread every day.
Here.
It's good. Meanwhile, the others go hungry.
I knew you would be thinking about them.
Let's bring them a nice meal, if you'd like. With two bottles of wine.
My father is taking care of it.
Miss? They just brought in the new dress.
Do you want it?
No!
Take it. It'd make me happy.
We're about the same size.
Usually, rich people aren't like that.
They give you old things and make speeches, and put their hands on you.
They give you crumbs, like a dog.
I'd like to bite them.
But you... you're different.
Shall we go?
I gave her my dress.
You did good.
See? There are worse things than heartache.
I brought a rich man!
With his daughter.
They saved me from prison.
They gave me a dress!
They're bringing food!
We took a hackney coach!
I think I had too much to drink.
A rich man?
- You, go to bed.
- Why?
You're ill. Lie down.
- You, break a pane.
- A pane?
- Break a pane!
- What for?
To look pitiful.
- Don't play tricks on them!
- Shut up!
So, are you breaking this pane?
- I'm bleeding!
- That's nothing!
Illness, cold, blood--perfect.
Careful.
Who did you tell him I was?
- My father.
- What name?
- I didn't give a name.
- Well...
I am... Honoré Fabantou, actor.
Go meet them!
Are you done?
This is our home.
Come on in, young lady.
Come on in, dear sir.
My daughter told me what you did for her.
The wretched kid, who stole a loaf of bread while her mother is ill!
I raised her like an artist.
And she's talented, sir.
Don't worry, once you're gone,
She shall pay for it.
Let me get this for you, young lady.
Bring a chair.
Not this one.
Bordeaux wine?
It's baby Jesus in silk drawers.
Take this.
Sit down, Miss. Excuse the chair, we're very poor.
You must be blessed with such a fine young lady.
I, too, am bringing mine up religiously, to be honest and kind.
They better believe in God or I'll smack them.
You don't want to sit down?
No, thank you. We won't stay long.
Don't leave so soon. I should have welcomed you better, but my poor wife is ill.
She's ill.
Look at that man.
Do you recognize him?
Why? What's wrong?
Look at him.
And whimper, for God's sake!
Shortness of breath.
Comes from her age.
And my other daughter is injured.
It's broken. She's shy.
She had an accident while working at the factory.
Her arm was almost torn off.
- My God!
- Don't listen to him!
The pane is broken.
The fire is out. What misery!
You don't work?
I'm an artist, sir.
I can't just do anything.
I enjoyed some success.
Yes, I know you well.
I can't go near a theater dressed like this.
And I owe four quarters to my landlord.
He gave me until tomorrow.
If I don't pay, he'll throw us out on the street, with my sick wife and my child with her wound.
You won't end up on the street.
I don't have the money on me;
I'll take my daughter home and return.
I'll be back around eight.
Come on.
Thank you.
So, I'll be here at eight o'clock.
Thank you, my benefactor!
Thank you, Miss.
See you later, dear sir, and thank you again.
You are like Providence.
You are God.
Will we go see him when he plays somewhere?
You won't have the opportunity to see him again, my child.
19 Rue Plumet.
Follow that coach!
It's 40 sous an hour.
- I will pay on returning.
- Payment in advance.
It's beautiful!
Will you let me borrow it?
It won't fit you, you're too skinny.
Don't touch it with your filthy hands!
Father, she won't let me borrow it.
Don't worry.
Tomorrow, you'll have a satin dress and silk boots.
- What?
- You're crazy.
You didn't recognize him?
Poor old woman, she's blind.
Who is it?
All I can say is he must be richer than the Finance Minister.
Too much money for one man.
We'll tell Claquesous, he'll warn the Gang.
Don't do that. It's not your style.
Don't worry, this man doesn't like the police.
You get it?
Eponine!
Where did she go?
What are you doing here?
I'm looking at myself.
You don't notice anything?
No.
What's wrong?
- Are you sad?
- Yes.
- Is the General dead?
- No.
You're not ill, are you?
You were kind to me the other day.
Now it's my turn. Can I help you?
I'd like to.
- Listen...
- Yes, talk to me.
The gentleman and his daughter who came by your house...
You saw her. You like her.
You find her beautiful.
Beautiful...
Do you know where she lives?
No.
- But you can find her.
- I don't think so.
Here! To your health, Mother!
Here you are. Where were you?
I needed you.
Tonight, we'll go visit your gentleman and his daughter.
Where do they live?
I don't know.
What do you mean?
I met them in the street.
- And your dress?
- She had just bought it.
- And where's all this coming from?
- They bought it for you.
Go back to the store and ask, they must know him there!
- No.
- What?
I don't want you to hurt these people.
Is that how you talk to your father?
Don't touch me or I'll scream!
Don't count on me to help you with your nasty tricks!
Your plan is ruined.
I won't let that pest ruin my plans.
Leave! You're always underfoot, not working, not talking!
- Where do you expect me to go?
- Out! Come back tomorrow.
Tonight, I want to be free. Go!
It's been several years, but I recognized him at once.
That scoundrel hasn't changed much.
Some people never age, I don't know how they manage it.
He didn't recognize me because of my beard.
And you know what?
The beautiful young lady he calls his daughter...
- No!
- Yes, it is she!
- That one?
- That one!
Dressed like a princess when my daughters don't have a gown to wear!
I'd like to jump on her stomach with wooden shoes!
Don't worry. Tomorrow your girls will look like princesses and you'll wear a fancy dress that will turn young men's heads.
And we'll eat chicken!
But not charity chicken.
I'm tired of misery.
I want to have my turn now, before I rot!
I, too, want to be a bit of a millionaire.
Not so loud. The neighbor...
That long-legged ass?
Listen, we'll tell Claquesous.
He'll warn the Gang.
The other one comes at 8, the house will be empty.
The student will be out for his politics.
The hunters will be alone with the pigeon!
He'll have to make a sacrifice!
Come in.
Inspector, a man is bringing us an interesting case.
- Political?
- No... but it could help us catch the Claquesous Gang.
- Mr. Marius Pontmercy?
- Yes.
Thanks for warning us. We've been after these villains for a while.
You promise to catch them in the act, but they're dangerous.
- Are you afraid?
- Not more than you.
I suppose that you're armed?
No, why?
In that case, take this pistol.
Conceal yourself in your room,
Let them think you're out.
Observe. We'll be posted around the house.
We'll let the men go by.
Let them do their thing, but not too much.
Enough so that we can catch them in the act.
When you think it's time, fire one shot in the air.
- I'll take care of the rest.
- Understood.
One word of advice, Mr. Pontmercy.
In the next few days, avoid your young friends who want to change the world in the back room of Cafe Musain.
My ideas concern no one but me.
Give me back the pistol later.
I hope they're on time.
- There's no one next door?
- He's out.
With his politics, he's never back before midnight.
Let's make sure of it. Go check.
No one's here!
A hackney coach!
Hurry up!
Block the door if need be.
Yes?
Come in, my benefactor.
It's so good of you to have come one more time.
I told you I'd be back around 8.
It must be 8, then. We don't know;
I don't have a watch anymore.
How is your wife?
She's dying. But she's so brave.
She's not a woman, she's an ox.
Your daughters aren't here?
No, the wounded one had to go to the hospital to be bandaged up; her older sister went with her.
Did my benefactor bring the rent money?
- Yes.
- Thank you.
- Here.
- Thank you.
Sit down, dear sir.
Sit down with me;
I have a proposition for you.
Here. Paris is no good for you.
You'll never lead the honest life you deserve here.
Too many actors like you and not enough tickets sold.
- That's true.
- Isn't it?
I thought you'd need a new country.
I'll buy you and your family a trip to the Americas.
I'll set you up with some money so that you can wait for... the acting parts that'll suit you.
Some money? How much?
A thousand Louis.
A thousand Louis?!
Sweet Jesus.
Shut up!
Excuse me, sir, but women only think about money.
For us men, the heart talks.
I love Paris.
I can't live away from Paris.
I can't breathe.
Two leagues away from the Seine and I'm breathless.
It'd take a lot to forget Paris.
I said, a lot.
You're making a mistake.
You should leave rapidly with what I offer you.
Your future would be brighter.
My future or yours?
I'd like to show you something that explains why I love France.
It's a picture, but a masterpiece.
I'm attached to it.
But if you're interested,
I'll be willing to part with it.
We're in such poverty...
Take no heed.
It's just a neighbor.
His face is black because he's a coal worker.
People come and go here;
It is God's house.
It's a very valuable picture.
David painted it.
He got his inspiration from my own story.
"To the Sergeant of Waterloo."
I'm the Sergeant.
I'm saving a Colonel, pulling him from under corpses.
That's the moment when I'm saving his life.
The picture doesn't ring a bell?
You haven't seen it anywhere?
No.
If I could sell it for enough money,
I might leave France.
What value do you set upon it?
Three francs.
We're all here, we can start now.
First, look at me.
Don't you recognize me?
Like this, without the beard.
The inn at Montfermeil, with the sign of the Sergeant of Waterloo.
Don't you remember?
Thénardier.
I am Thénardier.
What do you mean?
I don't know you.
You don't remember?
You don't know who I am?
I do. You're a bandit.
That's how rich people call us!
We're hungry, so we're bandits.
You eat truffles, asparagus and green peas in January.
When you want to know if it's cold, you look at the thermometer.
But for us bandits, our skin is our thermometer!
Step aside.
Let us work a little.
Don't let him escape!
Don't hurt him. Sit him down.
Pick up the table, it'll be more proper.
Pick up the table.
There.
What is he waiting for?
Let's go see.
No papers, no money.
You think you're so smart?
But you'll give us your address, dear sir.
You don't know it? I'll tell you.
See how nice he is.
Where do you live?
On the Vendôme Column.
Bastard! Wait, I'll make you talk.
Bring me the brazier!
Good, good.
You'll be good and give us the address.
Then we'll go get your beautiful little lady.
When she's here, you'll be happy to give us all the money we want so that we don't hurt your little treasure.
Go ahead and shrug.
You don't want to talk?
Wait, he's gonna yell.
No, the gentleman won't yell.
He doesn't want the cops to show up.
When he came to get the girl in Montfermeil, the cops were already chasing him.
So, are you gonna give us the address?
No.
Do you remember knocking me out in my attic?
You think you can make me say what I don't want to say?
Here, look.
You're not men enough.
The old man is too tough for you.
If one of you doesn't mind the heat, let him come closer.
So? You, the brave Sergeant.
And you, the Terror.
You might be vicious, but you're weak!
Let me take care of him!
- Having fun, my friends?
- Javert!
Don't worry, I'm not alone.
You're 6, we're 15. Let's not fight.
Hi, Montparnasse.
Hi, Gueulemer.
The whole Claquesous Gang.
Right, kill me. My men will get you and in three months...
I surrender.
That's good.
All I'm asking is that I get tobacco in solitary confinement.
Granted.
Take them all away!
Let's go! Don't forget the Missus.
Bitch! She pinched me.
Cowards! You're no men.
You claim to be free and you get caught like chicks!
Watch these two!
Jean Valjean! Stop him!
General Lamarque is dead.
Read all the details.
Read The Constitutional;
General Lamarque is dead.
Read General Lamarque's last words before his death.
Thank you.
My friends... may his death be the opportunity for the Republic to be reborn.
His last word was... "Motherland."
His motherland... our motherland... is the Republic.
France and freedom are but one.
General Lamarque's funeral will take place in 3 days.
All the citizens of Paris will go with him for his last trip.
Gentlemen... that day, we'll show if we're ready to lead a free life...
Or die.
Mr. Marius, there's someone for you next door.
- Me?
- Yes.
One breaded chop!
Are you asking for me?
You don't recognize me? Eponine.
I'm in disguise because the cops are after me.
Don't count on me to help you.
You don't think I was in on it, do you?
I saw you bring them to your father.
You're a well-organized family.
You have no right to say that!
If I had wanted to, the young lady, right now, would be...
But I didn't want to reveal the address.
My father was furious.
I was itching to, but I didn't give it.
- Are you telling the truth?
- Yes.
- You know the address?
- Yes.
Why didn't you give it to me?
- Because.
- Because why?
If you can't guess,
I have nothing to say.
I have better things to do than play charades.
If I give it to you, will you believe me?
If I give you the address right now, will you believe me?
What will you give me for it?
A kiss for New Year's Day?
Rue de Plumet, number 19.
The gated house.
With a garden.
Are you happy?
Rue Plumet. Jean Valjean was abruptly leaving the house
for an overnight trip.
He had made a grave decision.
He knew that this retreat was no longer safe.
That sooner or later, the ghosts of his past would come through the gate,
along with that young swain
Cosette dreamt about.
"O Spring, you're a letter I write her.
Tell her I sigh and yearn, away from her.
And I wanted to die because I had lost her.
O, may the garden, the house, the limb, the leaf,
may everything become a soul and tell you about me.
You hold my hand when I walk in the shade
And the rays of light come from your eyes.
If I were King, I'll give my kingdom, my scepter
And my people on their knees
For a kiss from you
That I will take tonight."
Tonight...
That night, in the woods of Montfermeil,
a peasant woman thought she saw the Devil unearth his treasure.
Meanwhile, Rue Plumet...
The next day, Paris was burying General Lamarque.
Are you coming with us,
Mr. Maboeuf?
We're going to topple the government!
- I'm in!
- It will get rowdy.
- That's good!
- Sabers and gunshots, Mr. Maboeuf!
- That's good!
- Even cannons fired!
That's good!
Get in the procession.
All right, Chief.
Present arms!
Stop!
Let us through!
Let us through!
The Army with us!
Let's honor General Lamarque!
Lamarque at the Pantheon!
Lamarque at the Pantheon!
Lamarque at the Pantheon!
Lamarque at the Pantheon!
Lamarque at the Pantheon!
Unharness the horses!
Lamarque at the Pantheon!
Lamarque at the Pantheon!
At the Pantheon!
At the Pantheon!
Let's not fight on open ground.
Let's go to the center of Paris.
- We have to get weapons!
- Let's go!
I have a rifle and bullets!
- Let's go!
- I'm in!
They fired on the people!
We're powerless here!
We need guns!
- You'll ruin me!
- The Revolution will pay you back!
- Now, to the barricades!
- To the barricades!
- Hey, friends!
- Over here, guys!
- We're coming, guys!
- We're hiring for the Republic!
Come on, students!
We'll control Rue St Denis with our weapons.
They won't dare come close.
Tomorrow, we'll be the assailants.
Let's go, friends!
Let's go!
"Au raisin de Corinte?" No "H"?
A wine shop; I like it.
Enjolras is the king of strategists!
Hi.
Good! Put this over there.
We'll put the injured here.
Upstairs will be our citadel.
The floor is very sturdy, the bullets will hit it like a hammer.
- I have an idea, sir.
- What is it?
Let's have a glass or two to the Republic's health.
You're dead-drunk.
Go away, you're a disgrace.
I didn't drink it all, there's still some left.
Take these bottles upstairs, we can use them as projectiles.
Give me that.
I don't mind dying for the Republic, but I don't want to die of thirst.
Your idea, then?
Over there, working.
See the bald man over there?
He's a spy.
Are you sure?
Just last week, he almost ripped my ear off for taking lead to make bullets.
I know him as well;
I dealt with him not long ago.
Wait.
- Who are you?
- I see what this is.
- A spy?
- Inspector Javert.
Let's take him in the wine shop.
If things go wrong, we'll shoot him.
Right now, let's not waste bullets. Go.
You again. You still haven't returned my pistol.
Meanwhile, Jean Valjean, having packed all his belongings,
was preparing to leave France.
While waiting for his passports,
he was going to a secluded apartment he had rented in Paris.
Are you coming?
We should be in London in 8 days, after we get our passports.
7 Rue de l'Homme Armé.
"My Beloved...
We are leaving for England and I'll die if I lose you.
Rue de l'Homme Armé, number 7."
Eponine knew that whatever events were unfolding in Paris,
the night would bring her Marius.
Cosette?
Cosette?
No, not Cosette.
You?
- Are you disappointed?
- What are you doing here?
I was waiting for you.
She's gone.
I saw them lock the house.
They won't be back.
Gone? Do you know where they went?
I heard the man tell the young lady they'd be in London soon.
London?
It's far away, isn't it?
She didn't leave anything for me?
A note, a message?
No.
Where are you going?
We're fighting in Paris.
Remember what I told you.
The great upheaval has begun!
I used to be afraid of dying.
Now, it doesn't matter to me.
I almost wish for it.
Let me come with you.
We'll have a laugh.
Watch out.
Let's go around, there's a passageway.
Listen.
It's the bell of Saint-Merri.
Mr. Enjolras!
The soldiers are approaching!
Disperse!
Otherwise, we'll charge!
Wait!
Soldiers, listen to me!
The night hides you, but I know your faces.
You could be my sons!
In '89, I too was 20 years old.
But I was fighting against the Bastille, for the Republic!
Join us!
Let each of us defend this dead old man as he would defend his living father.
His garment will be our flag.
Watch out! Line up!
Aim properly.
Don't waste your bullets.
Forward! Get rid of this rabble!
Fire!
Fire!
Give me your weapons!
Forward! Show no mercy!
Stay calm!
Get rid of this rabble!
Take this away!
Here, Marius!
Stand firm!
Surrender!
Show no mercy!
- Surrender!
- No mercy!
Watch for the Powder keg!
Run away or you'll blow up!
- Victory!
- Long live the Republic!
They ran away like rabbits!
Reload your weapons!
Tend to the wounded!
Without you, I'd be dead.
Bravo, Mr. Marius!
Mr. Marius...
Mr. Marius...
I'll take you. We'll fix you up.
I'm in too much pain.
Leave me here.
It's no use.
Stay with me.
I saw you throw yourself in front of the musket.
Why did you do that?
Why?
I saw they were aiming at you,
I couldn't...
We will meet again.
Is it true?
Will we meet again?
Yes.
But if everyone meets again up there, it must be the same drama as down here.
True.
I have a letter for you in my blouse.
I found it on the bench.
I didn't want to give it to you.
But that's funny,
I can't see you unhappy.
Do you remember when I gave you the address?
I asked you what you'd give me.
A kiss on New Year's Day.
But it's only June.
- Promise me...
- What?
- Promise?
- I promise.
When I'm dead, you'll kiss me for real.
Yes.
I think I was a little bit in love with you.
Eponine was laid to rest next to Father Maboeuf,
and Gavroche understood what family could be.
Immobile, Javert was waiting for his fate to be sealed.
The dead were lined up in the street.
There they were, next to each other, made to get along,
but society had turned them against one another.
Grantaire had managed to find something to drink.
Gavroche was playing.
Marius was finishing a letter.
Will you do something for me?
Something? Anything!
I'd like you to deliver this letter.
It's too early for the post office.
Exactly. Miss Fauchelevent,
Rue de l'Homme Armé, number 7.
Right away.
"L'Homme Armé"?
I like it. The name fits.
Better leave my belt, it doesn't look like a mailman's bag.
Rue de I'Homme Armé,
Jean Valjean wasn't sleeping.
He knew there was fighting in Paris,
but that's not what was keeping him awake.
He had fled the police, but he sensed another danger
against which he felt powerless.
As soon as they arrived, Cosette had retired to her bedroom.
She refused to have dinner.
"Beloved... To England...
Will die if I lose you."
Finally!
Does Miss Fauchelevent live here?
What do you want from her?
None of your business.
I need to see her.
You're bringing her a letter?
Can't you tell?
From the student?
You know Mr. Marius?
Yes, he's a friend.
I have to give it to her.
She's asleep now.
Give it to me, I'll give it to her tomorrow.
Tomorrow's today.
There might be a reply.
Give it to me, I'll wake her up.
Hurry up, I have to go back to the barricade.
Barricade?
What do you think we do while you're all sleeping?
I'm waiting.
"My Beloved, farewell. I'm going to die with my friends.
When the sun rises, my soul will be near you."
Marius.
What if he kept the letter?
The man would die and she would never know. Ever.
He only had to let it be.
"You'll forget him and I'll keep you."
I think I fell asleep. ls the young woman awake?
There's a reply, but I'll take it myself. Lead me there.
It could be our last morning,
Enjolras.
- Any regrets?
- No.
Not of dying, but of killing.
Leave the officer for me.
What a shame to kill this young man.
He could be your brother.
He is.
Aim... Fire!
Soldiers, let's take this out.
Forward! To your bayonets!
Let's go, firemen!
- To your bayonets!
- Aim!
Fire!
- Don't step back!
- Hurry, it's started, over there.
Fire!
Cease-fire!
- Victory!
- Long live the Republic!
Another one of these victories and we'll run out of bullets!
It is said that Gavroche heard that sentence.
I was born in Nanterre,
'Tis the fault of Voltaire;
And not in Palaiseau
'Tis the fault of Rousseau.
Gavroche!
We have to change the Ministry,
'Tis the fault of Voltaire;
The cops and the dogs
'Tis the fault of Rousseau.
Come back!
Soldiers exaggerate,
'Tis the fault of Voltaire;
The sparrows are to blame,
'Tis the fault of Rousseau.
I'm not an owner,
'Tis the fault of Voltaire;
I'm a little bird,
'Tis the fault of Rousseau.
I have fallen to the earth,
'Tis the fault of Voltaire;
With my nose in the gutter
'Tis the fault of...
I got hit! Take the bullets.
Let's go!
- He's dead.
- Give him to me.
- Let's put him near the others.
- Where?
This way.
- What about Prouvaire?
- Taken prisoner.
Aim...
To France!
To the future!
It's Prouvaire.
Your friends have just been shot.
The last one alive will break your head.
- You want me to do it?
- You?
Yes.
- Do you know him?
- Yes.
If you don't mind,
I'll take him outside.
Do as you will.
Your situation is no better than mine.
You, here. It figures.
Get up.
Take your revenge.
You go first.
Attention!
At the ready!
A clasp-knife. You're right, that suits you better.
There, you're free.
There's a palisade at the end of the street. Go that way.
And if I come out alive, you'll find me
7, Rue de I'Homme Armé.
I don't understand.
You never understood anything.
So...
Aim!
Fire!
Reload!
Let's go, firemen!
To the bayonets!
Let's go! Forward!
- Fire!
- Bayonets!
Don't back down!
Don't back down!
No mercy!
Inside the wine shop!
Let's go inside the wine shop!
Go, go!
Axes! Bring axes!
Tear down the door!
- No more bullets. What do we do?
- Quick, the bottles!
Line up!
Wait!
I'm one of them.
You can't leave without me.
- Who are you?
- No one.
Aim...
Fire!
Stand down.
JEWELRY
During the first riots, the generous citizens had opened the prison doors.
Along with the innocents, the worst bandits came out.
Well, there!
This is my home.
I've been robbed.
Take him to the barracks!
I'm not a revolutionary.
I'm an honest man.
My hands are clean.
They don't smell like gunpowder.
- We'll see.
- Watch out, shots fired!
Well, this is bad.
A riot strengthens the government it doesn't topple.
It tests the Army, concentrates the bourgeoisie, stretches the muscles of the police.
We only have to track the survivors.
Some might have fled through the sewers.
But where will they go?
In 15 minutes, all the exits will be covered.
The Army has patrols at each collection point.
If fugitives go up the sewer lines, they'll end up in the Catacombs.
No one ever came out of there.
If they go down, they'll end up at the Seine.
Good.
Congratulations to our friend Javert for escaping the insurrection.
But take care of closing the gates yourself and have them under surveillance.
Yes, sir, don't worry. We'll catch them or they'll die like rats.
At the center of the city,
Jean Valjean had escaped the city.
He went from daylight to darkness,
from uproar to silence.
From thunderous explosions to stagnant tomb.
The labyrinth had a thread: its slope.
Following the slope would lead to the river, to salvation.
Did you hear that?
Something's moving over there.
Hey, over there! We're the 6th line.
Sergeant Lachenal, 24th patrol.
You should be more careful.
You almost fired at us.
- We saw something.
- A rat?
You had too much to drink, right?
Chief...
Good golly!
I know now why the cops are after you.
That's great work.
And you called me a bandit!
Nasty word.
So, good deal?
Don't touch.
Don't touch!
You're too strong. You're hurting me.
You're looking for the exit?
I have a master key.
- How?
- Look, the key to freedom.
But you have to share.
All right. But you can't leave your big shot here.
Throw him in the Seine.
- I'll do it.
- You need help?
- No.
- Selfish man.
I already told you
I was your prisoner, but first let me take him to his house.
Marius Pontmercy is one of their leaders.
He belongs to the military justice.
- He already paid for it.
- But he's not dead.
Here. He had this on his person.
"Please carry my body to my grandfather's, Mr. Gillenormand,
Rue des Filles du Calvaire, number 25."
Summon a hackney coach!
What is it?
What is it?!
- Mr. Gillenormand?
- Yes.
We're bringing him his grandson.
Mr. Marius!
Lay him there.
Dear God!
What happened to him?
He went to the barricade.
We're bringing him back.
Marius! My son!
He let himself be killed at the barricade through hatred of me.
Go fetch the doctor, you idiot!
He did it against me.
That's the way in which he returns to me.
Woe of my life! He's dead!
No, he's not dead.
After you.
Marius, Marius!
Son, you're alive!
He's alive.
Grant me one thing more.
Let me go home for a moment.
Then do with me what you please.
7 Rue de I'Homme Armé.
Wait for me, it won't take long.
One moment.
Why did you save my life this morning?
You don't know why?
No.
I Pity you.
Jean Valjean wanted to tell Cosette
that nothing could prevent her happiness
if the man she loved recovered from his injuries.
The street was empty.
Javert was gone.
Life had regained its course.
Hope and love were regaining their place.
At Mr. Gillenormand, grandfather and grandson had made peace,
and every afternoon, they received the same visitors.
Aren't they adorable, the both of them?
Everything would be so much better if I could know.
Know what?
My memory is fuzzy.
Someone was carrying me.
We were in the dark.
Who is this man who saved me and wants to remain anonymous?
The wedding was the following day.
What happened? Are you hurt?
I cut myself while chopping wood.
You know how clumsy I am.
Clumsy? You? Let me see.
It's nothing. I'll tend to it myself.
L...
Sick and feverish after his injury,
Jean Valjean was unable to be present for the ceremony.
I'm late.
You'll be all alone.
Are you sad?
We'll come see you tomorrow.
Am I beautiful?
Very beautiful.
- Are you happy?
- Very happy.
Well, then, laugh!
"You hold my hand when I walk in the shade
And the rays of light come from your eyes." if I were King, I'll give my kingdom, my scepter and my people
On their knees to feel your eyes on me, Cosette.
- I'm not Cosette anymore.
- Who are you?
My name is Marius, Mrs. Marius.
Come in!
Sir! I'll let the Mademoiselle-- I mean the Madame-- know you're here.
Don't disturb her, Toussaint.
I wish to talk to Mr. Pontmercy.
Good morning.
Cosette will be glad to see you're better.
Your absence yesterday surprised us.
- Please, sit down.
- No, thank you.
I wanted to tell you something.
I'm an ex-convict.
I didn't hurt my hand.
I was never in pain.
I pretended to be hurt so
I wouldn't have to sign anything, so as not to commit a forgery.
What does this mean?
I spent 19 years at the galleys and was then sentenced to them for life for a second offense--in absentia.
I am an escaped convict, and my name is Jean Valjean.
I've had doubts for a while now.
Something awful was hiding behind you.
But I was afraid.
I kept my eyes closed.
Why are you telling me this today?
Because Cosette told me we would live as a family, and I can't belong to any family.
For her sake, as long as she only had me in her life,
I had to accept the danger of my presence.
Now, I gave her to you.
She's happy.
I hope so, at least.
I need to vanish from her life.
I'm only asking for your promise that she won't know a thing.
I promise.
Thank you.
I have one last favor to ask of you.
May I come see her every now and then?
I got her when she was little, and you probably understand how one can love a child.
Even a man like me.
I could stop by while I'm in the area, say hello to her.
I don't think that's a good idea.
Each time you'd come here,
I would be worried about her.
It's better if she forgets about you.
But for many years,
I was all she had.
I'm afraid that, if she doesn't see me at all, she won't understand and will be very unhappy.
You don't believe so?
You think that for her, everything that isn't love has ceased to exist?
Where are they?
Father! You're here.
No one told me.
I came to bid you farewell, my child.
Farewell?
- I'm leaving for England tomorrow.
- Again with England?
I abhor England! It wishes to keep me away from my loved ones.
He's been wanting to go there for a while.
But now that you're rid of me, you shall take advantage.
You'll be able to travel.
I'm planning on settling there forever.
Forever? Impossible.
You'll die of boredom over there.
I heard that it's always raining.
- Will you write us?
- Of course.
Father was afraid of your opposition.
Me? Why?
Just a thought.
Madame is served.
Madame...
Well, I'll leave you too alone.
Farewell, Cosette.
"Farewell"? Goodbye!
Goodbye.
Pity for the unfortunate, but indulgence for the fortunate.
An old woman with rheumatism
and nothing else to do but look out her window,
noticed the strange outings of a man
who seemed to be getting older before her very eyes.
Cosette!
Marius was obsessed with the thought
of that man who saved his life
but had never come forth.
The person is waiting.
"Monsieur le Baron...
If the Supreme Being had endowed me with talents,
I might have been Baron Thénard, member of the Institute, but I am not so.
I merely bear the same name as he.
I am also in possession of a secret concerning a person.
This person concerns you.
I await in the anteroom.
Respectfully, Thénard."
Thénard.
Could you give me a moment?
- This person... is it a woman?
- No.
Let him in.
I've had the honor to meet Monsieur le Baron.
I believe it was at the Countess of Bagration's.
I don't know Madame Bagration.
Ah? Then it must have been at Châteaubriands.
I know him very well.
He's very affable.
And?
Monsieur le Baron didn't read my letter?
I have a secret to sell you.
What secret?
Monsieur le Baron, you have in your house a robber and assassin.
In my house? No.
Assassin and robber.
I'm not speaking of long-forgotten facts which might be erased by prescription.
I'm speaking of recent facts, still unknown to justice.
This man has crept into your confidence, and almost into your family, under a false name.
I'll tell you his real name, and tell it to you for nothing.
His name is Jean Valjean.
I know it.
But what you don't know is that he's an ex-convict.
I know it.
Monsieur le Baron surprises me.
But you can see that I'm well informed.
But what I have to tell you is known by myself alone.
It is an extraordinary secret.
I'll sell it for 20,000 francs.
I know that secret as I know the others.
10,000 francs and I'll talk.
You have nothing to tell me.
Still, I must have dinner tonight.
I know everything, even your name.
That's not difficult, I had the honor of writing it to you. Thénard...
- ...dier.
- What?
- Thénardier.
- Thénardier?
Also known as Jondrette, the poet Alvares, Fabantou the actor.
Father of Eponine and Gavroche.
You hurt me there.
I lost my oldest daughter, my poor little boy.
They died for the Republic.
Monsieur le Baron, you're right,
I am Thénardier.
See? I know as much as you do.
Jean Valjean is a robber. He was sent to the galleys for robbery.
A small robbery, I must add.
Still, Jean Valjean is a robber and an assassin.
- Explain yourself.
- That's easy.
On June 6th, the day of the riots,
I, for personal reasons, unconnected with politics, was hiding in the sewer.
- The sewer?
- That leads to the Seine.
Sometimes, circumstances lead an honest man to step into... dirty water.
And I saw someone I knew well;
I had met him a few times.
- It was our man.
- Jean Valjean?
Himself. And he wasn't alone.
He was carrying someone on his back.
A young man covered in blood.
A flagrant case of assassination, were there ever one.
The robbery was the motive for the crime, of course.
That young man didn't have any money.
Come on!
Jean Valjean offered me half of what he'd taken out of the young man's pockets for me to let him out.
He's a man of terrible strength;
I couldn't refuse him.
You came to accuse a man; you have justified him.
Mr. Thénardier, you are a scoundrel!
- The word is strong.
- I saw you in action.
But I have a debt to repay that you know nothing of.
Maybe you've never even deserved it.
You want to go to America.
Come back tomorrow,
I'll give you what you need.
Thank you, Monsieur le Baron, but I don't understand.
I don't ask you to understand,
I ask you to get out.
As you please, Monsieur le Baron.
- You said tomorrow, right?
- Get out!
We should have him taken to the hospital.
He doesn't have any servants.
I can't always watch after him,
I have to mind my lodge.
Too late for the hospital.
He's a worn-down old man who must have lost someone close to his heart.
One dies of this condition.
Will you come back, Doctor?
I'd rather it be someone else...
Father! You're ill!
Why didn't you say anything?
It is you, my child; you came.
How nice of you, my little girl.
You came too?
Please forgive me.
Now I know everything, and so does she.
Come with us, you'll be happy.
We'll never leave you again.
I'll come to get you tomorrow morning.
It's too late now.
No, it's not too late.
Don't cry, my child.
I was so worried I wouldn't see you again, and then you came.
I'm so happy.
Do you remember Montfermeil and the wood?
When I took your bucket and held your hand for the first time?
And the large doll?
You know it is still here?
And the convent, when you put cherries on your ears?
My child, the moment has arrived to tell you your mother's name.
It was Fantine.
Remember this name-- Fantine.
She knew as much misery as you have known happiness.
She loved you dearly, and she suffered terribly.
My children...
I must confess, Marius... that I did not always like you... and I ask your forgiveness.
Love each other dearly and always.
Because in the end, only one thing matters in this world:
Love.
Love.
Take these two candlesticks with you.
I hope the man who gave them to me is satisfied with me.
I have done what I could.
Another thing:
Don't forget that I'm a poor man, and when I'm gone, have me buried under a simple stone, no name on it.
That is my will.
You're here, my child. I'm happy.
He sleeps. Although his fate was very strange, he lived.
He died when he had no longer his angel.
The thing came to pass simply, of itself,
as the night comes when day is gone.
THE END
VIENNA 1906
- You're late.
- I took two cabs to be safe.
No. First make sure
I wasn't followed.
No one. The street's empty.
Anyone can hide in a carriage entrance.
I'm sure he suspects.
You're only happy in love first it's coupled with fear.
Anyway, he can't be jealous of me. not special at me.
He said to take a married woman as a mistress.
- He did?
- Yes.
- It's better since it doesn't last.
- He gives dreadful advice.
We've been seeing each other for a year.
That's right.
A year exactly.
The masked ball at the Opera.
The two masks which met that night...
- You!
- Sorry. Only me.
Husbands ring bells more imperiously.
As you'll soon find out.
- Any more tomfoolery?
- No. I came for you.
- She's still here?
- Yes. And late. Out you go.
Don't forget the lads' night out!
- It was...
- Your pal, Theo. I know.
Every time you find him, stay in bad mood with me.
I'm not sulking.
Of course not.
But when you look out the window,
I know what you're thinking.
You hate waiting here for me instead of drinking with your pals.
I'm a married woman.
Single women are more fun.
- You hate me for your unhappiness.
- Untrue.
Maybe these two masks should never have been found.
But what's done is done.
Too bad for you.
You're mine.
Here's Theo! Where's Franz?
He'll join us later.
He's busy.
He's studying the Battle of Austerlitz.
A battle that always puts him in a foul mood.
He needs a new battle.
Gentlemen, the usual conditions.
Anyone who doesn't bed a woman pays for the champagne in the mess.
- Agreed? 
- Closed! Big deal!
Three lemonades, right?
Alcohol gives me heartburn.
Three lemonades.
- Did you write this waltz?
- Yes. Well, almost.
I found the motif.
But another man used it.
As always.
It's the last time.
No one treads on my toes!
- Christine, waltz with me.
- No treading on toes now!
Mizzie!
She's right. I compose waltzes but dance them badly.
I'll lead.
Excuse us, won't you?
- Found mine!
- I saw her first.
No fighting over girls, only betting.
That's the rule.
Six.
Evens.
Nine.
Evens.
Mademoiselle, please... would give me the honor of this waltz? 
It's impossible. 
I was invited. 
- By whom? 
- This gentleman asked first.
I send optic telegrams.
They're faster.
May I?
It's not me.
The orchestra is too fast.
It should go...
Women! 
Betray me until in music.
Henceforth I'll be fierce:
Eye for eye, tooth for tooth.
- Watch it, will you?
- Excuse me.
- Bravo!
- Outstanding!
Let's close our eyes and go.
Why?
Mizzie isn't worthy of being your relation.
- She's outrageous. Come.
- Is that an order?
A prayer.
Christine, we're almost engaged.
"Almost, almost."
With you, it's always almost.
Well, I'm almost sure
I don't want to marry you.
Christine!
You're sad from tip to toe.
On Sundays with you, my parasol becomes an umbrella.
I'm 20.
I want to have fun, like Mizzie.
Go on then. Lift your skirts and dance with the dragoons.
But I will not sit at the same table.
Are you coming?
One, two...
So be it.
Adieu, Christine.
Another argument?
A lover's tiff. He'll be back.
You don't know civilians.
They can't argue for fun.
They always take it seriously.
If you'll excuse me.
Hello and goodbye. I promised
I'd come, but now I'm leaving.
I've just found two girls.
What about the other one?
Whatever. I want to be alone.
Amazing! Always he is with that woman, stay in bad mood.
I can't break up with her.
We should be banned from married women.
Forget her. Look.
Pretty girls, eh?
It's easy. Listen again.
One star, 2nd lieutenant.
Two stars, lieutenant.
Three stars, Captain.
And what's four stars?
General?
No idea. I've never met a superior officer.
This is Lieutenant Franz Lobeimer.
Miss...
Mizzie Schlager.
Mizzie Schlager and Miss...
Christine Weiring.
Christine has love problems.
Waiter, a bottle of Tokay!
Ask her to dance.
- Maybe latter.
- Silly!
The best way to forget a man is to dance with another.
- Dance with me now then.
- Why?
So you don't forget me too quickly.
Serious love problems?
I don't have love or problems.
Then you need seeing to.
You don't have to try to cheer me up.
You want to be alone?
Well, so do I.
So let's just pretend to be together.
Then we'll both close our doors.
- Goodnight, Miss.
- Goodnight.
Is she blonde or brunette?
No peeking through the keyhole.
May I come in?
For a second. No more.
Just to ask the time.
Five to eleven. Why?
I have a rendezvous at the Opera at eleven-thirty.
Young or old?
Neither. With my father.
- I shall escort you.
- No. I can go alone.
- Please don't bother. 
- Yes, but I insist.
- I must go.
- I'll come too.
No bother. It's on my way.
Must I stay here all alone?
Not at all.
You're on my way too!
- You don't know where I live.
- No matter.
All paths lead to mine tonight.
To yours? Out of the question.
Just see me at home.
Your silence is due to one of two things.
Either I bore you or you have a headache.
Let's say it's a headache.
Really? I have just you need.
- A pill? 
- No.
No. Eau de Cologne. You'll see.
I'm sure it will go soon.
- Is it a headache or not? 
- Yes
Then let me.
First take your hat off.
I'm too kind, caring for a man who wakes me every morning.
- I wake you every morning?
- Yes, with your horses and bagres.
As you leave the barracks with your horses and bugles.
Really, make quite a noise.
- The window that slams with anger is you? - It's me!
Delighted to meet you.
- What if I promise to behave?
- I can't.
Not even for champagne?
The one you'd win?
How do you know that?
I wasn't born yesterday.
The bet has never changed.
Never mind.
Then I'll walk you home.
- You promise to behave?
- I swear.
Then I accept.
But no more than five minutes.
Wait me here for a second.
Good evening, lieutenant.
Forgotten your key again?
Yes. I was late.
- I was with the Minister.
- A serious situation?
- Very.
- Jesus, Mary and Joseph!
Their policcies! Their policcies keep me awakeeat night
Tell me everything, lieutenant.
I won't repeat a word.
The balance of Europe is threatened.
- Like the other night?
- Exactly.
Turkey's fault again!
The Sublime Gate is all trouble.
That Sublime Gate!
Open, closed, open, closed...
Good job, we keep watch.
Good.
I hope there'll be no complications.
- None. The Diplomacy fix all.
- Great Diplomacy!
You don't imagine what the Diplomacy can make.
It gives me creeps!
To think the people haven't a clue!
It's the first time I've been alone with a captain.
At night too!
It seems funny.
Not captain.
2nd lieutenant.
Is that higher or lower?
At night, it's sometimes higher.
Here. I feel better.
Keep it.
It'll be a souvenir for me.
For you? How's that?
Every time I count my handkerchiefs,
I'll think of you, of course.
We're here.
Is your father often at the Opera?
Yes, every night and on Sunday afternoons.
- He's a music lover?
- No. A cellist.
Opera is silly because things never happen like that in real life.
Tonight is Romeo and Juliet.
I could have gone.
But they die in the end.
I hate sad endings.
- Good night.
- Don't curse me tomorrow morning.
It's Papa who curses.
He hates brass instruments!
- And you?
- Me? I try to accustom.
- See you in the morning.
- See you.
- Joseph didn't escort you?
- No.
- Where was this night?
- The trumpets are very high.
A 2nd lieutenant saw me here.
Is that bad?
Only if you hid something from me.
I'm all you have left.
What did this 2nd lieutenant say?
He said very little.
But he's very handsome and he dances so well.
Did you dance a lot?
Not once all evening.
But I'm sure he dances well.
Then draw.
- What?
- Mizzie and I, Christine and you.
Not exactly.
I'll tell you later.
Christine.
I came to apologise for last night.
- I was stupid.
- You weren't.
Yes, I was.
Stupid, ludicrous and boring.
I realised later.
But it's all over now.
Today, your sweetheart is ready to laugh, dance, stop getting angry and never speak ill of Mizzie.
So, you don't hate me?
Not any more.
You love me?
I adore you!
- Truly?
- Yes. Truly, truly!
If you knew how happy I am this morning.
Bugler, signal 1 st Platoon!
- Did you kiss her?
- No.
But the moon was magnificent.
Did she put on airs?
No. I didn't try.
He is the shame of this regiment!
A nice girl, no strings attached...
You know her?
No, but I asked Mizzie.
They're made for us and we for them.
As long as it doesn't last.
- How is with the baroness? 
- I don't know more.
The first 6 months were like a week.
Now a week is like 6 months.
You must break it off.
An affair with no more love is worse than when love and ends.
2nd Platoon, ready to charge!
Forward!
We don't have ribbon to match your hat.
So, keep looking, miss.
Well?
We didn't talk much.
He had a headache.
The best cure is a kiss.
No. Not with him.
He's a bit arrogant at first, but is only charm.
Who told you?
Theo. Last night.
See, I thought of you.
- And the ribbon, Miss?
- I'm looking, Madam.
Let's go out all together.
And Joseph?
He swore on his own head
I'd love him one day.
He can wait.
We all end up marrying Josephs.
I'm not silly. Come here to talk of Franz.
He didn't even ask for a date.
I bet you're already a tad in love with him.
Mizzie, love doesn't come so fast.
It depends.
Mine comes on a gust of wind.
And usually disappears the same way.
Miss!
I'm sorry, we have no matching ribbon.
But you have it in your hand!
So I do!
- Are you seeing Theo tonight?
- Tomorrow. He's on duty tonight.
- Could you take me the ribbon?
- Coming.
Goodbye.
Is it your first serious break-up?
Yes.
It's as easy as saying hello.
Start by telling her she was the love of your life.
That works like chloroform.
The rest is painless.
Lansky'll make us late.
They wait for us at 10 am.
He must be admiring his new star.
Here he is.
Attention!
Enough! The first to call me captain gets two days in the brig.
The big advantage of being captain:
No more dancing with the colonel's daughters!
It's a sweet pleasure for the satisfaction of you, lieutenants! 
Helena, I need to talk to you.
Hush. Later. He's watching.
I'd like to ask your wife to dance, but she doesn't have eyes for me.
Your young protégé is a fine dancer.
Startling! That lieutenant has danced twice in a row with the baroness while your daughters are wallflowers!
- The colonel's daughters, dear!
- Mama!
Silence!
I've something to say.
- I know. You're going to tell me how unhappy you are. - Yes.
You're sick of waiting hours for me and things must change. wonderful! Brilliant!
Things will change.
Tomorrow a new life begins.
- A new life?
- Yes.
My husband is going to Salzburg for 2 weeks.
During 15 days I will at your home every night.
I can't believe our good fortune.
Excuse me.
Every night I'll be waiting for you.
Is only close the curtains and make account we are in Venice or Florence.
Two weeks, Franz, is an eternity.
The first few days at least.
Helena, you are the love of my life.
I hope so. You are too.
Tomorrow. Yours. 7 pm.
This season at the Opera we have Caruso...
My dear, accord me this waltz.
And dance it with our good friend Wiemel.
You can no longer accuse me of being jealous.
Franz, I'm a friend of the family and yet you tell me nothing.
What is it? Heartbreak?
Certainly not...
- Hidden Love? 
- No.
Of course it is.
The colonel isn't dissatisfied with you, but he think you very close, very secret. 
Even leaving enough with your friends.
Perhaps. But I'm planning on changing things.
Soon, you won't recognise me.
Naturally, you'll declare your love.
Not tonight. I'll bide my time.
It will never come.
It will happen very soon than you imagine.
And if I told my husband?
He wouldn't believe you.
His distrust won't let him believe a thing.
How was it, painless?
- I split the manoeuvre in two.
- Bad strategy!
Tomorrow at 7 am she goes to my home. 
Everything will be finished at 7:30.
Come. Nothing like a waltz to clear the mind.
You haven't danced with me once.
And you leave tomorrow for 2 weeks.
I wouldn't leave you.
I'd like you to accompany me.
Out of the question.  
I don't like of improvised travels.
- You always said the opposite.
- I've changed my mind.
- What could keep you in Vienna?
- Nothing.
- Then this is a caprice.
- Perhaps.
The change is your caprice in the morning.
Don't count on it, dear.
Mr Franz, madam left with sir for Salzburg.
A last-minute decision.
Mr Franz will understand, I hope?
Thanks, Emille.
Thirteen.
Good evening.
Fourteen.
Her leaving surprises me.
She said she'd stay in Vienna.
What could have happened?
Don't ask. As Napoleon said:
"In love, the only victory is flight".
Your victory is double, you flee and she takes the train.
- I just pocketed all. 
- Ok.
- You win.
- And pay, as usual.
Coming, free man?
I've an idea for tomorrow.
Leave it to me.
A threepenny lovers' waltz
It's only sung in spring
And often though to the end
I vow to you, my love
To love you for evermore
Wherever the wind comes from
So this is a fine song
Every ball has its lovers
Its threepenny lovers
That it watches as they dream
while dancing cheek to cheek
But all that's left in winter
Just an air weeping on the wind
The love of the threepenny lovers.
Sorry, the door was open.
Come in. The lesson's over.
When's your audition?
Never, probably.
Papa can't decide to ask.
But you're not ready yet!
Why don't you addmit, daddy?
You are an opera musician... but have preconceptions with theater.
Preconceptions, I?
And conservative too?
I'll ask for your audition tomorrow.
So no more of it.
Going for a pic-nic?
Yes.
And I'd like to invite Christine.
Just the two of you?
I won't lie.
There'll be four of us.
But they're serious boys.
Christine, do you want to go?
I ought to say no.
Really want to go?
- My darling Papa!
- Quickly. Go and get dressed.
There.
Walk so I can see.
More relaxed.
Swing your hips.
Not too much.
Oh no, Mizzie!
What?
What's got into you?
Next to you, I'll look a lump.
If you leave me alone with him, it will be worse.
The other day, he barely spoke.
You are silly!
I show you what to do when you're alone.
Firstly, know what type he likes.
Between us, men are totally stupid.
You sit next to me, on the grass.
You raise your hem.
Not too much. We hide our legs to make him want to see them.
First try the shy type.
Good. Now turn them towards me.
In admiration.
Admiration, I said.
Ecstasy, even.
Men always believe it's true.
And if he still says nothing?
Then change the type.
A vague look.
Sigh a little.
Naturally, if he asks, you say your life is very complicated.
Try another one again.
A wasp comes. You gasp...
I said gasp, not shriek.
Look at him.
With your eyes closed, of course.
And?
If he doesn't kiss you, the Austrian army is finished!
Now let's hurry.
What's your promise?
To be home before dark.
- Goodbye, Mizzie.
- Goodbye, Mr Weiring.
Joys of nature, my foot!
Brambles, thistles, creepy-crawlies...
And yet, I'd still come again next Sunday.
How silly women are!
Your friend is nice, but she puts on airs.
And I did explain it all.
Christine, what's on your mind?
Many things.
Under this simple exterior, my life is so complicated.
Why don't you talk everything to me?
There's no point...
You would not understand.
Oh, a wasp!
A wasp!
They don't need us any more.
No. Leave me alone.
Behind your ear.
Where have they gone?
What do you expect?
Summer, the day, sweet grass...
Why do you lie to me?
Me?
Passing yourself off for something you're not.
So you'll be interested in me.
And because Mizzie was here.
It was a joke.
But now we're alone, it's different.
I should go home.
There's an idea!
Why?
I was stupid.
Now you'll always see me as stupid.
I know.
Mizzie!
I ought to say goodbye to her.
Theo!
I'll look that way.
Theo!
Don't answer.
- What?
- Christine's going. We argued.
Idiot, I said to use feeling.
Much feeling. 
As the rulebook says:
The rest will follow.
Have you two finished conspiring?
Try a boat for some Sunday romance.
They believe all you say on water.
Roll up for boat hire!
It's a lovely day for a boat trip.
This way, lovers, for your photo.
A souvenir photo, Christine?
Souvenir of what?
A day lost?
Come on, ladyes and gentlemen, take a boat trip.
- A perfect pose!
- Rowers, this way, please!
Ladies, my rowboats await.
Absolutely charming.
Good. Stay still.
A nice smile...
- Smile, Christine.
- It's not that easy!
No arguing.
Wasted days often leave us the best memories.
How can I take a photo if you don't smile?
Christine, don't poke fun at me, but I'm falling in love with you.
Wonderful!
That's not true.
Will be a beautiful photo.
Collect it in an hour, after a little boat trip.
A rowboat?
This way, please.
Souvenir photos!
Have your photo taken!
Wait.
I'll find you my nicest rowboat!
Love comes on slowly.
You think you're acting but it becomes real.
It has happened with you, Christine.
It's bad, what you're doing, Franz.
What's bad?
Say these things for the girls, so they'll lose their heads.
For you officers, it's just a passing game.
But beware, Franz.
For... although I know you're lying...
I'm just as silly as the others.
Christine.
I'd hate you afterwards.
Please don't cry.
It's nothing.
It's true I told you sweet nothings.
But you were false, too, earlier.
So we're quits.
I suggest we both be honest.
Only the truth. Promise?
- I promise.
- Cross your heart?
And hope to die.
You start.
Tell me the truth about your headache the other day.
I bet it was a woman running round inside. Was it?
A storm's brewing.
It's so muggy.
Let's sit awhile.
Your turn to tell me the truth.
Tell me about your love life.
No.
- It's a pity.
- What is?
That we started off by being fake.
Now, if we really liked each other... we wouldn't dare admit it.
Papa will be worried.
I've never come home so late.
Keep the cab. I'll walk back.
- Goodnight.
- See you tomorrow.
A drop of rain.
They say that lovers who are rained on during their first walk will love each other for ever.
Christine,
I want to promise something.
Promise nothing.
Between us, what will be will be.
I swear I'll ask nothing of you.
There. It's raining.
Now we'll love each other for ever.
See you tomorrow.
Don't forget me by then, lieutenant.
There you are!
Come over here.
I wont let my qdagter ot so late ith an oold persono
Explain yourself.
I've nothing to explain, Papa.
I'm happy. So happy.
If only you knew.
Tell me about it.
Tell me about it.
2nd-lieutenant, you are late!
Sorry, captain.
Idiot! Have a box for you.
Was brought... by two girls who find us charming.
We reciprocate, since it's the day after the first Sunday.
The second Sunday will be good too.
The third will seem long.
And the fourth may be the last.
We're not there yet.
Look, a message.
Signed Christine. It's not a hat but a messenger pigeon!
"I sewed up the lining,
"as it looked a little worn."
The needle and thread are the first tools of marriage.
So beware.
Sentiment, sure.
Enough to forget the Baroness.
But nothing more. Understood?
Yes, lieutenant.
Run to the florist and have 12 roses sent to 34 Schubertgasse.
Red roses, naturally, because she believe yet in the language of flowers.
I'm a fool.
I can't dance, can't send flowers and can't talk to women.
He didn't speak much either.
And we haven't danced together once.
I finally understand crimes of passion.
I'll be on page 3 of the newspaper.
Christine, I love you.
Love fades and we feel better.
- Will your love fade?
- I meant you.
For me...
At least I have music.
Exactly! Work on your opera again.
You're very talented, Joseph.
If I were, it would be known.
No. I'll write my waltzes that others steal.
It's my destiny! My own destiny!
Poor Joseph,
I hate seeing you sad.
Come on, give a little kiss on my face, let's go?
I don't want charity.
Be brave. Don't hurt my feelings.
Let's go, give me a kiss.
- It's our 3rd anniversary.
- How's that?
Our third Sunday.
Mizzie told me yesterday.
But since I met you, every day is Sunday.
Franz!
Franz, quick. There's an echo.
- Franz!
- Christine!
- I swear...
- I'll love you...
For ever!
Don't laugh, Franz.
Hear that murmur?
That's all the oaths of love shouted before ours.
The echo never forgets.
Only true lovers can hear them.
I'm exausted.
I'm so happy.
And hungry.
I could eat a mountain of cakes!
You choose.
I'll order the coffees.
Wait in the carriage.
- Already back?
- This morning.
I sent Emily to your place earlier.
But two weeks ago I...
A long time, isn't it?
Helena, I've something to say.
Go ahead.
Not here. I'm with friends.
Thank you.
- Franz, could you speak about this?
- What?
Who was the lady in black?
I don't remember of dresses.
The woman with whom was talking.
In Vienna, officers know all ladies.
This year, they're wearing black.
In the street, we confuse them all.
It seems that recognize this.
Christine, I thank that no do any questions.
- Do I ask you questions?
- You could.
But I don't.
Here. Drink your coffee.
- What did you do this morning?
- Same as yesterday.
I have no secrets.
Neither do I.
Actually, I do.
A very big secret.
Just one.
You, Christine.
I've forgotten everything from before.
The lady in black is nobody.
Do you believe me, Christine?
The day I stop believing you will be the end of the world.
Franz?
Hello? Is that you?
Don't you recognise my voice?
I'm calling from the barracks.
I am replacing an official until tomorrow.
Of course it's true.
Gotta be quick, understand.
Give me another date.
Tomorrow night, my place.
I'll be on duty at the Opera.
Arrange something.
I demand an explanation.
Listen...
No. I won't wait another day.
I said, tomorrow night, in my place.
Hello, Wiemel.
You wanted to talk?
Yes and no. It depends.
- On whom?
- On you.
When one hears something regarding a married friend, there are two ways to be ignoble.
Tell him everything, or tell him nothing.
What you recommend me?
Speak.
2nd Lieutenant Lobeimer lives behind St Michael's Chapel.
Number 17.
Continue.
As fate would have it,
I was just passing by...
No. It is too shameful.
Continue.
- You won't believe me.
- I said continue!
What is it, dear?
Feeling unwell?
I have a headache.
You'll have to go to the Opera without me.
That would be regrettable.
The Emperor will come and our friends will be there tonight.
Anyone can get a headache.
Perhaps. But on some nights it's most regrettable.
Don't insist, please.
And do not be late because of me, it would never forgive me.
Then rest well, dear.
I'll look in on you after the performance.
Did you have a good trip?
Excellent. But I'm happy to be back among friends.
I trust we'll still see you often at the house.
Certainly.
How about dinner tomorrow?
I'm already booked.
The day after tomorrow?
I'll be on duty then.
I refuse to be beaten.
We'll talk again.
These are the best seats.
We can see the actors in the wings.
We can see Papa, too.
He looks so excited.
He was so nervous before leaving,
I had to tie his bowtie.
Look.
Silly things. They're looking for us on the wrong side.
The ladies below have such funny hairdos.
But after the show, the boys will meet the ladies above.
- Looking for someone?
- The lady in black I told you about.
Don't. Thinking about people makes them come back.
Anyway, all men have a lady in black in their memory.
Don't let people see us.
We have free tickets.
They're so silly!
Wait!
Aim well.
If I'm not back before the end, make something up.
I'll see you later.
Great. Go, Don Juan.
But no noise.
The Commander is in the house.
Let me look at you first.
After an absence, one can feel disoriented.
One always hurts the other.
But no matter.
First, we tell each other everything.
In a while, it will be over and tomorrow, forgotten.
I'm glad you take it so lightly.
I do have a lot to tell you.
Impossible.
- You too, perhaps.
- No. You first.
Go on, I'm listening.
Was it one or several?
One.
One is a lot.
I prefer many.
Several are easier to forget.
Hold on, I can see her now.
Blonde, petite, blue eyes...
- How do you know?
I told you I have some witch in me.
What is she, a maid, a seamstress, a dancer in the corps de ballet?
No, I print she is the most innocent of creatures. 
Pure as the white of the snow. 
I beg that talk about her with more respect.
Don't tell me you've fallen in love!
Fair enough.
But no more games.
It isn't a game for me.
It's over between us, Helena.
It was, even before I met her.
Before you left Vienna.
Then only I didn't know.
I still hear you on that last day, whispering,
"I love you," in the dark.
One says "I love you" while thinking "I loved you".
The tenses of "love" are easily confused.
Franz...
Listen. I offer you something.
Let's take a one-month break.
Until the Emperor's Ball.
Then we'll see who misses whom most.
In the meantime, good luck.
Good luck to you.
But I warn you, until there, already be married.
You're mad.
Maybe.
But it's delightful being mad.
To dream and not know what day of the week it is.
I've never experienced that.
I'm sorry, Helena, but I'm happy.
She doesn't know yet.
I had to say goodbye to you first.
Goodbye and hello. For you'll be my best friend, won't you?
- If you agree?
- You're uncouth and self-centred.
You're just like the rest.
Only you're stupid with it.
But who is she? 
Tell me your name, at least.
She has no name, no money.
All she has is me.
So just have fun with her.
Helena!
Today he's hurting me, but my console is that you will be unhappy.
That was cruel, Franz.
Please forgive me.
Here...
Your letters.
I'll return yours too.
Helena, don't read them.
You must burn them.
You're right.
You'll see later... that the hardest thing is not burn the letters.
It's forgetting them.
This Don Juan... thousand women!
A lot for one man.
Men in his day were different to today's.
Baron Egersdorf'ss carriage!
Hello, is that the Opera?
Can you tell me which act is on?
The last act has just begun.
Thank you.
I must go.
One more minute.
Look at the couple in the mirror.
It saws we so happy together and thought this would be forever.
Now they'll each go their separate ways.
Let's bid them "adieu".
"Adieu", Franz.
"Adieu", Helena.
There.
No. That way.
Will meet you with her now? 
I don't want to lie to you. Yes.
She's lucky.
You like danger, madam.
But you are prudent.
You get your lovers out just in time.
No! No lies. He was here.
And I know who he is. 
He was seen leaving the house.
- I won't discuss this with you.
- You will.
Prove my blindness to me.
Or beg for my forgiveness.
But talk, will you!
With a wife like you,
I can behave like a boor and search everywhere.
You must have letters hidden somewhere.
What's so funny?
There.
Not smiling anymore.
Where could he be?
I told you. At the barracks, calling the roll.
Very well. Let's say he is.
Forever suspicious.
- I know men.
- Here he is!
- How was the roll call?
- Admirable.
Hear how they back each other up!
Christine, when the man who loves to follow behind, check if he has another woman's hair on him or a suspicious scent.
Franz, no listen to her. I will never ask for nothing. 
Not me, Christine. 
We love blindly.
That's how accidents happen.
I want a word with Franz.
You two, run along.
- What a daring! 
- Come on. 
It wasn't painful, was?
Yes, but I've forgotten it now.
It's like I've cleared an obstacle.
And your first act as a free man is to propose Christine in marriage?
Yes, tonight. 
It's a weird way to celebrate the freedom.
She's very dear to me, Theo.
I want Christine.
I want more than a weekend romance.
Don't try to convince me.
I know what you're going to say.
With the wedding I will win the family's fury and the mockery of friends.
But all I care about is Christine.
I am still some years older than you, and if you won't be my Best Man,
I'll beat you.
Respect my grey hair!
- Will you?
- No. You're stupid!
- Repeat that!
- Stupid!
- Will you?
- No. It's stupid.
- Answer me.
- I give up. I accept.
Attention! Lieutenants, your colonel is not happy.
Aren't you ashamed, playing games while two gentle young women await you?
- You'll have a month in the brig!
- Who said you could wear that?
Quiet!
I've something to ask Christine.
I've an announcement too.
- Me first, it's very important!
- No, the mine is more important.
In 2 days, I'm auditioning at the Opera!
But I'm so nervous.
Best cure for nerves is champagne!
Stage fright, like battle fright, is necessary for victory.
If you have it, you'll ve fine.
- Let's drink to success!
- To love!
- Expecting someone?
- No.
Don't open it, then.
Cheers! 
What, Franz?
- What is it?
- Nothing.
Forget it, you're not in!
You can see the light from the street.
Better go answer. 
- Cheers! 
- Cheers! 
Sorry, I don't want bother you. 
No. Be my guest.
- Having a party?
- Just a few friends.
Don't introduce me.
I'll stay only for one question and one reply.
About you and my wife.
Someone saw her coming out of your home.
I thought of asking for your word as an officer, if was guilty.
But you might give it and I'd despise you for it.
I preferred wait and confirm the story of another way. 
I am under his orders, sir.
- Who was it?
- Him.
- Egersdorf?
- He knows.
He knows nothing.
You didn't confess, did you?
He had proof.
My key.
So?
I will have to crossing blades with him.
In two days, no doubt.
Would you and Lansky be my seconds?
Count on us.
- Do we tell the girls?
- No.
I don't want Christine to know.
Let's go in.
What is this?
- Christine, take off this mask. 
- No.
If you can be mysterious, so can we, in our own way.
Music!
- Who was that? 
- Nothing, just a business to resolve.
Christine, take off this mask.
Is it bringing back memories?
Then I will.
From tonight, no more memories.
Only our plans.
What was it you wanted to say earlier?
- Me?
- Yes.
That I love you, Christine.
And will love you all my life.
I can swear to you it now.
Here are the conditions you will demand.
Distance, 20 paces. 
Change of bullets, 3 times.
Of course, as the offended party,
I shoot first.
- It's a real duel?
- Yes.
A real one.
Your conditions are unacceptable.
20 paces is a sure hit.
We'll give the opponent the first shot, but at 30 paces.
We've been told that these conditions are final.
Then all we can do is record them.
- Gentlemen, I won't sign.
- We have no choice.
More can you've done.
I shall return in one hour.
Gentlemen.
- Colonel...
- One second.
I'll see you, but I don't like my hand being forced.
So be brief.
- It's about the duel of Lobeimer. 
- I know you are his second, and?
The Baron has first shot and demands 20 paces only.
It's his right.
I can't admit that one of my officers be afraid to go to fight.
- Lobeimer doesn't know I'm here.
- Then why are you?
- This duel is absurd, sir.
- A duel is never absurd.
This duel haven't sense. 
Lobeimer want to get married.
I know.
He asked for my permission.
I couldn't refuse this to him.
But it pains me.
A dragoon officer with no fortune can't marry without a dowry.
This puts at risk all my rules.
Well sir, if the duel goes ahead, the wedding won't.
I know that.
The Baron is a good shot and keeps a calm head.
I suggest you do the same.
I refuse to second at a murder.
It's a matter of honor.
They say that only blood justify the honor. 
I answer this is an idiot point of view when is an ordinary massacre.
Lieutenant Kaiser, your promotion is compromised.
Expect my resignation tomorrow.
Perfect.
Then you're dismissed.
Hello, sir. I'm Franz Lobeimer.
I've heard all about you.
My daughter talks of you every day.
Come in.
And make yourself comfortable.
- I wanted to talk to her.
- She's not here.
I should be in opera too, where she makes your hearing test, but she was afraid and I was too. 
I had not courage to go there. 
The way was stay calm here alone, on my way.
Let's wait for her together.
Ave Maria
Maiden mild
Oh, listen to a maiden's prayer
For though canst hear tho' from the wild
And thou canst save
Safe may we sleep beneath thy care
Tho' banished, outcast and reviled
O, Maiden hear a maiden's prayer
O, Mother, hear a suppliant child
Do you like music, Franz?
Especially today.
It makes you think of all you could have but never will.
At your age, you can have all you want.
I wish Christine would come back.
I don't know what's got into me.
Never have children. But if you do, don't teach them music.
There she is!
- Well?
- Daddy!
Tell us about it.
Franz, you're here?
- So much happiness in one day!
- Well, tell us everything.
He said, "You can have a big part.
"But I think we'll have good news for you, my child."
- Before to speak he cough? 
- Yes.
- Like this?
- No, like this.
Then you did it!
If he coughed like that, he was holding back to listen.
I must go. I have a lesson to give.
I should be jealousy, because she only worked hard for you, not for me.
Yes, I should be jealousy, but I don't have time.
I start in 3 weeks.
Jot it down so you don't forget.
- In three weeks? 
- In this same day. 
At 8:30, and that night I will revenge of the beautiful ladies. 
I will be on stage and is for me they will look.
Why aren't you writing?
I don't make rendezvous too far ahead.
You're becoming as superstitious as I was.
Since my audition, I no longer more fear of anything.
I trust life.
Franz, I can be famous one day.
Let me say all the silly things I like.
It will be wonderful! 
Because everyone will talk of me and you will be proud.
Tell me you're happy.
Tell me, quickly.
I'm happy, Christine.
Especially happy to be here in your home.
So, here is where you live.
It's my first time here, but it feels like I've been before.
This is exactly how
I imagined your bedroom.
I'd love to live here with you.
It seems so reassuring and peaceful.
Peaceful? Far from it.
We're woken by army bugles every morning!
Your library?
Don't look.
Why not?
Schiller, Shakespeare and a dictionary.
It only goes up to P.
- Who's this chap with glasses?
- Schubert, of course.
Excuse me, Schubert, 
I didn't recognize you. 
That was the day that told me a big lie, remember?
It's true. I didn't know how much
I really loved you.
A big lie that became a small truth.
Our flowers from last Sunday!
They've wilted a little.
We'll pick more next Sunday.
Next Sunday?
You suddenly seem odd.
Won't we go out on Sunday?
It's just that I won't be here.
I must go away tomorrow for a few days.
Where?
It doesn't really matter.
A trip of no importance to see my parents.
Franz, what's wrong?
Nothing, I assure you.
You'll be back, won't you?
You'll be back one day?
Of course I will.
Why such worry?
Because I've never loved before.
And I'll never love again.
It would be dreadful never to see you again.
Franz, answer me. Say something!
Remember the echo?
- "I swear..."
- No.
These words are only for be said once ... but hear all your life.
You change trains in Prague.
There's a connection to Sadowa.
Your parents' carriage will be at the station.
We will have no reason to speaking, only by the lawyers.
There.
Adieu.
Stop pacing up and down.
We need to look calm.
- Good evening.
- Good evening, Franz.
I have a few tips for you.
As he has the first shot, only one thing you can do.
You turn side-on, your weight spread on both legs.
And stay completely immobile.
And remember to wear dress uniform.
No patent leather at sunrise.
It's too shiny.
Cigarette?
One, two, three, four...
It's time.
Gentlemen, are you ready?
- Ready.
- Ready.
And the second shot?
The second shot?
Why doesn't he shoot?
Franz!
My God!
And Christine?
Why aren't you at the Opera?
What's going on?
Out with it.
Listen, Christine.
The holidays are coming...
We'll go away together.
Wherever you wish.
You always dreamt with Florence.
Well, let's go there.
What's wrong?
Has something happened?
Yes.
Franz don't go back. 
He doesn't...
He left a letter?
He departed...
For a long time?
For ever.
He's dead.
This morning, in a duel.
A duel?
Over what?
Tell me, Theo.
You have no right to hide it from me.
Why, Theo?
Why did he fight a duel?
I don't know why.
Why not tell me the truth?
Mizzie, you know. Tell me.
Daddy, why?
Why?
Because of a woman. 
Because of that woman.
Her husband killed him in a duel.
He knew yesterday.
He knew that we might never...
And he left me with a smile.
And this morning... died because of another.
Yet he had sworn to love me always.
He had sworn.
And he died for another.
No. It can't be true.
It's not true!
Then what was I to him?
What was I?
Nothing... nothing...
He spoke of you all the time.
He died thinking of you.
If you want to see him again, come with us to his place.
Now.
Yes...
I want to see him again.
I want to see him again.
See him again...
Historical truth is sometimes stranger than fiction.
James Bowie was an example... literally engraving his name in the story... to become an American legend.
Near the town of Bayou
Sara, Louisiana, 1825.
- Why are you hitting me?
- I am pissed.
Well, control yourself.
You're not doing very well here, Mr. Jim.
I do not know why I'm laughing like that.
I have to wash their clothes.
Come on, Mr. Jim.
It's a good throw of knives.
I can still hear that blade hissing near my ear.
- Mr. Jim, you never miss.
- Of course not.
Truce of chatter. At work.
- So, mom, I win the trip?
- You well deserved it.
I hoped that Rezin would have won.
He already has a city suit.
I have to make you one.
No one in this family can go to New Orleans... having the appearance that you always had.
John, go get my meter.
Change of shirt.
There is 164 dollars here. If
John or Rezin went there...
I would be sure that he would have
100 left on his return. But you?
- Are you going to surprise me?
- I always surprised you, right?
Some things cost money in New Orleans.
Well, do not go near it.
We will not worry about that.
Sell this wood at a good price.
They are clever, these buyers.
They will give you a price for cypress and another for pine.
Have them take the set as it is.
Do not worry about me. I have as much Scottish blood as you.
I wonder. Did not you pay the blacksmith...
$ 30 for a $ 10 rifle?
- I won the turkey shot.
- How much was the turkey?
- Two pieces.
- Mom, measure it quickly.
We must bring this wood to the river.
We? You are now in the presence of James Bowie, businessman.
You can be a businessman once in New Orleans.
Over here, you're still the good for nothing of the family.
It is to the winner that the prize belongs.
- Wait. Measures.
- It will not suit you anyway.
You'll be much smaller once you're done with it.
Maria? Go get me the Bible.
I must refresh my memory on the Prodigal Son.
Bread.
NEW ORLEANS
Good fresh bread.
- Do you make money, Will?
- It's okay.
- Happy to learn it, me no.
- I have apples.
My birds! How can you do this to my birds?
Your painted birds do not pay rent.
And you neither.
But my other suit. My painting.
My brushes.
Your other suit, your paint and your brushes, you'll see them... when you gave me the money.
All right, ma'am. Children and gentlemen are present.
- My bird.
- Nice. But not really a bird.
When I paint a bird, it is a bird until the last pen.
- Always, I paint alive.
- Like this?
Well, I start with the living.
But some paintings take time.
I understand why you like to take your time for this one.
Mademoiselle de Bornay.
Whoever it is, no man should leave it unfinished.
The painted bird or the painted beauty?
I prefer the bird. It's thanks to her... that my beautiful paintings have no roof over their heads.
I have never painted a bird.
But I hunted hundreds.
It's unfortunate, sir, that you're leaving... just when I arrive.
Sir saw a wren, perhaps?
A wren? Of course. Full.
Good. Good. I never found one.
I always wanted to meet a man who would talk to me about it.
- Well, come in.
- But the owner...?
That is true. Good shot.
Stay out of the line of fire.
Do not call me darling. You do not see that I'm busy...
- I'd like a room.
- Certainly.
You have nothing to do?
- Mr. Boowie?
- Bowie.
- Bayou Sara.
- I see.
I have a guest.
Can you register both, please?
Thank you.
What is your name?
Audubon.
John James Audubon.
- Many names, right?
- For sure.
For sure.
You need money.
If only you finish this.
She is a beautiful girl from New
Orleans, proud and spoiled.
I would rather starve than beg.
Looks like you're not far.
Maybe if someone else...
Even me.
I tell you, I have considered all possibilities.
His mother...!
She thinks I have dined with
Rembrandt and Velasquez.
His brother does not like anything else... than to drink and bet on Saint Sylvain.
What is a poor Quaker artist for them?
Saint Sylvain? Where is it?
Please. You have been very kind.
Very kind.
But I would prefer that one of these days... you showed me the wren.
One day.
It's not wise.
They do not like me there.
And I do not like them.
- Hat, sir?
- No thanks.
But Sir.
I tell you, these steamers will change everything.
You will see the cotton fields extend to Natchez and beyond.
You want to bet on it?
He is right. You do not know what happened to the price of land.
Buy the right parcel, you can make a fortune.
I prefer to win mine here.
It's closer. More comfortable.
But, sir, thank you, but I do not drink.
Well! The Quaker dauber.
- Please please.
- The Quaker dauber... who considers birds more important than my sister.
But, sir, my admiration for miss goes beyond words.
I apologize most servilely.
It was a misunderstanding.
You made it wait 3 weeks before the second appointment.
I was in the bayou, I was looking for herons.
- There were delays.
- Herons?
While my sister was waiting?
You heard his excuse.
You might have the courtesy to let him finish.
Who are you, sir, to talk to me about courtesy?
A boor of the fields?
This is none of your business.
All that has to do with him concerns me.
If not, do you make it look like you?
- Your name, sir?
- Jim Bowie.
You will hear about my friends.
What does he mean?
You've been challenged, and all because of me.
You must not fight.
I'm dueling for a similar story?
It's the code.
What do you know? Two cognacs.
- You have to leave the city.
- I can not.
My brothers and I own a sawmill.
I have to sell the wood.
- It takes time.
- Mr. Bowie.
This gentleman is Mr.
Juan Moreno de Natchez.
- My name is Philippe Cabanal.
- Your humble servant.
Monsieur de Bornay has instructed us to arrange the terms of the duel... as you please, since you are the one who was provoked.
He asked us to ask you about the excuses you expect.
Excuses? I do not understand.
Monsieur de Bornay is a gentleman... whose courage has never been questioned.
He also has an unusual sense of honor.
He asks us to inform you that... having realized that he was slightly intoxicated... he feels that an apology is due to you.
Do you accept them?
Well, I think so.
But if he wants to apologize... why does not he do it with Mr.
Aubudon?
- He will do it.
- Now that's arranged... please please decline your names... and inform us of the time, place and choice of weapons.
Wait. Did not you say that
Monsieur was going to apologize?
Does this not cancel a duel?
Of course not. Monsieur de
Bornay would never dare... to deprive you of the right to defend your honor.
Tell him I'll give him my answer as soon as possible.
You see? We should never have come here.
As I told you, I'm not a man who drinks... but could you offer me another drink?
Two more, please.
Juanita, did you find my fan?
- Yes. I bring it.
- Well, hurry up.
Warning. Pay attention.
The dress is only built.
- You can not wear it here!
- I'll wear it here.
Why can not I see what it looks like here?
- I'm not sure of the color.
- But it becomes so much you.
If she's my hairdresser, tell her to wait.
- Upstairs in my room.
- Yes, Miss Judalon.
Hello sir.
Jim Bowie, I'm coming to see Mr.
Narcissus of Bornay.
Have you waited, sir?
I was expecting to see your second, sir.
I do not have a habit... to go through intermediaries for personal matters.
And a duel is the most personal thing.
I agree.
This is a rather subtle observation for an inhabitant of the forest.
Very good. Time, weapons.
First of all, I am grateful for your apologies.
My terms are: When it will snow in New Orleans.
Weapons, snowballs.
It does not snow in New Orleans.
I can wait.
Sir, although the proposal is frivolous...
I recognize goodwill.
Should we hope that the winters in New Orleans are sweet?
Thank you. And for Mr. Aubudon?
Aubudon? Does he not accept my apologies?
Yes, but that does not give him a roof.
Could he not finish the portrait of your sister?
It is a delicate problem, it is better to talk about a drink.
As long as he has debts to your family, no one will want them.
He has to paint portraits to make a living.
It will not impress my sister.
She does not like playing the second violins for a bird.
Second violins for what?
I am honored to introduce Mr. James Bowie.
Sir, my sister, who does not surprise me anymore.
Miss Judalon Daphne
Serafin de Bornay.
Bowie? This is not the gentleman against whom you will fight.
It's him, but I'm happy to say we will not fight.
So one of you must have been sensible... and I can not believe it's my brother.
As you see, sir, my sister does not appreciate me.
It may be that, being his brother, I can not be a suitor.
Do you like the dress, sir?
Very nice choice. The prettiest I have ever seen.
Indeed. It may be okay.
We give a ball in this house Thursday in eight.
Will you be our guest?
- Well...
- Yes of course.
I am so happy that you like the dress.
Mr. Audubon may have a chance to finish the picture after all.
- Where did you forget?
- No. Cheers.
I am now going to train with my fencing instructor.
- Do you want to join me?
- Fencing?
I do not know anything about swords.
You do not know anything about swords?
My jacket.
Sir, a man who catches the attention of my lovely sister... would do better to learn.
I could never equal the master.
Jim, why do not you try?
I never touched it.
- Try with me, then.
- Okay.
- Allow me, sir.
- Thank you.
Here, please?
I need a glove?
You give me everything.
Bend your knees, sir.
You have to bend your knees.
It's not so bad.
Are you still serious with a gun in your hand?
I would not like to see you when it's serious.
I am better with a whip.
It might be wiser to stick to the gun.
I know how to use a rifle... but I never fired a pistol... except the day of independence.
And yet, you were ready to accept my challenge?
Certain. Maybe I should have choose something like this.
It's easier to handle.
It's a Spanish cuchillo, made to throw.
It's too bad that nobody uses it here.
- Are you throwing the knife?
- A little.
Mr. Bowie will throw a knife.
I would drink a drink. And you?
Two sherry punch, please.
- You have been very good.
- I missed it by 30 cm.
But it seems like you're good at throwing knives.
If I fought a duel, that's what I would choose.
- A knife? In a duel?
- Why not?
Sir, a duel should be art... great tragedy, beautiful, honorable.
Honor is precious for a gentleman.
Without her, he's like a beast.
Bravery, artistic talent, honor... are the essential values of the duel.
Death is only the fall of the curtain.
It's good for the winners.
But the losers?
Has anyone gone on their graves... ask them what they think of their beautiful death?
You make it a personal question, sir?
Do what you want.
Narcissus, I remember that he is your friend.
You ruined the morning of Contrecourt.
I am sorry.
But a murder is a murder.
There is no need to add.
I would prefer to say that I never killed... rather than brag about how I did it.
This discussion is too creepy for such a beautiful morning.
It's time for me to talk to my tailor.
You will need something different for the ball.
- Please!
- Patience.
- How many mister's tails?
- Two, at least.
- One of the new capes?
- Incontestably.
And a long baggy pants?
- What else?
- Wait.
We must clarify something.
When will I have my baggy trousers?
Patience. No worries. I will offer you the latest models.
You will be another person.
- How long?
- We are harassed for work.
But I can arrange otherwise for your friend.
- Let's say, in a fortnight?
- After tomorrow.
- The ball is next week.
- You will wait so long... before arranging a session for Audubon?
Mademoiselle has an eye for clothes as much as for the shoulders.
After tomorrow.
Very good, the day after tomorrow.
But I'll have to make the store work day and night... and make wait for gentlemen.
But as you say, the day after tomorrow.
- But but...
- Patience.
How can I pay for this?
I wish he had not been so eager to satisfy you.
I owe him $ 3,000.
He can afford to upset the paying customer.
As I do not pay, my power increases with the years.
I see.
- But Sir!
- Patience!
You become very good.
This is the first I see.
You do not have any music at all up there?
Yes, violins. People play flute and banjo.
Dancers and broom jumps.
Broom jumps?
It's a kind of wedding custom.
Priests do not go to the bayous very often.
When a young couple is formed, their parents make a dance.
Everyone forms a circle and holds a broom thirty centimeters off the ground.
Young lovers jump over.
And what's going on?
It's finish. They are married.
Married?
When a priest on a journey passes... he gives them the blessing of the church.
Maybe you jumped over the broom yourself?
Not yet. The broom is easy to find.
But finding the right girl is something else.
- Yes I know.
- Please miss.
Keep the bow in place.
And your face around.
I guess the brooms are very busy.
Enough.
As miss can not leave the room... it might be better for you to leave it.
Perhaps it would be better for us to leave her.
Anyway, my foot is numb.
- Your arm. Can I?
- With pleasure.
- It's better.
- But the light is impeccable.
You have been a much better subject today.
It's a very nice compliment.
I am very happy to have satisfied you.
- But, miss...
- Maybe tomorrow.
Do not you still dance?
I asked him twice.
She told me no two times.
Try someone else then.
That's not why I came.
When they announce the quadrille, can I have the honor?
Why? Did you bet that you would dance with me?
A man does not bet with his life.
That's what you are for me.
- Will I have the honor?
- The quadrille comes after the break.
You would not want to ask me an answer so soon?
- For the quadrille?
- But it's still so early.
- But...
- Let's talk about it later.
- Another cut, sir.
- No thanks.
Good evening.
Excuse me. Two, please.
Thank you.
Ladies and gentlemen?
The Virginia quadrille.
- Good luck.
- To you too.
You are all so nice, I do not know who to choose.
Your arm, please.
Your arm.
Forgive me, but I knew... that they danced the quadrille even in the bayous.
I was not sure you knew how to dance waltz or polka.
I was not sure either.
But I will try anything with you.
It's better that way.
If you do not believe me, look at their faces.
You have danced the quadrille wonderfully...
I'm sure you could waltz.
Would you like to take a private lesson?
Did you hear me?
Sorry. I thought of wood.
In the woods? I scandalize everyone by coming here with you...
- and you think of wood.
- I always say what's wrong.
But if it was not for the wood...
I would never have come here.
I would never have met you.
"You do not regret it, are you?
Not at all."
Thanks to you, I will become a very good businessman.
Thanks to me? This is your strangest compliment so far.
I could have sold the wood when I arrived.
But I met you, and I wanted an excuse to stay.
Now I have been offered double the price.
I guess that's what happens when you want to keep something.
I hoped never to sell it.
But it must be tomorrow.
So you have to come back?
- You do not want?
- No.
So do not go away.
Jim, do not leave.
It must.
Why?
Judalon, have you ever been to the land of bayou?
No. But I would like you to tell me about it.
That's wonderful. There are millions of hectares... where no one except the Indians... and some hunters like me, never set foot.
You see, an Indian never works the land.
Never change it.
Once dead and gone, it's as if he had never been there.
To hear you, it seems very lonely.
It's not.
Or at least I had never thought of it before.
I was like the Indians before coming here... with all the cotton and the rice fields.
Now, I want to go back to work the land.
Put my mark on it.
Leave New Orleans for good?
I'm not in my place here, yet I make a living here.
Do you still have to think about making a living?
Can not that wait... tomorrow or next week or even next year?
I thought I could wait all my life.
Now, I know I can not.
Judalon, come with me.
Live in a hut in a wilderness?
It will not always be wild.
Do not you understand? You say you do not have your place here.
Do you really think I have my place there?
Without music or dance?
Think how I would be useless.
Do not talk about it now.
It's time to go back.
- Tell me.
- Tell you what?
What do you think I am, a bayou woman... that one catches and that one removes at the first kiss?
If you want a squaw, go back and skip the broom... with one of your young girls in the country, Mr. Bowie.
You like compliments.
A proposal in marriage is the best compliment... that a woman can get.
I thought you loved me.
I still think so.
What did he do?
I'd rather not talk about it.
Well, Henry, you do not invite me to dance?
Jim?
Please, do not talk about him anymore.
It's my fault. I should never have invited him.
He insulted you, did not he?
I did not say that.
You do not have to say it, Judalon.
Will you excuse me, please?
- Champagne, Miss Judalon?
- Please.
It's a wonderful evening. Thank you.
You had to know what kind of man he was.
You need to be more precise.
What man is this this time?
You know who I mean.
But I do not want you to do anything.
- Where did Henri Contrecourt go?
- Whatever?
Dance with Me. I do not want to stay here.
Judalon, what did you do?
Tell me what you did.
I am not responsable.
It is not me.
Narcissus, you have to do something.
Is it rain that brought you home so early?
Jim? I said, it's the rain that brought you back so soon?
She is beautiful, is not it?
You should have seen her tonight.
I can imagine.
They say that true artists... must be able to see behind the surface of what they are painting.
I painted it, Jim, and I saw behind the surface.
Me too.
She is not for you.
Why? Because she slapped me tonight?
You are closer than I thought.
A kiss first, maybe?
- She is...
- What is she?
I do not say it's bad.
She is almost perfect.
But she would not be good for you.
Return to the bayou.
Run away?
I would see her in the bayous.
I would see her everywhere.
And if you were right? If she was not good for me?
Will it stop me from loving him?
You can try.
I do not want to try.
I want her enough to bet that the day will come when she will love me.
Good or bad, it will be worth it.
Now, answer me.
Tell me what to do.
Maybe I do not have the right.
Maybe no man has the right.
I was taught never to run away from anything.
And I will not run away from that.
Where are you going?
Look for what goes with these clothes.
Red.
Sir, the bank is dry.
There will be a slight delay.
Is Mr. Bowie here?
Mr. Contrecourt?
No, just Mr. Bowie. It's enough.
This man came here with less than a hundred dollars.
He is already leading this place to bankruptcy.
I am the owner here.
I hope that sir will not object... that I take the place of the croupier?
- Like you want.
- Thank you.
Is there a limit?
Given the circumstances, there is no limit for you.
I put everything.
Like you want.
- Jim, I have to talk to you.
- Later.
Red.
Sir, I ask you for indulgence.
Another slight delay.
Jim.
You had a lot of luck, sir.
- Thank you very much.
- I do not know what happened.
Henri Contrecourt will challenge you.
- Why?
- What difference does it make?
Judalon?
Whatever the reason,
I feel responsible.
You have to leave. If I can find you, Contrecourt too.
You have seen that money there, ready to increase.
I do not do things halfway.
Countercourt can kill you.
Good. I'll be the first
Bowie to die rich.
- How much do I have here?
- Almost 50,000, sir.
- Still no limit?
- Your luck is incredible.
But the honor of the house is at stake.
No limits.
"You are doing well, Mr. Bowie.
I have to talk to you."
But a boor with money is always a boor.
- Red.
- Did not Mr. Bowie hear me?
Sir, we do not want trouble here, please.
Red.
Black. The house wins, sir.
Cognac, sir?
Thank you for your courtesy.
- You spoke to me?
- Henri, listen to me.
- Stay out of my quarrel.
- Henri.
Stay out of my quarrel.
I have just appropriated it.
Ready.
Ready.
You were going to challenge me.
Consider it done.
It is the privilege of
Monsieur to choose his death.
So, I choose the knives.
I refuse to dishonor the code by using such a weapon.
So, use your sword.
Sir is too good.
I think it's my privilege to choose the place.
Do you have an empty, dark room?
Dark? Men can not duel in the dark.
Maybe not.
But they can fight.
Very well then.
This way please.
- Choose your corner.
- Farthest.
We meet at the center?
We will meet again when we meet.
Ready?
Ready.
I suppose you believe me guilty.
No. No.
- Jim.
- Hello, Sam.
- You look different.
- I feel different.
- My God!
- It's alive?
Mom, mortals have never seen this before.
- Come on, sit down.
- Go slowly. You will break it.
- Did you have dinner, Jim?
- No mother.
What happened?
First, I... I killed a man.
- Should he kill him?
- More than any man.
- Nobody's looking for you?
- No, it was right.
I guess you want to know for the wood.
- How much did it yield?
- I did not sell it.
- How?
- It's part of the deal.
I sold the whole thing in full.
Finally, if you want to sign this deed of sale.
I will not sign anything. We should never have let you go.
Our home means so little to you?
I did not sell the house, just the factory.
Do not worry. We keep everything.
Stay calm. Jim deserves to be listened to.
$ 7,000. It seems to me a good price.
We work in the wood. What is the use of money without the factory?
The wood would not pay for a boat ride.
Cotton, yes.
Upstream and downstream of the river, they clear.
Put this money in the lower lands, we will all be rich.
We do not know anything about cotton growing.
We know the earth. We hunted and fished on both sides of the river.
They did not even start clearing this.
We buy, we clear, we plant and we move to the next plot.
This country is ready for the biggest leap forward in its history.
- Listen.
- Hold on.
I'm not saying Jim acted well or acted wisely.
Or what he asks you to do is the best.
But whatever you do, do it together.
Both of you go out to calm down.
Jim, sit down.
My clothes were not good enough for you?
That's why you want to be rich?
Come on, eat.
NATCHEZ HERALD HIGH
PRICES FOR LAND VIRGINS
WE WILL PAY IN LIQUID FOR
YOUR HECTARES NOT WORKED
BOWIE BROTHERS, BAYOU SARA.
ON EMPLOYMENT MEN. GOOD SALARY FOR
MULETIERS AND MANORS OF HACHES
REGULAR EMPLOYMENT BOWIE
BROTHERS, BAYOU SARA
BAYOU SARA BECOMES A
REGULAR STOP ON BOATS
BOWIE BROTHERS SHOULD SHIP
5000 COTTON BALLS THIS YEAR
Jim Bowie. Bowie, Bowie, Bowie.
You call it a newspaper?
He's been fighting back with us for over a year.
I imagine you have seen Bayou
Sara's passage, Mr. Moreno.
- Yes that's it.
- I'm sorry but...
- Marschalk?
- Yes, Judge Crain?
How can you live here in Natchez and print these things?
- Things?
- Like this.
"Will Bayou Sara compete with Natchez?"
"Land clearing and speculation in full development."
What will they raise up there?
Big frogs?
You can laugh as much as you want, gentlemen.
They made a good crop of cotton last season.
They want the moon this year.
And he could have it.
Not without real money to invest.
They will never find it here.
And here in Natchez?
They will not have money from
Natchez to build Bayou Sara... not as long as I'm the director of the bank.
It is the center of cotton.
This will remain so.
Perhaps. You saw the Bowie brothers in the corner recently, did not you?
They are very big with an insolent air.
I knew Jim Bowie in New Orleans.
He had not worn shoes for more than a week.
You do not need shoes when you can go by car.
BANK OF NATCHEZ
At least one of our important citizens seems to think... that this country is big enough to have two cotton centers.
Excuse me, gentlemen.
General Cuny, there is their money.
No well is so full that it can not be put to dry.
In a month or so, they will realize it.
General, you must be reasonable.
Reasonable? How dare you tell us that we are poor?
Wells, my brother and I have enough money to buy you.
If your money was not entirely in the land.
You have mortgaged all your Natchez holdings... to buy and clear these marshes of mud at Bayou Sara.
- Mud swamps?
- In three months... they will produce the most beautiful cotton.
Let me remind you that... the judge and I are only directors of the bank.
She does not belong to us. To do justice to the depositors... we must demand the payment of the interest due.
We are ready to pay the interest, with the land.
This is what has been done.
Unfortunately, the bank is now asking for cash.
$ 25,000 before the 1st of the month.
It comes from you, Crain.
For 15 years, you waited for your time.
You see his arm?
I put my mark on it, oh yes, at a speed of 30 steps.
He was in the lead, but he could not take his own medicine.
Let's see how you take them now.
Good evening.
Good evening sirs.
- Well, Mr. Bowie.
- Did you have the money?
I think Mr. Moreno can answer that question.
I imagine you went to the bank alone.
I arranged a loan of cash but a messenger came from here.
Pity. It seems that there is not much money everywhere.
- When you pull the cord.
- Good evening sir.
Just 25,000! Gentlemen, do you understand... that if we do not find that money...
Gentlemen, the situation is serious.
Extremely serious.
I am a man of property in this community.
I have been a good man all my life.
Now, I can even lose this house.
You led me to this disaster.
You, kind of arrived!
Speculation on the land.
Easy money.
Make us all rich, you said.
Where was my head? I was already rich.
If you were 30 years younger and you weighed 50 pounds less...
- I would be very upset.
- Oh, kind of...
General, you know that you are unfair.
Moreno and Crain are the traitors... in this cotton story, not Bowie.
But they will steal our land for mortgages... and will make a fortune with what we started.
Maybe not. Do you want to go to town?
- Why?
- Money.
But I'd like to take a good look first.
Another of your crazy plans?
Come on, get up.
Do you have money, ladies?
So, go out.
- What can I do for you?
- Is Studentvant here?
Yes. He is here. Jack?
We came here to see
Jack Studentvant?
I would rather starve than accept his dirty money.
Do not worry. He will not give you any.
Ah, Mr. Bowie.
Drink for Mr. Bowie's friends.
The best available.
- It happens.
- Gentlemen.
- Is Steel Duke here?
- He is waiting.
- Who the hell is Steel Duke?
- A racehorse.
Just arrived from Nashville. Steel
Duke is still very well known there.
What does it have to do with us?
I buy it for 700 dollars.
We are at the foot of the wall and you buy racehorses.
- That's it.
- You must be crazy.
What if he beat Kerry
Isle, Moreno's horse?
In the Duncan Cup?
How else can you find
$ 25,000 in speed?
Show us the way, Jack.
It's my heart. I'm not young anymore.
There is nothing wrong with his pedigree.
I would prefer to see a bill of sale on which there is nothing to complain about.
Ah yes?
I won it at poker. What would a racehorse be for me?
The rules of the Duncan Cup... specify that horses must belong to gentlemen.
Local influencers say
I can not register.
I lose, you win. Nose Cut?
Take it out.
Hurry up, hurry up.
He is handsome, is not he?
Bet on this creature against Kerry Isle...
Natchez's fastest horse?
It's crazy!
Kerry Isle is Natchez's fastest horse.
But Steel Dukey is the fastest horse in the world.
He has good points. Yes sir.
Very good points.
Yes, but where are we going to find the money to bet?
Nobody knows for this horse.
They are all sure of Kerry Isle.
Guys like Moreno and Judge Crain... should be afraid of a rating of 5-1.
5,000 is all we will need.
We have this sum in liquid. And if we win, Moreno and Crain... we would save the skin with their money.
You have understood the heart of the matter.
That's right, sir.
What's his name?
Steel Duke.
Steel Duke? To your good health, sir.
To our enemies, who I hope will hate the sound of your name.
- Please?
- He knows me as a sister.
I mean, like a brother.
We will have fun together.
How do you like it?
I look good. The women will look at me, not Steel Duke.
Do not look at women and watch Kerry Isle.
You will lose your beautiful shirt.
I wonder if he has already arrived... that businessmen risk everything on a race.
If it works, you'll be rich, Jim.
Very rich.
Rich enough to return to New Orleans.
- What makes you think that?
- I know what pushes you.
Horses online.
You have smuggled this horse.
I bought it here in Natchez.
And forgot to say he was from
Nashville before making the bets.
It seems he has won a dozen races.
It's for gentlemen.
- You are not part of it.
- I am here.
Only because Cuny has sponsored you.
If this scammer beats Kerry Isle, pay attention to yourself.
I have been paying attention to myself for years.
Horses and owners, at the booth.
Owners and grooms, leave the track.
Leave the track, please.
Horses, forward.
Come on, train this horse.
Honey, pay attention to your tension.
My tension? I do not have.
- He's going fast.
- Not fast enough.
Kerry Isle is the best in the home stretch.
The winner, Steel Duke!
Go. We have not lost yet.
Mr. Bowie, come cut your price, sir.
- Sir, I have to talk to you.
- Later.
Jim, what head does Judge Crain have?
Like the time my ball touched it, I bet.
Hello, Bowie. It has been a long time.
If only I had known that your horse was going so fast.
Apparently, my wife knew it.
She won.
Your woman?
Unfortunately, a very small bet.
Congratulations, Jim. Your horse has had a wonderful race.
I should have congratulated you, but I did not know.
Mr. Bowie, you're expected at the judge's booth.
Jim, stay here tonight.
This lady is visiting us.
We will celebrate that.
Very well thank you.
Have you forgotten?
I bet on Steel Duke.
Do not you think I deserve to see you get your prize back?
Yes of course.
But, Philip, you bet on Kerry Isle.
It does not bother you?
Jim, I have to talk to you alone.
I have heard so many wonderful things about you.
You have come a long way from New Orleans.
That's true for both of us, Ms. Cabanal.
Please, you must understand.
After Narcisse's death, everything was so confused.
That's not all. Philippe was my mother's choice.
We do things like that in New Orleans.
- So you did not love me?
- No.
Judalon, tell me the truth.
You have never done anything... just because someone else wanted it.
Why did you marry him?
Okay. Maybe I thought I wanted a man like Philippe.
- Someone who...
- Whose name was with yours?
- Social position?
- Maybe that was it.
But will not it be enough if
I tell you it was a mistake?
Judalon.
Jim? They are always waiting for you at the judge's stand.
Excuse me.
Excuse me for interrupting you, Mrs.
Cabanal.
You are Mrs. Cabanal, are you?
Yes.
A horse must be registered by its owner.
I want Bowie to prove that he is the owner.
- It's a legal protest.
- Legal, maybe.
But we are all supposed to be gentlemen here.
All except Jim Bowie.
Mr. Bowie.
These gentlemen are questioning... the property of the horse that you have registered.
You understand my position.
Here is a bill of sale. He will convince every honorable man.
Is this an insinuation, sir?
It depends on whether it is difficult to convince you.
This states that Studentvant won this horse at a card game... with Joseph Levington in Nashville.
I do not know Mr. Levington.
Can you check his signature?
I can not check it.
But why question it?
Very big bets are at stake.
I give you time to find Levington and check his signature.
If everything is in order, the bets will be settled.
But if it's a fake, Steel
Duke will be disqualified... and Kerry Isle declared winner.
- I'm leaving for Nashville.
- I'll wait for your return.
JAMES BACK, FORGE, COUTELLERIE
- Mr. Black?
- Yes sir.
- My name is Bowie.
- How are you sir?
It seems that you make a very good edge... and you have a different method of quenching.
With your permission, sir, it's a professional secret.
I'm on my way to Nashville.
I would like to have a knife made during my absence.
It's something that I cut.
I have never seen a blade of this form.
The heel on the back is very thick.
A few millimeters.
It seals his strength. It is important not that it breaks.
I saw swords breaking, knives breaking.
I want something that will never break.
It's a big challenge, sir.
And I like challenges.
I will show you something.
Once I saw a fireball cross the sky... as bright as the sun.
There was an incredible roar like a hundred guns.
It was the death of a shooting star.
Later, I found this fragment of the meteor.
It's steel. Pure steel from another world.
Harder and stronger than anything on this earth.
I tried to find the equivalent.
I never did it.
Yet I think I was closer than anyone.
I'll be back from Nashville in four days.
Will he be ready?
Sir, you ask me for a unique knife.
A knife that the world has never seen before.
It would take me at least two weeks.
I have the feeling that I am going to need this knife.
Really need.
So it'll be ready in four days.
Thank you.
Sam, turn off the oven. Cleans it.
Do not leave an ash that will give you the tear in the eye.
- Prepare a new crucible.
- Get active.
Jackson, brings together our best wrought iron. Hurry up.
- Sam, we're going to need steel.
- Yes sir.
More coal. It must be warmer.
Hotter.
Mr. Black, what are you going to do?
More heat!
This steel offers a cutting edge that you have never seen.
I soaked it seven times.
He is superb.
I never thought that such a knife could exist.
There will never be another one.
I melted it with a fragment of a star in it.
For better or worse, this knife has a little paradise in it.
Or a little hell.
It's better not to sing so loud before you see their money.
We will see him. Jim reported the proof now... they can no longer lift their feet.
Once you get it, this property at
Rapides Parish is not expensive.
- We should buy it.
- Not me.
It does not look like you.
What is going on?
Do you think you are rich enough?
I feel like a man on his
31's with nowhere to go.
Can I talk to you alone?
- Of course.
- Please excuse us.
As you and Juan Moreno are not on very good terms... he asked me to give you the payment of his bet.
- He's a very worried man.
- Perhaps.
There is an act signed for 12 hectares of cotton growing land... and $ 5,000 in cash.
I would say he is fast.
I would love to be so fast.
Frankly, I am rather short.
Bad luck at the races.
Bad luck with the cards.
I owe Jack Studentvant a lot.
Studenvant? You played with him?
He sold you a good horse, right?
I thought he was honest.
What I wanted to say... could you give me the loan of those 5,000 dollars?
It was your horse that dragged me into this situation.
You almost owe it to me.
And if I do not believe you have the duty?
In this case, you may think it is Judalon's duty.
It would be a terrible humiliation for her... if I did not pay my debts.
- Does she know?
- She does not know anything.
By the way, I have a note from him.
She gave it to one of the servants, but he came to see me.
I took the liberty to read it.
That said she would like to see you in our summer house... at nine o'clock tonight.
Jim, I was afraid you were not getting my word.
I got it. From Philippe.
I should have known. I'm used to being watched.
His actions do not surprise me anymore.
Jim, I would not have taken the chance to meet you, but...
Finally, I'm going to divorce.
Not because he plays all his money and all mine... but because I can not live with a man I do not like.
I know that now.
But you can not ask for a divorce.
It's not allowed here.
I know it requires a law from a legislator.
I have high-ranking friends in politics.
This can be done and I will do it.
But do not think I do not know what that means.
They will laugh behind my back and stain my name.
I do not want to face this alone.
Jim, I know there is animosity between you and Juan Moreno.
Will you promise me not to fight with him?
I want you safe.
I want you near me.
I promise you. If there is a challenge, it will not come from me.
I was hoping you would say that.
Judalon... when the time comes, will you marry me?
I can not answer that question.
But when the time comes, perhaps you will rest the question?
- I'd better go home.
- Yes.
- That's it, General.
- Thank you.
- Doctor.
- Thank you, my boy. Hold.
Well, Dr. Maddox.
The last.
We wondered if everyone would pay except you.
Here is your money, but you will have little time...
- to enjoy.
- You do not leave me any choice.
Will you be one of my seconds, General?
With pleasure.
I wish you had offered me the privilege of killing yourself.
Jim, will you represent me too?
The bar, tomorrow morning.
The earliest would be best.
Juan Moreno and Judge
Crain will represent me.
Good evening sirs.
I knew they could not pay like gentlemen.
They want blood for their money.
We will have to do more than be ready tomorrow.
They will make a battle.
I should have said no there.
I promised to stay away from Moreno.
Why promise him anything?
She is married.
Not for a long time. There is a loophole.
So, will she marry you?
She did not answer you frankly, I bet.
She will never do it.
It's not that she does not love you, she likes what she was born in.
I can give it to him now.
Money does not make you what she calls a gentleman.
You could not marry her anymore... that Jack could enter a horse in the Duncan Cup.
Have you finished?
I do not know what Juan
Moreno means to her... but he has seen it a lot lately.
No matter what else he is, or how old he is... he is always what she calls a gentleman.
You're done?
I'm your brother and
I have to tell you.
Let's get out of Natchez.
She is like a vine around a tree.
- It will choke you to death.
- Shut up!
- Jim!
- I said, shut up!
Fortunately, the
Bowie's head is hard.
- I could have killed you.
- Yes, you could have.
We forget. I forgot.
One two Three.
Gentlemen, you both have proven your courage.
We are lucky that nobody was hurt.
You want to shoot again?
- Yes.
- Yes.
Prepare to shoot.
- You shoot too fast.
- I'll have it this time.
Are you ready, gentlemen?
- Ready.
- Ready.
A... two... three.
Gentlemen, not even the strictest interpretation of the code... requires you to fire a third time.
I hope you will consider your honor satisfied.
Shake your hand.
Maddox, if you're a man, you'll shoot again.
Maddox! Shoot again.
- Stay out of this, Crain.
- We came to settle an account.
I ask you, will you do it?
I held my head twice. It's enough.
I'll fix that.
Gentlemen, it's a field of honor!
Here is what says "The Herald".
"It's Bowie, falling hurt..." a steel blade in the chest... animated only by its deadly ferocity...
"who made Crain's group retreat."
"An avenging demon, a knife he handled like a modern Excalibur... irresistible against any human defense."
You become famous.
This is not the type of celebrity I want.
Go get him some lemonade.
This fire and the sulfur that you read will not make him lower the fever.
- It will be fine.
- Go get some tape.
Keep me company I risk getting lost here.
It happened for you. I guess you know who sent it.
I'll be in the lobby if you need me.
A man like you puts his heart on something and stays attached to it... whether it be a fortune, a quarrel or a woman.
Even a married woman.
But you can recover from that... if you go out and find someone else to take his place.
The book says it's not good for a man to live alone.
Look for someone to fill your life.
You can not fill it with a sheet of paper.
Jim, it's wonderful to see you back.
I started to recover as soon as your word arrived.
All these weeks, I was so worried.
I was worried too.
I was afraid that Moreno means something to you... and that you would hate me for what happened.
You want some? I know you have to do it.
But, Moreno meant something to me, Jim.
And it meant something to you, too.
He was the only one I knew who could free me from Philippe.
The only man with enough influence in the legislature.
He was trying to enact a law for divorce?
Why did not you tell me?
I wanted to, but I was afraid you did not understand.
What I understand is that
Moreno never gave anything.
What was it?
You were going to marry her.
No. Maybe he was hoping... but he knew how I felt about you.
I tried to hide it, but I could not do it.
Not good enough.
In your heart, you must know... why he wanted to get rid of you.
You mean he could not trust you anymore?
He had no reason to trust me.
You have some.
It's easy to say that while you're Mrs.
Cabanal.
I told you I was going to Texas... and that I will not return until the divorce is pronounced.
I always go there, but
I will not come back.
Take me with you.
You are sincere?
I am sincere if you say that you want it too.
Want what?
You are the reason of all my acts since I met you.
You will always be the reason.
I will always want you.
But do you know what it means if we go to Texas?
What does it mean wherever we go?
It's a new country, is not it?
They will not ask questions.
They will ask questions in any country.
But I promise you this.
They will not ask them loudly.
I am sure of it.
- If only...
- If only what?
Philippe. He is so weak, so stupid.
He can be cruel sometimes.
But I can not forget what it will do to him.
If only he was not already in such a bad situation.
- Does he always play?
- Worse than that.
He has so much debt to
Studenvant that he forces it... to cheat towards other players.
He can not even leave.
- Studenvant owns.
- I'll take care of Studenvant.
We will leave this place in order.
Be ready tonight.
Well, Bowie, what brings you here?
I was told that you were very good at knife.
- I have never met better.
- You have one in front of you.
I was told that you never provoke anyone.
I cause here even.
Or do you prefer that I take a look at these cards you distribute?
You feel strong enough for a circle of 3 meters... with the wrists attached?
Clear the table. Draw a circle with chalk.
James!
If things go wrong, you catch Bowie, understand?
Ready, gentlemen?
Ready.
Ready.
Go for it.
Come on, finish it.
It's finish. I do not think so... that you will distribute a lot of cards with this hand.
Do not approach me!
It will not bother you anymore.
Return to New Orleans and stay there.
Find where he is going. I want him dead.
What happened? Where is she?
I waited an hour near the house.
Then, when the butler came to see me, she was not there.
She took the night boat to New
Orleans with Mr. Cabanal.
- The butler lied.
- No, he did not lie.
He told the truth. You see?
He gave me that word.
It's for you on his behalf.
Jim, I do not have any courage.
Philippe and I are made for each other.
Neither he nor I have courage. Judalon.
- Come.
- Where are we going?
We were going to Texas, right?
I remember there is a cabin further.
We can sleep there tonight, right?
- No.
- But the horses. He is tired.
Do not you think he needs rest?
They are not so tired.
Stop.
- Is he dead?
- Yes, señor.
- This one is still alive.
- If we leave him there, he will die.
Take him to the car.
- Put it up there.
- We can not. Inside.
- There is no place.
- We'll make some. Hurry up.
- Enter too.
- And you?
Do not worry. I will put myself near the driver.
- Bowie?
- I do not know.
I did not find his body.
But I found that.
Bowie would never have left that if he had been up.
I saw car tracks.
Maybe they took it.
Perhaps.
Go and get it. Hurry up!
I will learn. I will learn.
Help me, I will learn.
So what does the world look like for you?
I was afraid for a moment that you would not see him again.
- My knife. Where is he?
- Do not worry about that.
You could not even use a fork.
I took care of horses more than humans.
I wanted to try this thing on someone.
Hold. Try to swallow that.
That's okay?
I remember now for my knife.
But who brought me here?
You have not seen it?
What a pity. She was a real princess.
She brought you here with class, really.
She, shaking on the car, and you warm inside.
I looked at you and I thought...
"What an elegant way to die".
She? Who was she?
It's right here.
Señorita of Varamendi... daughter of his Excellency the vice-governor of Texas.
On the way back to San Antonio.
She has a beautiful head wear.
Sweet and kind as I have never seen.
She went to Spain too.
Real Spanish duplicates.
She left them for you to keep them or to be buried... according to what would happen.
I have money. Why did she have to...
A good Samaritan like she does not look in the pockets.
She really took care of you, body and soul.
She left that for you, with a little prayer.
For me, that's what saved you.
I could not do much.
How long will I stay in bed, doctor?
It's a little hard to say.
I do not think you'll leave this bed for three or four weeks.
Unless the Lord takes you away.
If you need anything, call me.
Try to sleep if you can.
She was good, that one.
"Unless the Lord takes you".
Señorita of Varamendi. Señor James Bowie.
- I do not speak Spanish.
- I speak english.
I came to thank you for saving my life.
I can not thank you enough.
But I brought you the money you left me.
Señor. Is it really you?
I know now. It must be your wounded Americano.
The one who was so seductive, you said.
The wounded gladiator with the face of a Roman nobleman.
Sir, I am Ursula from Varamendi.
It's my sister Theresa... who has fine hearing and a good memory.
Have not you practiced enough for today?
- Oh. Please excuse me.
- Yes.
Have you come all the way from
San Antonio to bring me this?
In part.
But above all, to see the good
Samaritan who saved my life.
Money does not mean anything... but to see you here living the report is worth a lot.
If you want, I'll give it to the church.
Except this.
I would love to keep it.
I gave it to you that night.
It's always up to you.
You must be very tired after such a long trip.
Pedro will show you your room.
But I can not stay here.
But, señor, it's the governor's house.
That you would prefer another one would be very rude.
In addition, you said that you came from afar to see me.
And it is here that I live.
He is very agitated, because it must be ready in two weeks... in time for the Christmas posada.
The festival.
We give a wonderful evening at that time.
It is very unfortunate that you can not be there.
The piñata is going too fast for me.
Who else wants to try?
We will give you another chance, Señor.
But without tricks.
No, I had my chance.
You want to touch the piñata for me, little one?
Me?
Please have a seat.
You may be wondering why I removed you from the posada.
Ursula too.
I have the feeling that you are wondering... why I have abused your hospitality so long.
It's a pleasure.
But I'm not talking to you as host, but as governor.
You are a famous man.
Even here in Texas, we've heard about your duels.
Your beautiful fights while everything was against you.
You have a great reputation, but related to violence.
So I have to ask you what are your intentions.
Señor, I came to Texas... only because, for personal reasons,
I want to be out of the
United States for a while.
I had no intention of settling here for good... but now so.
I must admit that I am not surprised.
But do you realize that here, make the court... is a very long process?
Yes. I have no reason to think that I would win... but I wish I could try.
Well, you force me now to speak no as a host... neither governor... but as a father.
Understand me, I like you and I admire you.
But I can not totally forget your violent past.
Great gods, you have been married to a knife.
Men called him your iron mistress.
Señor, I do not have the knife anymore.
Only an empty sheath remains.
Salud.
Salud.
I will leave tomorrow morning.
But only to settle my things.
I talked to your father.
He gave me permission to...
Ursula...
Will you marry me?
I'll marry you, if you want me.
Of course I want you.
You are my only reason for being here.
The only reason I want to stay.
Ah yes? I'm wondering.
I know how I feel.
What I felt the first time I saw you.
But are you sure you're here because of me... or are you here because of an event there?
What makes you say that?
That night, when we brought you to the inn...
I heard you pronounce a name.
I had never heard that name before.
I did not even know if it was a man's or a woman's name.
I know now that it's a man's name.
Tonight your father had his own troubles.
If I had left my old life behind me or not.
It's more than the knife that's gone,
Ursula. Everything has disappeared.
That is true?
You always wear the sheath.
Jack, I have news for you.
- What about?
- Bowie. He was in town.
He sold a parcel of land.
He stayed an hour and left.
- Where did he go?
- He missed the diligence... so he took the boat. You'll catch him at Fells Landing.
Anything else, sir?
No.
Thank you sir.
- Boy?
- Yes, Mr Bowie?
- Please serve my dinner here.
- I'll bring you the note.
Jim.
So, Texas did not ask you after all.
I'm afraid so.
How's Philippe?
Is he on board?
I guess so, although I have not seen it much these days.
You saved him from Studenvant, but he always finds someone else.
Can not we talk about something more cheerful?
Jim Bowie, for example?
Tell me what you did.
Nothing that would interest you.
Let me go. Let me go!
Let me go!
- Philippe.
- You think I'm drunk, right?
That is true. But not enough drunk.
But I will be. I will be!
Philippe.
They took everything. Every dollar.
What do you mean?
They could not have.
Every penny!
I do not go back to New Orleans.
You understand?
I do not go back there.
I can not go back!
Hello, Philippe.
Oh, it's you.
Since when are you on board?
You... you always find someone, right?
What did he do?
Friends sent him to St.
Louis to sell their cotton.
We left with almost
$ 50,000 in cash.
And it was not our money.
Philippe Cabanal.
As I fought to keep the honor of the name.
Now, it's a shame to wear it.
I dishonored him?
Who wanted me to play with someone else's money?
Ask him.
Judalon de Bornay. Pride and debts.
That's what makes Bornay's.
That's why she married me.
To repay his debts.
To repay his debts.
Now, what's up?
Not even my pride!
I hope you do not believe it.
You can not believe it.
Keep it here.
Fells Landing.
I bet 500.
I raise from 1000.
And 5000.
What is happening?
You're not a thunard, are you?
Ad.
- Where is Mr. Bowie's room?
- Over there, sir.
He plays poker in the men's saloon.
- Do I have to leave him a message?
- No, I'll see him later.
I raise with the 1000 dollars that I have left.
And five.
I show you. Boy?
Give me the cards.
Put them there. Do not return them.
We started with a blank game.
All three of you have made a mark on each card.
Left corner, as.
Right corner, king.
Center, queen.
Stand up.
Look under his vest.
Gentlemen, it's special ink.
I have a present for you.
You concede the pot, right? Fill it.
Send down the captain right away.
Thank you.
I took my own money with which I played.
This should match what you lost.
Where are you going?
Thank him. Would not you think so?
It can wait until tomorrow morning.
Nothing can wait until tomorrow morning.
- What do you want to say?
- I'm leaving you.
It's over.
This was not the case before his arrival.
You will not see him.
Not now. Never.
Mr. Bowie? You really live up to your reputation.
We knew they were cheats... but you proved it.
The captain locked them up.
I hope he will not release them.
Have you seen Mr. Studenvant?
He was looking for you.
Studenvant? Here on board?
Yes, sir, he went up to Bells Landing.
He is in this cabin.
- I'll go see him tomorrow morning.
- Yes. Good evening sir.
He is dead.
I know.
We will be in Kingston soon.
We can go down there.
- Us?
- Sounds strange, does not it? "We".
That's how it should have been, always.
Philippe has just died, and you can leave.
Why not? I do not worry about appearances anymore.
But he loved you. He loved you enough to kill for you.
I wonder what Philippe and I had in common.
I could be lying in his place right now.
But you are not. You are here.
Near me. Think about it, Jim, I'm free.
Only two of us now.
We can go anywhere, do anything I want to do.
We can start living for ourselves now.
Judalon, I thought I was coming back here to sell everything.
But that was not the reason.
It was you.
As it has always been.
If you had not been there,
I would have found you.
I would have found you somewhere, one way or another.
The money I earned was for you, not for me.
I know.
Philippe knew it too. He died of it.
Narcisse, Contrecourt, Moreno.
Even Studenvant and his men, one way or another... died because I was in love with you.
Once, I almost killed my brother.
But you knew that I had nothing to do with all that.
You have always had something to do with it.
You mean you do not want me?
No woman is worth the death of eight men.
- You have good time, honey?
- A hundred proof, bottled and bond.
- Somethin' funny happen?
- Is gonna happen.
The cops are gonna find
Howard's hat and coat a couple of miles downstream, a gun on one road, a magazine on another.
A ditched stolen car, and there'll be no Howard, no Maize, and no Kelly.
And no Tommy.
- Glad you had a good time.
- My goodness, Teddy dear, I wonder what this is all about.
What do you think the police want with us?
- I don't know, Harriet, nobody's told me yet.
- Just a check.
- Hello, officer.
Now, go ahead Teddy, dear.
Now you show this nice officer your license.
- I don't need your license, sir.
Did you see anything of a 1931 Cadillac sedan, black, three men in it?
- Did we?
I think we did.
Yes we did, right up the road about three miles.
Or was that a maroon car?
Well anyway, we saw a car with three people in it,
I'm sure we did.
Didn't we, Teddy dear?
- Nope, we didn't see one.
-  Thank you sir, sorry you've been delayed.
-  Honey, you oughtn't look like that.
You oughta smile pretty.
- You know, kitten,
I'm gonna get you a nice little white mouse to play with.
- Capo.
- See your license?
Get outta the car, open up the trunk.
- If there's something you're looking for, maybe I can help you find it.
- No, no, give 'em the keys.
Here, open it yourself.
- Seems like you're pushin' hard at me, mister.
That makes me think you maybe got a reason.
- Go ahead, search the car.
Search us, too.
You think those brass buttons you got give you a huntin' permit on respectable citizens, don't you?
You search 'em, push 'em around, eye up their women.
- Joe, found the Cadillac sedan about eight miles off the west of the highway.
- Car switch?
- No sign yet, but the birds scattered.
This block is canceled.
- Okay.
I'd like to take you up on your offer.
I really would.
- Darlin', you tryin' to push us into a cell?
- Well, he was easy.
Cops like to turn you sick scared just by starin' at you.
They start you to runnin' and hide, and then they laugh in their fat guts.
They beat the cement with the night stick to make you run faster.
Well, that might work with booze hounds and bums and kids stealin' apples, but not with me.
Not with me.
Come on, let's go.
- You know, sugar, the cops scared you.
- You don't listen to me so good sometimes.
Stop callin' me cute names and showin' your garters.
- Georgie, you know I don't wear stockings.
- You like to be looked at, don't ya?
You like to be petted, you like soft things like silks and satins, fur for your neck.
You just remember, baby.
Somethin' soft'll choke you right into a soft death.
Car ready for Maize?
- Yeah.
- It'll reach the highway in about an hour.
You pick 'em up.
-  Okay.
Uh, gas?
- Fill it up.
Wild Mountain, hey you got one of those overgrown tomcats in one of your cages?
- Nope, it's the real McCoy,
George.
Caught him on a little trip about a month ago.
- You're a real big game hunter, ain't you?
- Time I was, before I caught the fever.
Before that big striped cat in India savaged me.
- Striped cat out of a bottle.
Hey Harry, they tell me that drunks that slip far enough drink anything with alcohol in it, even hair tonic.
You know, you stink of it.
- What I say is true, don't matter if you believe me.
- That's eight gallons.
A buck 60.
That's, uh, $201.60.
- Yeah well, here's a buck six bits.
You can keep the change.
- Two hundred, George.
- You'll get yours when the payoff's made, just like everybody else.
- It's not the same.
I'm a hired hand, not a partner.
- Listen, great white hunter, you take the pennies when
I get 'em and be glad.
Or I'll have Flo here slap you silly.
- Want me to, Harry?
I think you'd like it.
A slap's better than no touch at all.
- I remember African hyenas showed their teeth just like you two, dirty smilin'.
- Oh George, I'm thirsty.
Leave him alone.
- You know, you stink of those mangy animals, too.
Go get us a couple bottles of pop.
Nevermind, the stink might sweat right through the bottles.
- Like to see the big mountain cat, George?
- You catch him yourself?
- I had a little help.
- I guess.
Okay let's see this big bad cat of yours.
- Don't get too near the cage, he's mean.
He don't like the smell of men.
- Where'd you buy him?
- Buy him?
I caught him.
Trapped him, roped him, tied him off.
You know, lions'll try and stare you down if they can.
And if you break, they'll make a try for you.
There was a time once in Kenya, wandered about 200 yards from camp, no gun.
Stumbled onto a black-maned lion in the scrub.
Rose up and faced me.
Why, it was a queer feelin'.
Him lookin' at me, and me starin' right back at him.
Then he skins his teeth once, turns around, and walks off.
- Harry, you're a liar.
- If you say so, George.
You think you could weight him out.
- I'm lookin' at him.
- I mean, if he was outside the cage.
- Harry, put the lock back on.
- I want my 200 bucks, George.
- I'd hate to lose you, you're a good man with cause.
- Gimme my money, or I'll leave Maize inside the dragnet.
He's a nervous man like me, and he probably talks a lot.
- There, pick it up, put the lock back on that cage.
- You won't be mad at me after, will ya George?
I had to do it.
I gotta have that double C-note.
- I'm just glad to see you got some guts, now go ahead.
- I was only only bluffin'.
I wouldn't let him out, you know that.
- You can keep the two bills.
Eh, it's only a scratch.
Come on, get up.
You make sure you pick up Maize.
-  Read all about the big bank hold up.
Bandit gets 41,000.
- What're you making?
- God of good fortune,
Chinese idol.
- Hm.
What's that stuff?
- Jade.
Beautiful stone, isn't it?
- Mm-hm.
You like beautiful things,
Howard.
- More than anything else in the world.
- Get away from him.
- Everybody here?
- Except Fandango.
- Did you keep those parts?
- Eh, I shoulda dumped 'em.
Made me nervous.
Cop stopped me.
If he'd have searched me, we'd all have had it.
- You mean you would've had it, don't you, Maize?
- What's the sense of keepin' these parts?
Breech blocks and pins are like signatures, that's why.
Besides, parts are hard to get.
I had to heist the state arsenal for this.
- Fast.
- Two minutes, 38 seconds.
And blindfolded, only
42 seconds more.
- My baby can handle a Tommy gun like most men can't even handle an automatic.
Machine Gun Kelly's my little baby.
Best gun of 'em all.
-  That's funny?
- I was just thinkin'
Machine Gun Kelly, that's a hard nickname to say.
See, what would be short for that?
- How about
- Hello.
Gee, the way you're all lookin' a me, you must've been worried sick.
And that rough road you had me on just about chipped me to pieces.
- Anybody stop you?
- Yeah, an officer on a cycle.
Tall, good-lookin' blonde fella.
And very polite and courteous.
We talked about my little run about for a while.
He's an amateur mechanic, whaddya think of that?
- Does it check?
- Isn't someone gonna offer me a drink?
My throat is just parched with dust.
- Howard, get the paper.
- There's some bourbon on the bureau.
- Bourbon?
Haven't you got anything lighter than that?
Like a cordial or somethin'?
- We got bourbon, you want it or not?
- No thanks, I don't think so.
- I think maybe you better have one.
- All right, if you insist.
A small shot with a lotta water.
You know, plenty of body and very little spirit.
- I'll get it.
- Read that.
- Yeah, everything worked out just fine, didn't it?
- Right here, read it out loud.
- The State Trust Bank of
Lebanon was robbed this morning by two armed bandits with automatics and a machine gun.
They got over $41,000, and the bandits ignored securities and bonds.
- All of it.
- Well, there is all of it.
I didn't even open the black bag.
- You better be nice, Fanny.
- Don't call me Fanny, and that could happen, you know?
You know how newspapers exaggerate and everything, and maybe it was a teller or a cashier or.
-  He wouldn't be dumb enough to have it on him.
- He thinks he's smart enough to charm his way outta anything, this guy.
- Oh, don't touch me, I tell you, let me alone.
I'm, I'm, hurt, you hurt me.
I'm hurt.
- Yeah, that's it.
One part's broken into.
- What he already took, we'll call his share.
- What's the matter, can't you take a little joke?
I want my cut, I tell ya,
I want my cut.
- You already got it.
- Don't you try, I'm warnin' ya, just don't try it.
- Flo, give him some refreshments.
Now you know Fanny doesn't like strong liquor.
Why didn't give him some cordial or something?
- No.
- Where's the file on bank operators?
- A new bunch on our backs.
- I guess.
- Should I try to use the weapons file?
- Might as well.
- I'm sorry, I didn't spot any of them.
- Don't worry about it.
We've got a lot more going for us than they have for them.
Print files, mud files,
MO files.
And if they're not in there anywhere, they will be.
- They wanna be known.
Can't be important unless everybody knows what they've done.
In a way, they actually wanna be caught.
Better check on machine gun specialists now.
- You still foolin' with that thing?
- It's a different one.
I finished the god of good fortune.
This is the god of death.
Ugly lookin' character, isn't he?
No, hey look.
What's the matter, is it hot?
-  You keep your junk away from me.
- It won't hurt you, George.
Just a symbol.
It's like the skull on the bottom of poison, or the fires of death.
- You know, one of these days, your educated wisenheimer ways are gonna buy you a seat on a hot rock.
- Well at least you're always threatening to, George.
- Are you crazy?
Not here, and not here, don't shoot.
And don't stay mad.
George always gets upset about things like that.
- And don't ask him to hold off.
- I've gonna carve a map of hell in your kisser.
- Don't, for god's sake, don't.
- Come on.
I'll stitch a new belt right across your belly.
Come on.
- Drop that!
- Put the knife away.
Open your coat.
Loosen your arm, go ahead, try me.
- Go, let it go, let it go.
-  Come on.
- You're crazy, George.
- Playing games?
Better not be so noisy about it.
There's a beat cop downstairs.
Maybe he has nothing better to do than to pick you up for disturbing the peace.
What's the matter, Howie?
You look sick.
Oh, getting thick.
You'll have one that ends up in curls.
How's the boss, baby?
- That's me.
Well, did you look it over?
- Better than that.
The assistant teller thought he was a real sheik.
We had a talk.
- I told you just look, not try and be smarter than you are.
- Oh, he was easy.
So was the bank.
Be a lotta nice money coming in Saturday.
There's a big construction outfit that pays Saturday night.
The armored car makes the delivery.
It's in the vault and checked out, 15 minutes later.
- What about the armored car?
- They leave a soon as they get the receipt.
That's seven or eight minutes.
- That gives us about three minutes with only the guard to worry about.
- Three minutes isn't enough.
- I'll work it out.
We'll take two cars, two drivers, and two guns, no picking.
We can use Fandango to drive.
- I already stopped in to see him.
He said fine.
- You mean his feelings weren't hurt?
-  No.
He said all was forgiven.
Fandago doesn't forget people mauling him easy.
One of his buddies who had a mad on against him told me that Fandango was waiting for a chance to even things up.
- Ah.
But he'll talk about this deal, huh?
- Uh-huh.
- Okay, Maize.
You go down and talk to our friend Fanny.
Tell 'em I wanna set the plan.
Tell 'em we meet Harry's
Gas Station about two miles.
Flo, sketch out a floor plan.
I'll be back after a while.
- Gee, Harry oughta clean up this place.
Looks terrible around here, what a mess.
- Yeah it does.
- Hey, where's Howard and Maize?
- They already know about the plan.
No sense in making this a convention.
- George, you didn't tell me I was point out player this time.
- That's what I wanted to ask you, Fanny.
- Ask me, I don't even know what bank you got set up.
- I mean the squealin' and the sound of singin'.
- George, sometimes you talk in riddles.
- You know Fanny, one of your friends doesn't like you.
You weren't nice to him, so he's talkin'.
- George, I don't like your sense of humor.
- Fanny, why didn't you take the beatin' I gave you like a man?
- No, no, no no, no!
- Teller's cage is here, the vault's back here, guard'll be here.
The alarms are here, here, and here.
This door leads to the hallway.
Down this side is the washroom, and the other way leads to the vault area.
- We'll be to the bank the same time the armored cops are there.
Gives us an extra minute or so.
The minute they leave, we'll move.
Right then, Howard, you ask the teller if you can use the washroom.
Then go the other way to the vault.
I'll be over here by the alley.
- I thought you said we were in the bank.
- No guts to be alone for a couple of minutes?
What's the matter with ya?
You want me to hold your hand for ya?
I'm gonna have a chopper and a suitcase,
I don't want even the chance for the guard to get curious.
Now look at here.
The minute that armored car leaves,
I'll be in the front door with a gun on everybody that might be there, including the guard.
You pick the letters, Howard, and Maize.
You be across the street.
Now you move right up front the minute you see me go in.
- You know, even bein' in the bank to pick up time, it's cuttin' it pretty close.
The construction payroll crew could arrive too soon.
- Well, Flo's gonna be up about three blocks with a conked out car crosswise in the middle of the road.
- And poor Floey will be sitting there with tears on her face, just helpless as can be.
- That's right.
- And if tears don't stop the money.
I can always show 'em a little leg.
- Sure, a little.
- What's the matter, ma'am?
- I don't know.
- Well, maybe I can help you.
-  Shake a leg, Joe, we gotta pick up that payroll.
- Get outta there!
The alarm!
- Florence, baby, oh it's so good to see you.
- Hi, Ma.
Ma, this is George, I wrote you about him.
- You never could pick your men, could you?
-  I'm tired, and I'm hungry old lady, let me in.
- Oh, ya punk.
- Ma, please.
- He's awfully cocky for man who can't even crack a hick town bank.
- He does real good, Ma.
It's just that something happened, we didn't figure on it.
- I read all the clippings.
The cops got a perfect description.
You got a couple of months of trouble and worry.
- We're clear now.
Otherwise we wouldn't have come.
- Okay, go back to readin' your magazines, and you wipe that chocolate off your chin.
And stop eatin' 'em, you're fat enough.
- This a new girl?
- Shut your mouth, she's my daughter.
- Ain't we all?
- No respect.
Oh, these young girls nowadays.
Come on into the dining room,
I'll get you something to eat.
- You hungry, George?
- Come on now, you sit right down here at the table.
Now I'll fix you up some nice cold chicken and potato salad.
Frank, come on in and see who's here!
You know, your father was real worried about you.
Would you like a little salad with that?
- Chicken and potatoes will be fine, Ma.
- I can heat the chicken up if you like.
Say, how about a nice belt of rye whiskey, good stuff.
Bonded warehouse stuff,
12 years old.
- Hey, that's for me.
- It's a wonder booze wouldn't make you sick.
Seein' as how you served two stretches for running it in.
- You tell your old lady to keep her wise cracks behind her teeth 'cause she's gonna be wearin' false ones.
- I already do, smart Alec.
- Ma, I could use the chicken.
- Right away, have it in a jiffy.
Frank, yoo-hoo!
Don't you wanna come and see your daughter?
- Well, you look fine, just fine.
- This is a friend of mine.
- Sure, Kelly.
Machine Gun Kelly.
Bring one along?
- I always got one with me or close by.
- Here have a drink.
- Yeah sure, thanks.
- Too bad you lost your driver in that bank job.
He was a good man, so I heard.
That other fella got away though, that's good.
- Not so good when I see him again.
- Not your friend now?
- He run when he saw cops and guns.
- Happens many a-time.
One wrong apple and the whole cider barrel goes sour.
And they can yellow out at funny times.
Little things shake 'em.
They're no good, you can't depend on 'em.
- You know, you gab too much,
I don't like talkin' to people, get outta here.
- Sorry, only tryin' to be friendly.
- Here we are, now don't be bashful, eat up.
Not very fancy, but he food's good, and plenty of it.
There ya are.
Some people are makin' the headlines, not you, though.
Number one boy, public enemy number one.
- Just because some bum stumbles over his own feet and shoots down a couple of feds, he ain't so much.
- He ain't so much.
- I'd like a bourbon and water, please.
I'll take it over there.
- I beg your pardon.
My name is Phillip Ashton,
I'm a friend of Michael's.
- Michael?
- You call him Fandago,
I believe.
May I join you?
- Why?
- There's something you might like to know.
Thank you.
You have a friend named Kelly.
You work with two others, Maize and Howard.
Howard blames Mr. Kelly for a certain large amount of money, the death of his friend, and a shallow palm.
He joined with some other gentlemen in the suit of his profession.
But he hasn't forgotten.
He means to kill Kelly if he sees him.
- How is Fandango?
Thank you.
- He had to lose his arm.
He doesn't find it too difficult.
- He tell you how it happened?
-  Yes.
- Now what are you telling me about Howard for?
- His new bunch wants Kelly to stay out of banks altogether.
They say he might die.
Please, allow me.
- Now the whole trick is in ridin' and whippin' like this.
Oh no no no, never fight a chopper, what you do is drift with it.
- Oh, I bet that kicks a lot.
- Plenty, but I like things that kick a lot, like pepper and cheap booze and a tommy gun, but especially a big, grown, beautiful broad.
Mm, Flo sure has the nicest sister.
- And that makes you my brother-in-law.
- Yeah, that's a couple of relatives.
There's no harm see, it's all in the family.
- Mm-hm.
- Hey, play somethin' steppier, will ya?
Come on sister, you show me, huh?
- If you say so, brother.
- Go sit in the corner, girl.
You oughta put a muzzle and leash on that.
- Ah, get outta here old lady.
- You hit me.
- You wouldn't, George.
- You hit me.
- On the spot, Howard wants to kill you.
He'll gun ya down, George, you hear me?
He's in with a new bunch, they're warning you.
- Everybody out.
- Girls gotta right in this room.
Go hold your wake somewhere else.
- You get 'em out, or there won't be much good of you, either.
Get 'em out.
- He's no good.
His wives gave him the air, didn't they?
You better wise up and do the same.
Come on girls, don't stay in a room with that.
- Do they know we are?
- No, it was you who didn't do right.
Wasn't it?
- You know where they are?
- No, but I can find out.
You weren't in the bank in time to cover the guard.
- This new crowd, are they big,
Flo?
- Well, Howard isn't alone.
- Flo.
How should I handle this?
- You askin' me?
Somethin' scared you, George.
- Yeah, I'm askin' you.
- You tell me, George.
It was you who did wrong.
- Flo, you know how somethings get me.
I can't help it.
It comes all over me like a cold sweat.
- Now tell me, George.
You were scared, weren't ya?
- Yeah, I was scared.
But you're the only one knows that.
I'm not afraid of anything else, you know that too, don't you?
- Sure, baby, I know.
- Well, I've gotta get
Howard and the rest of 'em, all at one time.
- Gun 'em where they hang out.
Your name's Machine Gun Kelly, ain't it?
Show me.
- Oh, shut up, Ma.
George, there's only one thing to do.
I'll turn 'em in for the Lebanon job.
- A daughter of mine's goin' fink?
- Why should George do what the cops can do better?
- Listen, this is inside, this guy's after Kelly.
Then let Kelly take care.
- There's a mob behind Howard now.
- So all right, so let
Kelly take 'em on.
Unless he's yella.
Run away brave boy.
Tough boy, there,
Machine Gun Kelly.
- He isn't running.
George isn't afraid of any man living.
-  Afraid of gettin' your hair mussed, Howard?
Eh?
- So they warned me outta the bankin' business, huh?
We're gonna get out, all right.
- Why, sugar, we doin' all right?
- Eh, it's nickels and dimes.
And your old lady wants some headlines,
I'm gonna give her some headlines.
We're gonna get into somethin' big.
- What's that, honey?
- Kidnappin'.
- Are you sure she hasn't got anybody to meet her?
- Positive.
I've been watching her for two weeks, haven't I?
- If she was my kid,
I wouldn't let her come walkin' home from school alone.
- She only lives around the block.
She doesn't have to cross any streets or anything.
- Looks like the last of 'em.
Maybe she was sick today.
- Uh-uh.
I saw her go in this morning.
- Well, maybe she got sick in school, and they sent her home.
- George.
- Funny lookin' little flapper.
If I was her old man, I wouldn't pay a dime to get her back.
- Smile George, be sweet.
- Hi, hi.
- Hello.
- Don't you remember me?
- I don't think we've ever met.
- Oh, you can just bet we did.
You were about oh, so big then.
- How big?
- About so.
- Then I couldn't remember, could I?
- Well, you got me there.
Hey, you know your dad sent us to pick you up.
Hop in.
- I can't, I'm waiting for my nurse.
- Nurse?
- Yes, here she comes.
- Let's go.
- No, everything's set, the note's already on its way.
We'll take her with us, too.
Get the kid.
You know, you're a very pretty little girl.
How old are you?
- Nine.
- Come on with me.
Come on, Daddy's waiting.
- We're gonna take your nurse, too, come on.
- I don't understand.
- You don't have to.
Scream, and you die.
Why don't you hold the kid on your lap, you'd like that, wouldn't you?
- Sit on my lap, Cheryl.
- Why can't we sit in the back?
-  Well, this is cozier.
- We'd have more room.
-  This is much cozier, isn't it?
- We're just going for a little ride.
It's all right, Cheryl.
- All right you two, get out.
- You're late.
- We're here, ain't we?
Get in the other car.
- What are we doing out here?
- It's all right, honey.
Come on.
- Hurry it up, hurry it up.
Go home and get the rest of everything.
- See you tonight.
Kiss?
- Save it.
Okay, let's go.
Hit the radio.
You still scared?
Eh, you don't have to answer.
I wanna tell you somethin'.
If that kid cries or squawks too loud, I'm blamin' you.
There's no price on your head, so I'm not gonna worry about damagin' the merchandise.
You understand what I mean?
- Yes.
- You seem pretty cool.
Maybe you're workin' up some cute ideas.
Well, forget 'em.
If I see anything that bothers me,
I'm not gonna ask questions or wait for answers.
So don't hang any steppins to dry in the window.
Steppins in the window.
There's a room in there, and you can sleep with the kid.
Now, whenever you want, you can fool around out here, you know, play the radio.
But when I say get in there, you do it.
- May we go in there now?
- If you want to, but leave that blanket on the window.
Keep the door open all the time, even when you're sleeping.
- Cheryl won't be able to sleep very well with the light coming in from this room.
- You see that she does.
-  We interrupt this program to bring you a special new bulletin.
Camden Ohio police report that nine year old Cheryl Vito may have been kidnapped.
When the daughter of steel executive Andrew Vito didn't return from school with her nurse,
Miss Lynn Grayson, a search was made, and no sign of the child or the nurse was found.
Authorities suspect that Miss Grayson, only a day in the Vito employ, may have been the contact for a kidnap ring.
No ransom notes have been received as yet.
Stay tuned to this station for further reports as they come through.
-  Did you hear that, huh?
How's it feel to be number one suspect?
Where you goin'?
- To our room.
- Well this time, you didn't say may I?
- Aren't you a little young for Giant Steps?
- Look at that, you made the great stone face laugh.
I didn't know you were such a wisenheimer.
You smart off with me again.
- May I?
- Yes, you may.
You may take three butterfly steps.
- We're just one great big vaudeville act, ain't we?
-  A ransom note has been delivered to the home of Andrew Vito.
This afternoon, nine year old
Cheryl Vito and her nurse,
Miss Lynn Grayson, disappeared from the school grounds only a scant block and half from the Vito home.
Police have not released the details of the note as yet.
This station will report on them as soon as possible.
-  What are these two doin' here?
You're supposed to be back in the city.
- But the child's probably cold and frightened and hungry.
And I'm not leavin' till I see that she's all right.
- Listen, you kind-hearted, white-haired old granny, this ain't a weekend's fishin'.
Too many people up here outta season, and the whole works can blow.
- Don't bother me.
- You're supposed to be back handlin' the contact.
- Just came along for the ride,
Kelly.
I'll go on back.
This way you can get rid of one of the cars, too.
- Hungry?
- Yeah, I am.
Why did you bring a parade?
- I couldn't find them.
- I just brought some little things for the youngster.
Gee, I could've brought some of Martha's things for you if I knew what size you were.
- It's awfully kind of you to think of Cheryl.
- Well, it's not her fault that Daddy's rich.
Is it, sweetheart?
- Are you my grandma?
- Heavens no, honey.
But I'd like to have a little girl like you, though.
- There's only her father.
She's all he has.
- Guess what's in here?
- I can't see it, I don't know.
- There you are.
Something to keep you company.
- I have Lynn to keep me company.
- Say thank you.
- Thank you.
- I'll take care of the baby doll, and you can take care of me.
I don't know what you have to do with this.
Please, won't you help us?
- Now look, don't ask something I can't give.
You just do as you're told, and the both of you'll be home before you know it.
You hungry?
- No.
- Well the little one is.
Go on, get out there and earn your keep.
Go on, go ahead.
Oh now, now.
Look here.
You don't see her cryin', do you?
And she's even littler than you.
-  More information on the Vito kidnapping.
The contents of the ransom note have been released to the press.
It's on a standard
Western Union form.
The message cut out of newspapers and magazines.
It reads, your daughter is safe, she will stay safe, as long as you follow instructions.
Go to the police if you want to, but be ready for the worst if they get in the way.
We want $100,000.
Stay by your phone, remember the number you hear.
- Okay, get your old lady and Frank outta here.
- Ma is with the kid.
- She oughta buy a cap and a rockin' chair.
- Very funny, Georgie.
- Well, I guess I better see this is clean.
- How old are you?
- What?
- How old?
- Hm.
- Married?
- No.
- Oh that's right, they said miss on the radio, didn't they?
You got a boyfriend?
- In a way.
- Nice guy?
- Yes,
- Big, tall?
- Fairly.
- Big as me?
- No.
- Is he good?
You know, as long as we're here, and we're gonna be here for a couple days, there's no reason we can't get some good out of it, eh?
I mean, put the kid to bed, go on.
Now, don't start yellin'.
You wouldn't wanna wake the kid, would you?
Now, there's nothin' to be afraid of, sweet face.
I just wanna show you how to live a little, that's all.
You need a big man.
- Okay, big man.
Sit down.
- That's a big gun, George.
- That's right.
Why don't you go outside and take a look around.
- Yeah.
- Thank you.
- You're gonna be a lot of trouble.
-  This station is kept to inform about the kidnapping of little Cheryl Vito.
Now we turn over our facilities to her father in hopes that her words might have some effect upon the people that have taken her from him.
-  I want to say to whoever has my little girl that I'm ready to pay anything you ask.
I got the telephone call, but
I couldn't hear the number, you hung up too fast.
Please, please call again.
- What's he tryin' to pull?
-  You know I've called in the police, but they promised not to interfere, now please believe me, this isn't a trick.
I just didn't get the number.
I just want my little girl back.
She's all I have.
Please believe me, please believe me.
- That was Daddy!
-  People of this entire nation beg the kidnappers to do nothing in panic.
There is no trap possible here.
Please call again, call again.
- Get bright eyes in bed, it's past her bedtime anyhow.
Come on, come on!
- You think you have a talent for this type of thing, Mr.
Kelly?
- Get in there.
- Your girlfriend's back.
- I heard it on the radio.
- I don't like the sound of it.
- It's nothing.
Frank must've gotten a little nervous.
- Okay, you go back and tell him to speak clear this time and do it now.
- It can wait.
It'll make Vito riper.
- Get down to the store and call now!
- Well.
-  We ask again that the kidnappers please call back.
Mr. Vito is prepared to cooperate fully with your demands.
Please call back.
- Hangin's too good.
- They use the chair now.
- That's even better.
The kind of people who do somethin' like that.
Yes ma'am.
- I go the wrong cigarettes.
My husband smokes Camels.
Better make it a carton.
- The whole carton?
- Mm-hm.
- Yes.
-  We ask again that the kidnappers please call back.
Mr. Vito is prepared to cooperate fully with your demands.
We will repeat this every 15 minutes until we receive further instructions.
- You know this kidnappin' business is awful.
- Oh, yes it is.
- What kind of people, what kind?
- Well, hanging's too good for them.
- That's just what I said, exactly.
- Ah, I gotta get going.
- Okay, stop around later?
- Maybe.
Haven't seen you around before.
- My husband and I rented a cabin for a few days.
- Hunting?
- No.
Hunting's out of season, and you know it.
My husband's a writer.
He writes articles.
We thought he'd write better up here.
- Just like to know who's about, but just in case anything happens, we can help you.
Call if you need me.
- Thanks ever so much.
Now what?
- Tobacco for his pipe?
- Mm-mm, smokes cigarettes.
Only one thing to do, call him up.
- Oh, you can put a sack of flour in the car, if you please.
- A whole sack?
- Mm-hm, if you please.
- Yes, ma'am.
- Anything wrong?
- No, I just wanna see you off all right.
Woman late at night's not always safe.
- I'll be careful.
- How long will you be staying?
- No idea.
- Been here long?
- Mm-mm.
Got here this afternoon.
- Plate from New York, huh?
- From the middle of the city to the middle of the country.
- Well, good night, and be careful.
- Uh-huh.
- You forget something?
- To call in.
- The little lady must be expecting to do a batch of baking bread and biscuits.
- Yeah?
- Bought a whole sack of flour.
- Susie, this is Freddie.
Just put a couple of calls through from the General Store.
Where to?
Just one, to Youngstown, Ohio.
Susie, put me through to the state police.
- I knew I should've waited until morning.
- What's the matter.
- A cop was in the store.
- I put a call to Frank in double talk.
He got the message all right.
When I came back, the cop was still pokin' around the car and asking questions.
- How many did you have to answer?
- Oh, I don't think enough to hurt.
- Wrap the kid up, we're gettin' outta here.
- What for?
So some cop noses around the car.
Maybe he was just lonely for a good-lookin' broad.
- We'll clear out to a gas station, wrap the kid up.
-  We repeat the message to the abductors of little Cheryl Vito.
Mr. Vito is prepared to cooperate fully with your demands.
- Well, here's the tracer on that Youngstown, Ohio call.
It's a bar called the Blue
Sky, public booth in it.
- Got a man there?
- I posted one as soon as I found out.
The Ohio office is checking out for us.
- Clinton.
Okay.
- They just identified
Howard as one of the men mixed up in the Lebanon bank job and that Elizabethtown mess.
- State boy described a
Louisville paper found in the suspect car.
Those two bank jobs six months ago,
Lebanon and Elizabethtown.
Whoever gunned Howard and the others might be tied in.
One of them used a machine gun, the mob was sieved.
- It's possible.
Elizabethtown got Maize killed and Howard hit.
Check up on everybody who knew either one of them.
We need more.
- A set of phony license plates, the newspaper, the description of a girl.
We have them running.
Let's hope they don't dump the kid so they can travel faster.
-  We repeat the message to the abductors of little Cheryl Vito.
Your message has been received.
We will repeat this every 15 minutes until we receive further instructions.
- Now we can make the pickup and the first payment.
Apple, you go in--
- I'll give the orders, Flo.
- We planned it this way, that's why Apple's in.
- Now I changed my mind.
- You don't mean I'm out.
- No, but we're bringin' somebody else in.
- Well, you have to cut
Harry in extra as is.
If you didn't run from the cabin, we wouldn't have.
-  It was you who almost blew the lid off back at that general store.
- I did?
I did nothing, nothing!
What about your, uh, little goof at the Elizabethtown job, eh?
A coffin scared you silly.
- Don't say any more, Flo.
You know I don't like to be called about that.
- You don't like?
You silly, scared bum.
Not just of coffins, graveyards and things.
He's scared to die, to get hurt, to do anything.
- Well everybody is, Flo, everybody.
- Not like you.
You were peddlin' watered down gin when I picked you up.
I gave you the machine gun, the name, the reputation.
I gave you a backbone.
- Look, there's no locks, you didn't have to stick.
- You know why?
Because you were dumb enough and scared enough.
I could use you, make you do anything I wanted you to.
You were my gun hand.
- Don't shame me, Flo, don't shame me.
- I could've had 50 better than you, and I still can.
They wouldn't push around so easy.
- And you're the one that's scared.
You're scared when your looks went, you'd have nobody.
- That's right, smart guy.
But I was gonna leave you after this one.
I finally pushed you to the big time, big kill.
I wasn't planning for you to be around to spend the money.
- Flo, you're not bein' very smart.
'Cause I'm gonna kill you now.
- Ah, you haven't got the guts.
- There was Howard and his mob, wasn't there?
- Because I made you do it.
I made you beg me to understand why you were afraid of dying and things about death.
I mothered you till you went out to prove to me that you were a man!
Everybody knows you're not.
- You were always so soft and so easy.
I never knew that.
- Leave her alone.
Shut her up, or I'll slap her silly.
- You want to be as brave as your man?
- Flo baby, you want a new man now?
- Sure.
Sure.
- Get your hands off me,
I don't want your help.
- I feel sorry for you, George.
I never saw anybody look the way you did when she told you about yourself.
- Georgie shouldn't do things like that.
He's hitting old Harry again.
Apple, slap the boy's wrist, huh?
- Go ahead, Apple, and
I'll peel and core you.
- Put the gun away, George.
- Yeah, you must be crazy, Flo.
Well, Apple?
'Bout time I killed somebody, go ahead.
- Oh, we wouldn't have made a very good team, anyway.
That's how I like it, baby.
- Flo, get her and the kid in the other room.
- Go for your gun.
Harry, you pick him up, take him outside.
Harry?
- Yeah?
- I ain't ever gonna hit you again.
- I know, George.
- Blue Sky?
Is Fandango there?
Put 'em on, will ya?
- Why you calling Fanny?
- I need him for a job.
- He hates you.
- We're not scared of him, are we?
Besides, we need him to make a pick up.
Hey, Fandango?
This is George Kelly,
Machine Gun Kelly.
I got a job for you, what you do like better, money or revenge, huh?
- I'm not mad at you anymore,
George.
Say, you really made the headlines this time, didn't you?
Where should I drop the money?
Oh, all right, bye.
- All right, how'd you lose your arm.
- 1917, the war, you know.
-  You were about 15 then.
- Oh?
May I have a cigarette, please?
Thank you.
Actually, I lost it when I was a boy.
Match, please.
I was working in circus as a trapeze performer, and one night, I fell and smashed it badly.
- Who was the call from?
- What call?
- The one at the Blue Sky?
- Oh, that.
A friend.
- Who?
- I told you, a friend.
- Tell me again.
- His name's Phillip Ashton, you don't believe me?
If you don't believe me, you can go call him and check.
- We will.
- Well, anything else you wanna know?
- No, you can walk now.
- Oh, well thank you very much.
Bye.
- Well, that's it.
You'll step wrong sooner or later.
- I've got my best man on him.
- Let's hope he's the pickup man.
The kidnappers contacted Vito.
He's all set to deliver
50,000 in cash.
If Fandango's the one, we can follow him through the hoops.
- He got away.
- Where?
- Down the hallway.
- Well how did it happen?
- Well, he stalled for a minute, then ducked into the ladies' restroom.
- What?
Yes.
What did you say?
-  Listen, you want the kidnappers?
Well shut up and don't stall for a trade.
The gang is run by
Machine Gun Kelly.
Later on, I'll tell you where.
- That call may have been from our friend, Mr. Fandango.
The head of the gang is
George Kelly, sometimes known as Machine Gun.
- When rabbits roar, it's a bad time.
- Harry?
- Yeah.
- You feel all right?
- Okay.
- You're a good boy, Harry.
You know, you've been real good this time around.
You're no longer a hired hand,
I'm gonna make you a partner.
That's right, a full partner.
1/3 of the pie is yours.
- A third, huh?
With Fandango, that makes four of us.
- Well, Fanny won't be playin' fair.
At least I don't think he will.
He'll be pickin' up the money pretty soon.
Why don't you take the car, go down and meet him after he gets it, see?
But don't walk right up to him, follow him a little.
And if he doesn't head straight for the meetin' place, you bring him in.
- I got ya.
- They all right?
- They're both asleep.
- That's good.
- You worried about 'em?
- I'm leavin' George.
- I don't have to tell you now, hurry back, huh?
- I'll hurry.
- No, I'm not worried about those two in there.
I was just hoping they'd sleep through so they won't know.
- Know what?
- When they were killed.
Flo, we're not going for the hundred, we'll take 50.
That'll be enough for me for a while.
- You?
- Oh, you know I mean us.
We can stall the cops a couple of more weeks by having more instructions and messages go through.
By that time, we can be out of the country.
You know, all we have to do is hire a couple of blind stiffs to make calls they don't know anything about.
Maybe it's better the kid won't have to bother growin' up.
- You ready, Mr. Vito?
- Yes.
This money doesn't mean a thing to me.
You're not staking out this place where I'm going.
- Don't you worry, Mr. Vito.
We won't make a move until we know your little girl is safe.
- Well, all we can do is wait and hope the informer calls us.
We could pick up Frank
Ellstrom and his wife now.
- Good.
- Speaking.
Yes.
It was our little bird, gas station out on the highway.
- All right, Fanny.
- Oh, Harry.
- Goin' home?
- Yeah, as a matter of fact,
I was.
I gotta go pick up my car.
- Good, I'll keep you company.
- Oh, all right then, would you mind carryin' this for me?
Because I wanna light a cigarette.
- My good arm's occupied, Fanny.
- Oh.
- Turn to the left, get onto the highway.
- Left, meeting place isn't that way.
- No kiddin'.
We figured you'd yell copper, so we changed our minds a little bit.
- Oh, fine.
It's all right with me.
Where are we goin', your place?
- Mm-hm, you'll be glad to say hello to your playmates, sweetheart.
- Oh Harry, don't be cruel.
You were following me very well.
I didn't even see you, and
I could hardly hear you.
I guess your experiences as the great white hunter--
- Knock it off, cripple.
- Okay Harry, bring your friend in.
- He's our little friend.
- Hello, fink.
- What do you mean by that, Flo?
- George, stop!
What's the matter, honey, what happened?
- I heard a scream, someone was screamin'.
- Gonna lay down, sir?
- Tell me what happened?
- I was in a coffin.
You had put me in a coffin!
- You're crazy, honey!
You had a bad dream!
- I'm pretty sure you're gonna be in one.
Shut her up!
-  Kelly, George Kelly.
We're out here, Kelly.
- How did they found out?
- Me, me, I told 'em
Georgie boy, yeah.
I was weak enough to be pushed around, mangled, maimed, that's what you thought.
Now they're out there, go on, go fight 'em.
Go fight 'em, yeah, yeah make those dreams of yours about coffins and burials come true.
- Not you, Fanny.
- Yeah me, you stupid animal, me!
Yeah, I told 'em, do you think when you were talkin' to me over the telephone,
I didn't hear that mountain lion?
That's a sound I couldn't forget very easy, could I, George?
You thought you were a wise guy, huh?
Wise guy!
- Harry, stay away from the window, they'll shoot, they'll kill you!
Harry, stay away!
- You wanted the jungle, now live in it!
- Harry, don't shoot, don't shoot.
- They got a sniper out there.
We'll all get killed.
- Oh, no we won't.
You out there, listen to me!
The little girl and her nurse are here!
You keep shootin' I will put them in a place where they'll be hit!
-  Are you
Florence Becker?
- Yes I am!
-  We have your mother and father in custody as accessories.
It's all over, there's no place to run, even if we let you out of there.
Don't do anything foolish.
Let the child and her nurse go, and we'll offer a recommendation to the courts.
- Did you hear that?
We'll live.
- You always wanna give up, don't you?
- Well Flo, why die for nothin'?
Just to show that we got some guts?
Flo, I don't wanna show mine with my life spillin' out of 'em!
- You watch it, Georgie, your shadow'll scare you to death someday!
- Flo, please do what I say, put the gun down.
- Uh-uh, Machine Gun Kelly.
You liked being called that, didn't you?
Well, I made you, and
I'll make your name stick whether you like it or not.
For those two dead, you'll get the chair, and I'll plead that I'm a woman, and I'm scared of you.
It'll be a nice touch, huh?
- I never wanted any of it.
I didn't want to be public enemy number one.
I didn't want any part of it,
Flo.
It was all your fault.
It's your fault.
It's your fault.
- You all right, miss?
- This one got in the throat.
-  He's dead.
- You the tough man in the crowd?
You got a tough name, Kelly.
Why didn't you shoot it out?
- 'Cause I knew you'd kill me.
-  Machine Gun Kelly.
Come on along, Top Gun Kelly.
TOHO CO. LTD., JAPAN MCMLVI
SAMURAI III
DUEL AT GANRYU ISLAND
Produced by
KAZUO TAKIMURA
FROM HIDEJI HOJO'S ADAPTATION OF
THE NOVEL MUSASHI by EIJI YOSHIKAWA
Screenplay by TOKUHEI WAKAO and HIROSHI INAGAKI
Cinematography
KAZUO YAMADA
Art Direction
HIROSHI UEDA and KISAKU ITO
Sound
MASANOBU MIYAZAKI
Lighting
TSURUZO NISHIKAWA
Music
IKUMA DAN
Cast
Musashi Miyamoto - TOSHIRO MIFUNE
Kojiro Sasaki - KOJI TSURUTA
Otsu - KAORU YACHIGUSA
Omitsu - MICHIKO SAGA
Akemi - MARIKO OKADA
Court Official - TAKASHI SHIMURA
Directed by
HIROSHI INAGAKI
"Drying Pole" my poor sword.
Your owner, a master swordsman, is still unrecognized.
How long must he remain a ronin?
Will Kojiro Sasaki's dream remain unattained?
Blind fools!
Poor swallow.
Not just anyone can do that.
The "swallow turn" swing.
I'll kill Musashi with it.
Why must you fight him?
It's my long cherished dream.
He's got nothing against you.
Why must you kill him?
Tell me!
You're a devil!
Why get excited about him?
Please. Forget him.
I won't mention him from now on.
So please.
Conceited girl!
I'm not after him because of you.
He's good.
He's my only match in this country today.
My dream is to fight him.
He must dream of it too.
Akemi, stop!
I won't.
You scare me.
You horrify me.
You'll go looking for Musashi?
Go, then.
If you see him, remind him that he is to duel with Kojiro Sasaki.
He must not lose his life before then.
Musashi!
NARA
MARTIAL ARTS TOURNAMENT
BY THE HOZOIN TEMPLE PRIESTS
Who's next?
Come on!
You?
No, I pass.
- How about you?
- Maybe some other time.
If no one sallies forth,
I'll leave.
I'll call myself today's winner!
Any objections?
Speak up!
You may come in a group.
No one?
No contenders? Oh, well.
Let's go.
Damn monks!
What? Wait, kid!
I like your spirit.
You insulted me audaciously.
You challenged me. Let's go!
Fight with you?
You can't?
Then why did you say that?
He's only a child.
Forgive him.
- Who are you?
- His companion.
- You urged him?
- No, it was my own idea.
Then you'll fight with me.
You may attack me together, if you wish.
- Please.
- I won't forgive him.
I apologize in his place.
No!
I was insulted publicly.
I won't swallow it.
Fool.
You're a prize fool, Agon.
Agon, stop it.
No!
Stop!
You're no match for him at all.
He's peerless.
Hasn't lost in 60 odd matches.
Stop it!
Musashi Miyamoto?
This is no fight.
The winner of the tournament is Priest Agon here!
Priest Agon reminded me of your old self.
- Yes.
- I marvel at your improvement.
Strength alone won't make an accomplished swordsman.
He must be strong.
At the same time, he must be just.
I want to be able to fight without regrets.
My past encounters were full of them.
"One can only smile contentedly after 10 years of pilgrimage."
Musashi, you still have much to learn.
I feel so pleased tonight.
Have you ever fallen in love?
I know a person who's madly in love with you.
Do you want to meet this person?
Well...
So there's already someone in your heart.
Don't worry.
The person I'm talking about is a man.
- A man who longs for a man?
- Yes, a man.
He wants to meet you and he hasn't even seen you once.
Who is he?
Lord Yagyu.
What? The Lord Shogun's teacher?
Yes. Why don't you go to Edo and see Yagyu?
You brought a letter from Lord Karasumaru? I see.
So your name's Otsu.
Are you connected with Musashi Miyamoto?
Yes, Your Grace.
I'm looking for him.
You're too late.
He was here until this morning.
- He was here?
- Yes, but he's left for Edo.
Stop.
Don't chase him.
I must see him.
I see, you care for him.
EDO
I am Okaya.
One moment.
Why cover the spearhead?
Don't worry about hurting me, please.
But -
Take it off.
Note his assurance, my Lord.
Now that I have uncovered it, use a sword yourself.
No, this will do.
- I won't fight like this.
- It's all right.
No, use your sword!
No.
I am only a masterless ronin.
If I use my sword, it will offend His Lordship.
Full of confidence, sir.
Okaya, let him have his way.
He overdid it.
It's an embarrassment.
Was the audience successful?
Well -
I'm afraid not.
- Why? A man of your ability!
It's true.
My opponent was not very strong.
I should have been gentle.
- Did you win?
- I did.
True, he will live.
But as a cripple.
Nobody will hire a swordsman who cripples his vassal.
I overdid it.
I like it.
You always mean business.
I feel I've done nothing wrong, but people disagree.
What are you doing?
Still like me after I tore your present?
I did the same thing today.
I will remain a ronin.
I like it.
I like your straightforward character.
Omitsu.
Elope with me.
I love you.
Please, no!
Don't you want freedom?
Don't you love me?
If you do, follow me.
I am leaving Edo.
Where are you going?
These young men of today!
Impertinent. Conceited.
Please.
You don't know how upset he's been about today's match.
- Did he tell you that?
- No, Father.
Only I can sense it.
Okaya, is it very painful?
It is.
I was lucky it wasn't a sword.
I'm very sorry, believe me.
I was just no match for you.
I'm only ashamed of myself, but I won't blame you.
Did you get the job?
Take good care of yourself.
And I thought he was arrogant.
But he's fine.
I never knew it.
- Kojiro visited Okaya?
- Okaya told me so himself, sir.
What do you suggest?
If he really meant to console Okaya, he must be quite a person.
I'm for employing him.
Who is better, your Musashi or him?
Musashi is said to be a peerless swordsman.
I must see Musashi.
Try to find him for me.
And Kojiro?
I'll think it over.
Watch it, idiot!
Hey, kid!
Your master's been carving images for days.
Did he quit? Is he really a swordsman?
- None of your business!
Keeper, is this really an inn?
Master.
When will you see the Shogun's teacher?
- I won't.
- Really?
Where's the letter the monk gave you?
I threw it away.
You shouldn't have.
Lord Yagyu might've recommended you to the Shogun.
You disgust me.
Why?
If you succeed in life, so will I.
Jotaro, is that why you've followed me?
But why stay here then?
Waiting for her?
- Who?
- Otsu.
Fool!
I know you want to see her.
I'm positive.
- You are?
- Sure.
Look. This is her face.
Why? Please.
Why not?
No. Don't.
You mustn't.
Yes, I want to see her.
But she'll refuse to see me.
Why?
I did something shameful to her.
Fight! Fight!
It's four to one.
And he's winning!
I'm not finished yet!
What skill!
Where is he?
Samurai, he posted a declaration.
These four men are students of the Obana Strategic School.
The one responsible for killing them is Kojiro Sasaki of Isaragozaka.
I appreciate your kind deed.
However, Miyamoto, the bodies you brought have nothing to do with my school.
But it's said that they drew when he slandered you.
Please.
No student of mine could be so weak.
You call me a meddler, then?
Miyamoto, this school is an honorable school that has served the Shogun.
My 100 students are accomplished men.
I see.
Forgive my rudeness for bringing the corpses.
Please, wait a minute.
Let me pass.
Master Obana told me they could not be his men.
Do not be offended.
Please give them up to us.
I will not.
The dead men won't like it.
Fortunately, I know several sutras.
I'll bury them myself.
I learned a lesson today.
HERE LIE FOUR UNKNOWN SAMURAI
So it is you.
I thought it was one of them.
Thank you for your help last year.
You fought marvelously at Ichijoji Temple.
I witnessed it.
I learned of your ability today for the first time.
Those four.
One stroke each.
Duel me.
Kid. Go away for a while.
Be calm no matter what you see.
I've always wanted to meet you.
- Ready?
- Stop.
- Are you afraid?
- No, but today's not the day.
What?
Elsewhere.
If we fight here, they may say I fought for the Obana School, which is not true.
Let us set a proper time and fight freely.
You're right.
Tomorrow evening,
I'll be at the East Gate. Understood?
Very good.
You've been evading me.
Are you scared of me?
No.
However, I won't elope with you.
You think I'm joking?
You meant it.
You're a darling.
I meant it.
But I've changed my mind.
- Why?
- Tomorrow night you'll know.
I'll succeed or die.
You won't be seeing me either way.
If I win, I'll seek larger fortunes.
If I lose, I'll be dead.
In either case, you'll always remember me as your lover.
His Lordship.
- What was it?
- Well, he was delighted.
He wants to hire Kojiro as his teacher.
That's wonderful.
Kojiro did something bold.
Where is he?
I'll bring him here.
- You've returned?
- I bring good news!
Come in.
My Master heard about you and Obana's students.
Please.
They were just weaklings.
It brought me no credit.
However, their master is the Lord Shogun's teacher.
Vengeance will be sought.
- I'll fight.
- Listen to me.
You are too full of youthful vigor.
"Such personal feuds must be stopped," my master said.
He suddenly decided to employ you.
Well? If you become
Lord Hosokawa's teacher, they dare not attack you.
- I decline.
- What?
I dislike seeking protection.
Don't be silly.
If the Obana School challenges you, you can fight as Lord Hosokawa's teacher.
It's not like you to decline.
Another thing.
Chief Retainer Sado is recommending Musashi.
Musashi?
He's being sought quietly.
We must decide this before they find him.
Taking the initiative is always advantageous.
Listen.
I duel with Musashi tomorrow.
What! With him?
So your worries are over.
This man's dreams are too grand.
Place your bets!
Game!
What noise!
Hey, be quiet!
Thanks.
They got quiet.
You're persuasive.
- Sure!
Excuse me.
Hey, ronin.
Stop eating.
Admit you're scared.
Don't pretend you're calm at heart.
Stop!
Who are you?
Don't know me?
Those who don't know me here, must be deaf.
Speak loudly, as I'm hard of hearing.
Who are you?
- Shut up!
I'm Kumagoro the horse-dealer, a real tough guy.
And when I say tough,
I mean tough.
Horse-dealer, eh?
I deal with samurai.
I handle live horses, mind you.
So what?
You sent this kid to me to tell me to be quiet, didn't you?
I have a big voice.
You don't own this inn, do you?
- So what?
- Apologize.
Write a letter of apology addressed to us all.
Or I'll take you out in the yard and wash your face with horse piss.
- Amusing.
- What?
Very interesting indeed.
Don't talk back to me!
Now answer me at once!
Depending on how you answer, you could get this!
Let's see, what shall I do?
There are too many.
Wash these sticks.
He's terrific!
Training for revenge?
I'm his pupil now.
Musashi Miyamoto! No wonder!
- Are you out of your head?
- Of course not!
Horse-dealer.
Did you say Musashi?
Does he live here?
Now I fully understand you.
I will not force my ideas on you.
However, will you be good enough to see my Master?
But I am to fight a duel tonight.
A duel?
It will be the most memorable fight of my life.
Who's your man?
- Kojiro Sasaki.
- Sasaki?
- Is that true?
- Yes.
In fact, Sasaki has been referred to my colleague Iwaoka and is to meet my master either today or tomorrow.
What? Kojiro?
Miyamoto, if you win, do not fail to accept my offer.
Must you fight?
Hey, kid.
Where is Musashi?
I have decided to leave on a journey.
Let me please postpone the promised match for a year.
When we meet again,
I will be quite ready to vie with you.
Musashi Miyamoto.
Why do you cry?
I don't like it.
That Kojiro as Hosokawa's teacher!
I dreamt of worldly success once.
I thought it was natural to settle down.
But now I want to train myself further.
Jotaro.
I'm hungry.
Let's eat, shall we?
- Kuma.
- What?
I was here before you, wasn't I?
Yes, that's right.
Call me Master Jotaro.
I say, Master Jotaro.
What is it?
A man should be kind to those who follow him.
It's time for lunch, isn't it?
Get down!
- Drop the reins.
- Or we'll shoot.
Surrender your swords.
Step back.
How did you make it here safely?
- We met bandits.
- Nothing happened?
We won a horse.
Do they appear often?
More than often, sir.
They're ruining us.
They steal our crops, they steal our women.
We're completely at their mercy.
Many have left the village for safety.
Imagine.
They won a horse!
Isn't that something?
Do you have an ax to cut down trees?
Master.
Why are we felling trees?
To build a hut.
What for, Master?
- We'll live here.
- Here?
And plow.
What about training for sword fighting?
As we plow, we will learn the way of the sword.
Let's get to it.
Welcome!
Hurry up, will you, girls?
They'll be angry. Hurry!
They seem like rich people.
We'll get rich!
Hurry, hurry.
Oh, really?
The keeper will get rich.
And we'll get thinner.
The greedy pimp!
Hurry up!
Hanagiri, are you free?
Let me have a moment.
We're short one girl for five customers. Hanagiri!
Keeper.
Do all your girls wear bells?
No, sir, she's the only one.
Jingles around like a kitten.
Hanagiri, you say?
Bring her at once.
You have a sharp ear.
Reminded of someone?
You win.
We'll stick to drinks then.
She's here. Come in.
Hanagiri.
So it is you.
You're mocking me, aren't you?
I'm not that heartless.
I know you.
You're worse than that.
I didn't even touch you.
Because of your vanity.
Had I not loved him, you would have.
Probably.
Come here and serve us drinks.
This girl cares deeply for Musashi.
Unrequited love.
See her now.
Stop!
I may be soiled, but my heart is pure.
Is it?
I'll tell you where he is now.
He plows at Hoten Field in Shimosa.
Care to go?
Please don't kid around, sir.
If she leaves, I'll suffer a big loss.
Keeper.
Is this enough?
Just a farmer.
- A woman?
- What?
Stop!
What a find!
Stop!
I saw her first, didn't I?
Somebody, help!
A girl.
Damn, it's those bandits again.
Let's go!
Help!
Why, Otsu!
Why, Jotaro!
More loot.
Master!
- What, is it time to eat?
- Big news! Otsu came!
Otsu?
Lord Yagyu of Edo told her, she says.
They already know that you live here.
Bring me something to wear.
She's washing her face now to make herself presentable.
Will you hurry?
I missed you.
I thought you were mad at me.
But why?
I was to blame.
It was sudden, so -
You forgive me?
I won't leave you again.
That's the hut we built.
We three live in it.
And we've tilled those patches of land.
It was barren.
But it's yielding crops lately thanks to our labor.
In the old days,
I used to hate farm work.
I was always daydreaming, longing for victory and renown.
I could think of nothing else.
Now I'm tilling the fields again.
Isn't it strange?
I'm beginning to learn the value of life.
The soil has taught me that.
Jotaro.
Cook something for Otsu.
I'll ask Old Gen to house her.
Otsu, aren't you happy to see him again?
He's still upset with me.
What happened?
- Listen, Jotaro.
- Master Jotaro.
Yes, sir.
I don't understand him at all.
Me neither.
He's started carving again.
He told me he'd done something bad to her.
It can't be true.
If that were so, why would she come here?
You're right.
Who goes there?
I hate to leave the village.
I'll stick by it, even if I may be killed on account of it.
Please, sir, teach us how to fight.
We must drive the bandits away from here!
Please, Master!
It's no use teaching you how to fight.
You must learn to run.
Run away from them, sir?
Lose today, win tomorrow.
You're going there by yourself?
Yes. I made it here alone.
But It's dangerous from here on.
The way to the next village is infested with bandits.
I've been around bandits since I was a child.
My father was a bandit, too.
Isn't my lunch ready yet?
It is.
It's best you disguise yourself as a man.
They'll stop any girl.
Men have already made a plaything of me.
I don't mind anything now.
If I can see him,
I'll die content.
One moment.
Men come here regularly to buy oil and salt.
Wait till then and go with them.
A good idea.
That may be them.
Give us drinks!
It's been bad since those ronin got here.
I hear they're teaching them how to wield a sword.
Who are they?
We've got to destroy them, anyway.
This is too small.
Bring bigger bowls!
Keeper.
That your daughter?
No.
Hey, girlie! Come here!
What are you doing?
Why, it's Akemi.
Toji.
Yes, it's me.
Know her?
She's Oko's daughter.
I see.
What happened to my mother?
Where is she?
I killed her.
Toji, you were there when she was killed!
You joined up with them to save your own skin!
Shut up!
I was avenging my brother's death.
- Your brother?
Your mother and a man killed my brother, Temma Tsujikaze.
I'm Kohei Tsujikaze
- What are you talking about?
It was the two of you who killed my father!
I'll do the same to you.
There. That's the village.
Tell them the bandits were all arrested by the officials.
Understand?
And tomorrow evening, you set fire to Musashi's hut.
That's when we'll attack. Got it?
That's horrible.
I can't do it.
Don't be a fool!
Musashi is Kohei's enemy.
He's mine as well.
Kohei spared your life.
You must do it.
If you don't,
I'll have to kill you.
Don't. You're still sick.
But I can't stay idle here.
Stop!
Tell me.
Tell me what to do now.
Must I leave?
Well, no.
Tell me then.
Why do you evade me?
Do you dislike me?
Do you hate me?
Have I been erased from your heart?
Please!
You're hard-hearted, unfeeling.
I hate it!
But -
I can't go on living!
I wish I were dead!
Don't be foolish.
I am foolish!
Watch what a foolish girl does!
Stop!
What are you doing?
So, she's here.
This is because of her.
That dame!
I'm sorry.
Old Gen can accommodate another person.
Otsu won't like it.
Neither will Akemi.
I think I'll go ask Aunt Oseki.
- I'll do that for you.
- Me, too.
At last we're alone.
Why don't you like it?
You've changed, Akemi.
You do remember me.
I'm so glad.
Takezo, I've loved you since we lived in the hills.
I really cared for you.
You don't mean that.
But I do mean it.
That's what I tried to tell you when you were trapped at Ichijoji.
I didn't understand then.
Takezo, let's go away together.
Won't you?
- Stop it.
Oko, your mother, asked me to do that once.
Her blood runs in your veins.
No, I'm not like her.
Not at all.
I never loved a man till I met you.
I've never loved anyone but you.
That's why I came here.
I'm sorry.
It's not your fault.
You have Otsu.
I shouldn't be unreasonable.
I will leave in the morning.
Be happy with her.
Take care.
Takezo.
It's so hard.
But I'll give you up.
I promise.
Just hold me tightly before I go.
Crush me to death in your arms.
That's all I ask, then I'll give up.
Men!
I heard on my way here that all the bandits were arrested.
- Really?
- Yes.
The whole town's talking.
If they've been arrested, we're safe.
Now we can finally relax.
Akemi said that?
- Serves 'em right.
- Now we're saved.
Akemi, are you sure about the bandits?
Akemi!
Is it true?
You wouldn't believe me.
I'll stay here for a while.
I like it here.
Master, did you hear it?
Very good news, eh?
Old Gen, did you hear?
Yes, I did.
Let's stop work and celebrate!
When the sun rises, let's work
When the sun sets, let's relax
Heave-ho, hey, hey
Heave-ho, hey, hey
Let's dig a well and drink the water
Plow a field and eat the crops
Heave-ho, hey, hey
Heave-ho, hey, hey
Not even birds would visit our village
But we live here and it's our heaven
Heave-ho, hey, hey
Heave-ho, hey, hey
For a thousand years and forever
May our rice fields give us food
She'll signal to us with a fire.
You set the houses on fire!
You kill the villagers.
Don't take on Musashi.
I'll handle him.
You and I need to talk, and alone.
Let's have a drink.
Where's Otsu?
- She's at my house.
- She can play the flute.
Good idea.
I'll fetch her.
Otsu.
You're a woman, too.
You should know what a woman feels.
I'm in love with him.
Akemi.
You're terrible.
Why must you come between the two of us?
Otsu.
Take it up.
If you want him, fight!
How horrible!
Take it up.
Here I come!
Help! Somebody!
Fire!
Go!
Bring water!
Bandits! Bandits!
Calm down! Quiet!
Take the women and children to Old Gen's.
Musashi Miyamoto!
Come out!
Fight me!
Musashi! I'm here to avenge my brother's death!
Run!
Bastards!
Kuma!
Bastard!
Damn kid!
Hold on, Kuma.
Jotaro, you're... truly my master.
Akemi!
Well done!
What are you doing?
Akemi! Hold on!
Otsu.
I'm dying now.
I've been so wicked.
Oh, no!
You saved my life.
Don't die, Akemi.
Akemi.
Takezo.
At last you hold me in your arms.
Hold on, Akemi.
It's all over for me.
I can't even see you.
Be happy together, you two.
Musashi!
Where is Master Musashi?
I have been officially engaged as Lord Hosokawa's teacher
and will leave for Kokura, his Castle Town.
I am desirous to have our match
at Kokura, April next.
My Master's so unreasonable to leave you like this.
After all, his heart has chosen the way of the sword.
KOKURA TOWN
"By permission of Our Lord,
Retainer Kojiro Sasaki will duel with Musashi Miyamoto of Mimasaku Province."
Musashi.
In five days, eh?
Fight fair and square, like a true samurai.
He is a peerless match, sir.
I will not spoil your honorable name.
In four days.
I can hardly wait.
He's busy.
But I'm his childhood friend.
An intimate friend.
I was with him at the school of Master Ito.
I'm Ichinomiya from Yamazaki Dojo.
He'll know who I am.
Please, calm down!
They ignored me while I was a ronin.
But today even strangers want to meet me.
Such is life.
But that's something to rejoice over.
Your prowess will be acknowledged, definitely.
And after the match, another big event.
Another big event?
My daughter is impatient.
Don't go, Otsu!
Let me find my Master.
Please.
Why have I come all this way?
In this match he might meet the worst fate.
If so, I'll gather his remains.
So I must see him.
I must speak to him!
All right.
Out of the way!
From Musashi, sir?
"I will arrive in my own boat at the appointed hour.
I hope this is satisfactory."
I see.
He stayed away from here out of respect.
He'll go directly to the island.
But at what inn is he staying?
Hold on, Otsu.
What's wrong?
Help!
- What happened?
- She's sick.
Sick? Come this way.
Omitsu.
You look pensive.
Concerned I'll be defeated?
- Oh, no.
You may not expect it to happen, but you're still worried.
I'll defeat Musashi.
That has long been my ambition.
I'll defeat him through my own ability.
The prayers of those who wish me victory and talismans are useless to me.
Therefore, do not pray for me.
Affection and attachments disturb my inner tranquillity.
I want to fight alone.
Return to the castle.
Now I feel relieved.
- Hey, Sasuke. Is it ready?
- Sure.
It's an honor for a boatman to row for Master Musashi.
The boat's been purified.
Good.
He's ready to depart.
Thank you for the kind gift
I wear now.
I feel so refreshed.
Good luck, sir.
One moment.
I want you to see someone before you leave.
Me?
Don't bother to get up.
Otsu!
I can't see him like this.
Master!
Don't come in!
I'm coming!
Otsu.
At last we meet again.
You look weak. Are you very ill?
I'm cured now.
My illness is so whimsical, you know.
Otsu, let's take a walk, shall we?
This is the first time you ever asked me.
Of course I'll go with you.
Until today
I've walked my own way and made you suffer a lot.
Forgive me.
But I'm not as heartless as I may seem.
- I know.
- You do?
That's why I've loved you.
Otsu!
What an auspicious day.
I can fight with a clear conscience now.
Why do you cry?
I hate samurai.
I wish you were still the Takezo who I used to know.
Musashi, abandon your sword.
Don't fight!
Let them call you a coward!
I long for happiness, just us two together.
Otsu.
That's impossible now.
Please!
I won't let you go.
I won't.
Don't be unreasonable.
I'm a woman.
I wish you had been an ordinary man.
Otsu, don't demoralize me, please.
A samurai's wife sends off her man with a smile.
Especially when it might be for the last time.
Of course.
Is that Funa Island?
No, sir, that's Hiko Island.
Funa Island lies beyond that.
It's a smaller one.
Isn't this where a sea battle was fought in olden times?
Yes.
What's that for, sir?
For the duel.
You'll fight with a wooden one?
I like the size.
Listen.
If I lose and fall, take my dead body back to Otsu.
Dear God. Don't say that.
Take this as a memento of me.
Musashi's boat is sighted!
- Musashi is coming!
- Musashi has come!
Don't be nervous.
You'll see the mysterious power of my sword.
Watch me.
Musashi!
Mr. Miyamoto.
That was splendid.
He was the best swordsman
I will ever encounter.
I'm so glad.
I'm so glad!
I was praying I wouldn't bring
Master Musashi back dead.
I'm so glad about it all.
I'm so happy!
THE END
'Tis but a pothole, Ned. Whip them on.
- Come on. Get out of there. Get up.
- Get up there. Come on.
Hold, Ned, hold.
My lord, we're caught fast.
There is an inn not far distant.
Aye, I see it. If Your Lordship will be patient, I'll go there.
- I shall come as well.
- Yes, my lord.
Welcome, my lord. At your service, my lord.
My coach is bogged down. Send eight or ten men to free it.
Yes, my lord. Master
Murray, do you hear?
Nay, I have but now gone deaf.
I am in haste to get to London.
We're all in haste to get to London, were our horses fresh and the rain stopped.
- I beg you, Master Waltham, my lord is...
- I care not who my lord is, fat-chops.
I would not venture out to free the coach of the queen.
- And nor would any of my friends.
- I'm on the queen's business.
The last time I went on the queen's business was to the Irish wars. Here's all I got for that.
To free your coach might cost me the other one.
Derry, do you know that man?
- No. Not from Adam.
- I do, very well.
I'll take these fellows, my lord, and free your coach for you.
When I tell them sit, they move not.
- I'll say rise, and they will move.
- Your tongue wags like a dog's tail.
- It's not my tongue speaking.
- Then we speak the same language.
Now, my friend, I too am late come from the Irish wars, and I'm as poor as you, but I've spent nights in the Irish bogs that make this seem like July sunshine.
So, shall we free my lord's coach?
Friend, you beat me fair.
We'll either free his coach or carry him back to
London on our backs.
Come on, lads.
- Let's to work.
- It's wet outside.
- Bring my doublet.
- I'll catch my death of cold.
You English are a heartless race.
My lord, will you not stay till they free your coach?
Nay. I have learned to thrive on foul weather.
Come on. Heave.
- My lord.
- Well done.
Here. Go and drink yourselves dry again.
Aye, that we will, my lord.
As for you, sir, another medal.
Gold? Nay, my lord.
- And why not, pray?
- To serve my queen is reward enough.
- So, you fought in Ireland?
- Aye, my lord, as a captain of horse.
- From whence come you?
- From Devonshire.
A village called Hayes Barton.
Hayes Barton. In other days I had a friend there. Raleigh was his name.
- He was my father, sir.
- So say you?
Then I remember you well as a boy.
- Do you not know who I am?
- No, my lord.
In those days, I was Robert Dudley.
Now I am the Earl of Leicester, the Lord Chancellor of
England, and many other things.
- But your father, does he well?
- He's been dead these seven years.
Sad.
Raleigh, you have done me a service, I would do you one.
Wait on me at Whitehall Palace in the morning, three days hence.
Look, Your Lordship, my poor friend here isn't feeling very well today.
Drunk, my lord.
Come on now.
Come on. Giddap. Come on.
Have you no ears in your head? He offered you gold.
One small purse of gold?
My hopes soar higher than that.
If you remain in the army, something better for you will be found than services of captain.
Nay, my lord. I trust
I have done with wars.
- Something then in the civil government?
- I have no wish to haunt palaces.
What may I do for you, then?
Present me to Her Majesty the Queen.
- To the queen?
- I have long had a dream, my lord, to sail to the New World in ships of my own design.
I feel the queen would share that dream.
At the inn the other night, you knew who I was, did you not?
- Aye, my lord.
- I thought as much. You're clever, Walter.
No, sir, but sometimes a man must catch the nearest way.
I ask that I may be allowed to tell her my plan for these ships.
Perchance it will find favour with her.
She is a woman of both whims and wisdom.
But the whims are of the moment.
The wisdom will endure when you and I are dead.
Are those the only clothes you have? I shall be glad...
No, sir. I'll accept only what I have asked.
Like all Devon men, you're stubborn.
Proud, sir.
God help your pride if you should find favour with the queen.
- No.
- No?
Well, here is a cloak of Flemish velvet
- satin-lined, exquisitely embroidered.
Value
- only eight sovereigns.
Look, you, Master Tailor, these are cloaks for ordinary men.
I have a cloak fit for an emperor, tailored as you have never seen a cloak tailored before.
A very god amongst cloaks.
Such cut, such workmanship.
- Such imagination of design.
- Yes.
- Not that one, sir. This one.
- This one.
No. That is tailored for... Gently, sir, gently.
This is tailored for a most important man.
- He comes for it tomorrow. It is not for sale.
- It becomes me.
I fear to touch it, lest I harm the thread.
Please, I beg of you, sir. The French ambassador will never forgive me.
- The French ambassador?
- Yes.
- It's for him you're making this?
- Indeed, sir.
Does it not matter that when you deliver this cloak you will betray every tailor in London?
Do you think he will wear this cloak as it stands, when he has sworn to discredit the tailoring trade of London?
- The French ambassador? - Ambassadors
- what are they? Paid spies.
Do you know what he'll do? He'll set the tailor he keeps with him in secret to work.
One shoulder will drop. The hemline will drag. There'll be a tarnishing of the gold.
He'll say, "Here is English tailoring. "
- The French ambassador?
- Yes.
The frog-eating villain. Thank goodness you told me, sir.
- How much?
- The price is 20 sovereigns.
I hadn't thought of buying it.
- I wanted to hire it.
- Hire it?
For one day. I'll pay for a lesser cloak.
But you couldn't hire it, not for blood nor money. Something might happen to it.
Is this gratitude to the man who saved you from the wrath of every tailor in London?
Yes, but...
- And her name, Monsieur Ambassador?
- Does a gentleman reveal a lady's name?
But if you promise not to tell.
Her name was...
What do you see?
This fellow that came in with Leicester, who is he?
- Stranger to me.
- He has a fine cloak cut in the French fashion.
Too fine for the rest of him.
I'll soon find out.
I amuse you?
'Tis the fineness of your cloak.
May I ask how you came by it?
I took it from the corpse of a man I stabbed. He made the mistake of pawing me.
My apologies. You washed it well.
No, on the contrary. The fellow was bloodless, like yourself.
- Would you question me further, sir?
- No further.
Don't be bold, Beth.
Faith, were a woman not bold, she would lack for much pleasure.
- Master Stranger.
- Mistress Curiosity.
- What brings you to court?
- An audience with the queen.
You must be careful.
That man has the ear of Sir Christopher
Hatton, who has the ear of the queen.
- Is this the general rule of court etiquette?
- One of many, sir.
- Name more.
- It would take too long.
- Your voice is very pleasing to hear.
- Well.
Number one, keep a blank face, like those you see about you.
- Yours is not blank.
- Do not interrupt, sir.
Two, be careful to whom you speak and where. The walls are listening.
Three, do not be seen talking to such as I in the queen's presence. She'd take it amiss.
Four...
Mistress Throckmorton, is this your pet swine?
- You have cast pearls before him.
- Your Majesty.
Faith, 'tis no swine, for it speaks.
'Tis a man and a stranger to boot. Your name and business?
Captain Walter Raleigh.
New-come from Ireland.
With dispatches?
Your Majesty, Captain Raleigh's father and I were friends.
I have heard scant news of Ireland these many days.
There is good news, ma'am, and bad.
Alas, I believe it. Ireland is no better nor no worse than Whitehall Palace.
I am surrounded by dancers.
It will do me good to talk with a blunt man of war.
- Ma'am, the armour.
- The iron will not rust, Christopher.
I have been talking nonsense all morning.
- It will do me no harm to talk Ireland now.
- As you please, ma'am.
Yes, Christopher. As I please.
And it pleases me to see your armour.
Sir Christopher here has a breastplate engraven with the love of Mars and Venus.
You will come with us to inspect it. As a soldier, you can best value its worth.
And later, I have been sent fresh fruit and wine from Portugal.
Perhaps you will sup with us.
- Are you fond of armour, Captain?
- It saved my life on occasion, ma'am.
Spoken like a blunt soldier.
And the rest of my soldiers, fight they well in Ireland?
Your Englishman always fights well, ma'am. He's half hawk, half vulture.
- And you, are you half hawk and half vulture?
- Well, I soar high, but I eat no carrion.
The hawk has a pointed tongue.
Did you hear that, Christopher?
Aye, ma'am, clearly. Hawks have loud and raucous voices.
- Would you mellow mine, sir?
- Smooth your feathers, Captain.
We are all hawks here.
Hail the queen. Hail the queen.
Your Majesty.
Sir Christopher?
Would you leave your cloak in the mire?
Would I be so vainglorious as to wear...
Pick it up, man. Pick it up.
I'm not quite sure whether you please me or not.
However, you have qualities which the court sadly lacks.
- Must we stand here in the chill air?
- Your Majesty.
Sable. The finest sable.
As you say, ma'am, there is no finer fur.
Much too fine to waste on a mere queen.
- You have a wit, Captain.
- A poor reflection of your own, ma'am.
- Flattery, flattery.
- Flattery is something a soldier never learns.
More wine. And what is it the soldier does learn?
- Attacks? The storming of citadels?
- Aye, that. And more.
And women
- do you consider them citadels to be stormed?
They are not like citadels.
They have better defences.
- Some have walls of paper.
- But they are masters of retreat.
Mistresses, Captain, mistresses.
You may go.
And what is your next campaign?
I am already launched on it, ma'am. My next campaign is you.
It takes strategy to reach me.
I have already used much strategy.
- On whom?
- The Earl of Leicester, for one.
Then you are a soldier indeed.
But now that you have reached your citadel, what tactics will you use to storm the walls?
Honest ones, ma'am.
But suppose the walls were breached and the queen captured.
What ransom would you ask?
Three ships, no more.
- You talk of ships, Captain?
- Such ships as the world has never seen.
- We were talking of citadels.
- Every ship is a citadel.
Since I learned to walk, my life has been around them.
- Citadels?
- Ships. I know more of them than of women.
- Women?
- Believe me, ma'am, yes.
I know 100 ways in which they can be improved.
- Women?
- Ships, ma'am.
I've made designs for ships that will skim the waves like gulls, outrace anything afloat.
- I had thought you were a soldier.
- I am, but a sailor first of all.
I would take these ships of mine to the New World.
I would bring them back heavy with gold and spices. I'd swell the coffers of the realm.
Give me these ships, ma'am, and a year in the New World, and, before heaven, you'll be glad you met with me this day.
Raleigh. No one leaves the queen's presence without the queen's permission.
Depart this room and you will regret you met with me this day.
I regret it already, ma'am. I had thought you'd listen to an honest man.
Too few of them. I'm out of practice.
Do I have permission to leave?
You have not.
Faith, you spoke true when you said you knew not the ways of women.
- I spoke true in all I said.
- This is the court and no place to talk truth.
Furthermore, 'tis winter weather, and no time to talk of voyage.
Fill my goblet, Walter.
Your reign was short.
I serve my queen as she wills, and I understand her moods.
This Raleigh is just the whim of the day. She but toys with him.
Suppose he were not the whim of the day?
Suppose from my window I could look on a fair view of lakes and mountains, and suppose someone planted a tree in front of that window, what would I do?
- Pull it out by the roots.
- Exactly.
My lord, the queen commands your presence.
But as you can plainly observe, there is no tree.
Captain Raleigh.
- Your cloak, Captain Raleigh.
- Thank you, Mistress Throckmorton.
- It's very muddy.
- And very famous.
Did she give you your ships?
- How should you know what I asked her?
- There are no secrets at court.
She gave me no ships nor any straight answer.
- I'm delighted to hear it.
- I'm not.
Until she gives you an answer, you must linger in the court.
- Believe me, I shall come no more to court.
- Nay.
I think you too stubborn a man to go off without the queen's final yea or nay.
And while you wait on her word, I intend to see you often.
In the queen's presence?
She'll take that amiss.
Perhaps. Perhaps not.
- Did you sit on the cushion?
- What cushion?
- The green striped one at her chair.
- I'm not a lapdog.
Then she cares not if I see you.
You pursue very fast.
On the contrary, Captain,
I do not pursue. I surround.
A good night to you.
- Walter.
- Aye.
- Did you see the queen?
- Aye, I dined with her, alone.
- And got your ships?
- No.
Well, speak up, man. What happened?
I had a cup of wine flung at me and I caught a smile.
There was talk
- talk like a game of chess with no conclusion. What is a man to think?
- Never have I seen you like this.
- I never was like this.
Come in.
The Earl of Leicester, sir.
Lord Leicester. You remember my friend Lord Derry.
- His Irish memento of the Irish wars, I am.
- Yes, yes.
Walter, I come at the queen's command with news that can bring fortune to you - fortune beyond anything you have dreamed.
The ships?
The queen has appointed you captain of her guard.
Her palace guard? I have no wish for such appointment.
So I told Her Majesty.
'Twas made nevertheless.
- You have pleased her.
- Pleased her?
If she thinks to have me sit on her cursed cushion, I'll leave tomorrow.
You're an ambitious man.
What place is there in England for ambition, save at court?
And my ships?
Your ships may come in time, if you hold her favour.
Then, Derry, we're in her guard.
Me too? An Irishman? Is that wise?
I came here, Walter, to tell you, and to add a warning.
This is not a simple thing you undertake.
In return for her favour, the virgin queen demands a devotion that is single-hearted, unwavering, long-suffering.
- Well, look at me.
- I do, my lord.
And despite all, I am proud to have served her.
- How came this?
- Guardroom scuffle, sir.
- Have him in a new doublet by nightfall.
- Aye, Captain.
Even birds of fine plumage have troubles with feathers, do they not?
Mistress Throckmorton.
Captain Raleigh?
Three days since unknown to the court, and now captain of the queen's guard.
Red becomes you, though perhaps it serves less purpose than mud-stained blue.
- I congratulate you, Captain.
- My thanks, Mistress Throckmorton.
And you have no cloak with you. What a pity.
- Adjutant, march the men to their posts.
- Sir.
Mistress Throckmorton.
Must you bait me before the guard? I have no choice.
I did not wish to bait you. Indeed, I pity you.
You have no ships and the queen has a new lapdog.
Dogs bark, and if they bark loud enough, they're listened to.
- I shall have my my ships. - Nay.
But a well-fed lapdog barks but gently.
And you shall feed well, Captain.
That a mouth so fair should utter only shrewish words.
It is at myself I am angry.
I had no right to think you the man I thought you were.
I give you good day, Captain.
Lead him by a length, ma'am.
Now.
- Too bad, ma'am. A trifle short.
- Christopher.
Well shot, monsieur. Very well shot.
Think you so, but why should that surprise you?
You French have faced our bowmen before and felt their arrows too.
- It was a fortunate shot.
- I know your aim, Christopher.
You aimed high, didn't you? You always have.
Give me another shaft.
If I may suggest, ma'am, a little more height might not be amiss.
Think you so, Christopher?
Think you so, Walter?
- You are your father's daughter, ma'am.
- Aye, and have no need to aim high.
Did you laugh, sirrah?
Know you then that though my arrow falls short of its mark, my kingdom will not.
I am no Diana, I. And the sun is hot in my face.
Let us all move to a place under the trees.
Walter, you go forward and see that all is prepared.
The pasties go on that table there, the sweetmeats over there.
The queen's footstool.
You, bring it over here.
Are you now minister of the queen's comfort?
Mistress Throckmorton.
Are you now my gadfly?
Not your conscience, surely.
- Do I need a conscience?
- Not you, sir. Not you.
Whatever I've done, I've not meant to hurt you.
You have not hurt me, sir, only yourself.
And I soothe no wounds such as yours.
- Wounds?
- Of the soul, Captain.
- I have no such wounds.
- But you have a great one.
While you linger in the court, it festers.
The gangrene grows in you, but you cannot feel it.
You know wounds, Captain. For a while, with shock, they're painless. Then the hurt begins.
The dying man cries for water where there is no water, and for aid where there is no aid.
You are in the first stage now, and the sight is not a pretty one.
- My heart is bitter. Do not pour gall on it.
- Heart? Your heart? Where is it?
With your ships, sailing in the grass of the meadow.
An invisible heart, beating on an invisible ship.
Walter?
- All is prepared, ma'am.
- It will wait till I am ready.
There are too many people about me.
Be off, all of you. Dance if you will, but out of my sight for a while.
No, Raleigh, not you.
What did you discuss with her?
- "Her", ma'am?
- Mistress Throckmorton.
Matters of no purpose.
The treatment of wounds.
Nothing more?
There was some mention of ships that sail in meadows, and of their captains who sit on cushions out of the sun.
Walter, I have commanded you to have no dalliance with ladies of my court.
As you will, ma'am.
Walter, I am hot and out of sorts.
As you love me, speak only gentle words, and I will do the same.
Aye, ma'am.
I read your mind, Christopher.
Do you? Then tell me what I plan.
To clear the view from your window.
His Excellency, the ambassador from the court of France.
- Your Majesty. My lords.
- We are honoured, monsieur.
May I compliment you once again on this most beautiful palace?
There is no other like it in all of Europe.
It was my father's. I will tell him when I see him.
But King Henry is dead. Madam jests.
- Madam never jests.
- No, madam.
I think I know the purpose of this audience.
You wish to report that the Duke d'Alençon is enamoured of me.
Ever since he saw you, he can talk of nothing else.
He is a sweet boy, but only a boy. We have discussed this before.
But this time I am commanded by my queen to return with a definite answer.
- Your queen then thinks to command me?
- No, no. I beg you of you, madam, no.
- And so you want a definite answer, do you?
- Yes, madam.
Very well. I shall give you one.
Go back to your Catherine de' Medici and tell her I am tired of little French dukes, and of old French queens, and of ambassadors who laugh when I miss with an arrow, and of all Frenchmen in general.
- Go back and tell her that.
- Yes, madam.
That may not be the best policy, ma'am.
It is I who make the policy of this realm. I, and I alone. Just as I made you.
They think to wed me to that weak-chinned, pasty-nosed, gap-toothed little monster.
I have been writing him gentle and loving letters for the past five years, and why?
To keep France on tenterhooks. To keep France from turning to Spain.
That is policy
- my policy.
And what is to stop France from turning to Spain now?
Think you monsieur will go galloping off to Calais?
No, never, Christopher. He'll be back.
It would be worth his head to return with a report of this interview.
Catherine hates failures.
- We must still keep her as a friend.
- States have no friends.
- It is also true of people, ma'am.
- Are you friendless, Christopher?
I speak not for myself, ma'am, but you.
Do you know who your friends are, and who are your enemies?
- I know who my enemies are.
- All of them, ma'am?
Well, enough to last the day out. What are you getting at?
A rumour has reached my ears, ma'am, that there is an Irish lord in your own guard.
And since we are at war with Ireland, who knows but what he plans to murder you?
- And the name of this Irish lord?
- Lord Derry, I believe, ma'am.
- Is this true, Raleigh?
- There is a Lord Derry in the guard, yes.
'Tis said he is Raleigh's friend, brought from Ireland.
You're most well informed, Sir Christopher.
I would discuss that with you in private.
- With pleasure, sir.
- Sit down, sir.
- Nay. Sir Christopher questions my honour.
- Sit down, blast you.
What do you mean, adding an Irishman to my guard?
He is an honourable man, who wishes
Your Majesty naught but happiness.
Words come two pence a thousand. What's in his heart?
- He speaks what is in his heart.
- No man has since God made Adam.
Well, we'll see what's in his heart.
- Arrest him. Send him to the tower.
- I, ma'am?
- You, sir.
- No, ma'am, not I.
You cheap-jack soldier, you. How dare you disobey me?
It's I who brought him to court.
It's I who take full responsibility.
It is I who will strip you of every honour you have, every bone I've thrown you.
It is no honour for a man to humble himself. And this I've done time out of mind.
I return such honours gladly.
Open that door.
Raleigh. You were not called here, you came here - an out-at-elbows dissembling rogue, foul from the Irish wars - and I took pity on you and allowed you to serve me.
I wished to serve not you, but England.
Then I find myself in an aviary full of tame birds.
All England's not confined in the walls of this court, but rides proud and free on the bosom of the ocean, bordered only by her destiny and hope.
Yet while every nation in Europe points its ships to the Indies and beyond, we English stand idly by, counting our pence.
But some Englishmen watch the sun on the waves, and dream of a future that will shine on England with the brightness of a hundred suns.
- Thank God I'm of their company.
- Thank God you are no longer of mine.
Out of my sight. Out of my house.
Little men.
You know what you were before
I made you what you are.
Do not gape so, or by the rood,
I'll turn you all out of doors.
Christopher. Robert.
I feel faint. Take me to my chamber.
If you've come to whip the queen's dog more, you'll find he's done being whipped.
- I have come to talk to a Devon man.
- The one who lives here nigh forgot his birth.
Where is Lord Derry?
Arranging for horses.
Saying goodbye to some wench.
- Where will you go?
- Any direction will lead to the sea.
My house is in Devonshire, near Plymouth.
My servants would give you shelter.
Have you lost your senses, girl? This is a face it would be wiser to forget.
It is a face that pleases me again.
Beth, you've chanced much in coming here
- perhaps more than you know.
I came because I wished to.
I've longed to stand as close as this.
In the moments before sleep I've questioned the colour of those eyes.
- Nay, I've been even bolder in their regard.
- How is one bold in the regard of eyes?
I wondered whether, when a man presses a kiss on your lips, those heavy lids, do they close?
Well?
Did they close?
I do not know.
'Tis nine by the clock, and all is well.
'Tis nine by the clock, and all is well.
Long live the queen.
I must return to the court.
Having but found each other, we must lose each other.
How much longer must you serve the queen?
- Five years, unless she marries me off.
- Marries you off?
I am her ward. My parents are dead.
Walter, may I not ride with you tonight?
Would you...
Beth, would you marry me? Now?
No church in London would say the words over us.
In Queen Mary's day, there were secret marriages aplenty.
Wait.
Master Innkeeper. This is a mad thing we do.
- I care not.
- Anon, anon, sir.
Come here. Bring the serving wench. Another lass in England would not venture so much.
As to defy the queen?
It was you who taught me.
She may object. God will not.
Stand here. There's a matter you must witness.
I, Walter Raleigh, in the name of God and the Reformed Church of England, take thee unto wife, God be my witness.
I, Elizabeth Throckmorton, in the name of God and the Reformed Church of England, take thee unto my husband, so God be my witness.
- Thanks.
- My lord.
- What was all that about?
- Some kind of a wedding, I suppose.
A wedding? Well, why did you not tell me?
I always cry.
Walter.
Walter.
There's been a change in our plans. We need another horse.
Another horse? It will be hard to get at this time.
Derry, we'll have to.
- Who is it?
- In the name of the queen, open.
Open up.
Walter Raleigh, we are commanded by the queen's majesty to take you hence.
- Can you give me a moment?
- We cannot, sir. Come at once.
File. Stand in.
- I would have a word with this man.
- What's happened?
The lady
- see her safely back to the palace.
Captain Raleigh, if you please.
File. March.
- Mistress Throckmorton.
- Where do they take him?
- They gave him no time to tell me.
- She's sent him to the tower.
Nay. She'd have sent him when they quarreled.
You do not know her.
Her anger is like a beast
- she lets it feed, then sets it free to spring. She'll have his head.
- Hold, Mistress Throckmorton.
- Nay. Mistress Raleigh.
Mistress Raleigh?
- We were wed this day. I must find him.
- It will serve no purpose.
- I care not.
- But he does. Do not complicate matters.
If the queen knew that you and Walter were... It would be the worse for him.
Do as he wishes. Return to the palace.
As you wish.
Enough, enough.
Have you not mumbled long enough, good doctors?
What latest attack have you planned on this frail body?
The blood moves sluggishly. It is best you be bled, that the strain on the heart be light.
Then come draw your pint, Master
Tapster. I have impatient blood.
Would that all the heart's strain could be eased by bleeding.
- Have they not brought that devil Raleigh?
- Not yet, Your Majesty.
The French ambassador waits outside, most importunate to see you.
- Bring him in.
- At such a time?
There never was a better. Fetch him.
Monsieur.
Your Majesty, had I but known.
Forgive my unforgivable rudeness.
I'd have knocked my head against the wall to think I caused your illness.
- I could have hanged myself.
- Fie, man, fie.
God made me ill, not you.
He is bringing me down by degrees. Look at me.
Sick as I am, would you have me wed to that sweet boy?
- He would be your greatest comfort, madam.
- Death will be my greatest comfort.
- We have finished, ma'am.
- Aye, and I am nearly finished too.
Had they saved all the blood they've drawn from me these many years, there'd be a Red Sea in England.
Pray, rest now, ma'am.
Surgeons are alarmed, are they not, my lord?
- Gravely alarmed.
- Do not mention the graves.
No, no, monsieur, do not mention.
So, monsieur, return to France and tell your queen of my ill health, and tell her when I am well again, if ever, it will be time then to discuss the ardours of young d'Alençon.
- Yes, madam.
- One thing more.
So that Catherine and I may understand each other better,
I propose we exchange some members of our courts.
If your queen will be so gracious as to send me four of her courtiers,
I will be most happy to send her four of mine.
An excellent proposal. Would you wish gentlemen or ladies?
It does not matter.
No, no, no, wait. I will send ladies.
There are many here who would see what is worn in France.
Let Catherine send me gentlemen.
I will take ship for Calais tonight, Your Majesty.
What is in that box?
A present I brought you
- a sword. I will leave it with the chamberlain.
No, no, no. I would see it.
It is not worthy of
Your Majesty's splendour.
Nay, 'tis a beautiful thing.
- I thank you from my heart.
- Madam.
Your Majesty.
There is policy for you.
A week from now, all France will think I am standing on my coffin, and that millstone is off my neck for a good six months.
How is it that devil
Raleigh is not here yet?
Let me ask, ma'am.
He is here, ma'am.
- Your Majesty.
- Come you here.
- Well?
- I did not know you were ill, ma'am.
Of course not. The plague knows not whom it kills.
But no matter. No matter.
Why do you think I've had you brought here?
To forgive you.
- Are you not pleased?
- It will happen again.
Nay, you will never again shout me deaf in my own house.
Sit down.
How do I look to you, Walter?
Do you like me as you see me?
- I admire the woman, not the wrappings.
- Admire, you say? Only admire?
Walter, we had a quarrel.
So, we had a quarrel.
- It is over.
- Hatton shouldn't have accused Derry.
- His only thought was of my safety.
- So has mine been.
And yet you bring over an Irish cutthroat from heaven knows what ill-odoured bog, and make him one of my guards.
The rapscallion could have slit my throat.
Had he wished that, he would've done it ere now.
You sound as though you'd do it yourself.
Would you, Walter?
Then let it be done.
Let it be done.
I am the last man on earth would do it, ma'am.
Kiss me, Walter.
Dear Walter, you are my best physician.
So long as you do not quarrel with Christopher.
How can you defend him?
He acted in his own interest. Ambition opened his mouth, jealousy spoke his words.
But you are all ambitious, all jealous. Yes, even you.
If I gave each man in this court everything he wanted,
I would have to give away half the world.
And since half the world is not mine to give, I give away titles, honours - high-sounding, but empty as the air.
- Would you not too like a title, Walter?
- I have done without one all these years.
And I have done without quarrels in my court. I co...
No, I do not command you.
I implore you, no swordplay with Christopher.
On your oath.
It shall be as you say, ma'am. On my oath.
That's better.
And do not make me bandy words so.
I am not well.
Walter.
- Am I old? Do I look old?
- Does the moon look old, or the sun?
I am talking of Elizabeth
Tudor, not suns and moons.
Answer me truly, Walter.
Were I forming a new company, ma'am, and were you not Queen of England,
I'd have you wielding a broadsword.
- Broadswords are heavy.
- Aye. Young men's work.
There's my blunt soldier.
You are no smooth-tongued courtier yet.
Open that box.
- A splendid weapon, ma'am.
- Take it out.
Try it.
A splendid weapon, indeed.
'Tis nicely balanced. And finely worked.
So I shall be in your company.
You will have me then, Walter?
- You shall fight by my side, ma'am.
- Aye, at your side.
But on whom shall I use it?
- Kneel, Walter.
- Kneel, ma'am? Would you have my head?
More than that, man. More than that. On your knee.
I, Elizabeth Tudor, by the grace of God, Queen of
England, do dub thee knight.
Arise, Sir Walter Raleigh.
But, ma'am...
You are still not pleased.
You said yourself, ma'am, honours are as empty as the air.
Aye.
So they are.
But the words you spoke to me in rage were not.
They were honest words and wise ones, and they still ring in my head.
But I will please you yet, Walter.
I cannot give you three ships, but one you shall have.
Announce Sir Walter
Raleigh to the court.
By command of Her Majesty, the knight Sir Walter Raleigh.
Beth.
Well, sir, are you ready to ride now?
Beth, listen. She gave me a ship.
Only one, when you asked for three?
Faith, you sell your favours cheaply, though not as cheaply as I.
- These are strange words from my wife.
- Your wife?
Did you defy her again? Did you tell her we were wed?
She's ill. I could not defy her on her sickbed.
I am not your wife. I'm the shadow of a wife, a woman cozened into a travesty of marriage.
- The marriage is a true one.
- How can a master of guile speak of truth?
How did you soften her? Did you use the same words that softened me?
- You know not of what passed between us.
- Heaven forbid that I ever should.
To think this was the man whose very life I prayed for when they took him away.
Man, indeed. Whipped dog licking the hand of its mistress.
- Don't go too far, girl.
- I've come to the end.
You have your ships, but you no longer have me.
- Take yourself off, sire.
- Curse you, I will. And never see you more.
Sir Walter.
'Tis not often one can talk to a knight so newly minted.
- I wish no words with you, sir.
- Now we are equals, I wish words with you.
You said in council I questioned your honour.
- I do not remember what I said in council.
- Then let me improve your memory.
I still question your honour.
This day Sir Walter Raleigh sets forth for Plymouth, oh, merciful God.
We crave thy blessing on each step of his venture.
May he have thy guidance in the preparation of his ship.
May he build it strong and seaworthy.
Thou knowest the dreadful dangers of the deep, the storms that rise, the whirlpools that engulf, the monsters that dwell below, the peril of the Spanish ships.
Thou knowest the giant waves that mount...
As you have said, my lord
Bishop, God knows these things.
He needs no remembrance, sir.
And my knees are weary.
Upon Sir Walter Raleigh and his undertaking, thy blessing, oh, merciful God. Amen.
- Amen.
- Amen.
Walter.
The time has come to make my adieu, madam.
Your dream is a dream no longer, and yet you seem to show no joy.
I have much on my mind. I have seen the plans of the Golden Falcon.
There are changes to be made.
- How long will it be in the making?
- Six weeks at least.
And then the sea. The sea, the storms and the months of voyage.
When will I look upon you next, Walter?
That's in God's hands, ma'am.
I thank Your Majesty for opportunity granted to no other man.
I have no taste for partings.
You have given me much joy, ma'am.
I have the highest hopes of this adventure, ma'am.
Adventure. Why must Raleigh go?
It is his dearest passion, ma'am.
Adventure is for the brainless.
Or should be.
Mistress Throckmorton.
The Golden Falcon is a stout vessel.
I doubt if you would find better.
She's not what I would have designed, but with these alterations, she'll equal any craft.
First, the rigging. She carries no topgallants. Rig her for them.
She lacks span on the fore and main. Add another full score yard of sail to each.
With that much canvas, a blow might pull the sticks out of her.
- I think not.
- Mark his words.
He comes from a long line of seafarers.
When Noah brought the animals to the ark, there were two Raleighs.
As to the gun ports, I want 14 abeam.
Aye, and add space for a pair of fore chasers as well.
Aye, sir.
"Our passions are most like to floods and streams:
The shallow murmur, but the deep are dumb;
So, when affections yield discourse, it seems
The bottom is but shallow whence they come. "
- "They that are... "
- ".. are rich in words must needs discover
That they are poor in that which makes a lover. "
- You know the poem, ma'am?
- Aye.
- The volume was just this day published.
- Sir Walter wrote the poem in my presence.
Sir Walter, a poet? I did not know.
I am aware of many things about Sir
Walter that are not common knowledge.
He has a delicate touch with a line.
'Tis a pity he will soon be at sea and with no more time to write verses.
Do not sigh, Christopher. There can be no funeral without a corpse.
Ma'am?
Sir Walter will not sail. He will return here to be with me.
Take care how you treat your queen's possessions, Mistress Throckmorton.
- I'm sorry, ma'am.
- Are you well? Your face looks drawn.
Quite well, thank you, ma'am.
I had been told you fainted in chapel Sunday last.
It was nothing, ma'am.
True, Christopher, I toyed with the idea of letting Sir Walter go voyaging off.
But I miss the rogue.
He tests my mettle.
Is he aware of this change in fortune, ma'am?
He will be, by degrees.
Aye, Sir Walter will remain here with me, but there are others who will go.
Ma'am.
Fear not, Christopher.
It is of the ladies I speak.
- I am sending you all to the French court.
- Your Majesty.
- To serve Catherine de' Medici.
- For how long?
For two years at least, perhaps more, should Catherine wish to keep you.
Aye. Soon all my pretty birds will have flown.
Did you hear? To Paris.
- Ease the strain on that mainstay.
- Aye, master.
- Captain.
- Gwilym. Why are you in Plymouth?
A letter from the queen, I bear, Captain.
Do all the little colleens in London miss me?
Lying I would be if I denied it.
Every Whitechapel wench is weeping.
You can float up the
Thames on their tears, then.
We're commanded to sail to
London to get our canons mounted.
Two weeks wasted.
- What other news from the palace?
- Naught of moment - the ordinary.
The queen is sending her ladies-in-waiting to the French court.
- All four of them?
- There's a bit of gossip I forgot.
Five souls may sail, if what's whispered by the kitchen maids comes true.
- What are the kitchen maids whispering? -
Why, faith, that one of ladies-in-waiting is...
- Beasts we men are, bless us.
- Which one is it?
I was told, but the name escapes me.
A poor memory for names, I have.
- Does the queen not know?
- Not as yet, Captain, dear.
But you can no more keep a secret in court than you can stop the rain from falling.
Dark will the lass's day be when her secret reaches the queen.
- Are they still at the palace?
- They've gone to bid their families goodbye.
A good week ago, it was, as I remember.
Well, if you too have troubles, drink them away with this.
Thank you, Captain.
I will find troubles
I did not know I had.
Sir Walter Raleigh to see Mistress Throckmorton.
A moment, sir.
Sorry, sir. Mistress
Throckmorton refuses to see you.
Beth.
I said I did not wish to see you.
Dame Bragg instructed me in manners.
Clearly, you had no such teaching.
Please go. Should the queen know you had ridden here, it would do your plans no good.
It is said that you are being sent off to France.
Such is the queen's command. Be off, please.
Is Mistress Throckmorton prepared to sail?
But she's not going.
- You choose to disobey the queen?
- Yes.
I am weary of court. It is no concern of yours.
Leave us.
Leave us.
If what I believe is true, it's very deeply my concern.
I do not know what you believe.
I bid you good day.
Court gossip says you're with child.
So the tongues have begun to clatter. Let them.
Is it true?
Does the queen's favourite wish reassurance that he will not be involved? I give it gladly.
Do you think that is my concern?
I am not a betrayed milkmaid whining for help, begging for pity.
Your name will never cross my lips.
Beth.
Beth, I've never loved you more than I do now.
- Do not speak again of love.
- I shall never stop with you.
Nay, go your own way.
You owe me nothing.
We owe each other everything. Our love, our child, the rest of our lives together.
Before God, girl, you'll do nothing more alone.
- When does the queen expect you at court?
- Three weeks.
Three weeks? Not much time. But it can be done.
Look, you. My ship must sail to
London to have her guns mounted.
Nay. 'Tis but a ruse. The queen plans to keep you with her. I heard her say so.
Did she, now? Then the game gets all the better.
What would you say if, in three weeks time, the Golden Falcon sailed due west with you and me aboard?
- For the New World?
- For our new world. Our new universe.
Beth, will you go?
Though every ship in
England barred the way.
'Tis good to see you. If you hadn't returned,
I was going to look for you myself. Is all well?
- Aye, well and better than well. Your tailor?
- At times.
This is the bed. I want it twice as wide, well slatted, and I want the finest-grained oak.
- A rare job I'll do, sir.
- Fetch your tools and set to work.
Aye, sir.
You plan to sprawl the nights that you need such a great bed?
Yesterday before a cleric we repeated our vows. 'Tis now a marriage doubly sealed.
You best be about other business.
Such words as "marriage" mustn't sully such innocent ears.
- 'Tis a dangerous thing you do.
- The outfitting of the ship must be speeded.
In three weeks we sail for the New World, avoiding London.
Gently, Walter, gently. Have you thought what'll happen when the queen learns that you're wed and you've stolen a ship?
- Her rage will shame the devil himself.
- It will pass, as all her rages have.
Elizabeth has a hunger for gold, a miser's hunger. I'll lay it before her feet.
You mean you'll return after these sins of yours?
When she sees what I bring with me, she'll forgive them all.
If you return with all of the New World in tow and anchor it off Land's End.
If adventure seems too dangerous, you've no reason to come.
I've shared your miseries. I may as well share your joys.
- Your men have surpassed themselves.
- Aye. Did you arrange the water casks?
- They'll be ready in ten days.
- Yes, sir.
There's a pouter pigeon from court waiting for you in your cabin.
- Thank you, Master Randall.
- Yes, sir.
Good morrow to you,
Sir Walter. Lord Derry.
- What brings you here, Master Chadwick?
- The queen's business, which, of course, is your business as well.
She sends you this.
- Am I to wear it?
- Nay. There is a letter too.
Convey my warmest thanks and appreciation to Her Majesty.
Not having heard from you since you left,
Her Majesty is exercised to know when she may expect you.
Ordinarily, it takes three days sailing from here to London.
Pray, tell her that the time it takes me will surprise her.
Upon my soul, I can believe it. I've never seen such busy workmen as yours.
- Do you stay in Plymouth, Master Chadwick?
- Nay, I ride to London at once.
The queen does not wish to wait of word from you.
But with your permission, Sir Walter.
Lord Derry.
Do you think he noticed the bed?
By the time ought can come of it, we shall have been long at sea.
- What more needs my name?
- These are all for the day, ma'am.
Master Chadwick has returned. He and
Sir Christopher await audience with you.
Why did you not say so before?
Remain where you are, ladies. I can find my own way about my own house.
You do not seem travel-stained.
You must ride a high horse.
I changed my clothes before
I ventured into your presence.
I would not care if you came to me in rags, so long as you bring me good tidings.
I bring you strange tidings, ma'am, if naught else.
- Gave you Sir Walter my scarf and my letter?
- Aye.
He took the scarf and read the letter and told me to thank you.
- He sent no letter to me?
- Nay.
I asked when he'd be in London. He said that the time it would take would surprise you.
Then he is in haste to return.
What is strange in that?
He is in greater haste than any man ever was before.
A most unhealthy haste.
Chadwick tells that he is working his men as though each had four arms.
But why has Master Chadwick been in such great pains to discuss the matter with you?
Because he did not know how to approach you, ma'am.
Approach me with what?
The strange thing is, ma'am,
Sir Walter has built a fine bed in his cabin.
So? So? The rogue likes his comfort.
'Tis not the bed of a single man.
Are you accusing Sir Walter of... of...
I'm merely stating two facts, ma'am - the fact of a great haste in shipbuilding, and the fact of a great bed in his cabin.
Add to these one other element, and fancy can take the whole thing over.
What other element?
Near Plymouth, a lady of this court is, even now, preparing herself for her trip to France.
She has little time.
Has she chosen the captain to take her there, or beyond?
You spend a woman's honour with great ease.
I try to save a woman's pride.
And it is most difficult, and most thankless.
What are you trying to tell me?
That Sir Walter Raleigh has taken himself a wife.
All the devils do not dwell in darkness, do they, Christopher?
Nay, ma'am.
Some of them bask in ocean sunlight and call themselves Devon men.
- Where's the Captain?
- Of the ship or of the guard?
- Captain of the ship. Make haste, sailor.
- Aye, sir.
Where are you going? You've one order
- not to leave your post.
Aye, sir.
Welcome to the Golden Falcon. Is it pleasure that brings you here or duty?
Both, Irishman.
I'll inform Sir Walter of your presence.
- Hatton's above with your death in his hands.
- Alone?
Ten men he has and a warrant from the queen to bring you prisoner to London.
There's only one thing to do
- over the side and back to Ireland.
- What of Beth?
- They're after you.
Take her to Ireland. I'll delay them to give you a league's start.
- I'll delay them. You go.
- It'll take an Irishman to smuggle her in.
Make haste. I know not how long I can hold them.
Which is the captain's cabin? The queen's messenger does not wait.
Lord Derry came with some silly jest. I threw him out of my cabin.
Would you call this a jest, sir?
No, I would not. I'd call it a forgery.
The queen's hand, the royal seal, a forgery?
There is one courtier who has access to the royal seal.
I was sent here to demand your sword.
I'll let you have it long enough to answer me for that affront.
I will not cross swords with you. I gave my word to the queen.
So that's it, is it? You hide behind a woman's skirts.
Does your vow include this?
Five men to back you. You're very brave.
I swore never to draw a blade against you.
I took no oath concerning my hands.
Swords or hands, it makes no difference.
Take him.
Get the cursed Irishman too.
Search the ship. If he's not aboard, search Plymouth and the highways.
- Is all well with you?
- All is well.
My skirt was caught in the stirrup.
Stop looking worried. My mother went pleasure riding the day before I was born.
It's not that I was worried about. Look.
Ride ahead. Try to reach
Clovelly. A man named Cahoolan.
Catch the girl.
That an English sword should reach this back of mine.
On a Friday too.
"Don't die on a Friday," they always said to me.
"It's bad luck for you. "
Derry.
My luck's not so bad.
The sun is shining.
Beauty herself bending over me.
You are under arrest.
We will start for London.
We have taken the Throckmorton minx. Inform Lord Hatton.
- He rests at Lambeth this night.
- Lord Leicester.
- Beth, child.
- They've killed Derry. What of my husband?
He is in the tower and condemned to die.
I have reasoned with the queen as best I could.
I've enlisted the help of
Canterbury and the duke, your uncle.
- What can I do?
- Nothing.
Sleep. Try to be strong for tomorrow.
Pray.
In prayer lies all your hope.
- We ride on to the tower.
- This weary girl?
She can sleep in her own room tonight under guard.
- This is my prisoner.
- Do you wish to question my authority?
Nay, Lord Leicester.
- Show them the way, Beth.
- Thank you, my lord.
Flint and steel, quickly.
Shut the window.
Where is she?
- Madam.
- Who is it?
Lady Raleigh.
You've come to plead your husband's life.
- Is Your Majesty all right? It was feared...
- There is no cause for fear. Close the door.
Your husband is a traitor, Lady Raleigh.
By his own admission he planned to take a ship of mine to sail it forth.
He meant to use it for
Your Majesty's own purposes.
Is the taking of a ship in truth the treachery with which he is to pay with his life?
You mean, I take his head because you took his heart.
Though that were treachery too, on both your parts.
His dirty little lovemaking with a girl who owed me loyalty.
Is that reason enough for a man to die?
It is reason enough for two to die
- Raleigh and his wench.
We have hired a new Flemish headsman from Rotterdam.
He'll be here by Wednesday next.
Even the Queen of England cannot send me to that death on Wednesday next.
You will have to wait some months,
Your Majesty. Such is the law.
Some months? What nonsense is this?
Two are past. Seven are yet to go.
It is a law older than the rule of the Tudors.
So you plead your belly.
If you kill Walter Raleigh, you rob an English subject of a father.
Why do you do this wrong to a child?
From jealousy.
Is that worthy of the queen's majesty?
Jealousy.
You have been my lady-in-waiting.
You have drawn these bed hangings every night.
Bring that light, girl.
Let me show you what they hid.
20 years since a fever took my hair.
Do you think I've ever put myself on the lists against pretty faces and empty heads?
I am Elizabeth Tudor. Men have loved me.
Not with the dandling love you toss a white kitten, but men have loved me because I struck sparks from their minds.
I matched spirit with spirit.
Walter Raleigh was one.
But it is I who carry his child.
Be very proud.
When I was 18, my physicians told me I could never bear a child.
I am glad. England was child enough for me.
Take this strumpet away.
Take her away.
Take her away.
Sir Walter Raleigh,
Her Majesty the Queen.
Rise.
I want to look straight in your eyes, the eyes of the man who fawned upon me, wheedled a ship from me, between the kisses he was wheedling from one of my wenches.
Did she sometimes stand behind me, Walter, and look love upon you whilst you prated to me about gallants and mizzenmasts?
That she did not, I swear.
Nor could I have seen her.
It seems strange, but it is true. I was blinded with the fascination of the queen's majesty.
The fascination of the queen's treasury.
I could ill afford to give you a ship.
She cost half again more than you said.
You could afford a dozen like it, ma'am. And do so, I beg you.
What's it to you, man? You'll be dead.
The ship won't be. The fairest yet to ride on water.
There's a navigator named
Barlowe. Let him sail her.
He has the feel of her. He'll bring back the wealth I would have brought you.
He'll claim that share of the world this island needs.
I had thought to find you thinking only of Beth Throckmorton.
She has but one chance of your forgiveness, as has the child - a cargo of gold such as has never been seen.
With that in your pocket, you'll forget a dead man whose eye wandered.
May I see her, ma'am, before they lead me down to the parting place?
No, I'll not pander for you.
I'll see the child is properly cared for.
And Beth?
That look. That tender look.
Once she's had her brat, she'll follow you. The axe will still be sharp.
You have often bade me leave your presence.
- I bid you now to leave mine.
- On what authority?
Dead men have authority. And I am one.
Walter. Walter, I needed you, and you betrayed me.
I loved you, madam.
I loved you as a man loves a great queen. It's that love you betrayed.
But I'm also a woman
- a woman not too young.
Madam. Madam.
I will not be served by underlings.
- You shall sail the ship yourself.
- Aye.
This does not mean I forgive you, nor the slut you married.
I want the world you promised me.
And I don't want to dream of a brat crying as I dreamt last night.
I was once a brat crying because of the headsman's axe.
Those cargoes you bring back had best be rich and rich and rich.
Long live Elizabeth.
God save the queen.
I am not done yet, nor will I be an hour hence.
The Golden Falcon's starting down the Thames.
- I had not thought her nailed to the wharf.
- Come look.
I have seen ships before.
Something about this ship might please you, ma'am.
You think to pleasure me with such a sight?
Raise the glass higher, ma'am.
Two months have passed and seven are yet to run.
A puking wench, and some waves.
I must go on with the business of state.
Her father, Henry VIII, called her Young Bess.
Her mother, Anne Boleyn, ended on the block.
Born at a time when heads fell around her like cabbage stalks, -
- to grow up at all was an achievement.
To grow up to greatness was a miracle.
HATFIELD HOUSE, ENGLAND
NOVEMBER 16TH, 1558
- Mr. Parry.
- Bills for gowns, shoes, caps!
Where's the money to come from?
No I didn't. That's all over!
Mrs. Ashley. What have you done?
Sit down and prepare yourself for some news.
Bad news.
I've just left my Lady Elizabeth.
She received a message from London
Her stepsister, Queen Mary, is ill
- It's cruel to lose one's sister.
- You mean Bloody Mary is dying?
- She'll be dead by morning?
- Dead as a doornail.
- This means ...
- Young Bess will be queen.
Queen of England at the age of five and twenty.
- Mrs. Ashley!
- Mr. Parry!
Do you remember the last little drink we had together?
- Yes. It got us into trouble.
- We mustn't overdo it this time.
- Long live Young Bess.
- Long live Queen Elizabeth.
Well, when she sits on the throne,
- I can safely say ... I did it.
You're a remarkable woman.
You've been no ordinary governess.
Yours has been no easy task.
A difficult child.
All children are. Let alone a daughter of the monster, King Henry
- And Anne Boleyn.
- A dangerous mixture.
Well, we're in harbor.
- At last.
- But it's been a stormy passage.
Like the song of the seesaw:
Here we go up, up, up
- Up to the sky so high
- Here we go down, down, down
Bumpety-bump, goodbye.
That's how it was.
To start with, we were our father's darling.
Those were the times when we went up, up, up.
Up, up, up in the sky.
So high.
- Look. Your future Queen Elizabeth
- Just like her father.
There's breeding for you.
No mistaking the fatherhood.
- Henry, didn't I have a hand in it
- Yes. But I gave you the idea.
Don't scowl at me like that. Why don't you laugh like your mother?
That's the way to win peoples' hearts.
But Anne Boleyn laughed once too often and with the wrong people.
She took three lovers with her.
Old Harry did things in a big way.
Come, we're no longer the future queen. The King doesn't want us.
We're a nobody.
So we were chased away from Court to Hatfield. Without a mother.
Without a home. Old Harry took another wife and a son was born.
He was heir to the throne.
We were declared illegitimate.
So we went down, down, down.
Bumpety-bump. Goodbye.
We'll never wear these shoes again
They're full of holes.
We have to see to it that our new stepmother likes us, -
- our appearance, our little ways and our manners.
Now Your Highness is back in your father's grace. Isn't it wonderful
Your Highness!
Now listen carefully. This one is
German. Don't forget that.
After all, it's not her fault.
We can't pick and choose.
What we need is a mother.
Ist das meine liebe Tochter
Elizabeth? Komm hier, mein Kind.
Hab keine Angst, mein Liebling.
I took one look at the King's face and knew what he was contemplating
For him a change, for us, a ride to Hatfield.
In no time we were back to be inspected by our fourth mother.
Don't be stubborn.
It can't hurt us to try again.
This one is said to be beautiful.
Your father is very much in love.
Come in, child.
I won't eat you.
Don't stare at me like that.
Say something.
I made you legitimate out of the goodness of my big, fat heart.
Doctor says it will kill me one day
He's in the Tower reconsidering.
Anne Boleyn's brat, I'll put you in the Tower if you dare defy me.
You dare. I'm beginning to like you
To my good health.
Henry, please. No more wine tonight
This is your new stepmother, child
I can see you like her.
I do, too.
I like her very much.
Come, my darling. I'm afraid we have to go home now. Back to Hatfield.
Don't worry. The King will soon have us meet another stepmother.
And another and another.
Well, I will not come!
Open the door, Bess. Please.
It's Lord Thomas Seymour.
He's to take you back to London.
Bess, we're going back to Court.
Those are the King's orders.
You'll be the death of us both.
My Lord Admiral. Will you come and talk to her? I can do nothing.
I see. Leave it to me.
I have a way with children.
Good morning, Lady Elizabeth. The
King sent me here to talk to you.
- I've looked forward to it.
- It will be a very short talk.
- I've just begun.
- I've finished.
- I promised your stepmother ...
- I've had too many!
You can tell the King I said so.
Will you please come closer to the door?
- Well?
- I'll tell the King that I failed
- But only on one condition.
- What condition?
I want to have a look at you.
Open the door and I'll come in.
- Why?
- I want to see your face and eyes
- What for?
- Can you come still closer?
I have my ear against the door.
Because of a woman I once knew and liked and laughed with.
- Who?
- We never speak her name.
- My mother?
- Yes.
I know the King banned you from the Court because you're like her.
Well then, come in.
Come in and see for yourself.
Well?
- I can't see much from here.
- Stay there. Keep the bargain!
I always do.
That's why I make so many friends.
I don't need your friendship.
I don't need your pity either.
- What are you doing?
- Opening so I can see you better.
- We can drive back in the sunshine
- You're full of tricks.
- Don't you trust me?
- No!
If the King could see you like this he'd change his mind.
You're so like him. The way you stand there, stubborn, suspicious.
Exactly like him. Even down to wanting to throw the inkwell at me
The King's daughter!
And yet, there's something else in your face. I've seen it before.
Her eyes. The slim nose. There's no another nose like this in England.
I'd know it in a thousand.
But where's her smile?
She turned men's heads with that smile of hers.
They made your childhood very unhappy.
But you'll be as beautiful as she was, and everyone will fall for you
That will save you from ever being lonely, as you are now.
Bye, Lady Elizabeth. I'll tell the
King I failed. He'll be surprised.
Hitherto, I've been lucky with my missions.
Goodbye.
What has happened?
What does this mean?
Wait!
Wait!
This is your room. And this is where
Mrs. Ashley will sleep.
The Queen wanted you to have the nicest room overlooking the garden
What's the matter?
Don't you like it?
- What's all this?
- Caps, gowns, scarves.
She thought you'd like them.
Catherine.
There was another Catherine. I grew to love her, but she was killed.
- It can happen again.
- It won't.
- I could never be happy here.
- You shall this time.
The Queen is the sweetest woman in all God's world.
How tall you are.
You're almost a grown woman.
I'm glad you're here. I'm told you have brains to match your looks.
And a charming companion to me and the little Prince of Wales.
Edward needs a sister, and
I need ... what shall we call you?
A younger sister or a daughter.
Will you like that?
The chief thing is that we've got you and we're going to keep you.
Make way for the Prince of Wales.
The Prince of Wales.
Make way for the Prince of Wales.
Make way for the Prince of Wales.
- What a fuss, just because I come
- Edward, is that you?
- You heard the idiots shout.
- But it's the middle of the night
I had to wait till Mother Jack went to sleep. I'm a prisoner in my room
- Come let me look at you.
- I wanted to show you this.
It's a model of the Admiral's flagship. He gave it to me himself
- I like my Uncle Tom.
- Edward, I'm so happy.
- About what?
- I love the Queen. We're friends.
She won't last.
What did you say?
She won't last. Take care, you're smashing my ship.
Edward, will you answer me? I order you to tell me everything you know
- Is she in danger?
- You're hurting me.
- I think the King wants a change.
- A change?
She contradicts him, and nobody's supposed to contradict my father.
When I'm king, if anybody contradicts me, they'll be execute
- You don't know what you're saying
- They quarrel about religion.
Well, I hope the French come in time to save her.
They'll invade us. Perhaps they'll kill the King before he kills her.
- But they'll have to hurry.
- I don't believe you.
Don't you?
Come on with me.
Why should you care? The King's will and wish means nothing to you!
The King's law is not heeded by his own wife. What a sad spectacle!
- You plead for a heretic?
- You see!
After the execution, they'll send you back to Hatfield.
- Anything in sight?
- Nothing, Lord Admiral.
Keep looking. First man to sight the French fleet gets an extra grog
Signal Burnell. Tell him to fill in that gap in the line.
The biggest fleet ever gathered against us. The danger is real.
Ned, the King's barge is coming for the ladies. You should go with them
- We want to stay for the fighting
- Will you lead a boarding party?
Why not?
Are we so sure we can beat them that we have women on board?
That was your idea.
- Is this a war or a picnic?
- A picnic, sir.
That's the spirit.
That's what I like to hear.
- Don't you agree, spoilsport?
- Not with overconfidence.
- Did you forget their 300 ships?
- No, and they didn't forget me!
- I broke the blockade in Boulogne
- Glorious nonsense.
Glorious performance.
Were there ever two brothers less alike, fighting like cats?
Archbishop, tell them what happened to the Kilkenny Cats.
Just a moment, Your Majesty.
- How do you feel, Cranmer?
- A little better.
- How is Mrs. Cranmer?
- Very well indeed.
- You're not afraid of me, are you?
- No. What reason could there be?
They say in this document that while I was in France, -
- you authorized a translation of the Bible into English.
Could you hurt my feelings allowing this jewel to be translated?
- Who am I to use the royal power?
- Who did it then?
- Not I, Sire.
- Who is cleverer than the King?
Who between the church and the state thinks he can do as he pleases?
Does Your Majesty forget that I was monarch while you were away?
- No, Kate, I do not forget that.
- I've pleaded for this translation
I know.
I still think that the word of God should be available for everybody.
So you've become a learned doctor?
- You're here to instruct us?
- I never thought ...
Quiet!
Pretty business that I, in my old age, should be taught by my wife.
Do you know what the law obliges me to do, even though I like you?
Even though you're a very pretty woman. I like you very much.
- Stop that hellcat screeching.
- What is it?
- The French!
- Where?
Out there. Tall ships.
Coming up like clouds.
- Top-man, what do you see?
- Nothing, my Lord Admiral.
- No trace of the French?
- Not a sail in sight.
I did see the ships for a moment.
Perhaps they saw us and sailed away
- Take that brat out of my sight.
- No!
Go, Lady Elizabeth.
You'll go back to Hatfield.
I don't want to ever see you again
- I'll not go back to Hatfield.
- What's that?
- I'll not go back to Hatfield.
- Sail ho!
- What do you make of them?
- Ships of the line. French.
Nine, ten ...
Bound for Portsmouth.
The King's barge for the ladies.
You! Come here.
You're very lucky. Did you see the before they could see them up there
- Yes.
- Don't you know the world is round
- They must be wrong. It's flat.
- You shape the world as you want.
Why not? Didn't you?
So I did! And you're my daughter.
Water!
I never laughed so much in my life
Thank you, Kate.
Kate.
Don't mourn. Look forward.
I've told these gentlemen to honor and treat you as if I were alive.
Come here, Ned.
You ambitious, old horse.
You can't wait for me to die.
Don't lie to me.
I know you're shrewd.
You're my son's uncle. That's why
I want you on the Council.
But you're a cold fish.
People don't like that.
They like a man to laugh and drink with them.
A man of courage. Tom!
I want him on the Council too.
Come here, Tom.
You're a man of my own kidney.
- Look after my little son.
- I will.
- We've had some good fun together
- Great fun.
- We did some good work, too.
- We made the narrow seas English.
Keep them so.
- You'll need ships.
- I'll get them.
Tom.
Don't be too much of a hero.
Ned's a jealous fool.
Watch the French, but watch Ned first.
I'll watch him.
The sheep.
Just a lot of sheep staring at me.
Mary, big crazy sheep.
My little son a frightened sheep.
You, how did you get in here?
Come closer. I want to see you.
- Who are you?
- The black sheep.
Come closer.
- Anne Boleyn's brat.
- Your daughter!
I remember.
You saw the French coming.
- What will you do when they return
- England has never been invaded!
- Not by the Normans?
- They're us, so they couldn't have
Did you all hear what she said?
Tom, did you hear what she said?
I wish she were a boy.
Watch her grow up, Tom.
You keep an eye on her. Ned, wait and see. She'll make you jump.
I wish I were there to see the fun.
- Pray to release me from purgatory
- You have abolished purgatory.
Don't argue, Ned.
- Ashley, what are you doing?
- Last time I left half our things
- They'll drag us out of our beds.
- The Queen will protect us.
And who's to protect the Queen when she's queen no longer?
Where did I put your warm bodice?
It's always so freezing in Hatfiel
Hatfield? Back to Hatfield?
If I did, I'd never see him again.
Princess Elizabeth.
Get back to Mrs. Ashley.
- I must talk to you.
- In my room? In your bedgown?
You'll lose your head. Do you know what it would mean if they saw you
- They'd say I seduced a princess.
- They say I'll be sent to Hatfiel
Away from everyone I love.
The Queen and ...
They would! They shan't touch you and they won't send you to Hatfiel
I'll find a place for you to live with the Queen.
And I'll come to see you. Often.
- My lord.
- It's bound to be my page.
Don't be afraid. Barney's a good boy. Forget you saw the Princess.
- I'm talking to you.
- I have a message from Seymour.
- He wants you at the Council.
- He's not losing any time.
The coast is clear.
You can run along now.
- Was the King lonely all his life
- Yes.
I'd rather die than be lonely all my life.
You'll not be lonely, Bess.
And remember, no fear any longer.
- Don't forget to come and see me.
- We have an appointment.
The Lady Elizabeth.
Your pardon, madam.
Bess, is that you?
Edward.
Where have you been?
I've been sitting here all alone.
I was left all by myself in the dark. I was afraid.
Why?
My father is dead.
Yes, Edward.
And now they want me to be king.
And I'm frightened. Can't we run away and hide somewhere?
- We can't. You have a duty.
- But I'm afraid.
You're our father's son.
Be proud and strong as he was.
Here he is. I found him. The King is dead. Long live the King.
Long live the King.
Long live the King.
- Long live King Edward VI.
- We pledge allegiance.
- Long live the King.
- Long may you reign.
Make way for the Lord Protector!
I can announce that the Council has appointed me Lord Protector.
My wife, Lady Ann, and I were entrusted with the great honor -
- of becoming
Your Majesty's guardians.
That's not what my father said.
Bess, you heard what my father said
- Uncle Tom was to take care of me
- The King, my brother, is right.
The Council, after careful deliberation, has ruled otherwise.
You were coming from the east wing so you came from the Admiral's room
- It's the simplest logic.
- No! Your syllogism ...
- Don't speak so I can't understand
- It's difficult to avoid.
- Ned, don't let her insult me.
- You have insufficient evidence.
- It's her character!
- Do you know my character?
I knew your mother. Like mother like daughter. And we know what she was
- Ann ...
- Stand aside. I can handle this.
- Madam, I'm warning you.
- Who are you to warn me?
- My mother's daughter.
- And following in her footsteps.
Spending the night with any handsome man. That was Anne Boleyn
Excellent. Maturity is the secret in wine as in women.
- I thought you liked them young.
- No. Young wine goes to the head.
- What are you two talking about?
- Bess. She'll end like her mother
No, Ann. Youth will have its fling
A fling is the word. That's quite signature. Something regal about it
A little too regal.
That's why we sent her to Hatfield
- Sorry to separate you from her.
- Would I find love in the nursery
Yes, when the nursery holds a possible future queen of England!
Ann's warning you against letting ambition lead you into danger.
- But I love danger.
- You also love your life.
Don't amuse yourself with royalty.
It will be taken as a bid for power
You intercepted Lady Elizabeth and sent the Queen there, too.
- The Council will be disturbed.
- The Council is you!
You're Lord Protector against the King's wish.
He didn't want you to have all the power. Neither does the country.
- Neither do I.
- What's your aim? My office?
No, not yet.
Not now.
- What makes you hesitate?
- I don't know, Ned.
Perhaps the memory of Mother, who feared we'd end like Cain and Abel
- Or the desire to be happy.
- With whom? Elizabeth?
- That's my private business.
- Is it?
- Is it your private business?
- Yes!
In 47 B.C., Caesar went east where he came, saw, and conquered.
Mr. Mums, aren't you leaving out an important date?
The year when he fell in love with Cleopatra.
That's always interested me.
I've often wondered ...
What was the fascination she held for one so much older than herself
Was it her youth or intelligence?
It's important to know, Mr. Mums.
- We're to discuss his conquests.
- Yes! His conquest of her.
Of course she fell in love, but how was a girl her age able to hold him?
- I couldn't tell you.
- I know.
She showed him that she shared his interests.
They talked about strategy and about ships!
Ships again!
Ever since we came here, it's been nothing but ships and admirals.
Why not? What is more interesting than the fleet?
We are a seafaring people with the best admirals in the world.
- To name only one ...
- Tom Seymour.
A man of great ability and daring, but where are the ships he needs?
- This is a lesson in history.
- But ships made our history.
How many ships have we today for the defense of England? 25!
Shall the Spanish plunder the world -
- while Tom Seymour sits idly for lack of ships?
Drink this. You'll feel better. An you've had enough lessons for today
- You'll make a corpse of Mr. Mums
- Thank you, Mrs. Ashley.
I shall be grateful for a rest. It's hard to match her energy at my age
Poor Mums. He'll never understand my interest in all these things.
If he has a brain, he'll understand
And he may tell the Court that you want to be an admiral's wife.
- Am I wrong?
- No.
No, you are not wrong.
I love him.
I love him dearly.
I shall love him until I die.
Bess, my darling!
He's a fine man! My father picked him out for a magnificent future.
Had he lived, he might have picked him out for me. Because we match!
- But you're so young.
- I can still share his thoughts.
One day he might sail my ships with my flag.
- With my love.
- In his eyes, you're only a child
His eyes say different things to me
And so do his letters.
He writes me every week. He'll come to see me as soon as he can.
- There's something you should know
- What?
- He's in love with another woman.
- That's not true.
I should have warned you long ago.
But the secret is not my secret.
What secret? Speak up.
What have you heard?
You're an old eavesdropper, listening at key holes.
There is no secret. If there was another woman, you could name her.
- There is no other woman.
- My poor child.
Go, Ashley. Go!
Catherine.
Bess, darling. I'm sorry you had to find out this way.
They were secretly engaged when the King decided to marry her
The Protector would rather kill him than let him marry a royal.
That's why they have to meet at night.
Sweetheart.
It's all right, Ashley.
Go back to bed.
Barnaby, did I see someone with the King?
Yes, Your Grace. Princess Elizabeth
The Princess Elizabeth, here at
Whitehall? Where are they?
- On the lawn. Playing shuttlecock
- How long have they been together
Edward!
Edward!
Edward!
Bess.
Edward.
- Edward.
- Silence. Horse-leech.
Wood louse.
Beetle-face. Herring guts.
What is it you want to tell me?
- If I'm caught they'll beat Barney
- But he is Tom's page.
- He gave him to me for Christmas.
- Do they whip him for what you do?
It's a great honor to be the King's whipping boy.
- Well? You asked for an audience.
- With the King. Not a baby.
But they treat me like a prisoner.
They don't even give me enough pocket money to bribe my servants.
They don't allow me to see him, but he puts coins under the carpet
He's a wonderful man.
Don't you think so, Bess?
- Don't you like my Uncle Tom?
- What difference does it make?
If you want to see him or Catherine you should be allowed to see them.
- You might have plans for them.
- Plans?
You might want them to get married
Perhaps you think they'd like it.
- Perhaps they would.
- Then say so. Your wish is the law
- Who's to argue with the King?
- Who's to argue with me?
Did I say it was my wish they should get married? Yes! I think I did.
- Isn't it a brilliant idea?
- Who am I to judge your ideas?
See that the country knows you're the master.
They're your subjects. They have to obey. Let it be today. It's torture
Bess, what's the matter? You're crying. What are you crying about?
- I don't know.
- You're crying about me.
You don't have to feel sorry for me
Don't pity me. Stop it, Bess!
I can't abide weeping women.
Bess, you'll see what happens.
I'm the King!
By the devil's teeth, where are my servants? I want pens and parchment
I want to write a letter to a friend of mine.
"We have Your Highness's contentment at heart and, after consideration,
- it is our royal wish and desire that you marry our Uncle Tom."
"We expect you to do it forthwith, showing yourself as a good subject
"We chose our Uncle Tom because he will not be troublesome to you.
- Oh, Tom!
- Not troublesome to you! Rascal!
Perhaps we laugh too soon. The boy has no power. Ned won't allow it.
He must if the letter's made public
I'll read it at the reception.
"We persuaded Bess of the excellence of the idea -
- as soon as it matured in our mind."
- Is this perhaps your doing?
- No!
- No, it isn't.
- Barnaby told me you were there.
Bess, my sweet Bess. You talked the King over. You did it for me.
I told you I had nothing ... nothing to do with it.
Bess.
Bess.
My dear, what's wrong?
Madam, I ...
I shall leave the day before the wedding.
Now I understand.
Oh, my darling.
You thought you'd have to leave.
That's wrong. This is your home!
You belong to us.
I love you, Bess.
And Tom loves you too.
You know that, don't you?
- Yes, madam.
- Then you'll stay?
Yes, madam.
Today my Uncle Tom wed Catherine
Parr. It almost killed Uncle Ned.
But it was my wish, and I am the King!
More power to Uncle Tom. I'll give him ships to fight the pirates.
I am the King.
Uncle Tom has defeated the pirates
It almost killed my Uncle Ned.
Hoorah!
- They cheer him like a savior.
- A man can work for his people.
But the crowd still runs after a handsome face.
- Just listen to those women.
- The man's insatiable.
- He has two wives already!
- What ridiculous nonsense you talk!
- If only you'd listen to me.
- I do, too much.
- That's why I sent Tom on the trip
- The Lord High Admiral.
Welcome home, and thanks in the name of the Council for a splendid job.
- I'm glad you liked what I did.
- Not all of it, Tom.
It seems that after the battle, you had a good time with the pirates.
We cracked some bottles and played cards. They're great captains.
- And robbers!
- Yes, they do forget their manner
They want me to do it again.
Keep the sea lanes open.
This is great. Just give me ten times as many ships.
- And the crowd will cheer you.
- And sweep you to the throne.
Fascinating idea.
- We'll all go to sea with you, Tom
- Afraid, Ann? I wonder why?
Had you hoped I returned defeated, or, better still, not at all?
Was that the idea of sending me out with only five decrepit ships?
- Make way for the King.
- But, Your Majesty ...
- I have to see my Uncle Tom.
- I told you the King was not ...
Your Majesty. The admiral of your fleet reports with great pride.
The campaign you wished has been taken to a successful conclusion.
- We are very pleased.
- Your ship was in the lead.
- A shining example to the rest.
- We are very pleased. We thank you
- Little rascal! How have you been
- Nothing under the carpet!
- There will be!
- Put His Majesty down, Tom.
Your Majesty, your people want you
Tom!
Cathy!
- It's so good to have you home.
- Oh, Cathy.
Why aren't you down to greet him?
What will they think of you?
- They'll be happy to be alone.
- Aren't you behaving strangely?
- He'll think you don't care.
- Leave me alone, Ashley.
Bess!
Well, what's this? Triumphal arches everywhere, but Bess is in her room
I thought you'd like a few moments alone with Catherine.
I see. Tact.
- Grown up, is that it?
- Yes, milord.
- Isn't it all rather nonsense?
- No, milord.
Yes, milord. No, milord.
Welcome home, Tom.
- Why don't you ride with them?
- I should only spoil their fun.
Besides, they're going to try the new sails, and I'm not a sailor.
You're troubled, Ashley.
What is it?
I'm not sure he realizes that she's no longer a child.
It has always delighted me to see them together, Ashley.
What do you think of it?
It's as good as new.
- Better!
- Why?
You've made improvements.
The mizzenmast is rigged to make her easier on the helm.
- Where did you pick that up?
- I read and I watch.
- I like everything about the sea.
- That includes me.
- You most of all.
- Bless you for that, Bess.
- What can't we do with 100 ships!
- We?
You and I and England.
Cathy.
We're home.
I'll tell her what a great sailor you are. You belong there!
We'll sail again, together.
Unless ...
Unless the Lord Protector has his way.
How would you like to go to Denmark or Sweden to be married there?
- You're not serious.
- My brother wants to marry you off
To the Danish or the Swedish prince
Doesn't he know I'd never dream of leaving ..? I belong to England.
He knows that one day this country may belong to you.
- That's why he wants you gone.
- The King is still young.
He's not strong. He won't grow old
And your sister Mary's a fool.
She's not like you.
If you were queen, would you let your admiral do great deeds?
I'd give him opportunities he never dared dream about.
I'd send him around the globe like the Portuguese do.
Send him to the New World to let the Spanish know we're the masters
- But we're a small country.
- That can be remedied, Tom.
- It can be remedied.
- It's exciting to hear you talk.
I find myself believing in what you say.
- I envy your admiral.
- But that will be you, Tom.
- You!
- My dear Bess.
Who knows what I'll be when you set out to beat the Spaniards?
You'll be with me, Tom.
Always!
Always!
Well, nobody's home.
We're back. We're hungry.
Cathy. Don't move, sweetheart.
Beautiful!
I wish that Italian Leonardo was alive. He could have painted you.
Tom!
- Have you been far?
- Everywhere. We circled the globe
Conquered the world.
It was wonderful!
You behave as if we haven't seen each other for weeks.
Tom, put me down, please.
Thank you, milords.
Tom!
- What's that?
- Princess Elizabeth.
- Here? To do what?
- Meet the Danish envoy.
Don't you think he should see her before he recommends the marriage?
- You know she won't leave England
- Yet she wrote me a letter.
Most surprising in it's graceful attitude.
"Whatever your choice may be, I'll bow to the wisdom of the Council."
"No one is more eager than I to do what is best for the country
Does the letter disturb you? Strange she never told you of her plans.
- Your sister is pretty tonight.
- Is she?
- And very foolish.
- Yes!
- You're not in favor of this?
- No.
- Your sister appears to be.
- Yes, but all girls are silly.
And if she doesn't take the Dane, she'll have to take a German.
Uncle Ned loves the Germans.
I wish he'd die.
What?
- What was that?
- I wish he'd die ... D-Y-E.
- It's the wrong spelling.
- What are you talking about?
Spelling. Nobody knows for certain how to spell the King's English.
- As long as it's the right word.
- It was exactly the right word.
Edward. Would you ask the orchestra to play the Danske Dans?
What does she want?
Danske Dans!
Princess.
- Thank you, Barnaby.
- Your Highness.
Do the Danes really put meat under their saddles until it's tender?
That's the Hungarians.
Uncle Tom, you promised.
- In here, Your Highness.
- What is it?
The Admiral asks you to wait for him here. He wishes to speak with you.
- What about, I wonder?
- He didn't say, but ...
But what?
What were you going to say?
I heard him tell the Lord Protector that he wishes to speak with you .
... about this Danish marriage.
Really?
Poor Tom. Spending the night talking to Ned Seymour instead of dancing.
I danced with almost everyone.
I haven't stopped for hours.
- Even though my shoe pinched me.
- Let me do that.
It's been a glorious night, hasn't it? Something to talk about
- On a long, Danish winter night.
- Don't leave us for Denmark.
That's not for you.
You're so exquisite.
I've said too much. I must go.
The Admiral will soon be here.
Don't go, Barnaby.
You don't want to leave me.
Never again, as long as I live.
Do you want to kiss me?
He saw us. The Danish gentleman.
I want no one to suffer.
I didn't see his face.
Let us assume that our project was a mistake.
- We thank you for your forbearance
- Good night.
- Where's that girl?
- Tom took her home. He's in a rage
Look! That lighted window in Lambeth Palace.
The bishop is working night and day on that new religion.
Isn't that exciting? A new religion
Perhaps a new way of life.
- A new England.
- Who was the man?
- What man?
- The man you kissed.
- There was no man.
- Boy, then. Yes, of course.
Barnaby Fitzpatrick!
Was it Barnaby?
- Answer me.
- Yes.
Don't tell me you love him.
You must be proud of your night's work. Outrageous performance.
- Then let's forget it.
- You have sent him to the block!
Not him. Too young and unimportant
Had it been someone like you ...
That would have pleased you.
Doing like your mother.
Is that what you want, to drive everyone mad who loves you? Is it?
Tom, what are you saying?
It couldn't be ...
- No, that would be beyond belief.
- What would?
That you're jealous. Tom Seymour, the great Lord Admiral, jealous.
Stop it. Stop that, I said.
- But it's so funny ...
- I said stop it!
Stop it!
Bess!
- Forgive me. I was beside myself.
- You couldn't help it.
You either had to kiss me or ...
And I think it was better that you slapped me.
- Is that what you wanted?
- I love you, Tom. I always have.
It should never have happened, but I can't stop loving you.
I couldn't bear it anymore. I want to hurt you. I was desperate.
I love you, Tom.
Bess.
- Yes, Catherine?
- Come here, child.
How lovely you look, this morning.
Come and sit with me.
- I'm disturbing you.
- I've finished.
Tom has gone to London for two or three days. We're alone together
That will give us time to talk things over.
We've had a wonderful life together you and I and Tom.
Last night when Tom came home,
I knew something had happened.
We talked all through the night.
Your name was never mentioned.
And yet I knew.
You see, I love Tom and he loves me very dearly.
I can't afford to lose him. I'm not like you ... strong and independent
You have your whole life before you
One day you may be Queen of England
But I need Tom.
He cannot mean all that to you.
He means my whole life to me.
Come here. Sit close to me.
Bess, you're so young. This may be no more than a passing infatuation
If it is not so ...
Then you will have to go away.
Only you can know whether your love for Tom is deep enough -
- to outweigh all the unhappiness of separation.
I thank you for your kindness.
You make me feel so ungrateful.
Bess, Bess.
I'm sorry, madam. I'll have to go.
- Mr. Parry?
- Yes, he's back.
Mr. Parry, you saw the Lady Catherine? How is she?
- No one may see her.
- Where is the Admiral's letter?
There is no letter.
No letter?
- Milord was distraught.
- I know. That's why I sent you.
She is ...
She's in no danger, is she?
- Mr. Parry!
- The Lady Catherine is dying.
Remember once, many months ago, you carried me in your arms like this?
- I remember.
- You'd been away with Bess.
And I thought I'd lost you to her.
But when you came home, you were very sweet to me.
Your bed is ready now.
Thank you, Lady Tyrwhitt.
Tom.
You don't want me to die because you want to marry Elizabeth, do you?
Do you?
- Would you mind leaving us?
- Tom ...
- Tell me.
- Merciful heavens, Cathy!
Have I ever wanted to hurt you?
Have I ever wanted to leave you?
Haven't we been happy together?
Forgive me, Tom.
I must be mad to say such things.
Where's Bess?
Tell her to come closer to the bed
Bess is not here.
But you were talking to her.
That was Lady Tyrwhitt.
Bess is in Hatfield.
Remember?
Hatfield? Oh, yes, now I remember.
She said she had to go because she loved you.
Tom.
Yes, Cathy.
You're not the first man to be in love with two women.
We celebrate His Majesty's birthday in the spirit of brotherly love, -
- which he so nobly embodies as a shining example to us, his servant
Long live the King!
The Earl and Countess of Courtnay.
Happy birthday, Your Majesty.
Sir Anthony and Lady Denny.
My humble duty, Sire.
Lord and Lady Mostang.
Loyal greetings, Your Majesty.
Lord and Lady Clinton.
- Look who's here. Elizabeth!
- Yes. How pale she looks.
Grief! She hasn't seen Tom for almost a year since Catherine died
- Letters?
- Just one before he sailed.
Her Highness, Princess Elizabeth.
May God grant that you rule Englan for years in peace and wisdom.
We thank you, dear sister, for you loyalty and loving kindness.
I'm playing shuttlecock with Mary Throckmorton now.
- You've changed. Are you sick?
- I must see you. Please!
What can I tell you? His ships have been sighted. He'll be home soon.
- He's well. He isn't wounded.
- That's all I wanted to hear.
- Thank you, Edward.
- I think you like my Uncle Tom.
- I hope they won't arrest him.
- But he won another victory.
Yes, and he wasn't meant to.
Besides, he's coming back to you.
- Edward, what are you saying?
- That's what he said in his letter
- What letter?
- The one he sent by courier.
- I never got it.
- Of course not. Uncle Ned got it.
Edward, what's in this letter?
I've got to know.
- It was a nice letter. I liked it
- But what did it say?
You're to wait for him. When he's back, you won't be lonely anymore.
Are you lonely, Bess?
I think you are.
My Uncle Tom loves you, and that's why Uncle Ned wants to kill him.
Kill him? Edward!
- Who are you?
- Your new steward.
Appointed by the Lord Protector to take Mr. Parry's place.
Mr. Parry and Mrs. Ashley were taken to London for questioning.
Lady Tyrwhitt now has the honor of being your governess.
I'm glad you're home. We didn't know you'd be delayed in London.
My Lady Elizabeth?
My Lord!
My Lord?
Is that all you have to say?
- You've come.
- Did you ever doubt it?
Tears? That's not like you.
That's not like my young Bess.
I'll remember 1,000 things I should have said. And it'll be too late.
But why?
You risked your life coming here.
Ned isn't giving me much time.
My life isn't worth anything if I don't risk it. We'll put up a fight
But when shall I see you again?
Not for some time.
- Perhaps never.
- Never?
What sort of word is that?
You only came to say goodbye.
I couldn't leave without your Godspeed.
- Bess!
- I love you and I'm frightened.
Ned will kill you if he can.
Do you remember when we sailed?
We planned to sail the seven seas.
Explore the four corners of the
Earth, find new countries. Remember
- I shall remember while I live.
- I felt the future belongs to us.
- So did I.
- So it does!
So it will!
It's time.
Godspeed, Tom.
Godspeed!
Milady Elizabeth.
We came in the name of the King to tell you that Admiral Tom Seymour
- has been arrested and taken to the Tower.
I don't believe you.
You wouldn't dare touch the Admiral
Read this.
The people will set him free.
You admit he tried to arouse the people against us. Did you help him?
- For years you've conspired ...
- Take care. You're not very wise!
- Remember I'm second to the throne
- You've thought of that, have you?
- You, too, want the throne.
- That will cost you your head.
It is your head that is in question
It's my duty to protect this realm
- against you and my brother. He finally influenced you to marry him
He hoped to overthrow the Council.
Many witnesses have, under pressure testified to the shameless affair.
- Even Catherine accused you of it
- You're lying. She loved me.
- She was my friend.
- But you were not her's.
Have you anything to say?
Whatever you say will be set down word for word and weighed.
Perhaps in your own favor.
- I'll testify.
- Write.
Yes, write!
I accuse the Lord Protector -
- of trying to convict a man of things he has never done.
He is plotting the basest crime of all. The murder of his brother.
Write that in his envy and fear, -
- and most ignoble envy of Tom
Seymour, he would like to kill him
- Because the people love him.
- Your violence betrays your guilt
Write that the Lord Protector stands accused before the people -
- whom he plans to betray.
If he knew the nature of the English, he'd tremble.
If he tries to kill his own brother like Cain, he'll be driven out.
He'll find it in the Bible, which translated so he may understand it
Write that if he harms Tom Seymour he puts a noose about his own neck
You think you have sovereign power
Don't forget you're in danger.
Remember that here you are only a subject, as your mother was.
But she took three lovers with her to the block.
I shall ask the King to send forth a proclamation -
- stating that all your charges are lies and slander.
I shall demand this proclamation to be read by everyone in this country
Five o'clock and all's well.
Well, jailor, where's that sunshine you promised me?
Barnaby!
A friendly face. You don't know what this means to me. Bless you.
- Have you seen her? Is she ill?
- They never left her alone.
Night and day they questioned her.
They say that ...
She turned on them again and again
She was their judge.
Her father said, "Watch her grow up
She'll be a match for you."
"I wish I could be there to see the fun." And he was right.
There will be fun in England soon.
I want to be there when it happens
I see.
I can't quite believe it.
I've always been lucky. Lucky with things and lucky with people.
It's hard to believe that this could be the end.
"To the Lieutenant of the Tower of London."
"Tower of London ..."
"We, Edward, by the grace of God..
"Grace of God ..."
"Do hereby command you ..."
"Do hereby command you."
Goodbye, my boy.
Tell her from me ...
Tell her ...
Well, never mind.
I think she knows.
Now we're alone.
Yes.
You have to go to bed now.
Why didn't they let you come before
Why didn't they let you see me?
I liked my Uncle Tom.
Princess Elizabeth.
She never mentions his name. That's how I know that in her heart, -
- he's still alive.
Look, it's another day.
She'll be Queen of England.
That's why I put on this dress.
I wore it when the little King died
But for Ned Seymour's execution, -
- I trimmed it with this gold lace
It's beautiful.
Here we go up, up, up
Up to the sky so high
- Your Majesty.
- Your Majesty.
English subtitles:
Tom Ahlmann - IFT
Venice - Spring 1866
The last months of Austrian rule in Venetia.
The Italian government has allied itself to Prussia and the war of liberation is imminent.
Foreigners out of Venice!
General La Marmora has mobilised the army!
Long live La Marmora!
Viva Italia!
Viva Italia!
Where are the stewards?
This is a disgrace!
Please go and see, General. lf this continues, we'll have no choice but to evacuate the theatre.
Please go and see, General!
How amusing. This is the kind of war the Italians prefer.
A shower of confetti to an accompaniment of mandolins.
Coward!
You're a coward!
I’m ready to prove that the Italians want to fight!
And if you are a gentleman...
Let me go!
You have no right to lay hands on me!
Viva Italia!
Power to the Italian Army!
- Where are you going?
- To the foyer. It’s terribly hot here.
I don’t think this is the best time.
Leave me alone.
You know I always do as I please.
Even so, I won't allow you to wear these flowers.
It all began that evening.
It was the 27th of May.
My cousin, Roberto Ussoni, who'd been among the organisers of this demonstration, was also an important figure in the Venetian underground movement. l was terribly worried he'd endangered himself by challenging that officer.
I was already thinking of ways to help him.
Roberto.
Livia.
It was madness to expose yourself like this.
You shouldn't have done it.
All I know is that I lost my head.
When that cad said those words...
- What will you do now?
- He has accepted my challenge.
At least, so it seems.
- We'll fight a duel.
- No, you mustn't!
To take on an officer, in your position... the consequences would be so...
Something must be done.
Leave!
You must get out of this theatre right away.
Go home.
Go there or to Marsenza's, wherever you want...
Wait for me to get word to you.
I beg of you, Roberto, you must be careful for everyone's sake!
I know. Don't worry.
But did you see? They rose up tonight.
There's still a lot to do, but they're stirring.
Let's go, Roberto.
We'll go by way of the pier.
- Farewell, Roberto. Go!
- Farewell, Livia.
- Go!
- See you soon.
This is La Marmora's statement.
We haven't published it in the newspapers.
It’s utter nonsense.
And it would only further agitate the Venetians.
There are still people here who don't think much of him and his provocations.
We are truly sorry to have halted the performance, dear Count, but we cannot allow La Fenice to become a hotbed of sedition.
I wholeheartedly agree.
But please believe me, this must be the work of some agent provocateur.
- There can be no doubt about that.
- Of course. It has been a delightful evening.
Ah, Countess Serpieri.
There is going to be a duel.
I mean it.
They've challenged Franz Mahler.
Maybe they wish to recreate the battle between the Horatii and Curiatii.
You are very close to the man who made the challenge, Countess.
Please, Your Excellency, let us not dwell on this unfortunate incident.
That young man is a distant relative, but we never see him.
Aren't relatives the people we all know least?
I know him very well.
This will be no battle between the Horatii and Curiatii.
My cousin isn't interested in politics.
He is completely apathetic... when it comes to this kind of thing,
I mean.
He must have had other reasons.
That Lieutenant Mahler...
I have heard a lot about him.
This doesn't surprise me.
All the ladies in Venice are talking about him.
There you are, the ladies must have spoken of him.
That's how so many stories are made up.
Isn't that right?
Is this an officer under your command,
Your Excellency?
- Mahler? Of course.
- Yes, he is.
I would love to meet him.
Given that all the Venetian ladies are talking about him,
I’d love to be able to speak with him too.
Countess, this is a favour you shouldn't request from one of your admirers.
Lieutenant Mahler is far too dangerous a rival.
- Would you care to sit down?
- No, thank you, Your Excellency.
This isn't the first time
I’ve seen Il Trovatore.
Besides, Austrians love music.
We Italians, on the other hand, come to the theatre for very different reasons.
We have arrived;
There's the tower where the State's prisoners languish.
Ah, the hapless man was brought here!
Go...leave me, and don't fear for me.
I can save him, perhaps
Fear for me?
Sure and ready is my protection.
- Shrouded in this dark night...
- Countess, Lieutenant Mahler.
Countess Serpieri.
I’m near you, and you don't know it.
- Would you care to sit down?
- Thank you.
Moaning wind, you who blow here.
- Do you have a good view?
- It’s fine, thank you.
Do you like opera, Lieutenant Mahler?
I am very fond of opera,
Countess Serpieri, as long as I am fond of that particular opera.
And you?
I’m very fond of it. l simply dislike it taking place off the stage. l dislike it when people act melodramatically without considering the serious consequences of an impulsive action, or of an action dictated by unforgivable thoughtlessness.
May I speak to you very truthfully?
Please.
Honesty is the one thing I appreciate. lf I’ve heard aright... a duel should take place tomorrow.
Isn't that so?
And it's up to you to accept or to refuse this challenge - isn't that so? l wish to know.
I wish to know as well.
Don't accept the challenge.
It isn't right to risk one's life for...
Why are you so concerned about my life?
It’s a matter of principle.
Don't worry.
Neither my life nor your principles are at any risk.
This foolish incident will soon be dealt with by an arrest.
What do you mean?
..waken in him the memories...
What wonderful music.
Will you return tomorrow evening?
If you'd allow me to...
I don’t feel well.
I must go.
Please, don't move.
Good night, Your Excellency.
- Are you depriving us of you company?
- I don’t feel well.
I’m so sorry.
Good night.
- Let's go.
- lf you don't feel well, we should wait a while.
- I said, let's go.
- As you wish.
Good bye! Why so soon?
Won't you come with us?
Your Excellency. Colonel.
They arrested Roberto as soon as he left La Fenice.
That's impossible!
He was with Donà and Meneghini.
All three have been arrested.
We must do something, immediately.
Why don't you tell your husband about it?
- If he'll only look into it...
- Leave it up to me.
Go to Marsenza's.
I’ll send you word.
But leave now.
Don't take any risks.
- Good night.
- Good night.
Did you hear?
They've arrested Roberto.
Listen, I’ve never asked anything from you, but this time you have to do something to free Roberto.
You can do this.
You have influence, you know people.
I’m sure that lieutenant must have reported him.
- He didn't want to fight.
- Fair enough.
Why would an Austrian officer fight an Italian civilian?
It would be absurd.
If your cousin had a modicum of good sense...
Can't you see what the outcome might be?
Yes, I do. And I want nothing to do with this matter.
They were right to arrest him.
And you'd like to involve me in matters that don't concern me in the least?
I’ve had it. Don't mention this to me again, do you understand?
It’s childish tomfoolery!
What do you all think you'll achieve, anyway?
Roberto was sent into exile for a year, along with many others.
I had a strange foreboding about what his departure would mean...for me.
Farewell.
I hope to see you soon, my guardian angel.
Go to Aldeno as soon as you can.
Please tell Cavalletto.
We need secure lines of communication.
I hope to come back soon.
Garibaldi is in Desenzano.
Just think, Livia, the time is nigh.
May we meet again as Italians!
Roberto, take care.
But when I saw that officer again, l understood that he was at the root of all my fears, and that for many days I’d been apprehending a possible meeting.
Countess Serpieri.
What do you want?
- May I escort you?
- No, thank you, Lieutenant Mahler.
But there's a curfew and it's already late.
Would you have me arrested because I’m still walking about?
I’ve never had anyone arrested over so little.
What do you think about
Roberto Ussoni's arrest?
Oh, so he's been arrested? I thought he was only asked to go for a change of air for a while.
They sent him into exile, as you know perfectly well.
You believe it's my fault, but you're wrong.
I hope you believe me.
Besides, Ussoni will be pleased.
He was born to sacrifice himself for a noble cause.
- And what were you born to do?
- To be what I am.
To be what you are...
Good night.
Wouldn't it have been better if you'd told me that first evening that Ussoni was your lover, and that you hoped
I’d do anything to keep him in Venice?
A true gentleman. would not take advantage of the fact that I’m alone to insult me.
- I have asked you not to follow me.
- But I’m not following you.
- So you're not following me?
- Consider me your shadow.
- Thank you, but mine will be enough.
- Mine will protect you much better.
Look, don't follow me!
- Is he dead?
- Yes.
How did it happen?
Come, quickly.
- What's this?
- Go and look.
He's dead! Quick, take him away.
Two men over here.
These damned Venetians.
Every night, they kill someone.
Go! Take him away! One either end.
Quick, quick!
Poor wretch. I knew him.
He hadn't been long in the Eighth Company.
Thank you.
You see, it isn't very pleasant to be part of an army of occupation.
You have to live among men who hate you.
And since we're young, far away from home, alone... we end up courting their wives, their girlfriends, and...
Yes, I understand.
Good night, Lieutenant.
I’m not afraid any more.
Please don't bother to walk me home.
Good night.
But there's something
I’d like you to know.
Roberto Ussoni is not my lover.
He's my cousin.
And he's the man
I admire most in the world.
Do you admire him more than your husband?
My husband and I have very different views regarding the Austrians.
He's prepared to accept them, and is willing to accept favours from them.
I’m like my cousin, a true Italian.
Good night.
Countess Serpieri.
We walked for a long time, together, through the deserted streets.
My preconceptions had vanished.
Time stood still.
All that remained was the hidden pleasure of hearing him talk, of hearing him laugh. of listening to the sound of our steps, in that silent city.
- Where are we going?
- Wherever you'd like.
I don’t even know where we are.
- We've arrived somewhere.
- That's my house.
That's where I live.
Alone?
No, not alone, with other officers.
We often sit around in our shirtsleeves, drinking beer, talking about women.
- But everything's about to change.
- Why?
Because I’ve met you.
- What have you found?
- A piece of broken mirror.
Why are you looking at yourself so closely?
Are you that taken with yourself?
Yes. I never pass before a mirror without looking at myself.
Why is that?
I like to look at myself to make sure I am... me!
Is that the only way you can be sure?
Also when I see a woman who is looking at me the way you're looking at me right now.
''It is Judgement Day
''the dead rise again...
''to eternal joy...
''or eternal suffering.
''And we remain in an embrace
''and nothing matters to us, neither Heaven, nor Hell.''
- Do you like these verses by Heine?
- No.
- Why not?
- I don’t like their meaning.
What a shame.
But with war about to break out...
You think there will be a war?
Yes. However strange it may be that people will die over matters that don't concern them.
Do you believe in war?
I believe that a country's freedom should be defended even if it costs you your freedom or your life.
And so we shall be enemies?
I don’t believe that.
I suppose it is a failing of mine that I’ve never been interested in war, in politics, in the loss or gain of territory, in all those terribly serious matters for which men ought to be ready to die.
You see, I believe that even if one man was born on this side of a river and another man on the other side of a mountain, it doesn't mean God put the rivers and mountains there to keep them apart.
You talk like a child.
How can you be a military man when you hold such opinions?
It seems absurd that you're an officer.
Yes, I agree with you.
Everything's quite absurd.
I must go now.
It’s almost dawn.
- Livia, that's your name, isn't it?
- Yes.
When can I see you again?
Tomorrow?
No, that's impossible.
I’ll wait for you.
By now it was dawn.
The city was coming to life again.
And I was beginning to feel almost ashamed.
How could I have spent the whole night with a stranger, an Austrian officer?
I was an Italian woman, a married woman, a woman who had never behaved frivolously in her life.
And yet, four days later, four days spent in the vain hope of meeting him,
I was going to him. l had managed to persuade myself that he alone could help Roberto.
It was my duty to ask him.
Not bad, eh?
Do you want a game?
I’ve been waiting for days... and you've finally come.
Let us not bother with heaven and hell.
From that day on, we often met.
We would go to a rented room that Franz had found in the Fondamenta Nuove.
You see, in these rooms, there is always some little noise.
The swish of a curtain, a fly banging against the window..
Had you ever noticed that?
No, Franz.
One notices it only later, as a memory.
Only then does one remember having heard it while in an embrace.
Is that so, Franz?
Later, you realise that you'd heard it all along, without paying attention.
But later... this tiny detail becomes important.
Can a detail be that important?
It’s the sense of adventure.
It’s as important as...
As what?
The colour, the scent of your soft hair on the pillow.
Had you never noticed this, my love?
No, Franz, not until now.
I keep forgetting...
What?
I keep forgetting that the past doesn't exist for Countess Serpieri.
There is only the present, and the future.
Only the present, Franz.
Only today? Not tomorrow?
- Will you hand me that hairbrush?
- Yes.
You see, if they told me that there would be no tomorrow for me, that tomorrow would never come... after a moment like this...
I would feel as if a doctor had told me,
''You are about to die.
''You only have a few hours left.''
And now I know it's true.
It is just now, just now, Franz.
There is no tomorrow.
Every time you leave, you say,
''Farewell, Franz,
'we will never meet again''.
But each time, I wait for you with the same confidence that you'll return.
You may think you will never see me again, but I’ll keep waiting for you.!
Maybe you will.
But you've had so many love affairs, during which the room was filled with sounds, with the noise of a fly banging against a window, which you only noticed later on.
So you got up and you gave that poor insect its freedom, with the same elegance with which you freed yourself from the woman's heart.
But don't worry, when it comes to us you won't even have to make that small effort.
I’ll do it for you, Franz.
I’ll get up,
I’ll open the window, and I’ll let your heart fly out, as free as a butterfly.
Would you give me those hairpins, please?
I will no longer be acting as your maid.
You will have to get your own hairpins.
Franz, remember me by this.
What a splendid medallion.
Keep it by your heart.
I’m leaving now.
I’m leaving.
Farewell.
Farewell.
Franz...
- Would you let me leave like this?
- No, my love...
I knew you wouldn't go.
One afternoon, while I waited for him in vain in that room,
I realised for the first time that I wasn't in control of my feelings, as I’d always believed.
I must go out, and no one else is home.
Shall I leave the door ajar or will you answer it?
Are you sure the lieutenant hasn't left a message for me?
- A message?
- I’m sure, ma'am.
But perhaps you'd gone out and no one was home.
What can I say?
Maybe he's left.
There was a captain who came here a lot and he was suddenly transferred.
In fact, you wouldn't happen to know anyone who could help me?
They want to turn my house into military accommodation.
Don't they have barracks for that?
Ma'am, see if you can help me.
It would be in your interests, too.
I know you can do anything, Countess.
I know you very well, you see.
One of my sisters spent years working for...
You're leaving?
But what if the lieutenant should arrive?
Besides, Countess... what if the lieutenant has really left?
Who will settle his bill?
I’ve never said anything, because I know him well, but... think of all the laundry I have to do.
Thank you, ma'am. That's better.
Excuse me, is Lieutenant Mahler around?
Is he in Venice?
Yes, he's still in Venice..
- Do you know when he'll be back?
- I don’t know, ma'am.
- I’ll wait for him.
- Please do.
Do sit down.
Do you like our dwelling?
She won't say whether she likes it, but she comes here anyway.
Two pairs of underpants,, three shirts, two smart shirts, and two sheets.
Here you are! The gentleman will come by tomorrow to pay his bill
But the lieutenant, didn't he say where he was going?
How should I know?
- He didn't come back last night.
- He stayed out?
- All night?
- Probably not all night.
But he didn't come back?
You didn't see him?
How should I know?
Perhaps he was with Kati or with Nena.
Don't lie to me.
Well, if you want to wait for him, please do.
Are you sure he's not nearby?
- Or in the barracks?
- Nothing's certain.
I can assure you of that.
In fact, it's the one assurance I can make.
But if you're patient... And since you're a friend of Franz's, you must be.
Ludwig said he left Franz an hour ago.
They were playing billiards together.
We don't know where he went after that.
Why can't you keep your mouth shut?
Pay no attention to him.
He doesn't know what he's talking about.
Why don't you sit down?
Franz will be here in a few minutes.
We never know what he's up to, or where he is.
He's always out somewhere.
He's hard to pin down.
That's just the way he is.
We lived in the same apartment for three months, once, in Innsbruck.
Girls were always coming around to see him.
And even if he was home, he refused to see them.
- Countess! We're leaving.
- What is it?
The count has ordered us to pack.
You must have misunderstood him.
What's happening here?
You could have told me about this.
Don't I matter at all?
The Prussians have invaded Holstein.
This means the war has begun.
- I think it would be wiser...
- No, it can't be!
This is so sudden.
- What do you want?
- Instructions from the countess.
There's no hurry, Laura.
I was dismayed by my husband's decision.
But I managed to convince him to delay our departure by at least twenty-four hours.
Lieutenant Mahler, please, from the Eighth Company.
The Eighth Company is no longer here, ma'am.
They're at the Misericordia barracks.
Oh, Countess!
I was bringing you an umbrella.
The count told me to.
But I didn't know where to look for you.
I thought I’d start out at Countess Marcello's, or...
But you're all wet.
What terrible weather!
Even the sky has gone mad.
It’s the war's fault.
I remember as if it were today that in '59...
The count was worried.
I said you must have had things to do before the departure.
A man came looking for you.
I had never seen him before.
I didn't tell the count.
He said it was urgent, that you had to go see him.
You have to go to
Campo San Geremìa 349 and ring three times.
- When did he come? Who was he?
- I don’t know him. You'd just gone out.
He wanted to go looking for you.
I’ll be back later. Give me the umbrella.
What shall I tell the count?
Whatever you want!
I don’t care!
I really don't care!
Tell him everything!
Tell him!
There was no call for you to spy on me.
I’d have told you myself.
I’m tired of lying.
It’s true, I have a lover. l love him. I want to be with him!
Livia, At last!
We were waiting for you. Come in.
Livia!
Livia, how wonderful.
At last!
Oh, it's you. I didn't know you were back.
You could have told me.
Livia, we were able to cross the border last night.
I must get in touch with our friends in Venice.
- There's no time to lose.
- Why didn't you trust me?
- She wanted me to believe that...
- You can't understand.
You can't understand.
I’ve already been very clear with Livia.
Now I should tell you what I said to her.
I have absolutely no intention of accepting the position the Austrian government has recently insisted on offering me.
Livia, how are you?
I was born in Venice,
I was brought up here.
My business affairs are tied to this city.
My loved ones are here.
Now, it's clear that whatever the outcome of this war,
Venice will go to the Italian government.
The French Emperor has vouched for this.
As a result of all this,
I wish to help you.
You can trust me.
As you can see, mine is a practical offer.
It isn't dictated by enthusiasm or by ideals and beliefs I don’t share.
I understand.
And what do want in return?
I told you, I want to be able to stay in my country without being harassed.
- I can't promise you anything.
- I see.
But, one day, you could testify in my favour.
...and a ruby ring.
A gold chain with a watch...
Livia, would you be prepared to leave for Aldeno tomorrow?
Nothing would please me more.
For days, I’ve been telling Livia...
I know, it was my fault.
I wanted to wait for you.
I was sure that you would come back.
That's fine, Livia, but now there's no time to lose.
I’ll be leaving Venice tomorrow.
I must reach the headquarters of the Italian Army.
They'll instruct me on the role of the volunteers.
We've set up a good communication network. Luca is already in Aldeno.
I’ll be there in four or five days, if everything goes well.
You must take charge of the money we've raised.
Give it to me, Andrea.
They need it urgently.
Our volunteers are living off charity, like hermits.
It’s a decent sum.
You must have contributed as well.
No.
We've been waiting for this moment for a long time.
And now it has arrived, it feels like a surprise, doesn't it?
It comes as a shock.
We must all behave as if the lives of our fighters depend upon our actions.
We no longer have any rights,
Livia, only duties.
We must learn to forget ourselves.
I don’t care if I sound bombastic.
Italy is at war.
It is our war!
Our revolution!
Roberto's words, his trust in me, had given me the courage to leave.
The first days spent in the peaceful surroundings of our villa at Aldeno reminded me of the periods of convalescence that follow a serious childhood illness.
- Laura! Laura!
- Yes, I’m coming. Just a minute.
When the dogs started barking,
I noticed someone on the balcony. l noticed someone on the balcony.
- I didn't hear a thing.
- Now be quiet. The countess is asleep.
- Who is it?
- It’s me. Laura.
- What is it?
- Countess, you must forgive me.
But the gatekeeper...
Yes?
...has seen someone on the balcony.
Countess!
He's sure he saw someone on the balcony.
Yes, it was me.
- Have you lost your mind?
- Yes, in Venice, when you left.
- Is the door locked?
- The door...
- Laura?
- Yes, Countess.
It was me.
- Go to bed.
- You see, you fool?
- Did they see me?
- What were you thinking?
How could you?
Why do you keep all those dogs? To keep away your enemies or your lovers?
Why did you decide to come here,
Franz?
I didn't decide anything. I just came.
I suddenly felt I had to see you again, so I came.
Livia!
So you'd have me get torn to pieces by your dogs?
No! No! No!
Go and hide over there.
Go, over there.
I... I don’t believe you risked your life just to see me again.
There was a time when I would have believed you, before you began to miss our rendezvous, before those agonising days when I couldn't find you anywhere.
I am younger than you,
Countess Serpieri, and not as smart as I’d like to think.
When I began to realise that I’d fallen in love with a woman who would never be able to love me, my first reaction was to disappear.
That's why you didn't see me again.
But it made no difference.
When I realised that you were the one slipping away from me, that you'd left Venice, all I could think of was to find you again.
You must have some other reason
I don’t understand.
For what other reason would a man risk his life to come here?
But can't you see?
We're at war now!
War...
I’m so tired.
All I want is to look at you, to be with you.
That's why I came, that's all I can think about.
I would have believed you, once.
If you don't believe me,
I’d better go now.
No, wait!
Wait.
Franz?
Come here, Franz.
Franz.
- Stay here.
- Here?
- All right.
- Please.
Don't make any noise.
Wait.
Countess, what's going on?
Be quiet, you fool.
Ah! Countess. What a scare!
I knew something would happen.
I was fretful all night. I couldn't sleep.
- Was it really you on that balcony?
- Simone!
Look everywhere!
See if you can find any footprints!
Make sure no one is hidden in the garden!
That's good, Simone!
Keep looking around with the dogs.
Do you need me, Countess?
No. I don’t need anything.
Go on, go to sleep.
Keep looking.
He must have fled when he heard the dogs barking.
- I’m going back to bed.
- Good night, Count.
Giuseppe, look behind the stairs!
Be sure to have a good look!
I’m sorry.
You must forgive me.
We're no longer in Venice.
I’ve changed.
I can think straight again.
My mind is clear.
- Livia, listen to me...
- No! We're no longer in Venice.
You made me lose my sense of shame, my dignity.
- But why?
- It’s true, I lost all my dignity, for a wretched, illicit love, a shameful love.
Livia, my love.
We're no longer in Venice.
Fine, we're no longer in Venice.
We're agreed on that.
- We're agreed on that.
- May I sit down?
Yes, seeing as you can't leave until they've tied up the dogs.
Thank you.
I’m so sleepy.
I haven't slept for three nights.
I love the smell of summer.
I love the smell of ripe wheat.
This place is full of that scent.
I’m so tired.
There's a gentle laziness in the air.
What did you say?
The dogs have gone away.
You speak so quietly, that I can't hear what you're saying.
Did I mishear you?
I thought that you were saying... that you were saying...
Franz...
Dear Franz...
I’m so alone... please... stay with me.
You misheard.
Forgive me.
I misheard.
I said you had to leave now.
You must leave. You must leave.
What did you say?
I said that the danger was past.
You can go now.
How long...
How long has it been since we last saw each other, my love?
That's what I was dreaming you would say.
I told you to leave.
Leave. Leave. Leave...
Is that it?
Is that what you really want?
I was hoping you'd ask me to stay.
Oh, Franz...
Franz...
Yes, Franz.
Please stay.
Franz...
Franz, wake up, my love.
It is almost dawn, and you told me you had to be in Verona before nightfall.
Who is it?
It's me, Livia.
Franz, wake up. It’s daylight.
- What did you say?
- You must go away now.
The sun will be high soon.
And if they see you...
Close your eyes.
- I didn't close them all night.
- Why?
I was watching you sleep.
That's why I slept so well.
I dreamt I was home.
I was a child, and I played at being a soldier with a wooden sword.
- I must go.
- I wish you could stay!
- I wish I could...
- What do you wish you could do?
I wish I could stay in your arms, just as I did tonight, for the rest of my life.
Farewell, I must go.
- I must go. I must go.
- No!
The sun's coming up. It’s already late.
You wouldn't want them to see me climbing down your window?
No, no!
Don't go yet.
I’ll hide you.
I’ll have you with me for another day.
With me. Wait. Wait!
Let's hurry!
Come along, hurry.
Livia!
Come, stay with me a while.
No, the maid must find me in my room.
- But it's still early. There's time.
- Don't speak so loud.
I won't say another word.
You know, it's not bad here.
I could stay here my whole life.
Then why don't you stay?
Have you forgotten that I must go to war and become a hero?
Oh, no. No.
Try to forget that.
If only one could forget.
If only.
One of my friends did an incredible thing.
Which one?
A companion. An officer.
What did he do?
He managed to bribe a doctor, and got himself declared unfit for military service.
He went for a check-up, you see?
The doctor pretended to find him a heart defect, which required a quiet, restful existence.
So they sent him home, free from any further obligations.
- But how can this be?
- I told you. He bribed a doctor!
A huge sum.
I didn't think such things could happen.
But, after all, those of our generation were spoiled like children.
We like elegant uniforms because they suit us.
The gold braid, the tabs, the sound of the marching band that accompanies our heroic parade.
But then here's the other side of the coin - being far from our women, being hungry, cold, tired.
When it comes to raising a glass to future victories, we're all there.
But we're not willing to pay the price of the victory we're toasting.
- The loss of an arm, an amputated leg.
- That's enough!
A face so disfigured that it causes others to recoil in horror.
No, Franz! No!
And why? War.
Tens of thousands of men ready to kill each other, for no reason, no purpose.
Reason has nothing to do with war.
What is war, after all, if not the most convenient means to force men to think and act in the way that most suits their leaders?
Why are you silent, dear?
What are you thinking about?
That war is horrible. Horrible.
I’ll be back as soon as I can.
So many troops went past last night.
Even the heavy artillery.
The whole house was shaking.
They're going from Innsbruck to Verona.
- Ah, they're going to Verona...
- Count!
Count, should I report last night's incident?
No, better not.
I bet someone found out about the wheat and is trying to get us into trouble.
None of the men can have spoken.
Still, let's have some men keep watch at night.
But...look over there!
Isn't that Le Ronghe?
- Yes, it is! That fire is at Le Ronghe!
- That's one hell of a blaze!
Let's go and see!
Look, Count, look at that dense, dark cloud over there!
It looks like a barn is burning down!
We must send someone over there right away!
To Le Ronghe! To Le Ronghe!
Look, sir.
It’s coming from Mangini's house!
It can't be! His house is behind the hill!
It’s further away!
It must be the stables at Piovene.
Come on!
Let's go to the granary to look.
It’s just some slag piles, I expect.
Can't you see all the smoke, Countess?
That's Mancini's house!
No, it's very clear from here.
Perhaps it's a military camp.
It’s best to be sure.
You two, come with me.
This is not good...
Let's look out the windows!
Let's hope no wind will rise
All that wheat...
Listen, the bells!
What are they waiting for?
For the whole country to burn?
Sir, we can't see a thing here.
Let's go to the other side.
What's happening here?
The door is locked with a key. Let's move it!
Look! The view is much better from here.
Romagnano's patriots.
They will challenge the Austrians.
Have they lined up close to the houses?
These idiots are endangering us all!
And that's why they are setting fire to our farms?
Antonio! Call Giuseppe!
Antonio!
Tell him to prepare the carriage! Hurry!
- Countess?
- What happened?
That gentleman is there.
- And Luca has returned from Romagnano.
- Countess!
Good news.
Marchese Ussoni has arrived at our headquarters.
It's will just be a few hours now...
We are waiting for further orders.
Garibaldi is in Salo!
Two of our representatives met with a spokesman of the General in Trento yesterday.
Garibaldi congratulated the patriots.
He didn't think there were so many of us.
His troops arrived and they saw the work had been done already!
We don't need help to protect our country!
Sure. Tell me more.
- Come back later. This evening!
- Countess!
Ussoni told me, you have to give me the money collected in Venice.
There should be more than 3000 florins!
I don't know.
I haven't counted it.
I'm sure you're right.
This evening!
Come back this evening, OK?
- That can't grow to such proportions in such short time!
They haven't told me anything.
Nothing! They must take me for an idiot...
- Count, the carriage is ready.
- Good.
- I'm going there.
- Yes, and hurry!
- Good day, Count
- Good day..
Antonio, my hat! Quick!
- Take Luca outside.
- Good day, Countess.
- Until tonight.
- Very well, Countess.
How did you get here?
How?
Laura! Isn't that her name?
The maid.
I thought it was you who'd sent her.
How extraordinary!
She came to collect me, brought me here and gave me breakfast.
My God!
- She knows you're here!
- What harm can it do?
This is what ladies' maids are for!
Countess!
The count is looking for you.
We're leaving.
I won't be back for lunch.
Very well.
- What?
- I said, very well!
At your service, Countess.
Goodbye.
What are you thinking?
I was thinking...of something.
Tell me what.
This morning, in the granary... you told me of that friend of yours... who they sent home... because a doctor had said he had a bad heart.
So?
Couldn't you do the same?
Me?
Yes, Franz, you.
You want me to play the cripple, bribing some crook to pass me off as unfit?
Yes.
You think me... capable... of something so contemptible?
And even if I was... it comes at a price.
How much?
2000 florins.
2000 florins! Impossible.
- More than I’m worth, is it?
- If you could...
If you found a way...
You could stay close to me...
- At Trento, couldn't you?
- No... No.
Regulations state that the discharged soldier must remain close to his regiment.
- If only you could!
- I have to leave, It’s late. lf I’m not in Verona by tomorrow morning
I’ll be declared a deserter.
- No!
- I could be shot.
That would solve all our problems.
- We have no time!
- Wait! Wait, Franz!
Wait.
Close the door!
Quickly! Come here!
My love! Is it yours?
Your husband's?
Whose then?
I can't tell you!
You'll think I’m insane!
I am! I am insane!
Oh, my love! My love!
My darling....
My poor, sweet love!
My poor, poor darling.
- Who is it?
- It’s me. Countess. May I come in?
Don't come in!
- Don't come in!
- It’s me, Countess...
I said no!
Have you counted it?
Is it enough?
I know you have given me your heart... and not only your heart.
I don’t feel guilty accepting the money.
I’d feel guilty not accepting it.
Do you believe me?
Countess! Countess!
- The count will be back any minute
- Yes, I realise!
Tonio saw him down in the village and he told him...
I told Tonio to wait in the kitchen.
I had the gardener called too, with an excuse.
You need to avoid the terrace...
Ada's putting the washing out. l tried to call her into the house, but...
Luca's here, too.
I showed him into the sitting room.
- He's waiting.
- Very well!
Write to me as soon as you can,
I beg you.
I have written the address here.
Give the letter to a civilian and have them take it to Luca, and I shall receive it directly.
- I must hear from you!
- I’ll write.
Don't forget.
As soon as possible
Go now!
Send word when all is settled, and I will come to you at once.
I cannot live like this.
You shouldn't love me.
No one should.
I was irrevocably tied to him.
For him, I had forgotten... and betrayed all of those who were fighting, in an attempt to realise my long unfulfilled dreams.
Marchese Ussoni.
You should take a route around our left wing, just outside of Valeggio...
But there will be serious obstacles.
It will not be easy.
- Thank you!
- Good luck, Marchese Ussoni!
Stop!
Can you take me to Oliosi near Montevento?
- It’s dangerous...
- Don't worry, we can find a different route.
Here. There we go!
Which way should I go to get to Oliosi?
Oliosi...
The roads to Montevento are blocked.
There are battles going on.
Try to reach that hill, turn left, you'll come to a large, square farmstead called Ca' Pasquale.
- Here.
- That's it.
From there, continue going left, maybe...
Take the road to Maragnote and on to Menso.
We can still get to Sant'Ambrogio avoiding Oliosi.
Thank you, Lieutenant.
- Are you from the south?
- Naples.
Good luck, Lieutenant!
- I’ll take the reins.
- She goes slowly, mind.
I have to get over the hill.
It’s absolutely imperative! l have safe conduct signed by
General La Marmora in person.
To arms!
I had received a letter from Franz.
He had been discharged, and was in Verona.
But he urged me to stay where I was.
The journey was dangerous and he feared for my safety.
Battle had commenced on all fronts... and the news that reached Aldeno confirmed hopes of an Italian victory.
You can see the canons firing from Sant'Ambrogio!
- He said the Austrians are leaving Verona!
- No, they left yesterday!
Luca's here!
Let's hear what he has to say!
Here he is.
What did he say?
The Austrians have fled Verona!
We'll get the lot of them!
Viva Italia!
Good day, Countess.
Are the Austrians leaving Verona?
Yes, Countess.
We're advancing all along the front..
They've called for reinforcements at Trento, and they're leaving Verona!
And this time they'll be gone for good!
Viva Italia!
And we have no part to play?
The time has come to act for us as well...and Marchese Ussoni.
We've heard nothing of Marchese Ussoni.
No news...nothing.
We can do nothing.
We must await orders.
But Countess, we can't wait any longer.
Even having heard nothing, our troops must move in and occupy the area.
There's no more time to lose!
We will not participate.
Garibaldi will be coming here!
Countess, just think, Garibaldi!
Bloody hell!
What's going on?
What are you doing?
Officer, what's happening?
Where are you all going?
We've been ordered to retreat.
Come on! You can do it!
Who are you?
Are you injured??
Everyone is retreating, Lieutenant.
Yes it's true. It’s a disaster.
Not us. Eh, lads?
Everyone here's staying put, Lieutenant!
Lieutenant! Orders to retreat!
- Everyone out!
- Understood, Lieutenant!
Always last to know, eh?
Come on, lads!
Come on, lads!
I decided to leave. At dawn.
Before patriots could take over the surrounding area, and before the Italian troops could reach Verona.
I knew I would never return to my house, my people.
And yet, I felt neither regret nor emotion.
The walls of the carriage were burning, and the sultry air suffocated me.
I had Franz's letter with me.
And I re-read it over and over again, even though I knew it by heart.
''My darling Livia...
''You have saved my life.
''The money was sufficient, for now at least
''to satisfy the rapacious doctors.
''I have been discharged and they are keeping me in Verona.
''I have a beautiful room overlooking the river Adige,
''on Via Santo Stefano, number 149.
''I miss you day and night.
''But don't come just yet.
Stay where you are.
''The journey would be too dangerous.
''Love me always...
''as I love you.''
-.From there take the road to Ala.
- Drive on! Make way!
Do you have safe conduct to enter Verona at this hour?
No, but I am Countess Serpieri.
My husband is an Austrian officer.
I am here to meet relatives in town.
Very good, Countess.
You may pass.
But I must warn you, tonight the streets of Verona won't be safe for a lady.
Thank you.
- Quickly! Via Santo Stefano 149.
- Yes, Countess.
Well, what a lovely surprise.
Oh, Franz!
What?
I am here.
Has something happened?
I am here, Franz. l told you in my letter not to come.
- Did you not receive it?
- Yes, but I came all the same.
- I couldn't bear the anxiety any longer.
- What anxiety?
- Anxiety over what?
- What might happen to you.
You knew I was safe.
You knew how... with your money.
You know it bought me safe passage, calm, wellbeing, peace and amusement.
But I wanted to be sure... to see it with my own eyes.
Fine! Now you have.
You shouldn't have come.
It was a bad decision, and now you'll be sorry.
You see?
I am no longer an officer, or a gentleman.
I’m a drunken deserter.. who reeks to high heaven of cowardice and vice.
But now I’m here, Franz.
I will stay with you always..
I have left everything for you.
Take me in your arms, Franz.
I haven't washed or shaved in a few days.
I wouldn't want to disgust you by coming too close!
You'd get dirty.
Franz!
- You're not alone?.
- Don't worry about her.
She comes for a couple of hours each night to keep me company.
Do you want to meet her?
Don't be shy.
After all, she belongs to you.
I pay for her with your money.
Clara! Come here.
I’d like you to meet a great lady.
The Countess Livia Serpieri.
She has made a long journey.
As you see, she is exhausted.
She's travelled amid the soldiers returning from battle.
Men who haven't been lucky enough to have what I have... a rich benefactor.
Clara,
Get her something to drink.
Wash it first!
Stupid girl.
It’s for a lady.
Ladies don't drink from unwashed glasses.
Didn't you know?
Guests must be treated with respect.
You don't want it?
Are you unwell?
What are you waiting for?
Help her you fool!
Lift her veil!
Take off her hat, her gloves!
Countess Serpieri is a lady!
A high-class lady, and important lady!
Can't you see?
An Italian aristocrat.
- Haven't I told you about her?
- No!
You don't remember?
You didn't listen because you thought I was just crowing.
You didn't believe me when I said that a real lady like the Countess Serpieri was in love with me.
It’s true!
She said to me, that she didn't know what love was before she met me.
Why are you saying these things?
To hurt me or to hurt yourself?
I beg your pardon, but I didn't hear you, you're speaking so quietly.
Did you hear what she said, Clara?
No, I didn't hear anything, and I don’t want to either.
- I’m going.
- You're insane!
Livia, you must forbid her to leave at this hour.
Invite her to sit down to table with us.
Ask her.
Please, stay.
Don't mind him.
He's drunk.
Who exactly do you think you are?
Do you have such a high opinion of yourself that you can't sit at the same table as a whore?
What difference is there between the two of you?
I’ll tell you myself.
She is young, and beautiful, and men have to pay for her.
You, on the other hand...
What? Why are you looking at me like that?
I don’t like being looked at like that, understand?
Do you think I’ve gone mad?
No! I’m not mad!
I’ve never been as lucid in my entire life.
Listen, and try to understand.
Try to see me as I really am.
Not as you imagine me to be!
The image you have created of me is mere fantasy.!
It’s all in your head!
It has nothing to do with who I really am.
So, who am I?
How do I live?
By what means?
With money I procure in two ways.
Money I get from women, and money I steal, cheating at cards.
I am a master of both arts.
That's how I make my living. l have other charms, too.
I am a deserter because I’m a coward.
And I don’t mind being either!
What matters to me is that my compatriots won a battle today in a place called Custoza, when I know that they are going to lose the war.
And not just the war.
And that Austria, in a few years, will be finished, and a whole world will disappear, the world to which we both belong.
The new world your cousin speaks of holds no interest for me.
I think it's much better not to be involved, and to take your pleasure however you can.
And, for that matter, so do you.
Otherwise you wouldn't have given me money to buy yourself an hour's worth of love.
- No!
- That's enough!
It’s too late. It’s over.
I’m not your knight in shining armour!
And I don’t love you anymore.
I wanted money, I got it.
That's all.
Oh! And I forgot.
I’m also an informant.
It was me who betrayed your cousin to the police.
Of course, you knew this, but pretended not to to save our love affair!
No!
Go on! Go on, my lady!
Run! Run away, you whore!
Run! Run away!
Break your neck!
Don't look back!
..with devastating precision.
Afternoon report of the Fifth Corps -
After heavy fighting,
Santa Lucia was taken.
At 7 pm, Custoza was won.
The enemy has certainly put up an admirable fight.
The first of the offensives were particularly forceful.
Officers set their men a fine example.
I’ve come to fulfil my duty as a loyal subject.
The countess is Austrian?
Venetian.
Here.
I don’t understand.
Is it addressed to you?
Right then, I don’t have much time, let's see to this.
The letter is from...
Franz Mahler, of the Third Artillery Regiment.
And, so?
It’s quite clear.
He bribed doctors into saying that he's ill.
He is a deserter.
Ah, I see..
The officer was your lover, and now you're taking revenge by getting him shot.
Think carefully, Countess.
To inform is a vile treachery, and your actions will see a man killed.
Lieutenant Schneider !
General... carry out your duty!
Show the lady out.
Arrange this order to be executed!!
Highest priority!
Do you understand?
Highest priority!
Immediate execution.
Order - arrest immediately.
First Lieutenant Franz Mahler.
Residing in Stefanstrasse 147.
Franz!
Thrice happy he who hides from pomp and power
in sylvan shade or solitary bower
where balmy zephyrs fan his burning cheeks...
- Clown! The king of clowns!
Leave the stage at once!
Who is it?
It's Cyrano.
I was afraid he'd do this.
Thrice happy he who hides from pomp and power...
- Wretch! Did I not forbid you to appear this month?
- Let's be quiet.
- Quiet!
Go on Montfleury.
Thrice happy he who...
He who, indeed.
Donkeys say rather Hee-Haw!
Begone! Or must I come and help you off the stage myself?
What! Still there?
Where balmy zephyrs fan his burning cheeks...
Fat swine, if you dare breathe on balmy zephyr more
I'll fan your cheeks for you!
Monsieur, won't you all protect me?
- Proceed, proceed.
- Go on.
Sir, I will not allow you to insult me in this manner.
Really?
What manner would you prefer?
Quiet, down there!
- We'll tolerate no more of this.
Go on with the play,
Montfleury.
Unless these gentlemen retain your seats my sword may bite their ribbons.
Who is this braggart?
My cousin, sir.
Well, Montfleury, still no exit?
- Very well then,
I enter with knife, to carve this fat, stuffed goose.
I pray, do not crowd my scabbard here.
She may put her tongue out at you.
Silence.
I say be silent!
And I offer one universal challenge to you all:
Will all who wish to die, please raise their hands.
Approach, young heroes.
I will take your names.
To the first man who falls
I'll build a monument.
Who will head the list?
You, sir?
No.
You?
No, no.
Anyone?
Anyone at all?
Not one...name?
Not one finger?
Very well then,
I go on.
Attend to me, Full Moon.
I clap my hands three times, thus.
At the third, you will... eclipse yourself.
Ready!
One.
How dare you.
I demand!
I insist.
- I call upon all the nobles...
- Two!
This is an outrage.
You hear, an outrage.
Nothing on earth will move me from this stage.
Three!
Fair ladies and noble gentlemen...
- Boo!
But, Monsieur de Bergerac, why have you done this to our Montfleury, an admirable actor?
I have two reasons, either one conclusive.
First, he is an abominable actor, who mouths his verse and moans his tragedy.
Second,...
Well, that's my secret.
But...
But you've closed the play!
It is not a very good play.
Huh!
And of their money?
Possibly you would like that returned to these good people.
Yes?
Yes.
Here,...catch!
Well, Monsieur, you are hereby authorized to close our play every night.
On these terms.
Ladies and gentlemen, your money will be returned.
Kindly pass out, quietly.
Goodnight, goodnight.
Your cousin is an extraordinary man, Madame.
Oh, I agree.
Soldier, poet, philosopher, musician, playwright.
All those?
Yes, and the best swordsman in Paris.
Really?
Now, I should have thought the Vicomte here had that honor.
Tell me, Madame, that comic mask, that nose, presently he will take it off?
No, Monsieur, he keeps it.
And heaven help the man who smiles.
Good night.
Oh, Monsieur!
Monsieur!
Uh, when do you leave Paris?
Sir?
Why, after what you've just done to Montfleury, did you not know that the Compte de Guiche was his patron?
Who's yours?
No one.
No one?
No patron?
I said not.
But the Compte de Guiche has a long arm.
Mine is longer by three feet of steel.
Yes, but. but, what a scare...
You may go now.
- but...
- You may go.
Well, tell me, why are you staring at my nose?
Oh, I was not staring.
Does it astonish you?
Why n...Why no, I've been careful not to look.
Oh, and why not, if you please?
It disgusts you, then?
But, no, I just...
Does its color appear to you unwholesome?
By no means.
Then, possibly you find it just a trifle large?
No, small, very small, tiny!
Infinitesimal!
What?
You accuse me of absurdity?
Small, my nose?
Why magnificent, my nose!
You pug, you knob, you button head, know that I glory in this nose of mine!
For a great nose indicates a great man, congenial, courteous, intellectual, virile, courageous.
Whilst that face of yours, that blank, inglorious concavity which my right hand finds on top of you, is as devoid of pride, of poetry, of soul, of picturesqueness, of contour, of character, of nose, in short,
As that which is at the bottom of that limp, spine of yours my left foot.- Oh, help!
Presently, this fellow will grow tiresome.
Oh, he blows his horn.
- Well, will no one put him in his place?
If you would all me.
Observe.
Monsieur, your nose, your nose is rather large.
Rather?
Oh, well.
Is that all?
Well, of course, you...
Ah, no young sir, you're too simple.
Why, you might have said a great many things.
Why waste your opportunity?
For example, thus...
Aggressive-
I, sir, if that great nose were mine,
I would have it amputated on the spot.
Practical-
How do you drink with such a nose.
You must have had a cup made especially.
Descriptive-
'Tis a rock, a crag, a cape.
A cape, say rather, a peninsula.
Inquisitive-
Uh, what is that receptacle, a razor case or a portfolio?
Kindly-
Ah, do you love the little birds so much that when they come and sing to you, you give them this to perch on?
Cautious-
Take care. A weight like that might make you top-heavy.
Eloquent-
When it blows the typhoon howls and the clouds darken.
Dramatic-
When it bleeds...the Red Sea.
Simple-
Eh, when do they unveil the monument?
Military-
Beware, a secret weapon!
Enterprising-
What a sigh for some perfumer!
Respectful-
Uh sir, I recognize in you a man of parts, a man of...prominence.
Or, Literary-
Was this the nose that launched a thousand ships?
These, my dear sir, are things you might have said had you some tinge of letters or of wit to color your discourse.
Bit wit not so.
You never had an atom.
And of letters, you need but three to write you down, a..s..s.
Ass.
You, sir!
Dolt! Bumpkin! Fool!
How do you do, and I,
Cyrano Savinien Hercule de Bergerac.
Vicomte, come.
Such arrogance.
This scarecrow who...
Look at him!
No ribbons. No lace.
Not even gloves!
True. I carry my adornments only on my soul.
Decked with deeds instead of ribbons.
Mantled in my good name, and crowned with a white plume of freedom.
But..
But, I have no gloves.
A pity, too.
I had one, the last one of an old pair, and lost that.
Very careless of me.
Some gentleman offered me an impertinence.
I left it in his face.
So be it!
You shall die exquisitely
Oh, a poet.
Oh, yes, a poet if you will.
So, uh, while we fight,
I'll improvise a ballad for you, and as I end the refrain,
...skhrch!...thrust home.
Will you?
I will.
Ballad au Duel at the Theatre de Burgoyne between de Bergerac, and uh...a barbarian.
What do you mean by that?
Oh, that?
The title.
Stop. Let me choose my rhyme.
So. Here we go.
Lightly I toss my hat away.
Languidly o'er my arm let fall the cloak that covers my bright array.
Then, out swords, and to work withal.
A Lancelot in his lady's hall,
A Spartacus at the Hippodrome,
I dally a while with you.. you jackall.
Just as I end the refrain, thrust home!
Where shall I skewer my peacock again?
Nay, better for you to have shunned this brawl.
Here in the heart or your ribbons, gay, in the belly
'neath you silken shawl?
Now, come my points floats, light as the foam ready to drive you back to the wall, and then as I end the refrain, thrust home.
Oh, for a rhyme.
Why, your fight is fading.
You break.
You cower.
You cringe.
You crawl.
How can I tell you're allowed to say something to turn on my head forestall...
Life with a tunny death with a scall.
Something to turn on my fancy roam, free for a time till the rhyme's recall, then as I end the refrain, thrust home!
Refrain.
Prince, pray God that is Lord of all, pardon you soul, for your time has come.
Pass! I fling you aslant, asprawl.
Then as I end the refrain, thrust home!
Ladies and gentlemen, please, please, not until the performance is over.
Close the house.
A strike, but leave the lights.
We rehearse the new farce tonight.
Wait.
You have only to watch a fight, or have you ruined if you listen to them.
Think of the enemies you've made,
Montfleury, the Vicomte, if he lives, all those foppish marquis, the Comte de Guiche.
That politician.
He's the Cardinal's nephew.
There's power there!
And power here.
Young fool!
Take an example from me.
20 years a captain, while others who know only how to deploy their forces at court now dangle a marshal's baton.
Well, uh, someday
I will avenge you, too.
Impossible.
Come on, let's go to dinner.
Dinner?
No, not I.
Why not?
Because I have no money.
But, the purse of gold.
Farewell paternal pension.
And you have until the first of next month?
Nothing.
What a fool.
Yes, but, what a moment.
Pardon, Monsieur.
A man ought never to go hungry.
I have everything here.
Please.
My dear child, I cannot bend this Gascon pride of mine to accept such a kindness.
But, I...
Yet, for fear that
I may give you pain if I refuse,
I will take something.
A grape.
One only.
And a glass of water.
No, clear.
And, uh,...half a macaroon.
Nothing more?
Why, yes.
Your hand to kiss.
Thank you, sir.
Good night.
Idiot.
Dinner.
Drink.
Desert.
Mon Dieux, I was hungry, abominably.
Tell me.
Anything.
Why to you hate this Montfleury?
A very bad actor.
Ah, come now, the real reason, the truth.
That fat goat who cannot hold his belly in his arms, still dreams of being sweetly dangerous among the women.
Sighs and languishes, making sheep's eyes out of his great frog's face.
I hate him ever since one day he dared smile upon...
Oh, my friend, I seemed to see over some flower a great snail crawling.
Eh, what?
Is it possible?
For me to love?
I love.
Whom?
May I know?
Whom I love?
Think a moment.
Think of me.
Me, whom the plainest woman would despise.
Me, with this nose of mine that marches on before me by a quarter of an hour.
Whom shall I love.
Why, of course, it must be the woman in the world most beautiful.
Most beautiful?
In these eyes of mine... beyond compare.
Wait.
Your cousin, Roxane.
Yes.
Roxane.
Well?
Why not?
If you love her, tell her so.
My old friend.
Look at me and tell me how much hope remains for me with this protuberance.
Ahhh, I have no more illusions.
Now and then I may grow tender walking alone in the blue of evening through some garden fresh with flowers after the benediction of the rain.
My poor big devil of a nose inhales April.
And I follow with my eyes where some boy with a girl upon his arm, passes a patch of silver... and I feel somehow...
I wish I had a woman, too, walking with me under the moon, and holding my arm and smiling.
Then I dream.
I forget.
And then I see the shadow of my profile on the wall.
My friend.
My friend.
I have my bitter days, knowing myself so ugly, so alone.
Ah, but your wit, your courage, why that poor child who just now offered you your dinner, your saw it, her eyes did not avoid you.
That is true.
Well, then, Roxane herself, watching your duel, pale.
Pale?
Yes, her lips parted.
Her hand at her breast, thus.
I saw it.
Speak to her. Speak, man.
She might laugh at me.
It is the one thing in this world I fear.
Pardon, Monsieur, a lady outside asking for you.
Monsieur.
A Duenna.
I have a message for you from a...a certain lady.
She desires to know when and where she may see you privately.
She has certain things to tell you.
Certain...
Things!
She wishes to see me?
We go tomorrow at dawn to hear mass at St. Rupe
And afterwards, where would you suggest?
Well, then, I...
- Where?
- Well?
Ah...I am thinking.
And you think?
Where?
The shop at Ragueneau's.
Yes, yes, Ragueneau, the pastry cook.
Who dwells?
Rue Saint Honore.
Eh...Rue Saint Honore.
We are agreed. At 7 o'clock.
Until then. Adieu.
I'll be there.
Me! To see me!
Ah, not quite so gloomy.
After all, she knows that I exist.
Imagine, she has asked to see me!
So, now you're going to be happy?
Happy. I'm going to be a storm. A flame!
I need to fight whole armies all alone!
I have ten hearts!
I have a hundred arms!.
I feel too strong to war with mortals!
BRING ME GIANTS!
Quiet, please, shhh.
We are rehearsing back here.
So sorry.
Ha, ha, ha.
Cyrano.
Cyrano.
Ragueneau.
Oh, thank goodness you're still here.
Well, what's the matter.
I'm afraid to go home.
Why?
You know those comic verses I wrote?
About the congregation.
Cyrano, he's hired ruffians.
Bullies.
A hundred, waiting for me on the way home.
They're gonna beat me.
Cane me!
Please, would you permit me to spend the night with you?
A hundred men, is that all?
Ragueneau, you're going home tonight.
But they're armed.
They're cutthroats!
Take this lantern.
Forward march.
I say that I'll be the man to see you to your shop.
Not you, I want no help from you.
For even for a hundred, you're mad.
Those are the odds I want.
Why for this pastry cook?
First, because this pastry cook is a friend of mine.
Second, because this pastry cook is also a poet.
And, most important, if anything should happen to this pastry cook, tomorrow morning at seven his shop will be closed.
Goodnight.
Cyrano. Help!
Look out behind you!
I have been robbed.
There are no hundred here.
It's, it's, it's...
Be quick. Inside.
Bolt the door!
Ah!
Yah!
Ah!
Awk.
Cyrano!
Hold!
Ah.
How do you feel?
Oh, pleasantly exhilarated.
- Come, I know a little tavern not far...
- Where's Ragueneau?
Ragueneau?
Ragueneau!
Little boy, come out.
All's well!
- Is it over?
- All over.
Really?
So soon?
Ha, ha, ha.
Oh, if only I'd had my sword.
How many did we kill?
Oh, about eight.
Eight.
Eight!
Ohhhh.
This...gentleman begins to annoy me.
No. The sauce and meat must rhyme.
Add a pinch of marigold and thyme.
Your house, of course needs a stronger roof.
Eh? There's proof.
Cyrano.
Cyrano.
Come in and eat.
- What time is it?
- Not quite seven.
Oh, now, please, Cyrano.
A man without breakfast is like...
No.
Could she have changed her mind?
Aw, she wouldn't dare.
We were magnificent last night.
And at the theater, too.
'Then, as I end the refrain'...
When she arrives.
Where can we converse undisturbed?
Wherever you like.
My shop is yours.
The little dining room is quite romantic.
'Thrust home!'
Yea gods, what a line.
- 'Then as I end the re...'
- Vanish.
- Uh, huh, she's come?
- Shhhh.
I swear.
Welcome.
- A pardon, one word.
- Oh, yes?
Have you a good digestion?
Oh, wonderful.
Eh, here are some éclairs.
Uh, creampuffs.
Some, uh, jellyrolls.
And do you like nature?
I adore it.
Go out and eat these in the sunshine.
Do not return.
But why?
Until you have finished them.
What do I do then?
Blessed above all others be the hour when you remember to remember me, and came to tell me...what?
To tell you that...
Before I dare tell you I...
Are you, I wonder, still the same big brother almost that you used to be when we were children, playing by the pond in the old garden down there?
At Bergerac.
Those lovely summers.
You use to make swords out of bulrushes.
And you, dandelions also golden hair.
In those days
I could tell you everything.
And you did everything I wished.
Little Roxane, a sweet tyrone with short skirts and long hair.
Was I pretty?
Not too plain.
Sometimes when you had fallen or hurt your hand, you used to come running to me, and I would be your mother and say, oh, with a very grownup voice,
'Now, what have you been doing to yourself?'
'Let me see.'
- Oh!
- No one that.
Wait, let me see.
Still. At your age?
Now, how did you do that?
Playing with the big boys at the Place de Neanne.
Come here.
Such a wise little mother.
And tell me, while I wash this blood away, how many you played with?
- Oh, about a hundred.
- A hundred?
- More or less.
- It can't be.
No.
Tell me what you were going to tell me... if you dared.
I think I do dare, now.
It seems so like those happy days long ago.
Yes, I dare.
Listen...I love someone.
Yes?
Someone who does not know.
Yes?
Someone who loves me, too, but is afraid of me and keeps away and never says one word.
Yes.
Give my that hand.
Why, how hot it is.
Yes, he loves me.
I am sure of it.
Yes.
And he is a soldier, too, in your own regiment, your own company.
Yes.
Such a man.
He is proud, noble, young, brave, beautiful!
Beautiful.
What's the matter?
Oh, nothing.
It's this, my hand.
I love him.
That is all.
And I have never seen him anywhere except in the theater.
You have never spoken?
Only with our hearts.
Well, then, how do you know?
Well, people talk about people, and I hear things, and... and I know.
You say he is in the guards?
His name?
Baron Christian de Neuvillette.
You know him?
He is not in the guards.
Yes, since last week.
He is only lately come to Paris... from Normandy.
So soon.
So soon we lose our hearts.
What...
Monsieur de Bergerac
I have eaten all the cakes.
Good.
Now, go out and enjoy nature.
But my dear child, you love only words, wit, poetry.
Why, for all you know, the man may be a savage or a fool.
Not with such eyes.
I read his soul in them.
Yes, all our souls are written in our eyes.
And you have brought me here to tell me this?
I do not yet quite understand, madam, the reason for your confidence.
They say, that in your company, it frightens me, you are all Gascon.
We pick a quarrel with any outsider who intrudes himself.
Is that what you have heard?
- I'm so afraid for him.
- Not without reason.
And I thought you... it's you whom they all respect and fear.
You want me to defend your little Baron?
Will you?
Just for me.
Because I have always been your friend.
And this is what you want of me?
Will you be his friend?
I will be his friend.
And never let him fight a duel.
No, never.
Promise?
I promise.
Oh, thank you. Thank you.
I knew I could rely on you.
Well, now I must go.
Oh, you never told me about last night.
Why, you must have been a hero.
Have write and tell me all about it, and...about himself.
Oh, you are a darling.
We are great friends, are we not?
He must write to me.
A hundred men against one.
You shall tell me the whole story someday when we have time.
A hundred men.
What courage!
I have done better.
Well?
Let us leave this place.
But the whole company is on its way here.
Oh, no.
On my heels. Naturally I told them all about last night.
They're wild.
Here they are.
- Yes, but, why did you?
- Perhaps I can stop them.
Never mind.
Cyrano!
Eight dead men in the street.
Scandalous.
You know my edict against dueling, nephew.
I expect to have it enforced.
Furthermore, I wish to know who was responsible for last night's outrage at the Place de Neanne.
I understand, Your Eminence.
Very well.
And now I have news that should be more to you liking.
I fear, in confidence, our uneasy armistice with Spain is doomed.
My colonelcy?
You commission has been prepared.
Oh, thank you, uncle, thank you.
Oh, one thing more.
Last night at the theater, the duel in rhyme, that guardsman with a nose.
- Bergerac, that impossible Gascon.
- Yes, impossible.
- His treatment of Montfleury.
- Abominable.
- The arrogance with which he closed the play.
- Incredible.
- It will be a miracle if the Vicomte survives.
- A sorrow.
What will you do with him, Your Eminence?
I? Nothing.
I thought I might leave that to you.
To me?
Yes. Place him somewhere in your service, with a comfortable allowance.
He looked a little threadbare.
I...You...But, Your Eminence.
You detest dueling.
Of course I do.
Why didn't you prevent it?
I should much prefer that monsieur de Beregrac live by the pen, rather than die by the sword.
Do you not agree, Antoine?
By all means, Your Eminence.
By all means.
'And then, as I end the refrain... thrust home.'
Monsieur de Bergerac.
Your Excellency.
I have come to express my... admiration for both your exploits last night.
Indeed. Thank you.
My dear fellow, we may have had our differences, but I am disposed to forget them.
That is very generous of you, sir.
No, truly.
You are, it seems, a man of many skills.
A rare combination soldier and poet.
- Would you care to join my following?
- No, sir.
I do not follow.
I am told you have written a play.
As you know, my uncle, the Cardinal, is also a dramatist.
I might help you there.
Cyrano, now at last you can have it performed.
Why not?
I could take it to him.
Really?
Of course.
Let him rewrite a few lines here and there, and he'll find a theater for you.
Rewrite...my lines?
Impossible.
Uh, when he likes a thing, he pays well.
Yes, but not so well as I.
When I have made a line that sings itself
I pay myself a hundred times.
You are proud, my friend.
You have observed that?
- Cyrano.
See what we found in the street.
Plumes dropped in their flight by those fine birds who showed their tail feathers!
The man who hired those scoundrels, he must be an angry man today.
Who was it?
Do you know?
It was I.
I hired them to do the sort of work we do not soil our hands with.
Punishing an insolent poet.
They ought to be mounted before they spoil.
What shall we do with them?
Sir, will you not return these to your friends?
Have you read Don Quixote?
I have and found myself the hero.
Be so good as to read once more the capture of the windmills.
Chapter 13.
Windmills, remember, if you fight with them... may swing round their huge arms and cast you down into the mire.
Or up among the stars.
Gentlemen.
Gentlemen.
Gentlemen.
You've done it, now.
You've made your fortune.
He was willing to forget.
There you go again, growling.
Yesss, this latest pose of yours, ruining every opportunity that comes you way, becomes exaggerated.
Very well, then, I exaggerate.
There are certain things in this world a man does well to carry to extremes.
Your precious independence.
Your white plume.
How do you expect to succeed in life?
What would you have me do?
Seek for the patronage of some great man and like a creeping vine on a tall tree crawl upward where I cannot stand alone?
No, thank you.
Be a buffoon in the vile hope of teasing out a smile on some cold face.
No, thank you.
Eat a toad for breakfast every morning.
Make my knees calloused.
Cultivate a supple spine.
Wear out my belly groveling in the dust.
No, thank you.
With my left hand scratch the back of any swine that roots up gold for me while my right, too proud to know his partner's business, takes in the fee.
No, thank you.
Shall I use the fire God gave me to burn incense all day long?
No, thank you.
Struggle to insinuate my name into the columns of the Gazette?
Calculate, scheme, be afraid?
Love more to make a visit than a poem?
Seek introductions, favors, influences?
No, thank you.
No, I thank you, and again I thank you.
But, to sing, to laugh, to dream, to walk in my own way, free with and eye to see things as they are.
A voice that means manhood.
To cut my have the right shoes.
And a word, a yes, a no, to fight, or write, but never to make a line I have not heard in my own heart.
To travel any road under the sun, under the stars, nor care if fame or fortune lie beyond the bourne.
Yet, with all modesty to say, my soul be satisfied with flowers, with weeds, with thorns, even, but gather them in the one garden you may call your own.
In a word, I'm too proud to be a parasite.
And if mine intellect the germ that grows towering to heaven like the mountain pine
I stand not high, it may be, but alone.
Alone, yes, but why go about making enemies?
Watching other people making friends...everywhere, as a dog makes friends.
I mark the manner of these canine courtesies, and think, here comes, thank heaven, another enemy.
Yes, tell this to all the world, and then to me say very softly that she loves you not.
Let me be alone for a moment.
Cyrano, wait.
Give us your story of the fight.
Presently.
No, the story, now!
Oh, let him alone.
There's time enough.
I want it now!
As an example for that young tadpole sneaking out the doorway.
You, there.
Are you addressing me?
Yes, you flat-footed
Norman farmer.
You wish something of me?
Listen, Monsieur de...de...de whatever your name is. de Neuvillette!
Baron Christan de Neuvillette.
Very well, de Neuvillette.
As you are a newcomer here, you should know there is a certain subject or object, if you prefer, that is never mentioned among us.
And that is...?
Look at me!
You understand?
You mean...?
Thus we never speak that word.
To even breathe it is to have to do with him.
He has exterminated several whose mere tone of voice suggested...
Would you die before your time?
Just mention anything convex.
Or cartilaginous.
One word. One syllable.
One gesture. Nay, one sneeze.
And your handkerchief becomes your winding sheet.
Captain.
Sir?
What is the proper thing to do when Gascons grow too boastful?
Prove to them that one may be a Norman and still have courage.
I thank you.
Come on, Cyrano, your story.
Now, let me see.
Where shall we begin?
I followed with our host to meet those scoundrels not knowing where they might attack.
No lamps in those narrow back streets.
No moon in the sky.
Dark. Everything dark.
It was so dark, Mon Dieux, you could not see beyond...
Your nose!
Who...is that...man...there?
A new recruit.
Arrived last week.
A recruit, eh?
Ha, ha-.
His name is Christian de Neuvillette.
I see.
Very well.
As I was saying.
It grew dark.
You could not see your hand before your eyes.
I marched on thinking our all for the sake of one amateur poet
- Who wrote a verse whenever he took a..
- A nose full.
...whenever he took a notion., and might antagonize some dangerous man.
One powerful enough to make me pay...
Through the nose!
...pay the piper!
After all, I thought, why am I putting in my..
Nose!
...putting in my oar in a quarrel that was none of mine, however now that I am here,
I may as well go through with it.
Come Gascon, do your duty.
Suddenly a sword flashed in the dark!
I caught it fair...
On the nose!
...on my blade!
Before I knew it, there I was...
Rubbing noses!
...crossing swords with harvard's joy once.
I had the bottom then...
A nosegay!
...a monstrous crab tree.
He went down for as a wave.
I charged...
Who was in the air hard.
...at the two of them.
Another lunged, and I parried...
Through your nose!
Right out of here!
All of you go!
Leave me with him.
To my arms, sir.
You have courage.
- That pleases me.
- Why?
Come, do you not know
I am her brother?
Whose?
Hers. Roxane.
Brother?
You?
Well, a distant cousin.
Much the same.
- Then she has told you?
- Everything.
- She loves me?
- Perhaps.
My dear sir, more than I can say.
I am honored.
- Rather sudden.
- Oh, please, forgive me.
If you knew how much I have admired you.
- Yes, yes, and all those noses.
- Please. I apologize.
Roxane expects a letter.
- From me?
- Yes, why not?
Oh,, No.
- Once I write, that ruins everything.
- Why?
Because, any schoolboy can write to her more gracefully than I.
A fool!
- You did not attack me like a fool.
- Anyone can pick a quarrel.
No, I'm never at loss for words among men, but with any women... paralyzed...speechless, dumb.
I'm one of those stammering idiots who can not court a woman.
Really?
As for myself, it seems to me that given the opportunity, and if I put my mind to it,
I could do that.. rather well.
Oh, is I had words to say what I have here!
If I were handsome like you.
Together, we could make one mighty hero of romance.
If only I had your wit.
Borrow it, then.
What?
Tell me, would you dare repeat to her the words I gave you day by day?
Send to her the letters that I write?
I mean, that Roxane should have no disillusionment.
Come, shall we win her both together?
For you?
- Why, Cyrano...
- Christian, why not?
I...I'm afraid.
Afraid that when you have her all alone, you will lose her.
Have not fear, it is your self she loves.
Give her yourself.
Put into words, my words...upon your lips.
Will you?
Will you?
Does it mean so much to you?
It means...
It means a comedy, a situation for a poet.
Come, shall we collaborate?
I'll be your cloak of darkness, your enchanted sword, your ring to charm the fairy princess.
Think!
Is the prize not worth the danger?
My friend!
My friend.
Take my heart.
I shall have it all the more.
Plucking the flowers, we will keep the plant in bloom.
Thus do I love thee, my darling.
Idiot.
There are a dozen ways to read that line.
Can't you give it some meaning?
Any meaning!
THUS do I love thee!
Thus do "I" love thee.
Thus do I LOVE thee.
Thus do I love THEE,
THEE, THEE.
Who knows your smile has known a perfect thing.
You are a white rose, wherein love lies in ambush for its natural prey.
In the garden of my heart, you are the most... eh, the most... fragrant blossom.
As the tender sapling thirsts for rain, as the eagle seeks the sky, as the wave hurtles toward the shore, my heart yearns for you.
Good, good.
You know, you're beginning to have a feel for words.
- Words. I'm sick of words.
- Those are your weapons.
How else do you conquer?
Yes, but when, when?
They're fighting in the north, now.
You know that.
The Regiment will be called up any day, and I've never even kissed her.
Patience, my boy, patience.
I've been patient.
Why, she sees the Compte de Guiche as often as she does me.
Do you suppose she's playing with me?
Making a fool of me?
Impossible.
How can you say?
How do you know?
Cyrano, you have her confidence.
You could find out.
Nonsense, I say.
Oh, very well.
I'll scout the terrain.
Listen, Cyrano, intelligently, discreetly.
Yes.
With finesse.
And, uh, what do you think of Christian after all these weeks?
He is beautiful, but he's brilliant.
- And I love him.
- Good!
Uh, do you find him intellectual?
- More so than you, even.
- Huh?
- Oh, I didn't mean.
- No, no, no, I am glad.
No man ever so beautifully said those things.
Those pretty nothings to everything.
Sometimes, he,. he, he falls into a reverie.
His inspiration..fails.
But, then all at once, he will say something absolutely...
Ah!
Really?
How like a man!
You think because a man has a handsome face he must be a fool.
Not necessarily.
Uh, he talks well about, uh, matters of the heart?
He does not talk.
He rhapsodizes. He dreams.
Only the other night he said to me, extemporaneously, mind you.
Oh, of course.
'Take my heart.
I shall have it all the more.
'Plucking the flowers we will keep the plants in bloom.'
Well?
Umm, passable.
He writes well?
Wonderfully, listen:
'Knowing you have in store more heart to give
- 'than I to find heart room...'
- The first he has too much heart, then too little. Just how much heart does he need?
You are teasing.
You are jealous!
Jealous?
Yes.
Poets are all alike.
Would you dare criticize these lines?
'Only believe that unto you my whole heart gives one cry.
'And writing, writes down more than you receive.
'Sending you kisses through my fingertips.
'Lady, oh, read my letter with your lips.'
Yes, those last lines, but he overwrites.
Listen to this.
Do you know them all by heart?
Every one.
Well, I may call that flattering.
He is a master.
- Oh, come..
- Yes, a master.
Huh, a master,... if you will.
And, uh, when do you bestow the laurel wreath?
How many prodigies of poetry must this new Hercules perform?
I do not know.
My friend, you men own the world and all that's in it.
Woman is at best a prize, a property valued much the same as a horse or a dog, unlike the pear and sheen of skin and soundness of teeth and limb.
Well, if I must be chattel, then the terms shall be mine, and the price according to my own values.
There.
I see.
Christian tells me that you meet tonight.
What would you have him speak about?
Oh, nothing, and everything.
I shall say, speak to me of love in your own words.
Improvise, rhapsodize.
Be eloquent.
But you will not tell him, will you?
Ah, perish the thought.
Madame, Compte de Guiche.
Madame.
Monsieur.
Madame.
Monsieur.
- Christian, quick.
- No.
There's still time to learn your lines.
No.
I have some brilliant phrases for you, brilliant, sensitive...
No.
I'll have not more of it.
Taking all my words, my sentences all from you,
- making our love a little comedy.
- Don't you real...
It was a game at first, but now she cares.
Huh?
Thanks to you.
Uh.
I'm not afraid any longer.
I'll speak for myself, now.
Oh, undoubtedly.
I will. You shall see!
Besides, I know enough to take a woman in my arms, and tonight, I will.
Christian!
Thank you, my friend, and goodbye.
- Christian, I beg of you.
- Leave me!
- You're making a grave error.
- Go away!
So be it.
Christian.
Roxane.
I'm so glad you are early.
Let us stay out here in the moonlight.
It's so pleasant.
Sit down.
There, so.
Now, speak to me.
I love you.
Yes, speak to me of love.
I...love you.
Now, be eloquent.
Be brilliant for me.
Tonight of all nights.
I love you...so.
You have your scene.
Now, improvise, rhapsodize.
I love you... very much!
I ask for cream, and you give me milk and water.
Tell me firstly, how you love me.
Very much!
Is that all you feel?
Your throat, if only
I might kiss it.
Christian!
But, Roxane, I love you.
Again.
No, not again.
I do not love you.
That is better.
I...I adore you!
Oh!
I know I grow absurd.
And that distresses me as much as if you had grown ugly!
Please. Gather your dreams together into words.
I...um, I...
I know. You love me!
Good night!
Oh, but wait, please!
I was going to say...
That you adore me.
Yes, I know that, too.
-No, go away.
- I...
A great success.
Help me.
Not I.
Speak for yourself, my friend.
Why I...I can't.
Well, at least you know enough to take a woman in your arms.
Oh, Cyrano, please!
What, and make your love a little comedy.
Cyrano, I cannot live unless I win her back, now.
This moment!
This moment. How the devil am I to teach you now, this mo...
Her window.
- Help me, Cyrano, help me.
- Shhhh.
It does seem fairly dark.
Well? Well?
It is more than you deserve. must try out what can be done.
Stand over there.
Idiot, here, before the balcony. I'll whisper you what to say.
- She'll hear..
- Shhhh. Call her.
Roxane.
Roxane.
Who's calling?
Christian.
You again.
I...had to tell you.
No. Go away.
You tell me nothing.
Please.
You do not love me anymore.
No, not anymore.
I love you evermore, and everymore and more.
Oh, a little better.
Love grows and struggles like an angry child.
Breaking my heart.
His cradle...
Better still.
But such a babe is dangerous.
Why not have smothered it newborn?
And so I do.
And yet he lives.
I found as you sha... you shall find this newborn babe... and infant Hercules!
Good.
Strong enough at birth to strangle those two serpents doubt and
What? pride!
Why, very good.
Only, tell me why you speak so haltingly.
Has your imagination gone...lame?
This grows too difficult.
Your words tonight hesitate, why?
Through the warm summer gloom, they grope in darkness toward the light of you.
My words are heavy with honey, like returning bees.
Yet they must fly so high.
Come nearer then.
Stand you on the bench.
No.
Then I'll come down.
NO!
And why so great a no?
Let me enjoy the one moment I ever...
My one chance to speak to you...unseen.
Unseen?
Yes. Yes.
Night making all things dimly beautiful one veil over us both.
You need no eyes to hear my heart.
Oh, tonight, let it seem as if
I speak for the first time.
For the first time?
Yes.
Your voice, even, is not the same.
How should it be.
I have another voice tonight.
My own, myself,... daring!
Why daring?
Because, what am I, what is any man would he dare ask for you?
Therefore my heart has hidden behind poetic words and tinsel phrases.
But are they not sweet, those pretty phrases?
Not enough sweet for you and me tonight.
You never spoke to me like this.
I tell you, there comes one moment, once, and heaven help those who pass that moment by, when beauty stands looking into the soul with grave, sweet eyes, that sicken at pretty words.
Yes...that is love.
Love.
A love beyond breath, beyond reason, beyond love's own power of loving.
Your name is like a golden bell hung in my heart, and when I think of you I tremble, and the bell swings and rings,
Roxane! Roxane!
Along my veins...Roxane.
Yes...that is love.
Yes that is love.
That wind of terrible and jealous beauty, that dark fire, that soaring, blinding music.
Yet, you may take my happiness to make you happier even though you never know I gave it to you.
Only let me hear, sometimes, all alone, the distant laughter of your joy.
Do you begin to understand a little?
Can you feel my soul there in the darkness breathe on you?
Oh, only tonight, now I dare say these things.
I to you, and you hear them.
It is my voice, mine, my own that makes you tremble there in the green gloom, above me, for you do tremble as a blossom among the leaves, you tremble, and I can feel all the way down along this jasmine branch whether you will unhold the passion of you trembling.
Yes, I do tremble.
And I weep, and I love you, and I am yours, and you have made me thus.
I have done this to you.
I myself.
Only let me ask one thing more.
I want a kiss!
You ask me for...
I...yes.
That is to say...
I mean...
You've gone too far.
If she's willing, why not make the most of it?
I, I ask.
I know I ask too much.
Only one?
Is that all?
All?
How much more than all?
I know I startle you,
I...I ask, I ask you to refuse.
Why? Why? Why?
Christian, be quiet.
What is that your say?
I am angry with myself, because I know I go too far and so I say to myself,
CHRISTIAN, BE QUIET!
Watch it, someone comes.
Well, sir, I am looking for the house of madame Roxane Robin.
This is not the house. That way.
To the right. Keep to the right.
I thank you sir.
I shall say my beads for you to the very last bead.
Win me that kiss?
No!
Sooner or later.
So that is true.
Sooner or later must be so, because, she is young, and you are handsome.
Since it must be, I'd rather be myself the cause, if it must be.
Are you still there?
Yes.
We were speaking of...
A kiss.
- A kiss.
And what is a kiss when all is done?
A vow taken before the shrine of memory.
A rosy dot over the "i" of loving.
- A secret whisper to listen if the past.
Shhh.
A moment free to mortal with a rush of wing from Ceden.
A sacrament of blossoms.
A new song sung by two hearts to an old, simple tune.
Hush.
Why? What shame?
No.
No shame.
Then come.
Gather your sacred blossoms.
Your moment made immortal.
Climb!
- But, climb?
- Many more!
Roxane.
Ah, Roxane.
I have won what I have wanted.
A feast of love, and I am faint with hunger.
Yet, I have something here that is mine now,... and was not mine before.
I spoke the words that won her.
She kisses my words.
My words...upon his lips.
What, dear Father, lost your way again?
But, she lives here,
Madame Robin.
Oh, I thought you said, Rolen?
No, r..o..b..i..n, Robin.
Oh, Robin, I see.
I'm too old to chase wild geese
- my feet...
- Oh, what a shame, however, I'm sure there's someone at home.
What is it?
Yeah, I'm looking for the young lady, Madam Rolen
Rolen?
Robin!
Madame!
A letter for you.
Yes, yes, I heard.
Cyrano.
Uh, passing by cousin,
I saw this light.
Uh, some matter profitable to the soul.
A very noble lord gave it to me.
What is it?
My regiment has been ordered to the front.
I cannot allow you to delay any longer.
This simple old monk, who knows nothing,
will marry us tonight.
My love, Antoine de Guiche.
Father, this letter concerns you.
"Madame, the Cardinal will have his way,
"although against your will.
"That is why I am sending this to you,
"by a most holy man.
"Intelligent, discreet.
"You will communicate to him our order to perform
"here and at once the rite of holy matrimony.
"You and Christian will be married privately in your house.
"Be resigned to the
Cardinal's command,
"who sends herewith his blessings.
"Your very humble, and etcetera..."
Oh, this is terrible.
Oh, you're to be the, uh...
I am to be the bridegroom.
Uh, look here.
A postscript.
"Give to the monastery, in my name 120 pieces of gold."
One hundred and twenty...
Oh, a worthy lord.
A very worthy lord.
Daughter, resign yourself.
I am resigned.
The Guiche is coming, too.
Don't let him enter.
Not let him enter?
Until we're married, please.
Me?
- Why, where did you come from?
- The moon.
- You...
- From the moon.
I have just returned from the moon.
- The fellow's mad!
-Like a bomb, I tell you,
- I fell from the moon!
- Your feet must...
I say THE MOON!
- Very well, if you say so.
- Thank you.
Raving mad.
- Where am I?
- My dear sir!
- What place is this?
What country?
- Please, let me pass.
- This face, good heavens!
Maul, a robber.
Where am I?
- A lady is waiting for me.
- Oh, this is Paris, huh?
You fool!
Dear old Paris.
Excuse my appearance.
I arrived by the last thunderbolt.
A trifled singed as I passed through the ether.
Monsieur!
Sir?
That will do, now. I wish...
I know, you wish to look for my own list of nature for moons and happiness and character of it's surface, if any.
I desire no such thing, I...
Of course not.
You wish to know by what mysterious means I reached the moon.
Well, a very secret affair of state, but confidentially a new invention of my own.
Drunk, two ways.
Well a man..
Oh, no. In truth I have my choice of several inventions.
Uh?
Yes, several ways to violate the virgin sky.
Several?
Several.
As, for instance, smoke having a natural tendency to rise, blow in a globe enough to raise me.
Yes, that makes one.
Again, I might construct a rocket in the shape of a HUGE locust driven by impulses up within a saltpeter from the rear and thus speed upwards, like, thus!
Yes, another?
Finally, seated on an iron plate, hurl a magnet into the air.
The iron follows.
I catch the magnet.
Throw it again, and so proceed indefinitely.
Excellent, and which did you adopt?
Why none of them.
Yet another.
Which was...?
Guess.
Ahhh, I can't!
Try.
Interesting idiot, this.
Have you guessed it yet?
Why, no, what is it?
Alas, you will never know, but no matter.
You are free and they are bound in wedlock.
I drunk that voice, and that nose, Cyrano!
Cyrano. This very moment they have exchanged vows.
Who?
My sincere compliments.
You, also, my traveler in space.
My Lord, the heads of Capathieu and Joyce have joined together.
Quite so!
Madame, kindly bid your... husband farewell.
Your regiment leaves tonight, sir.
Report at once!
But, the Cadets are not called.
They are, indeed, and under my command.
Out there we may have an accounting.
Somehow, that news fails to disquiet me.
Here are the orders.
Baron, deliver this.
Christian!
The bridal night is not so near.
Somehow that news fails to disquiet me.
Baron, you have your orders.
Farewell, Roxane.
Take care of him, for me.
Promise me never to let him do anything dangerous.
I will do my best.
I cannot promise.
I thought you brave always.
Make him be careful.
Yes, yes, I'll try.
Be sure to keep him warm and dry!
Yes, if possible.
Have him write to me every single day!
That, I promise you.
Halt!
Uh!
The situation is simple, gentlemen.
We have besieged Arras.
The Prince of Spain has besieged us.
Consequently, we are surrounded.
- A fine war. Where the besiegers are beseiged and starve to death.
Yes, but the Marshal has devised a brilliant plan for bringing in food this very night.
Now, see here.
Spare us the details, Colonel.
Merely inform us when the food arrives.
True, we are hungry.
But why blame me?
I'm only your Colonel.
Oh, yes, I know you disprove of me.
Call me courtier, politician.
Well, I can afford you little hates.
My conduct under fire is well known.
It was only yesterday
I repelled a Spanish attack.
Pouring my men down like an avalanche.
I, myself lead the charge.
And your white scarf?
Cyrano!
And your white scarf?
Eh, you heard that episode?
Yes, I was so far in advance
I was in danger of being captured.
But I thought quickly, took off and flung away the scarf that marked my military rank.
And so being inconspicuous escaped among my own force, rallied them, returned, and won the day.
What do you say to that?
Still, an officer does not like to resign the privilege of being a target.
How pleasant for you that you are denied that privilege.
Pleasant?
Lend me your scarf.
With your permission I shall lead the first charge tonight wearing it over my shoulder.
What bluster.
You're safe making that offer, and you know it.
My scarf lies on the river bank between the lines.
A spot swept by artillery.
Impossible to reach alive.
Yes.
Here.
Thank you.
This bit of white is what I need to make a signal.
I was hesitating.
You have decided me.
- Stand or I'll fire!
- Hold you fire.
There's a man down there running away.
Yes, a Spaniard.
But very useful as a spy to both sides.
As I was about to tell you.
The Marshal has withdrawn more than half our forces here.
Fortunately, the Spaniards do not know that.
Oh, yes, they do now, and they will attack tonight.
At this point.
Your revenge, eh?
I make not great pretense in loving you.
But since you gentlemen esteem yourselves invincible, the bravest of the brave, and all that.
Why need we be personal.
The Marshal needs a diversion, and I serve him in choosing as I chose.
As you can see, Captain, the great thing is to gain time.
To hold until the Marshal returns.
And to gain time?
You will all be so kind as to lay down your lives.
Christian?
Yes.
Roxane?
I should like to say farewell to her with my whole heart for her to keep.
I have taken the liberty of...
But, wait.
This little spot.
Spot?
Yes.
A tear.
Is nothing.
A poet while he writes is like a lover in his lady's arms, believing his imagination, everything seems real.
There's half the charm of writing.
Now, I made this letter so pathetic, that, while I was writing it,
I wept.
You wept?
Why, yes, because it is a little thing to die, but not to see her,... that is terrible.
I shall never..., you will never...
Give me that.
- Halt. Who goes there.
- On the service of the King.
- The King!
- Fall in...
Good evening.
On the King's service, you?
- Gentlemen,...
- What are you doing here?
- We heard rumors at home you were hungry, so we came prepared.
The Spaniards adored the fare, but they missed the fowl!
But why did you come here into this, this danger?
They said in Paris there was no fighting.
Besides, it was your own fault.
Think of the letters you have written me.
How many times!
Every day!
Every day?
Of course.
And each one more wonderful than the last.
All this, for a few absurd love letters.
Hush. Absurd?
Your letters...no, never.
Every one was like hearing your voice that night in the dark. Remember?
Like your arms around me.
I read them over and over.
Every page was like a petal fallen from you soul.
Like the light and the fire of a great love.
- Sweet and strong and true.
- Sweet.
Strong.
True?
Oh, my Christian.
I came here to ask forgiveness.
It is time to be forgiven.
Now, when we may die so soon.
Forgive me for being light and vain and loving you only because you were handsome.
- For now...
- Now?
I love you for yourself.
For what you are.
Roxane.
How you must have suffered.
For you saw how frivolous I was.
And to be loved for the mere costume, for the poor, casual body you went about in.
To a soul like yours, that must have been torture.
No.
I understand.
You cannot perfectly believe in me, a...a love like this...
I want no love like this.
I want love only for...
Only for what every woman sees in you.
I can to better than that.
No, it...it was best before.
You do not altogether know me.
I was a child.
I'm a woman now.
- If...if you were less handsome,
- No. unattractive, ugly even,
I should love you, still.
Do you mean that?
I do mean that.
Ugly?
Even then.
Now, are you happy?
Yes.
What is it?
Nothing, only, Cyrano...
Cyrano. he has something to tell you.
Where are you going?
I...will...return...in a moment.
Cyrano.
Your wife, sir, she goes with me?
No, sir, she remains.
There is still time for her to escape.
She stays!
Very well.
Someone give me a musket.
I stay here also.
Sir, you show courage.
What, shall I run away, and leave a woman?
Colonel, my compliments, sir.
What of Roxane?
Wait.
Well, what is it?
You look so...
She does not love me.
- You think not?
- She loves you.
- No.
- She loves only my soul.
- No.
- Yes!
That means you.
And you love her.
- I?
- I see. I know.
You wrote her, everyday, every day!
- Perfectly simple.
- Simple?
For a month, we've been blockaded here.
How did you send all those letters?
Before daylight
I managed...
To face death everyday.
You love her.
Yes.
Tell her so.
- No.
- Why not?
Why?
Look at me.
She would love me if I were ugly.
- She said that?
- Yes. Now, go to her.
Nonsense. Do not believe any such madness.
Go back to her.
You never will be ugly.
Go!
It is you she loves.
That is what we shall see.
No, no!
- Let her chose between us.
- No.
- Tell her everything.
- Why do you torture me?
Shall I ruin your happiness, because I was born with a pretty face?
Am I to ruin yours, because I happen to have power to say what you perhaps feel?
- Tell her!
- Don't drive me too far!
- I'm tired of being my own rival.
- Hard to know.
My secret marriage, that can be annulled, I expect.
I want her love for the poor fool than I am, or not at all.
Oh, I'm going through with this.
I'll know one way or the other.
Now, go!...Tell her.
Let her chose one of us.
It will be you.
I hope so.
Captain!
The Spanish fires are going out.
It begins.
I need a scout. Where's Cyrano.
Captain.
Let me go.
No, my boy, Cyrano knows the terrain. He knows their lines.
So do I.
Please, allow me.
Very well.
We must know from which direction the advance comes.
Their weight and numbers.
I understand.
Roxane.
Cyrano.
Christian thinks...
Christian thinks you ought to know that...
But I do know.
He still doubts what I just told him, just now.
I saw that.
Yes, but,...was it true, what you told him just now?
It was true.
I said that I should love him, even if he were...
The word comes hard before me?
Say it, I shall not be hurt.
Ugly?
Even, then
I should love him.
Disfigured.
Or disfigured.
Even...grotesque.
How could he every be grotesque, ever to me?
But, you could love him so, as much as?
Yes, and more.
Roxane...
What is it?
Are they fighting?
What is happening?
The Spaniards advance, but there is time.
- Where is Christian?
- At the parapet.
Oh, of course.
What is it that you wish to tell me?
Roxane,... believe me this is difficult, and for once I lack words.
Christian asked me to...
He told me...
Christian!
To your places, gentlemen.
Is he dead?
No, but dying.
I will not let him!
Cyrano...did you?
Yes, my friend.
I have told her.
She loves you.
Roxane.
Yes, my darling.
Christian!
He is not dead?
Yes.
Time you must go, now.
Really, he is dead.
No one else knew him but you.
Was he not a hero?
Yes, Roxane.
A heart deeper than we knew.
Yes, Roxane.
A poet.
A soul magnificently tender.
Yes, Roxane.
But he is dead now.
Why, so am I.
For I am dead and my love mourns for me and does not know.
Will never know.
Take her away quickly.
Wait.
A letter over his heart.
I have two deaths to avenge, now,
Christian's...and my own.
Fire!
Surrender or you die!
Ah!
We fought. We died.
We fought again.
Who are these men who are so fond of death, one Spaniard cried.
On and on, they came.
Then, when all seemed lost, we heard the trumpets of our returning troops.
The battle was ours!
Ah, you have been fortunate,
Ms. de Bergerac, you have lived!
While we, we waste our youth.
There is no war and not hope for any.
No hope for any?
My fellow, I just realize, we are both fools.
But mine is the greater folly, for I am an older fool.
What is more...
Everything I told you was a lie.
Another satire for the Gazette?
Yes.
Another glove flung in the face of power?
Oh, why do you do it, Cyrano?
- Why do you attack...
- Stupidity?
Deceit? Corruption?
I'm too old to change.
I'm an old dog with nothing left but his teeth.
Ah, but teeth can be pulled.
That can be painful.
That insolent wretch.
That scoundrel de Bergerac.
This time he's gone too far.
I swear it.
He's signed his death warrant.
And who will deliver it?
His sword is still very powerful, my friend.
There are may ways a man can die.
Who knows?
He may meet with an accident.
Soon.
But, uh, tell me, Madame.
How long will you continue to remain here, forever in mourning?
Forever.
Was Christian all that?
If you knew him you would not ask.
His last letter is still in my heart.
And, uh, Cyrano?
Do you see him often?
Every week. My old friend takes the place of my Gazette.
He brings me all the news.
Every Saturday under that tree out there.
I wait for him embroidering.
The hour strikes.
I need not turn to look.
At the last stroke,
I hear his cane tapping the walk.
His satires have made him many enemies.
But, they still fear that sword of his.
No one dare touch him.
Hm, that may be so.
It is not violence
I fear for him, but solitude, poverty.
Old gray Decembers stealing on wolf's feet into his darkened room.
It seems to me he's worn the same old coat for many months, now.
Eh, that is nothing strange in this world.
You need not pity him overmuch.
He lives his life, his own life his own way, thought, word and deed free.
My Lord Duke.
Oh, yes, I know.
I have all. He has nothing.
Nevertheless, today,
I should be proud to shake his hand.
Ah, well, adieu.
Will I ever see you again?
Come whenever you like.
Then, you have forgiven me.
I am here.
Do you know?
When a man wins everything in this world, when he succeeds too much, he feels, somehow, a thousand small displeasures with himself, whose whole sum is not quite remorse but rather a sort of vague disgust, dry illusions, pained regrets.
Yes, now and then,
I envy your Cyrano.
The sentiment does you honor.
Madame, I must tell you, it is true that no one has yet dared to attack your friend Cyrano.
Nevertheless, at the theater last night, I heard some things.
Keep him at home all you can.
Tomorrow when you see him, tell him to be careful.
I thank you.
Good night, Ragueneau.
Cyrano, you not leaving?
You will not have dinner here with me?
My regrets. I have a magnificent roast waiting for me, a rare wine, a gift from my publisher.
Fine, to be sure.
Uh, have you seen
Moliere's new play?
No.
Heh, ah, well...
What is it?
Well, he...
Speak.
He stole a scene from you, word for word.
You know, "What the devil was he doing there?"
That one.
He stole it, bodily.
Well, he showed good taste.
It, uh, played well?
Oh, beautifully. They laughed and laughed.
Oh, how they laughed.
Moliere has genius.
Christian had good looks.
With me, it was always thus.
Good night, my friend.
Hold, there.
You!
Are you addressing me?
Yes, you, Monsieur of the long nose.
Insolence.
- Foulmouthed scribbler.
- What?
- Lair, plagiarist!
- Liar.
Doctor.
Why pretend?
It is very grave.
Keep him quiet at all costs.
If he attempts to rise, he will die.
Shhhh.
Thank you.
Monsieur.
Ah, Sister.
What is the matter with you?
Shall I tell you something, Sister?
Yesterday, Friday, mind you,
I ate meat again.
Yes, I know.
That is why you are so pale.
Please come to me to the refectory before you go.
I'll make you a great bowl of hot soup.
Of course, of course.
You're quite reasonable today.
Perhaps you'll convert me.
Oh, no! Not for the world.
Why, now I think of it, that is so.
You, bursting with holiness, and yet you never preach.
Astonishing.
And now I shall astonish you.
I'm going to let you pray for me tonight, at Vespers.
Absolutely struck dumb, eh?
I did not wait for you to say I might.
Now may the devil admire me if never hope to see the end of that embroidery.
After 14 years, late for the first time.
Yes.
Yes, maddening.
I was detained by a visitor. Most unexpected.
An old friend of mine.
At least a very old acquaintance.
Did you tell him to go away?
For the time being, yes.
I said excuse me,
I see that it's Saturday,
I have a previous engagement.
One I cannot miss.
Even for you.
Come back an hour from now.
Your friend will have to wait.
I shall not let you go till dark.
Perhaps a little before dark,
I must go.
Oh, then tell me now the court news. My Gazette.
Ah, yes, well, let me see.
Saturday, 19th, the King fell ill after eight helpings of grape marmalade.
Grape marmalade will no longer be served at court.
Sunday, the royal pulse is now normal.
Monday, everyone was talking about the success of Moliere's new play.
Tuesday, the King fell ill after six helpings of marone glacee.
Marone glacee will no longer be served at court.
Wednesday, the Compte de Firske spoke to Madame de Monte Glas.
She said...no.
Thursday... Nothing.
Friday, Madame de Monte Glas said yes.
Saturday, 25th...
Cyrano!
What is it?
Cyrano!
- Oh, no, no, it is nothing.
- What?
The old wound at Arras sometimes...
- My poor friend.
- No, no, no, it is nothing.
It will soon be gone.
There. 'Tis gone.
We all have our old wounds.
I have mine here, under this faded scrap of writing.
It's hard to read now.
All for the blots and tears.
His letter?
Did you not promise me, that someday you would let me read it?
- This letter? You wish...?
- I do wish it...today.
Open it and read.
"Farewell, Roxane, because today I die."
Aloud?
"I know that it will be today, my own dearly beloved.
"Yet, my heart still so heavy with love I have not told.
"And I shall die without telling you.
"No more shall my eyes drink the sight of you like wine,
"never more with a look that is a kiss,
"follow the sweet grace of you."
How you read it.
His letter.
"I remember now the way you have
"of pushing back a lock of hair with one hand from your forehead,
- "and my heart cries out..."
- His letter!
"cries out and keeps crying."
- You read it so...
- "Farewell, my dear, my dearest,"
- In a voice...
- "my own heart's own,"
- "my own treasure," - In such a voice! - "my...love."
Yes, I remember hearing long ago.
"I am never away from you.
Even now I shall not leave you.
"In another world, I shall still be that one who loves you,
"loves you beyond measure, beyond..."
But, how can you read it now?
And all those 14 years he has been the old friend who came to me to be amusing.
- Roxane.
- It was you.
No, no, Roxane, no.
And I might have know it every time that I heard you speak my name.
- No, it was not I. -
It was you! - I swear.
- The letters. That was you.
- No.
- And the dear foolish words. That was you.
- No.
- And the voice in the dark. That was you.
- On my honor!
And the soul.
It was all you.
I never loved you.
Yes, you loved me.
Even now you love me.
No!
And twice you're great to know.
Oh, no, no, my own dear love,
I love you not.
Why were you silent for so many years?
All the while.
Every night, and every day, he gave me nothing.
You knew that.
You knew in that letter lying on my breast.
Your tears.
You knew they were your tears.
The blood was his.
Cyrano!
Here! He's here.
Oh, what recklessness.
No.
I knew it!
- Madame he has killed himself coming here.
- No. Shh.
That drink is, what is it?
Nothing. I did not finish my Gazette.
Saturday, 26th, an hour or so before dinner
Ms. de Bergerac died, foully murdered.
Cyrano, what have they done to you?
How fate loves a jest.
Behold me ambushed, taken unawares.
My noble foe, a lackey.
My battlefield, a gutter.
It seems too logical.
They have missed everything, even my death.
Sisters! Sisters!
No, do not go away.
I may not be here when you return.
You shall not die.
I love you.
No, my lady, it's not in the story.
When beauty said
I love you to the beast all his ugliness changed and dissolved, like magic.
But, you see,
I am still the same.
And I have done this to you.
You? Why no.
All my fault, mine!
On the contrary.
I have never know womanhood in its sweetness, but for you.
My mother did not like to look at me.
I never had a sister.
Later, I feared those sweethearts with mockery behind her smile.
But, because of you,
I have had across my life one whispering, silken gown.
I never loved but one man in my life.
I have lost him, twice.
I would not have you mourning any less that good, noble Christian.
But, perhaps, I ask only this, when the great cold gathers around my bones, you may give a double meaning to your widow's weeds.
The tears you let fall for him, may for a little, be my tears.
Oh, my love!
No, not here.
Not lying down.
Let no one help me.
No one need help me.
It is coming.
I feel already shod with marble.
Gloved with lead.
Very well, let the old fellow come now.
He shall find me on my feet.
Sword in hand.
Cyrano!
He'd delirious.
I see him now.
He grins.
He is looking at my nose!
That skeleton.
You there.
Who are you?
A hundred against one, eh?
I know them now, my ancient enemies.
Falsehood, there!
There, Predujice!
Compromise, Cowardice.
What's that?
Surrender? No, never!
Never!
Ah, you too, Vanity.
I knew you would overthrow me in the end.
No, I fight, I fight on,
I fight...ow!
All my laurels you have riven away.
And my roses.
Yet, in spite of you, there is one crown
I made away with me.
And tonight when I enter before God, my salute shall sweep away the stars from the blue threshold.
One thing without stain, unspotted from the world, in spite of doom, mine own,
...and that is... my...white...plume...
God save King Edward the Fourth!
Long live King Edward the Fourth!
May the king live forever!
Once more we sit in England's royal throne... repurchased with the blood of enemies.
Hurrah!
Come hither, Bess.
And let me kiss my boy.
Young Ned... for thee thine uncles and myself... have in our armors watched the winter's night... went all afoot in summer's scalding heat... that thou mightst repossess the crown in peace.
And from our labors, thou shall reap the gain.
Clarence and Gloucester... love my lovely queen.
And kiss your princely nephew,
Brothers both.
The duty that I owe unto Your Majesty...
I seal upon the lips of this sweet babe.
Thanks, noble Clarence.
And that I love the tree from whence thou sprang'st... witness the loving kiss
I give the fruit.
Worthy Brother, thanks.
And now what rests but that we spend the time with stately triumphs... mirthful comic shows... such as befit the pleasure of the court.
Sound drums and trumpets!
Farewell sour annoy... for here, I hope, begins our lasting joy.
Hurrah!
Now is the winter of our discontent... made glorious summer... by this sun of York.
And all the clouds that lowered upon our house... in the deep bosom of the ocean... buried.
Now are our brows bound with victorious wreaths... our bruised arms hung up for monuments... our stern alarums changed to merry meetings... our dreadful marches to delightful measures.
Grim-visaged war has smoothed his wrinkled front.
And now, instead of mounting barbed steeds...
- to fright the souls of fearful adversaries... he capers nimbly in a lady's chamber...
- to the lascivious pleasing... of a lute.
But I, that am not shaped for sportive tricks... nor made to court an amorous looking-glass -
I, that am rudely stamped, and want love's majesty... to strut before a wanton ambling nymph -
I, that am curtailed of this fair proportion... cheated of feature by dissembling nature... deformed, unfinished... sent before my time into this breathing worid scarce half made up... and that so lamely and unfashionable... that dogs bark at me as I halt by them.
Why, love forswore me in my mother's womb.
And, for I should not deal in her soft laws... she did corrupt frail nature with some bribe... to shrimp mine arm up like a withered shrub... to heap an envious mountain on my back... to shape my legs of an unequal size... to disproportion me in every part... like to a chaos or an unlicked bear whelp... that carries no impression like the dam!
Why...
I, in this weak piping time of peace... have no delight to pass away the time... unless to spy my shadow in the sun... and descant on mine own deformity.
Then, since this earth affords no joy to me... but to command, to check... to o'erbear such as are of better person than myself...
I'll make my heaven to dream... upon the crown... and, whiles I live, to account this worid but hell... until this misshaped trunk that bears this head... be round impaled with a glorious - crown.
But yet I know not how to get the crown... for many lives stand between me and home.
And I, like one lost in a thorny wood... that rends the thorns and is rent with the thorns... seeking a way and straying from the way... not knowing how to find the open air... but toiling desperately to find it out... torment myself to catch the English crown!
And from that torment
I will free myself... or hew my way out with a bloody ax!
Why...
I can smile... and murder whiles I smile... and cry ''Content'' to that which grieves my heart... and wet my cheeks with artificial tears... and frame my face to all occasions.
I'll drown more sailors than the mermaid shall.
I'll play the orator as well as Nestor... deceive more slyly than Ulysses could... and, like a Sinon, take another Troy.
I can add colors to the chameleon... change shapes with Proteus for advantages... and set the murderous Machiavel to school!
Can I do this and cannot get a crown?
Tut, were it further off,
I'll pluck it down.
Meantime, I'll marry... with the Lady Anne.
And here she comes... lamenting her lost love...
Edward, prince of Wales... whom I some small time since... stabbed in my angry mood at Tewksbury.
A sweeter and a lovelier gentleman this spacious worid cannot again afford.
And made her widow to a woeful bed... that from his loins no hopeful branch might spring... to cross me from the golden time...
I look for.
Set down... set down your honorable load... whilst I awhile obsequiously lament... the pale ashes of the house of Lancaster.
Thou bloodless remnant of that royal blood.
Be it lawful that I invocate thy ghost... to hear the lamentations of poor Anne.
Lo... in these windows that let forth thy life...
I pour the helpless balm of my poor eyes.
Cursed be the hand that made these fatal holes!
Cursed be the heart that had the heart to do it!
Cursed the blood that let this blood from hence!
If ever he have wife, let her be made... more miserable by the death of him... than I am made... by my young lord.
Aye, thee.
Stay,you that bear the corse... and set it down.
What black magician conjures up this fiend... to stop devoted charitable deeds?
Villains, set down the corse, or, by Saint Paul,
I'll make a corse of him that disobeys.
- My lord, stand back, and let the coffin pass.
- Unmannered dog!
Stand thou, when I command.
Advance thy halberd higher than my breast... or, by Saint Paul,
I'll strike thee to my foot... and spurn upon thee, beggar, for thy boldness.
What, do you tremble?
Are you all afraid?
Alas, I blame you not, for you are mortal... and mortal eyes cannot endure the devil.
Avaunt, thou dreadful minister of hell!
Thou hadst but power over his mortal body... his soul thou canst not have, therefore be gone.
Sweet saint, for charity, be not so cursed.
Foul devil, for God's sake, hence, and trouble us not.
If thou delight to view thy heinous deed... behold this pattern of thy butcheries.
Blush, blush, thou lump of foul deformity.
Vouchsafe, divine perfection of a woman... of these supposed crimes, to give me leave... by circumstance, but to acquit myself.
- I did not kill your husband.
- Why, then he is alive.
O, he was gentle, mild and virtuous.
The fitter for the King of Heaven, that hath him, for he was fitter for that place than earth.
And thou unfit for any place but hell.
Yes, one place else, if you will hear me name it.
Some dungeon.
Your bedchamber.
On now, good people, with your holy load.
I'll have her... but I will not keep her long.
What though I killed her husband... and her father... the readiest way to make the wench amends... is to become her husband and her father- the which will I.
Not all so much for love... as for another secret close intent... by marrying her... which I must reach unto.
But yet I run before my horse to market.
Clarence still breathes...
Edward still lives... and reigns.
When they are gone... then must I count my gains.
Clarence, beware.
Thou keepest me from the light.
But I will plan a pitchy day for thee...
and I will buzz abroad
such prophecies...
that Edward shall be fearful
ofhis life.
And then, to purge his fear...
I'll be thy death.
Where is the duke of Clarence?
 At hand, my lord.
He waits Your Highness'pleasure.
-  Let him be arraigned...
and brought before us.
Plots have I laid... inductions dangerous... with lies well steeled with weighty arguments... by drunken prophecies... libels... and dreams... to set my brother Clarence and the king... in deadly hate the one against the other.
Oh, passing traitor... perjured and unjust!
What have I done that seems disgracious in my brother's -
And if King Edward be as true and just... as I am subtle, false and treacherous... this day should Clarence closely be mewed up... about a prophecy, which says that ''G''... of Edward's heirs the murderer shall be.
And if I fail not in my deep intent,
Clarence hath not another day to live.
What Clarence but a quicksand of deceit?
Away with him!
He cannot live...
I hope... and must not die till George be packed with post-horse up to heaven.
Dive, thoughts, down to my soul -
George Clarence comes.
- Brother!
- Oh.
Good day.
What means this armed guard that waits upon Your Grace?
His Majesty, tendering my person's safety... hath appointed this conduct to convey me to the Tower.
- Upon what cause?
- Because my name is George.
Alas, milord, that fault is none of yours.
He should, for that, commit your godfathers.
O, belike his majesty hath some intent... that you shall be new-christened in the Tower, eh?
Ah, but what's the matter, Clarence?
- May I know?
- Yea, Richard, when I know... for I protest as yet I do not.
But as I can learn... he hearkens after prophecies and dreams.
And from the crossrow plucks the letter ''G''... and says a wizard told him that by ''G''... his issue disinherited should be.
And, for my name of George begins with ''G''... it follows in his thoughts that I am he.
These, as I learn, and suchlike toys as these... have moved His Highness to commit me now.
Why, thus it is when men are ruled by women.
'Tis not the king that sends you to the Tower.
Our upstart queen - his wife, Clarence, 'tis she... that tempers him to this extremity.
Was it not she and that good man of worship...
Anthony Rivers, her brother there... that made him send
Lord Hastings to the Tower... from whence this present day he is delivered?
We are not safe, Clarence.
We are not safe.
I beseech Your Graces both to pardon me.
His Majesty hath straitly given in charge that no man shall have private conference... of what degree soever with your brother.
We know thy charge, Brackenbury, and will obey.
We are the queen's abjects and must obey.
Brother, farewell. I will unto the king... and whatsoe'er you will employ me in,
I will perform it to enfranchise you.
Meantime, this deep disgrace in brotherhood... touches me deeper than you can imagine.
- I know it pleaseth neither of us well.
- Well... your imprisonment shall not be long.
I will deliver you, or else lie for you.
- Meantime, have patience.
- I must perforce.
Farewell.
Go, tread the path that thou shalt ne'er return.
Simple, plain Clarence.
I do love thee so, that I will shortly send thy soul to heaven... if heaven will take the present at our hands.
Gentle Lady Anne... is not the causer of the untimely death of your brave prince... as blameful as the executioner?
Thou art the cause... and most accursed effect.
Your beauty was the cause of that effect.
Your beauty, which did haunt me in my sleep... to undertake the death of all the worid... so I might live one hour in your sweet bosom.
If I thought that,
I tell thee, homicide... these nails should rend that beauty from my cheeks.
He that bereft thee, lady, of thy husband... did it to help thee to a better husband.
His better does not breathe upon the earth.
Go to. He lives that loves you better than he could.
Where is he?
Here.
Why dost thou spit... at me?
Would it were mortal poison, for thy sake.
Never came poison from so sweet a place.
Never hung poison on a fouler toad.
Out of my sight.
Thou dost infect mine eyes.
Thine eyes, sweet lady, have infected mine.
Those eyes of thine from mine have drawn salt tears... shamed their aspects with store of childish drops.
These eyes that never shed remorseful tear.
No. When thy warlike father, like a child... told the sad story of my father's death... and 20 times made pause to sob and weep... that all the standers-by had wet their cheeks... like trees bedashed with rain - in that sad time... my manly eyes did scorn an humble tear.
And what these sorrows could not thence bring forth... thy beauty hath... and made them blind with weeping.
I never sued to friend nor enemy.
My tongue could never learn sweet smoothing word.
But now thy beauty is proposed my fee.
My proud heart sues and prompts my tongue to speak.
Teach not thy lip such scorn... for it was made for kissing, lady... not for such contempt.
If thy revengeful heart cannot forgive... lo, here I lend thee this sharp-pointed sword... which if thou please to hide in this true breast and let the soul forth that adoreth thee...
I lay it naked to the deadly stroke and humbly beg the death upon my knee!
Nay, do not pause, for I did kill Prince Edward... but 'twas thy beauty that provoked me.
Nay, now dispatch.
'Twas I that stabbed your husband... but 'twas thy heavenly face that set me on.
Take up the sword again... or take up me.
Arise, dissembler.
Though I wish thy death...
I will not be thy executioner.
Then bid me kill myself,
and I will do it.
- I have already.
- That was in thy rage.
Speak it again, and, even with the word... this hand, which for thy love did kill thy love... shall for thy love kill a far truer love.
To both their deaths shalt thou be accessory.
- I would I knew thy heart.
- 'Tis figured in my tongue.
- I fear me both are false.
- Then never man was true.
Well, well... put up your sword.
Say, then, my peace is made.
That shalt thou know hereafter.
- But shall I live in hope?
- All men, I hope, live so.
Vouchsafe to wear this ring.
To take... is not to give.
Look... how my ring encompasseth thy finger.
Even so thy breast encloseth my poor heart.
Wear both of them... for both of them are thine.
Bid me farewell.
Was ever woman in this humor wooed?
Was ever woman in this humor won?
My dukedom to a widow's chastity...
I do mistake my person all this while.
Upon my life, she finds, although I cannot... myself to be a marvelous proper man.
I'll be at charges for a looking glass... and entertain some score or two of tailors... to study fashions to adorn my body.
Since I am crept in favor with myself...
I will maintain it to some little cost.
Shine out, fair sun... till I have bought a glass... that I may see my shadow... as I pass.
Have patience, madam.
There's no doubt His Majesty... will soon recover his accustomed health.
In that you brook it ill, it makes him worse.
Therefore, for God's sake, entertain good comfort... and cheer His Grace... with quick and merry words.
If he were dead, what would betide of me?
No other harm but loss of such a lord.
The loss of such a lord includes all harm.
The heavens have blessed you with a goodly son to be your comforter when he is gone.
Oh, he is young and his minority... is put unto the trust of Richard Gloucester- a man that loves not me, nor none of you.
Is it concluded he shall be protector?
It is intended, not concluded yet.
But so it must be if the king miscarry.
This is a special warrant for the duke of Clarence.
A summary order to deliver him... to execution and the hand of death.
Which done...
God take King Edward to his mercy... and leave the worid for me... to bustle in.
Oh.
Why looks Your Grace so heavily today?
Oh, I have passed a miserable night.
So full of ugly sights, of ghastly dreams... that as I am a Christian faithful man...
I would not spend another such a night... though 'twere to buy a worid of happy days... so full of dismal terror was the time.
What was this dream?
I pray you tell it me.
Methought that I had broken from the Tower... and was embarked to cross to Burgundy.
And in my company, my brother Gloucester... who from my cabin tempted me to walk upon the hatches.
Thence we looked towards England... and cited up a thousand fearful times... during the wars of York and Lancaster that had befallen us.
As we paced along upon the giddy footing of the hatches... methought that Gloucester stumbled... and, in falling... struck me, that thought to stay him... overboard, into the tumbling billows of the main.
Lord, Lord!
Methought what pain it was to drown.
What dreadful noise of water in mine ears.
What ugly sights of death within mine eyes.
Methought I saw a thousand fearful wrecks...
10,000 men that fishes gnawed upon... wedges of gold, great anchors, heaps of pearl... inestimable stones, unvalued jewels... all scattered at the bottom of the sea.
Had you such leisure in the time of death... to gaze upon the secrets of the deep?
Methought I had, and often did I strive... to yield the ghost.
But still the envious flood kept in my soul... and would not let it forth to find the empty, vast and wandering air... but smothered it within my panting bulk... which almost burst to belch it in the sea.
Awoke you not with this sore agony?
Oh, no, my dream was lengthened after life.
Oh, then began the tempest to my soul.
I crossed, methought, the melancholy flood... with that grim ferryman that poets write of... into the kingdom of perpetual night.
The first that there did greet my stranger soul... was my great father-in-law, renowned Warwick... who cried aloud...
''What scourge for perjury can this dark monarchy afford false Clarence?''
And so he vanished.
Then came wandering by a shadow like an ·ngel... with bright hair dabbled with blood.
And he shrieked out aloud...
''Clarence is come!
False, fleeting, perjured Clarence...
''that stabbed me in the field by Tewksbury!
Seize on him, Furies!
Take him to your torments!''
With that, methought a legion of foul fiends environed me... and howled in mine ears such hideous cries... that with the very noise
I trembling waked... and for a season after... could not believe but that I was in hell... such terrible impression made my dream.
No marvel, my lord, that it affrighted you.
I promise you,
I am afraid to hear you tell it.
Oh, Brackenbury,
I have done those things... which now bear evidence against my soul... for Edward's sake... and see how he requites me.
Oh, God, if my deep prayers will not appease thee... but thou wilt be avenged on my misdeeds... yet execute thy wrath on me alone.
Oh, spare my guiltless wife and my poor children.
- I pray thee, gentle keeper, stay with me.
My soul is heavy... and I fain would sleep.
I will, my lord.
God give Your Grace... good rest.
Good time of day unto Your Royal Grace.
Oh, princely Buckingham. I kiss thy hand.
- Good morrow, Catesby.
- God make Your Grace as joyful as you have been.
- But now the duke of Buckingham and I have come from visiting His Majesty.
He hath revoked the order for the execution of the duke, your brother.
What likelihood of his amendment, lords?
But who comes here?
By heaven,
I think there's no man secure... but the queen's kindred and night-walking heralds... that trudge betwixt the king and Mistress Shore.
Heard you not what an humble suppliant
Lord Hastings was to her for his delivery?
Humbly complaining to her deity got my Lord Chamberlain his liberty.
I'll tell you what.
I think it is our way... if we will keep in favor with the king to be her men and wear her livery.
The jealous fading queen and Mistress Shore...
since that our brother
dubbed them gentlewomen...
are mighty gossips in our monarchy.
I beseech Your Graces both to pardon me.
His Majesty hath straitly given in charge that no man shall have private conference... of what degree soever with your brother.
Even so, an't please your worship, Brackenbury... you may partake of anything we say.
We speak no treason, man.
We say the king is wise and virtuous... and his noble queen well struck in years, fair and not jealous.
We say that Shore's wife hath a pretty foot... a cherry lip, a bonny eye... a passing pIeasing tongue and that the queen's kindred are made gentIefoIks.
How say you, sir?
Can you deny all this?
- With this, my lord, myself have naught to do.
- Naught to do with Mistress Shore?
I tell thee, fellow, he that doth naught with her, excepting one, were best to do it secretly, alone.
- What one, my lord?
- Her husband, knave. Wouldst thou betray me?
I beseech Your Graces both to pardon me... and withal forbear all conference with the duke of Clarence.
I cannot tell. The worid is grown so bad... that wrens may prey where eagles dare not perch.
Since everyJack became a gentleman, there's many a gentle person made a Jack.
But who comes here?
The new-delivered Hastings.
Good time of day unto my gracious lord.
As much unto my good Lord Chamberlain.
Well are you welcome to this open air.
- How hath your Iordship brooked imprisonment?
- With patience, good Catesby, as prisoners must.
- My lord.
- Farewell, good Brackenbury.
But I shall live, my lord, to give them thanks that were the cause of my imprisonment.
No doubt, no doubt.
And so shall Clarence, too.
For they that were your enemies are his... and have prevailed as much on him as you.
More pity that the eagle should be mewed... while kites and buzzards prey at liberty.
- What news abroad?
- No news so bad abroad as this at home.
The king is sickly, weak and melancholy, and his physicians fear him mightily.
Now, by Saint Paul, that news is bad indeed.
Hmm. He hath kept an evil diet long... and overmuch consumed his royal person.
'Tis very grievous to be thought upon.
Where is he, Catesby, in his bed?
- He is.
- God grant him health.
- Did you confer with him?
- We did, my lord... and he desires to make atonement betwixt the duke of Gloucester and the brothers of the queen.
And betwixt them and you, my good Lord Chamberlain... and sent to warn you to his royal presence.
They do me wrong... and I will not endure it.
Who are they that complain unto the king... that I, forsooth, am stern and love them not?
By holy Paul, they love His Grace but lightly that fill his ears with such dissentious rumors.
Because I cannot flatter and speak fair... smile in men's faces, smooth, deceive and cog... duck with French nods and apish courtesy...
I must be held a rancorous enemy.
Cannot a plain man live and think no harm... but thus his simple truth must be abused... by silken, sly, insinuating Jacks?
- To whom in all this presence speaks Your Grace?
- To thee, that hast nor honesty nor grace.
When have I injured thee?
When done thee wrong? Or thee? Or thee?
Or any of your faction?
A plague upon you all.
His Royal Grace, whom God preserve better than you would wish... cannot be quiet scarce a breathing-while... but you must trouble him with lewd complaints.
Come, come, we know your meaning,
Brother Gloucester.
You envy my advancement and my friends'.
God grant we never may have need of you!
Meantime, God grants that we have need of you.
Our brother is imprisoned by your means... myself disgraced and the nobility held in contempt... while great promotions are daily given to ennoble those... that scarce some two days since were worth a noble.
By God who raised me to this careful height... from that contented hap which I enjoyed...
I never did incense his majesty against the duke of Clarence... but have been an earnest advocate to plead for him.
My lord, you do me shameful injury falsely to draw me in these vile suspects.
You may deny that you were not the cause of my Lord Hastings' late imprisonment.
- She may, my lord -
- She may, Lord Rivers.
Why, who knows not so?
She may do more, sir, than denying that.
She may help you to many fair preferments and then deny her aiding hand therein... and lay those honors on your high desert.
Ha! What may she not?
She may, aye, marry, may she -
- What, marry, may she?
- ''What, marry, may she?'' Marry with a king... a bachelor and a handsome stripling, too.
I guess your grandam had a worser match.
My lord of Gloucester,
I have too long borne... your blunt upbraidings and your bitter scoffs.
By heaven,
I will acquaint His Majesty... with those gross taunts
I often have endured.
What? Threat you me with telling of the king?
Tell him and spare not.
Look, what I have said
I will avouch in presence of the king.
I dare adventure to be sent to the Tower.
'Tis time to speak, my pains are quite forgot.
I had rather be a country servant-maid than a great queen, with this condition... to be thus baited, scorned and stormed at.
Small joy have I in being England's queen.
Ere you were queen, aye, or your husband king...
I was a packhorse in his great affairs... a weeder-out of his proud adversaries, a liberal rewarder of his friends.
To royalize his blood I spilt mine own.
In all which time you and your late husband... together with his son Dorset here... were factious for the house of Lancaster- and, Rivers, so were you.
Let me put in your minds, if you forget, what you have been ere this, and what you are.
Withal, what I have been, and what I am.
Poor Clarence did forsake his father-in-law, Warwick-
Aye, and forswore himself- which Jesu pardon - to fight on Edward's party for the crown.
And for his meed, poor lord, he is mewed up.
I would to God my heart were flint, like Edward's... or Edward's soft and pitiful, like mine.
I am too childish-foolish for this worid.
My lord of Gloucester, in those busy days... which here you urge to prove us enemies... we followed then our lord, our lawful king.
So should we you, if you should be our king.
If I should be?
I'd rather be a peddler.
Far be it from my heart, the thought thereof.
As little joy, my lord, as you suppose... you should enjoy, were you this country's king... as little I enjoy, being the queen thereof.
Dispute not with him.
He is lunatic.
Peace, Master Marquess, you are malapert.
Your fire-new stamp of honor is scarce current.
- What doth he say, my lord of Stanley?
- Nothing that I respect, my gracious lord.
They that stand high have many blasts to shake them.
And when they fall, they dash themselves to pieces.
Good counsel.
Marry, learn it, Marquess. Learn it.
- It touches you, my lord, as much as me.
- Aye... and much more.
But I was born so high.
I was too hot to do somebody good... that is too cold in thinking of it now.
Marry, as for Clarence, he is well repaid.
He is franked up to fatting for his pains.
God pardon them that are the cause thereof.
A virtuous and a Christian-like conclusion... to pray for them that have done wrong to us.
So do I ever, being well-advised.
For had I cursed now,
I had cursed myself.
Madam, His Majesty doth call for you and for Your Grace and you, my noble lords.
Catesby, we come.
Lords, will you go with us?
Madam, we will attend Your Grace.
Go you before, and I will follow you.
But soft...
But soft... here come my executioners.
How now, my hardy, stout resolved mates!
Are you now going to dispatch this thing?
We are, milord, and come to have the warrant that we may be admitted where he is.
Well thought upon.
I have it here about me.
Uh -
But, sirs, be sudden in the execution... withal obdurate, do not hear him plead... for Clarence is well-spoken and perhaps may move your hearts to pity if you mark him.
Tush! Fear not, milord, we will not stand to prate.
Talkers are no good doers.
Be assured we come to use our hands and not our tongues.
Your eyes drop millstones when fools' eyes drop tears, eh?
I like you, lads. About your business straight.
- Go, go, dispatch.
- We will, my noble lord.
In God's name, who are you, and how came you hither?
I would speak with Clarence, and I came hither on my legs.
- Be you so brief?
- O, sir, 'tis better to be brief than tedious.
Show him our commission and talk no more.
I am, in this, commanded to deliver the noble duke of Clarence to your hands.
I will not reason what is meant thereby, because I will be guiltless of the meaning.
Here is the key.
There lies the duke asleep.
I'll to His Majesty and certify His Grace that thus I have resigned my charge to you.
You may, sir.
It is a point of wisdom. Fare you well.
I know thy charge, Brackenbury... and will take it.
Clout him over the head with the hilts of thy weapon... and then chop him in the malmsey butt in the next room.
Aye, make a sop of him.
Where art thou, keeper?
Give me a cup of wine.
You shall have wine enough, my lord, anon.
Why, so.
Now have I done a good day's work.
You peers, continue this united league.
Madam, my mother...
I do crave your blessing.
I every day expect a summons from my Redeemer... to redeem me hence... and now... in peace my soul shall part for heaven... since I have left my friends at peace on earth.
Rivers, Hastings... take each other's hand.
Dissemble not your hatred... swear your love.
By heaven, my heart is purged from grudging hate... and with my hand I seal my true heart's love.
So thrive I, as I truly swear the like.
Take heed you dally not before your king... lest he that is the supreme King of Kings... confound your hidden falsehood... and award either of you to be the other's end.
So prosper I, as I swear perfect love.
And I, as I love Hastings with my heart.
Madam, yourself are not exempt in this... nor you, young Dorset -
Buckingham, nor you.
You have been factious one against the other.
Wife, love Lord Hastings.
Let him kiss your hand.
And what you do, do it unfeignedly.
There, Hastings. I will never more remember our former hatred... so thrive I and mine.
Dorset, embrace him.
Hastings, love Lord Marquess.
This interchange of love, I here protest, upon my part shall be inviolable.
And so swear I, my lord.
Now, princely Buckingham, seal thou this league... with thy embracement to my wife's allies... and make me happy in your unity.
Whenever Buckingham doth turn his hate on you or yours...
God punish me with hate in those where I expect most love.
When I have most need to employ a friend... and most assured that he is a friend... deep, hollow, treacherous and full of guile... be he unto me.
This do I beg of God... when I am cold in zeal to you or yours.
Apleasing cordial, princely Buckingham...
is this thy vow unto my sickly heart.
There wanteth now our brother Gloucester here... to make the perfect period of this peace.
And in good time here comes the noble duke.
Good morrow to my sovereign king... and queen... and, princely peers, a happy time of day.
Happy, indeed, as we have spent the day.
Brother, we have done deeds of charity... made peace of enmity, fair love of hate... between these swelling wrong-incensed peers.
A blessed labor, my most sovereign liege.
Among this princely heap... if any here, by false intelligence... or wrong surmise, hold me a foe -
If I unwittingly, or in my rage... have aught committed that is hardly borne by any in this presence...
I desire to reconcile me to his friendly peace.
'Tis death to me to be at enmity.
I hate it, and desire all good men's love.
First, madam,
I entreat true peace of you... which I will purchase with my duteous service.
Of you, my noble cousin Buckingham... if ever any grudge were lodged between us - of you, Lord Rivers, and, Lord Grey, of you - of you, my noble Marquess,
lord of Dorset - that all without desert have frowned on me - dukes, earis, lords, gentlemen... indeed, of all.
I do not know that Englishman alive with whom my soul is any jot at odds... more than the infant that is born tonight.
I thank my God for my humility.
A holy day shall this be kept hereafter.
I would to God all strifes were well compounded.
My sovereign liege,
I do beseech Your Majesty... to take our brother Clarence to Your Grace.
Why, madam... have I offered love for this to be so flouted in this royal presence?
Who knows not that the gentle duke... is dead?
You do him injury to scorn his corse.
Who knows not he is dead?
- Who knows he is?
- All-seeing heaven, what a worid is this!
Look I so pale, Lord Dorset, as the rest?
Aye, my good lord... and no one in this presence but his red color hath forsook his cheeks.
I- Is Clarence dead?
The order was reversed.
But he, poor soul, by your first order died, and that a winged Mercury did bear.
Some tardy cripple bore the countermand... that came too lag to see him buried.
Who sued to me for him?
Who, in my rage, kneeled at my feet, and bade me be advised?
Who spake of brotherhood?
Who spake of love?
Who told me how the poor soul did forsake the mighty Warwick and did fight for me?
Who told me, in the field by Tewksbury... when Warwick had me down, he rescued me... and said,
''Dear Brother, live and be a king''?
Who told me... when we both lay on the ground frozen almost to death... how he did lap me even in his own garments... and gave himself, all thin and naked, to the numb, cold night?
All this from my remembrance brutish wrath sinfully plucked... and not a man of you had so much grace to put it in my mind!
Oh, God!
I fear... thy justice will take hold on me, and you... and mine, and yours for this.
Come, Hastings, help me to my bed.
Oh!
Poor Clarence!
This is the fruit of rashness.
Marked you not how that the guilty kindred of the queen... looked pale when they did hear of Clarence' death?
Oh, my good Lord Stanley, they did urge it still unto the king.
- God will revenge it.
Oh, who shall hinder me to wail and weep... to chide my fortune and torment myself?
Oh, for my husband, for my dear Lord Edward.
Comfort, dear madam.
God is much displeased... that you take with unthankfulness his doing.
Madam, bethink you, like a careful mother... of the young prince of Wales.
Send straight for him.
Let him be crowned.
In him your comfort lives.
Drown desperate sorrow in dead Edward's grave... and plant your joys in living Edward's throne.
Sister... have comfort.
All of us have cause to wail the dimming of our shining star... but none may help our harms by wailing them.
Madam my mother, I do cry you mercy.
I did not see Your Grace.
Most humbly on my knee,
I crave your blessing.
God bless thee and put meekness in thy mind... love, charity, obedience and true duty.
Amen, and make me die a good old man.
That is the butt end of a mother's blessing.
I marvel that Her Grace did leave it out.
You cloudy princes and heart-sorrowing peers... that bear this mutual heavy load of moan... now cheer each other in each other's love.
The broken rancor of your high-swoln hearts... but lately splinted, knit and joined together... must gently be preserved, cherished and kept.
Meseemeth good that with some little train... forthwith from Ludlow the young prince be fetched... hither to London to be crowned our king.
Why with some little train, my lord of Buckingham?
Marry, my lord, lest by a multitude... the new-healed wound of malice should break out... as well the fear of harm as harm apparent... in my opinion, ought to be prevented.
I hope the king made peace with all of us... and the compact is firm and true in me.
And so in me.
And so, I think, in all.
Yet, since it is but green... it should be put to no apparent likelihood of breach... which haply by much company might be urged.
Therefore I say with noble Buckingham... that it is meet so few should fetch the prince.
- And so say I.
- Then be it so... and go we to determine who they shall be... that straight shall post to Ludlow.
Madam, and you, my mother, will you go to give your censures in this business?
With all our hearts.
My lord... whoever journeys to the prince, for God's sake, let not us two stay behind.
For by the way I'll sort occasion... as index to the story we late talked on... to part the queen's proud kindred from the prince.
My other self... my counsel's consistory... my oracle, my prophet.
My dear cousin...
I, like a child, will go by thy direction.
Towards Ludlow then... for we'll not stay behind.
Last night, I hear, they lay at Northampton.
At Stony-Stratford will they be tonight.
Tomorrow, or next day, they will be here.
I long with all my heart to see the prince.
I hope he is much grown since last I saw him.
But I hear no. They say my son of York hath almost overta'en him in his growth.
Aye, Mother, but I would not have it so.
Why, my young grandson, it is good to grow.
Grandam, one night as we did sit at supper... my uncle Rivers talked how I did grow... more than my brother.
''Aye,'' quoth my uncle Gloucester...
''Small herbs have grace, great weeds do grow apace.''
Marry, they say my uncle grew so fast... that he could gnaw a crust at two hours old.
'Twas full two years ere I could get a tooth.
A parlous boy.
Go to, you are too shrewd.
Good madam, be not angry with the child.
Pitchers have ears.
Where is the queen?
- Where is Her Majesty?
- She is above, my lord.
Here comes your kinsman
Marquess Dorset.
- What news, Lord Marquess?
- Such news, my lord, as grieves me to unfold.
- How fares the prince?
- Well, madam, and in health.
What is thy news, then?
Madam, your brothers,
Lord Rivers... and Lord Grey... are sent to Pomfret... prisoners.
Who hath committed them?
The mighty dukes
Gloucester and Buckingham.
For what offense?
The sum of all I can,
I have disclosed.
Why, or for what, our kinsmen are committed... is all unknown to me, my gracious lady.
Ay me,
I see the downfall of our house.
The tiger now hath seized the gentle hind.
Accursed and unquiet wrangling days... how many of you have mine eyes beheld.
My husband lost his life to get the crown... and often up and down my sons were tossed... for me to joy or weep their gain and loss.
Blood against blood... self against self.
O let me die, to look on death no more.
Come, come, my boy.
We will to sanctuary.
- Madam, farewell.
- I'll go with you.
You have no cause.
My gracious lady, go, and thither bear your treasure and your goods.
For my part,
I'll resign unto Your Grace the seal I keep... and so betide to me as well I tender you and all of yours.
Come, I'll conduct you to the sanctuary.
Welcome, sweet prince,
to London, to your chamber.
Welcome, dear cousin... my thoughts' sovereign.
Ah, the weary way hath made you melancholy.
No, Uncle, but our crosses on the way... have made it tedious, wearisome and heavy.
I want more uncles here to welcome me.
Sweet prince, the untainted virtue of your years... hath not yet dived into the worid's deceit.
No more can you distinguish of a man than of his outward show... which, God he knows, seldom or never... jumpeth with the heart.
Those uncles which you want... were dangerous.
Your Grace attended to their sugared words... but looked not on the poison of their hearts.
God keep you from them and from such false friends.
God keep me from false friends, but they were none.
Hmm. Sir, my Lord Archbishop comes to greet you.
The mayor of London waits upon Your Grace.
God bless Your Grace with health and happy days.
I thank you, good my lord, and thank you all.
I thought my mother and my brother York... would long ere this have met us on the way.
Fie, what a slug is Hastings... that he comes not to tell us whether they will come or no.
And in good time here comes the sweating lord.
And the Lord Stanley with him.
Welcome, my lord.
What, will our mother come?
On what occasion,
God he knows, not I... the queen your mother and your brother York have taken sanctuary.
The tender prince would fain have come with me to meet Your Grace...
but by his mother
was perforce withheld.
Fie, what indirect and peevish course is this of hers.
My Lord Archbishop... will Your Grace persuade the queen... to send the duke of York unto his princely brother presently?
If she deny,
Lord Hastings, go with him... and from her jealous arms pluck him perforce.
My lord of Buckingham... if my weak oratory can from his mother win the duke of York... anon expect him here.
But if she be obdurate to mild entreaties...
God in heaven forbid we should infringe the holy privilege of blessed sanctuary!
Not for all this land would I be guilty of so deep a sin.
You are too senseless-obstinate, my lord... too ceremonious and traditional.
Weigh it but with the grossness of this age, you break not sanctuary in seizing him.
The benefit thereof is always granted... to those whose dealings have deserved the place... and those that have the wit to claim the place.
This prince hath neither claimed it nor deserved it.
And therefore, in my opinion, cannot have it.
Oft have I heard of sanctuary men... but sanctuary children - huh! - ne'er till now.
Milord, you shall o'errule my mind for once.
Come on, Lord Hastings, will you go with me?
I go, my lord.
Lord Stanley, will you come?
Good lords, make all the speedy haste you may.
Catesby, Ratcliffe, Lovel, go with them.
The mayor towards Guildhall hies him in all haste.
There tomorrow, at your meetest vantage of the time... infer the bastardy of Edward's children.
Moreover, urge his hateful luxury... and bestial appetite in change of lust... which stretched unto their servants, daughters, wives... even where his raging eye or savage heart, without control... lusted to make his prey.
Say, Uncle Gloucester,
if my brother come... where shall we sojourn till our coronation?
Where it thinks best
unto your royal self.
If I may counsel you... some day or two
Your Highness shall repose you... at the Tower.
Then where you please... and shall be thought most fit for your best health and recreation.
I do not like the Tower... of any place.
So wise so young, they say, do ne'er live long.
Did Julius Caesar build that place, milord?
He did, my gracious lord, begin that place.
ThatJulius Caesar was a famous man.
With what his valor did enrich his wit... his wit set down to make his valor live.
Nay, for a need, thus far come near my person.
Tell them that when my mother was with child - with my yet unborn brother- noble York, my princely father... then had wars in France... and by true computation of the time... found that the issue was not his begot... which well appeared in his lineaments, being nothing like the duke, my noble father.
Yet, uh, touch this sparingly, as 'twere far off... because, my lord, you know, my mother lives.
I'll tell you what,
my cousin Buckingham.
- What, my gracious lord?
- An if I live until I be a man...
I'll win our ancient rights in France again... or die a soldier, as I lived a king.
Short summers lightly have a forward spring.
Fear not, my lord,
I'll play the orator... as if the golden fee for which I plead were for myself.
If you thrive well, bring them to Baynard's Castle... where you shall find me well accompanied... with reverend fathers and well-learned bishops.
Ah, in good time, here comes the duke of York.
Richard of York.
How fares our loving brother?
Well, my dread lord - so must I call you now.
Aye, Brother, to our grief, as it is yours.
How fares our noble cousin, princely York?
I thank you, gentle Uncle.
Oh, my lord, you said that idle weeds are fast in growth.
The prince my brother hath outgrown me far.
- He hath, milord.
- And therefore is he idle?
- Oh, my dear lord, I must not say so.
- Then he is more beholding to you than I.
Ah, he may command me as my sovereign... but you have power in me as a kinsman.
I pray you, Uncle, give me this dagger.
My dagger, little cousin?
With all my heart.
- A beggar, Brother?
- Of my kind uncle, that I know will give... and being but a toy, which is no grief to give.
A greater gift than that
I'll give my cousin.
A greater gift?
Oh, that's the sword to it.
- Too weighty for Your Grace to wear.
- I weigh it lightly, were it heavier.
What, would you have my weapon, little lord?
I would, that I might thank you as you call me.
- How?
- Little.
My lord of York will still be cross in talk.
Uncle, Your Grace knows how to bear with him.
You mean to bear me, not to bear with me.
Uncle, my brother mocks both you and me.
Because that I am little, like an ape... he thinks that you should bear me on your shoulder!
With what a sharp-provided wit he reasons!
To mitigate the scorn he gives his uncle, he prettily and aptly taunts himself.
So cunning and so young is wonderful.
My lord, will't please you pass along?
Myself and my good cousin Buckingham will to your mother... to entreat of her to meet you at the Tower and welcome you.
What, will you go unto the Tower, my lord?
My Lord Protector needs will have it so.
I shall not sleep in quiet at the Tower.
- Why, what should you fear?
- Marry, my uncle Clarence' angry ghost.
My grandam told me he was murdered there.
- I fear no uncles dead.
- Nor none that live, I hope.
And if they live,
I hope I need not fear.
But come, and with heavy hearts... thinking on them... go we unto the Tower.
Well, let them rest.
Now, my lord, what shall we do... if we perceive that the Lord Hastings will not yield to our complots?
Chop off his head, man.
Somewhat we will do.
Come hither, Catesby.
Thou art sworn as deeply to effect what we intend... as closely to conceal what we impart.
Thou knowest our reasons urged upon the way.
What thinkest thou?
Is it not an easy matter... to make Lord Hastings of our mind... for the installment of this noble duke in the seat royal of this famous isle?
He for the late king's sake so loves the prince... that he will not be won to aught against him.
What think'st thou, then, of Stanley?
What will he?
He will do all in all as Hastings doth.
Hmm.
Well, then, no more but this.
Go, gentle Catesby... and, as it were far off, sound thou Lord Hastings... how he stands affected unto our purpose... and summon him tomorrow to the Tower... to counsel on the coronation.
If thou dost find him tractable to us, encourage him and show him all our reasons.
If he be leaden, icy-cold, unwilling... be thou so too, and so break off your talk... and give us notice of his inclination.
I will, my lord.
Farewell, Your Graces both.
Catesby... commend me to Lord Hastings.
Tell him his ancient knot of dangerous adversaries...
Lord Rivers and Lord Grey... tomorrow are let blood at Pomfret castle.
And bid my friend, for joy of this good news... give Mistress Shore one gentle kiss the more.
My lord.
My lord.
My lord.
- Who knocks?
- One from the Lord Stanley.
- What is't o'clock?
- Upon the stroke of 4:00.
Cannot my Lord Stanley sleep these tedious nights?
So it appears by that I have to say.
First, he commends him to your noble self.
- What then?
Then certifies your lordship that this night he had a dream - the boar razed off his helm.
Therefore he sends to know your lordship's pleasure... if you will presently take horse with him... and with all speed post with him toward the north... to shun the danger that his soul divines.
Go, fellow, go, return unto thy lord.
Tell him his fears are shallow, without instance.
And for his dreams,
I wonder he's so simple... to trust the mockery of unquiet slumbers.
To fly the boar before the boar pursues... were to incense the boar to follow us... and make pursuit where he did mean no chase.
Go, bid thy master rise and come to me... and we will both together to the Tower... where he shall see the boar will use us kindly.
I'll go, my lord, and tell him what you say.
How now, sirrah.
- How goes the worid with thee?
- The better that your lordship please to ask.
Many good morrows to my noble lord.
Good morrow, Catesby.
You are early stirring.
What news?
What news, in this our tottering state?
It is a reeling worid indeed, my lord.
And, uh...
I believe will never stand upright... till Richard wear the garland of the realm.
- How? Wear the garland?
- Mm-hmm.
- Dost thou mean the crown?
- Aye, my good lord.
I'll have this crown of mine cut from my shoulders... before I'll see the crown so foul misplaced.
But canst thou guess that he doth aim at it?
Aye, on my life... and hopes to find you forward upon his party for the gain thereof.
Thereupon he sends you this good news... that this same very day your enemies... the kindred of the queen... must die at Pomfret.
Indeed I am no mourner for that news.
But that I'll give my voice on Richard's side... to bar my master's heirs in true descent -
God knows I will not do it... to the death.
God keep your lordship in that gracious mind.
But I shall laugh at this a twelvemonth hence... that they which brought me in my master's hate...
I live to look upon their tragedy.
Well, Catesby... ere a fortnight make me older...
I'll send some packing
that yet not think on't.
'Tis a vile thing to die, my gracious lord... when men are unprepared and look not for it.
Monstrous, monstrous.
And so falls it out with Rivers... and with Grey.
And so 'twill do with some men else... who think themselves as safe as thou and I - who, as thou know'st, are dear to princely Richard -
- And to Buckingham.
The princes both make high account of you.
For they account his head upon the Bridge.
I know they do, and I have well deserved it.
Come on, come on, where's your boar spear, man?
Fear you the boar and go so unprovided?
- My lord, good morrow.
- Good morrow, Catesby.
You may jest on, but by the holy rood, the lords at Pomfret... when they rode from London were jocund and supposed their states were sure... and they indeed had no cause to mistrust.
And yet you see how soon the day o'ercast.
My lord, I hold my life as dear as yours... and never in my days, I do protest... was it so precious to me as 'tis now.
- Good morrow, mistress.
- Good morrow, my lord.
Think you, but that I know our state secure...
I would be so triumphant as I am?
This sudden stab of rancor
I misdoubt.
Pray God, I say,
I prove a needless coward.
But come, my lord.
Shall we to the Tower?
Go you before.
I'll follow presently.
Well met, my lord.
I am glad to see Your Honor.
I thank thee, reverend sir, with all my heart.
I am in your debt for your last exercise.
Come the next Sabbath, and I will content you.
What, talking with a priest,
Lord Chamberlain?
Your friends at Pomfret, they do need the priest.
Your worship hath no shriving work in hand.
Good faith, and when I met this holy man, the men you talk of came into my mind.
What, go you toward the Tower?
I do, my lord, but long I cannot stay there.
I shall return before your lordship thence.
Nay, like enough, for I stay dinner there.
- And supper, too, although thou know'st it not.
- Hmm?
- Come, will you go?
- I wait upon your lordship.
My lords, at once, the cause why we are met... is to determine of the coronation.
- Ah.
- In God's name, say. When is the royal day?
Are all things fitting for that royal time?
They are and want but nomination.
Tomorrow, then, I guess a happy time.
Who knows the Lord Protector's mind herein?
Who is most inward with the noble duke?
Why, you, milord, methinks should soonest know his mind.
We know each other's faces.
For our hearts, he knows no more of mine than I of yours.
Nor I no more of his...
- than you of mine.
Lord Hastings, you and he are near in love.
I thank His Grace,
I know he loves me well.
But for his purpose in the coronation
I have not sounded him... nor he delivered his gracious pleasure any way therein.
But you, my noble lords, may name the time.
And in the duke's behalf
I'll give my voice... which I presume he'll take in gentle part.
Now in good time, here comes the duke himself.
My noble lords and cousins all, good morrow.
I have been long a sleeper... but I trust my absence doth neglect no great design... which by my presence might have been concluded.
Had you not come upon your cue, my lord...
William Lord Hastings had now pronounced your part -
I mean, your voice - for crowning of the king.
Than my Lord Hastings no man might be bolder.
- I thank Your Grace.
- His lordship knows me well... and loves me well.
Hmm.
Ah, the crowning of the king.
My Lord Archbishop.
Milord?
When I was last in Lambeth,
I saw good strawberries in your garden there.
I do beseech you send for some of them.
Marry, and will, my lord, with all my heart.
Cousin of Buckingham, a word with you.
Catesby hath sounded
Hastings on our business... and finds the testy gentleman so hot... that he will lose his head ere give consent... his master's son, as worshipful he terms it... shall lose the royalty of England's throne.
When I am king... claim thou of me the earidom of Hereford... and all the movables... whereof the king my brother was possessed, hmm?
I'll claim that promise at Your Grace's hands.
And look to have it yielded with all willingness.
Where is our Lord Protector?
I have sent for these strawberries.
We have not yet set down this day of triumph.
Tomorrow, in mine opinion, is too sudden... for I myself am not so well provided as else I might be were the day prolonged.
His Grace looks cheerfully and smooth today.
There's some conceit or other likes him well... when he doth bid good morrow with such a spirit.
I think there's never a man in Christendom... that can lesser hide his love... or hate than he... for by his look straight shall you know his heart.
What of his heart perceived you in his face... by any likelihood he showed today?
Marry, that with no man here he is offended... for if he were, he would have shown it in his looks.
I pray you all, tell me what they deserve... that do conspire my death... with devilish plots of damned witchcraft... and that have prevailed upon my body with their hellish charms?
The tender love
I bear Your Grace, my lord... makes me most forward in this noble presence to doom the offenders.
Whosoe'er they be,
I say they have deserved death.
Then be your eyes the witness of their evil.
Look how I am bewitched!
Behold, mine arm is like a blasted sapling, withered up.
And this is Edward's wife, that monstrous witch... consorted with that harlot strumpet Shore...
that by their witchcraft
thus have marked me.
If they have done this thing, my gracious lord -
If!.
Thou protector of this damned strumpet... talk'st thou to me of ifs?
Thou art a traitor!
Off with his head!
Now, by Saint Paul I swear,
I shall not dine until I see the same.
Catesby, Ratcliffe, Lovel, see it done.
The rest that love me... rise... and follow me!
I never looked for better at his hands... after he once fell in with Mistress Shore.
Woe, woe for England.
Not a whit for me, for I, too fond, might have prevented this.
Stanley did dream the boar chopped off his head... but I disdained it and did scorn to fly.
Three times today my footcloth horse did stumble... and started when he looked upon the Tower... as loath to bear me to the slaughterhouse.
Oh... now I want the priest that spake to me.
Dispatch, my lord.
The duke would be at dinner.
Make a short shrift.
He longs to see your head.
Hmm.
The cat... the rat... and Lovel the dog... rule all England under the hog.
Come, come, dispatch.
'Tis bootless to exclaim.
Hmm.
Come, lead me to the block, bear him my head.
They smile at me that shortly shall be dead.
Well, well... that was the sliest, sheltered traitor that ever lived.
Would you have imagined, my good Lord Mayor... were't not, by great preservation... we live to tell it you... the subtle traitor this day had plotted in the council house... to murder me and my good lord of Gloucester?
What, had he so?
So smooth he daubed his vice with show of virtue... that, his apparent open guilt apart -
I mean, his conversation with Shore's wife - his life was free from all suspicion.
Now fair befall you.
He deserved his death.
And you, my good lords, both have well proceeded... to warn false traitors from the like attempts.
I never looked for better at his hands after he once fell in with Mistress Shore.
Yet had not we determined he should die
until your lordship came to see his end... which now the loving haste of these our friends...
somewhat against our meaning,
have prevented.
Because, my lord, we would have
had you hear the traitor speak... and timorously confess the manner and the purpose of his treason... that you might well have signified the same unto the citizens... who haply may misconstrue us in him and wail his death.
But, my good lord,
Your Grace's word shall serve... as well as I had seen and heard him speak.
And doubt you not but I'll acquaint our duteous citizens...
with all yourjust proceedings
in this case.
And to that end we wished your worship here... to avoid the carping censures of the worid.
But since you come too late of our intents... yet witness what we did intend.
And so, my lord,
I will be with thee straight.
Come, all good citizens, draw near... and to your good Lord Mayor... lend generous ear.
How now, how now?
What say the citizens?
Now, by the Holy Mother of our Lord... the citizens are mum... say not a word.
- Touched you the bastardy of Edward's children?
- I did... with his contract with Mistress Shore... and his contract by deputy in France - the insatiate greediness of his desires... and his enforcement of the city wives - his tyranny for trifles - his own bastardy, as being got... your father then in France... and his resemblance being not like the duke.
Withal I did infer your lineaments, being the right idea of your father... both in your form... and nobleness of mind - laid open all your victories in Scotland... your discipline in war, wisdom in peace... your bounty, virtues, fair humility- indeed, left nothing fitting for your purpose untouched... or slightly handled in discourse.
And when my oratory drew toward end...
I bade them that did love their country's good... cry, ''God save Richard,
England's royal king.''
- And did they so?
- No, so God help me, they spake not a word.
But like dumb statues or breathing stones... stared each on other and looked deadly pale.
Which when I saw,
I reprehended them... and asked the mayor what meant this willful silence.
His answer was, the people were not used to be spoke to but by the recorder.
Then he was urged to tell my tale again -
''Thus saith the duke, thus hath the duke inferred'' - but nothing spoke in warrant from himself.
When he had done, some followers of mine own... at lower end of the hall, hurled up their caps... and some 10 voices cried,
''God save King Richard!''
And thus I took the vantage of those few...
''Thanks, gentle citizens and friends,'' quoth I...
''This general applause and cheerful shout... argues your wisdom and your love to Richard.''
And even here brake off and came away.
What tongueless blocks were they!
Would they not speak?
Will not the mayor then and his brethren come?
The mayor is here at hand.
Pretend some fear.
Be not you spoke with but by mighty suit.
Play the maid's part - say no, but take it.
Fear me not.
And if you plead as well for them... as I can say nay to thee for myself... no doubt we bring it to a happy issue.
You shall see what I can do.
Get you up to the leads.
Now, my Lord Mayor,
I dance attendance here.
I think His Grace will not be spoke withal.
Now, Catesby, what says your lord to my request?
He doth entreat Your Grace, my noble lord... to visit him tomorrow or next day.
He is within, with two right reverend fathers... divinely bent to meditation... and in no woridly suit should he be moved... to draw him from his holy exercise.
Return, good Catesby, to the gracious duke.
Tell him, myself, the mayor and citizens... in deep designs in matter of great moment... no less importing than our general good... are come to have some conference with His Grace.
- ''General good.''
- I'll signify so much unto him straight.
Ah, ha, my lord, this prince is not an Edward.
He is not lolling on a lewd love-bed... but on his knees at meditation.
Not dallying with a brace of courtesans... but meditating with two deep divines.
- Two deep divines.
- Not sleeping, to engross his idle body... but praying, to enrich his watchful soul.
Happy were England would this gracious prince... take on himself the sovereignty thereof.
But sure,
I fear we shall not win him to it.
Marry, God defend His Grace should say us nay.
I fear he will.
Here Catesby comes again.
Now, Catesby, what says His Grace?
He wonders to what end you have assembled... such troops of citizens to come to him.
His Grace not being warned thereof before... he fears, my lord, you mean no good to him.
- Oh.
- Sorry I am my noble cousin should suspect me... that I mean no good to him.
By heaven, we come to him in perfect love.
And so once more return and tell His Grace.
When holy and devout religious men are at their beads...
- 'tis much to draw them thence... so sweet is zealous contemplation.
See where His Grace comes?
Between two clergymen.
Ahh!
Two props of virtue for a Christian prince... to stay him from the fall of vanity.
And see,
a book of prayer in his hand...
true ornament to know a holy man.
Famous Plantagenet, most gracious prince... lend favorable ear to our request... and pardon us the interruption... of thy devotion and right Christian zeal.
My lord, there needs no such apology.
I do perceive
I have done some offense... which seems disgracious in the city's eye... and that you come to reprehend my ignorance.
You have, my lord.
Would it would please Your Grace... on our entreaties, to amend your fault.
Else wherefore breathe I in a Christian land?
Know then, it is your fault that you resign... the supreme seat, the throne majestical... the sceptered office of your ancestors... to the corruption of a blemished stock.
The which to cure we heartily solicit your gracious self... to take on you the charge and kingly government of this your land.
Not as protector, steward, substitute... or lowly factor for another's gain...
but as successively
from blood to blood...
your right ofbirth,
your heritage,your own.
For this, consorted with the citizens... your very worshipful and loving friends... and by their vehement instigation -
- Hurrah!
- Hurrah!
In this just cause come I to move Your Grace.
I cannot tell if to depart in silence... or bitterly to speak in your reproof.
Your love deserves my thanks... but my desert unmeritable shuns your high request.
But God be thanked, there is no need of me.
The royal tree hath left us
royal fruit... which, mellowed with the stealing hours of time... will well become the seat of majesty... and make, no doubt, us happy by his reign.
On him I lay that you would lay on me - the right and fortune of his happy stars... which God defend that I should wring from him.
My lord... this argues conscience in Your Grace.
You say that Edward is your brother's son.
So say we too,
but not by Edward's wife.
Then, good my lord, take to your royal self... this proffered benefit of dignity.
Do, good my lord. Your citizens entreat you.
Refuse not, mighty lord, this proffered love.
Oh, make them joyful, grant their lawful suit.
I do beseech you, take it not amiss -
I cannot nor I will not yield to you.
Yet whether you accept our suit or no... your brother's son shall never reign our king... but we will plant some other in the throne... to the disgrace and downfall of your house.
And in this resolution here we leave you.
Come, citizens.
'Zounds! I'll entreat no more.
Oh, do not swear, my lord -
Call them again, sweet prince, accept their suit.
If you deny them, all the land will rue it.
Would you enforce me to a worid of cares?
- Call them again.
- Call them again!
Call them again!
Cousin of Buckingham... and sage, grave men... since that you will buckle fortune on my back... to bear her burthen, whether I will or no...
I must have patience to endure the load.
But God doth know, and you may partly see... how far I am from the desire of this.
God bless Your Grace.
We see it and will say it.
- Aye.
- Then I salute you with this royal title -
Long live Richard,
England's worthy king!
Long live Richard, England's worthy king!
Tomorrow may it please you to be crowned?
Even when you please, for you will have it so.
Tomorrow, then, we will attend Your Grace... and so most joyfully we take our leave.
Come, let us to our holy work again.
Farewell, my cousin.
Farewell, gentle friends.
Come, madam, come.
You must straight to Westminster... there to be crowned
Richard's royal queen.
Oh, would to God that the inclusive verge... of golden metal that must round my brow... were red-hot steel, to sear me to the brain.
Anointed let me be with deadly venom... and die ere men can say
God save the queen.
Go, go, poor soul.
I envy not thy glory.
To feed my humor, wish thyself no harm.
No? Why?
When he that is my husband now... came to me as I followed Edward's corse... when scarce the blood was well washed from his hands... which issued from my other ·ngel husband... within so small a time... my woman's heart... grossly grew captive to his honey words.
And never yet one hour in his bed... did I enjoy the golden dew of sleep... but have been wakened by his timorous dreams.
Besides, he hates me for my father Warwick... and will, no doubt, shortly be rid of me.
Be of good cheer.
Madam, how fares Your Grace?
Oh, Dorset, speak not to me, get thee gone.
Death and destruction dog thee at thy heels.
Go, hie thee, hie thee from this slaughterhouse... lest thou increase the number of the dead.
Full of wise care is this your counsel, madam.
Take all the swift advantage of the hours.
In Brittany, my stepson
Earl of Richmond doth reside... who with a jealous eye doth still observe the lawless actions of aspiring Gloucester.
If thou wilt outstrip death... go cross the seas and live with Richmond from the reach of hell.
You shall have letters from me to my own son George on your behalf... to meet you on the way.
Be not ta'en tardy by unwise delay.
Come, madam, come.
I in all haste was sent.
And I with all unwillingness will go.
Go thou to Richard, and good angels tend thee.
Go thou to Richmond... and good fortune guide thee.
Go thou to sanctuary, and good thoughts possess thee.
I to my grave, where peace and rest lie with me.
Pity, you ancient stones, those tender babes... whom envy hath immured within your walls.
Rough cradle for such little pretty ones.
Rude ragged nurse... old sullen playfellow for tender princes... use my babies well.
So... foolish sorrow bids your stones farewell.
God save King Richard.!
Long live King Richard!
May the king live forever!
Stand all apart!
Cousin of Buckingham.
Give me thy hand.
My gracious sovereign.
Thus high, by thy advice and thy assistance... is King Richard seated.
But shall we wear these glories for a day?
Or shall they live and we rejoice in them?
Still live they, and for ever let them last.
Buckingham, now do I play the touch, to try if thou be current gold indeed.
Thou know'st young Edward and his brother lives.
Think now what I would speak, hmm?
Say on, my loving lord.
- Why, Buckingham, I say, I would be king.
- Why, so you are, my thrice-renowned lord.
Am I king?
'Tis so... but Edward lives.
True, noble prince.
Cousin, thou was not wont to be so dull.
''True, noble prince.''
Shall I be plain?
I wish the bastards dead, and I would have it suddenly performed.
What sayest thou now?
Speak suddenly, be brief.
- Your Grace may do your pleasure.
- Tut, tut, tut, thou art all ice... thy kindness freezes.
Say, have I thy consent that they shall die?
Give me some little breath, some pause, dear lord... before I positively speak in this.
I will resolve you herein presently.
High-reaching Buckingham grows circumspect.
The king is angry.
See, he gnaws his lip.
- Catesby.
- My lord?
Knowest thou not any whom corrupting gold... will tempt unto a close exploit of death?
I know a discontented gentleman whose humble means match not his haughty spirits.
Gold were as good as 20 orators and will, no doubt, tempt him to anything.
- What is his name?
- His name, my lord, is Tyrrell.
I partly know the man.
Go, call him hither.
The deep-revolving witty Buckingham... no more shall be the neighbor to my counsels.
Hath he so long held out with me untired... and stops he now for breath?
Well... be it so.
How now, Lord Stanley?
What's the news?
The marquess of Dorset, as I hear, is fled... to Richmond.
Come hither, Catesby.
Rumor it abroad that Anne, my wife... is very grievous sick.
I will take order for her keeping close.
Look how thou dream'st.
I say again... give out that Anne my queen is sick and like to die. About it.
I must marry...
Brother Edward's daughter... or else my kingdom stands on brittle glass.
Murder her brothers, and then marry her.
Familiar way of gain.
But I am in so far in blood... that sin will pluck on sin.
Tear-falling pity... dwells not in this eye.
My lord,
I have considered in my mind... the late demand that you did sound me in.
Well, let that rest.
Uh, Dorset is fled to Richmond.
I hear the news, my lord.
Stanley, Richmond is your wife's son.
Well, look unto it.
My lord, I claim the gift, my due by promise... for which your honor and your faith is pawned.
The earidom of Hereford and the movables which you have promised I shall possess.
Stanley, look to your wife.
If she convey letters to Richmond, you shall answer it.
Most mighty sovereign, you have no cause to hold my friendship doubtful.
I never was nor never will be false.
Well, go muster men.
But hear you, leave behind your son...
George Stanley.
Look your heart be firm, or else his head's assurance is but frail.
So deal with him... as I prove true to you.
What says Your Highness to my just request?
I do remember me...
Henry the Sixth did prophesy that Richmond should be king... when Richmond was a little peevish boy.
A king... perhaps.
- My lord.
- How chance the prophet could not have told me, I being by... that I should kill him?
My lord, your promise for the earidom -
Richmond.
A bard of Ireland told me once
I should not live long... after I saw Richmond.
My lord.
Aye, what's o'clock?
I am thus bold to put Your Grace in mind of what you promised me.
Well, but what's o'clock?
- Upon the stroke of 10:00.
- Then let it strike!
Why let it strike?
Because that, like a Jack, thou keep'st the stroke... betwixt thy begging and my meditation.
- Is thy name Tyrrell?
- James Tyrrell, and your most obedient subject.
- Art thou, indeed?
- Prove me, my gracious lord.
I'm not in the giving vein today.
Why, then resolve me whether you will or no.
Thou troublest me.
I'm not in the vein.
And is it thus?
Repays he my deep services with such contempt?
Made I him king for this?
Oh, let me think on Hastings... and be gone to Richmond while my fearful head is on.
Darest thou resolve... to kill... a friend of mine?
Please you, but I'd rather kill two enemies.
Why, then thou hast it.
Two deep enemies... foes to my rest and my sweet sleep's disturbers... are they that I would have thee deal upon.
Tyrrell...
I mean those bastards in the Tower.
Let me have open means to come to them... and soon I'll rid you from the fear of them.
Thou sing'st sweet music.
Hark, come hither, Tyrrell.
Go, by this token.
Rise, and lend thine ear.
There is no more but so.
Say it is done... and I will love thee... and prefer thee for it.
I will dispatch it straight.
''O, thus, ''quoth Dighton,
''lay the gentle babes. ''
''Thus, thus, ''quoth Forrest...
''girdling one another
within their alabaster innocent arms.
''Their lips were
four red roses on a stalk...
''that in their summer beauty
kissed each other.
''A book of prayers
on their pillow lay...
which once, ''quoth Forrest,
''almost changed my mind.
But, oh, the devil.!''
''We smothered...
''the most replenished
sweet work of nature...
''that from the prime creation...
e'er she framed. ''
Good Buckingham, tell Richmond this from me - that in the sty of this most bloody boar... my son George Stanley is franked up in hold.
If I revolt, off goes young George's head.
The fear of that withholds my present aid.
Commend me to my princely Richmond.
Tell him the queen hath heartily consented... he shall espouse
Elizabeth her daughter.
These letters will resolve him of my mind.
Farewell, my noble Stanley.
The son of Clarence have I pent up close... his daughter meanly have I matched in marriage... the sons of Edward sleep in Abraham's bosom... and Anne my wife hath bid this worid good night.
Now, for I know the Tudor Richmond... aims at young Elizabeth, my brother's daughter... and, by that knot, looks proudly on the crown... to her go I...
- a jolly thriving wooer.
-  My lord.!
- Good news or bad, that thou com'st in so bluntly?
Bad news, my lord.
Buckingham is fled to Richmond.
Come, muster men.
My counsel is my shield.
We must be brief when traitors brave the field.
- How now! What news?
- My gracious sovereign... on the western coast rideth a puissant navy.
To the shore throng many doubtful hollow-hearted friends... unarmed and unresolved to beat them back.
'Tis thought that Richmond is their admiral, and there they hull... expecting but the aid of Buckingham to welcome them ashore.
Some light-foot friend post to the duke of Norfolk.
Ratcliffe, thyself, or Catesby.
- Where is he?
- Here, my lord.
- Catesby, fly to the duke.
Go thou to Salisbury.
When thou comest thither-
Dull, unmindful villain, why stayest thou here, and go'st not to the duke?
First, mighty sovereign, let me know your mind, what from Your Grace I shall deliver to him.
True, good Catesby, bid him levy straight the greatest strength and power he can make... and meet me presently at Salisbury.
- I go.
- What is't Your Highness' pleasure
I shall do at Salisbury?
- What wouldst thou do there before I go?
- Your Highness told me I should post before.
My mind is changed, sir, my mind is changed. Ah, Stanley.
What's the news with you?
None good, my lord, to please you with the hearing... nor none so bad it may not well be told.
Heyday, a riddle.
Neither good nor bad.
What need'st thou run so many miles about, when thou mayst tell thy tale the nearest way?
- Once more, what news?
- Richmond is on the seas.
There let him sink, and be the seas on him!
White-livered runagate, what makes he there?
- I know not, mighty sovereign, but by guess.
- Well... as you guess?
Stirred up by Dorset,
Buckingham and the Welsh... he makes for England, there to... claim... the crown.
Is the chair empty?
Is the sword unswayed?
Is the king dead?
The empire unpossessed?
What heir of York is there alive but we?
And who is England's king but great York's heir?
- Then, tell me, what makes he upon the seas?
- Unless for that, my liege, I cannot guess.
UnIess for that he comes to be your liege, you cannot guess wherefore the WeIshman comes.
- Thou wilt revolt and fly to him, I fear.
- No, mighty liege, therefore mistrust me not.
Where is thy power, then, to beat him back?
Where be thy tenants and thy followers?
Are they not now upon the western shore, safe-conducting the rebels from their ships?
- No, my good lord, my friends are in the north.
- Cold friends to me.
What do they in the north when they should serve their sovereign in the west?
They have not been commanded, mighty sovereign!
Please it your majesty to give me leave,
I'll muster up my friends and meet Your Grace... where and what time
Your Majesty shall please.
Aye, thou wilt be gone to join with Richmond.
Forget not thy son George.
I will not trust you, sir.
My gracious sovereign... now in Devonshire, as I by friends am well advised...
Sir William Courtney and the haughty prelate,
Bishop of Exeter, his brother there... with many more confederates, are in arms!
My liege, in Kent the Guildfords are in arms... and every hour more confederates flock to their aid, and still their power increaseth.
Sir Thomas Urswick and Lord Marquess Dorset,
'tis said, my liege, are up in arms!
- My lord, the army of great Buckingham -
- Out on you, owls!
Nothing but songs of death! There, take thou that till thou bring better news!
Your Grace mistakes.
The news I bring is good.
My news is that through sudden flood and fall of water... the duke of Buckingham's army is dispersed and scattered... and he himself wandered away alone, no man knows whither.
I cry you mercy that I did mistake.
Hath any well-advised friend proclaimed... reward to him that brings in Buckingham?
- Such proclamation hath been made, my liege.
-  My liege.!
The duke of Buckingham is taken!
Off with his head.
So much for Buckingham.
That is the best news.
That Henry Tudor, earl of Richmond, is with a mighty power landed at Milford... is colder tidings, yet they must be told.
Away towards Salisbury!
While we reason here, a royal battle might be won and lost.
Ratcliffe, take order Buckingham be brought to Salisbury. The rest march on with me!
Then fiery expedition be my wing...
Jove's Mercury and herald for a king!
Here... pitch our tents... even here... in Bosworth field.
Why, how now, Catesby?
Why look you so sad?
My heart is 10 times lighter than my looks.
- My lord of Norfolk?
- Here, most gracious liege.
Norfolk, we must have knocks.
Ha! Must we not?
We must both give and take, my gracious lord.
Up with my tent.
Here will I lie tonight.
But where tomorrow?
Well, all's one for that.
Who hath descried the number of the foe?
Six or seven thousand is their greatest number.
Why, our battalion trebles that account.
Besides, the king's name is a tower of strength... which they upon the adverse faction want.
Up with my tent. There!
Come hither, Lovel.
Where is Lord Stanley quartered, dost thou know?
Unless I have mista'en his colors much, his regiment lies half a mile at least... to northward of our power, milord.
Send to him, good Lovel.
Bid him bring his power before sunrising... lest his son George fall into the blind cave of eternal night.
Come, valiant gentlemen... let us survey the vantage of the ground.
Let's want no discipline, make no delay... for, sirs, tomorrow is a busy day.
My lord of Stanley, the king doth strain a charge... that if you value your son George's life... you do present your host before the crowing of the cock.
Fortune and victory sit on thy helm.
All comfort that the dark hour can afford be to thy person... noble stepfather.
Tell me, how fares our loving mother?
I, by attorney, bless thee from thy mother... who prays continually for Richmond's good.
So much for that.
The silent hours steal on.
In brief, for so the season bids us be... prepare thy battle early in the morning.
I, as I may, with best advantage will deceive the time... and aid thee in this doubtful shock of arms.
But on thy side
I may not be too forward... lest, being seen, thy brother, tender George... be executed in his father's sight.
Farewell.
The leisure and the fearful time cuts off the ceremonious vows of love... which so long sundered friends should dwell upon.
God grant us leisure for these rites of love.
Once more, adieu.
Be valiant and speed well.
Good lords, conduct him to his regiment.
What is't o'clock?
'Tis suppertime, my lord.
'Tis nine o'clock.
Hmm. I will not sup tonight.
Give me some ink and paper.
What, is my helmet easier than it was... and all my armor laid into my tent?
It is, my liege, and all things are in readiness.
Good Norfolk, hie thee to thy charge.
Choose careful watch, use trusty sentinels.
I go, my lord.
- Good night, good Lovel.
- Milord.
Stir with the lark tomorrow, gentle Norfolk.
I warrant you, my lord.
- Catesby.
- My lord?
Fill me a bowl of wine.
Give me a watch.
Saddle white Surrey for the field tomorrow.
Look that my staves be sound, but not too heavy.
Oh, Ratcliffe.
- My lord?
- Saw you the melancholy Lord Northumberland?
Thomas the earl of Suffolk, and himself, much about cockshut time... from troop to troop went through the army, cheering up the soldiers.
So, I'm satisfied.
Give me a bowl of wine.
I have not that alacrity of spirit... nor cheer of mind, that I was wont to have.
Set it down.
Is ink and paper ready?
- It is, my lord.
- Bid my guard watch. Leave me.
- Ratcliffe.
- My lord?
About the mid of night come to my tent... and help to arm me.
Leave me, I say.
Once more good night unto you all.
I'll strive, with troubled thoughts, to take a nap... lest leaden slumber weigh me down tomorrow... when I should mount with wings of victory.
And so, once more, good night, kind lords and gentlemen.
- Good night, good Richmond.
- Good night.
O thou, whose captain I account myself... look on my forces with a gracious eye.
Put in their hands thy bruising irons of wrath... that we may crush down with a heavy fall... the usurping helmet of our adversaries.
Make us thy ministers of chastisement... that we may praise thee in thy victory.
To thee I do commend my watchful soul... ere I let fall the windows of mine eyes.
Sleeping and waking... oh, defend me still.
Let me sit heavy in thy soul tomorrow.
I that was washed to death with fulsome wine... poor Clarence... by thy guile betrayed to death.
Tomorrow in the battle think on me... and fall thy edgeless sword.
Despair and die!
Dream on thy cousins smothered in the Tower.
Thy nephews'souls
bid thee despair and die.
Think on Lord Hastings.
Despair and die.
Richard, thy wife... that wretched Anne thy wife... that never slept a quiet hour with thee... now fills thy sleep with perturbations.
Tomorrow in the battle think on me... and fall thy edgeless sword.
Despair and die.
Give me another horse!
Bind up my wounds!
Have mercy,jesu.!
My lord.
Who is there?
Ratcliffe, my lord. 'Tis I.
The early village cock hath twice done salutation to the morn.
Your friends are up and buckle on their armor.
O Ratcliffe,
I have dreamed a fearful dream.
What thinkest thou, will our friends prove all true?
No doubt, my lord.
O Ratcliffe, I fear.
I fear.
Nay, good my lord, be not afraid of shadows.
By the apostle Paul, shadows tonight... have struck more terror to the soul of Richard... than can the substance of 10,000 soldiers... armed in proof and led by shallow Richmond.
Tell the clock there.
Give me a calendar.
- Who saw the sun today?
- Not I, my lord.
Then he disdains to shine... for by the book he should have braved the east an hour ago.
A black day will it be... to somebody.
- Catesby.
- My lord.
The sun will not be seen today.
The sky doth frown and lower upon our army.
I would these dewy tears were from the ground.
Not shine today?
Why, what is that to me more than to Richmond?
For the selfsame heaven that frowns on me... looks sadly upon him.
Arm, arm, my lord!
The foe vaunts in the field.
Come, bustle, bustle.
Caparison my horse.
Call up Lord Stanley, bid him bring his power.
I will lead forth my soldiers to the field... and thus my battle shall be ordered.
My foreward shall be drawn out all in length... consisting equally of horse and foot.
Our archers shall be placed in the midst.
John Duke of Norfolk and Thomas Earl of Suffolk...
shall have the leading
of this foot and horse.
They thus directed,
we will follow in the main battle...
whose puissance on either side
shall be well winged with our chiefest horse.
This, and Saint George to boot!
What think'st thou, Norfolk?
A good direction, warlike sovereign.
This found I on my tent this morning.
''Jockey of Norfolk...
''be not so bold...
''for Dickon thy master...
''is bought... and sold.''
A thing devised by the enemy.
My lord, the enemy are past the marsh.
Go, noble gentleman, every man to his charge.
Let not our babbling dreams affright our souls... for conscience is a word that cowards use... devised at first to keep the strong in awe.
- Conscience avaunt!
- Aye!
Richard's himself again.
March on!
Join bravely, let us to it pell-mell.
If not to heaven, then hand in hand to hell.
Fight, gentlemen of England!
Fight, bold yeomen!
Draw, archers, draw your arrows to the head!
Spur your proud horses hard... and ride in blood!
Amaze the welkin with your broken staves!
What says Lord Stanley?
Will he bring his power?
- My lord, he doth deny to come.
- Off with his son George's head!
My lord, the time admits not such a course!
After the battle let George Stanley die.
A thousand hearts are great within my bosom.
Advance our standards... set upon our foes.
Our ancient word of courage, fair Saint George... inspire us with the spleen of fiery dragons!
Upon them!
Victory sits in our helms!
Rescue!
Rescue!
My lord of Norfolk, rescue!
The king enacts more wonders than a man, daring an opposite to every danger.
His horse is slain, and all on foot he fights... seeking for Richmond in the throat of death.
Rescue, fair lord, or else the day is lost.
A horse.!
A horse!
My kingdom for a horse!
Withdraw, my lord.
I'll help you to a horse.
Slave, I have set my life upon a cast... and I will stand the hazard of the die.
I think there be six Richmonds in the field.
Five have I slain today instead of him.
A horse!
A horse.!
My kingdom for a horse.!
The International Union
Miners ...
... and Workers
Metal presents:
SALT OF THE EARTH
The scene is
New Mexico, ...
... the land of the
Free US ...
... which inspired this film ...
... and the home of the brave they performed ...
... most of the papers.
How to start a story ...
... which has no beginning?
My grandfather raised cattle in these streams ...
... before they got
Anglos. our roots are deep here ...
... deeper than the pines ...
... or mine.
This is my town.
When I was small, was called San Marcos.
Anglos put him
Zinctown.
Zinctown, New Mexico, ...
... United States.
This is our home.
The house is not ours ...
... but flowers yes they are.
My name
Esperanza Quintero.
I am the wife of a miner.
My husband has spent
18 years at this mine.
Half life in darkness, with dynamite.
The land where
Mine is ...
... Grandpa belonged my husband.
Now belongs to the Company.
Who can say when my story began?
Yo no lo sé.
But I remember that day as the beginning of the end.
It was the day of my holy.
Moreover, met 35 years ...
... a day of celebration.
She was pregnant
7 months of my third child.
I remember that day
I made a wish.
It was a sin, one evil.
I prayed to the Virgin to ask forgiveness for my thoughts.
I wanted ...
... my son did not come ...
... to this world.
Are you ill, mother?
Are you sad?
Are we going to church to confess?
Later, when end boards.
Did you come back to fight with Anglo children?
- They think very hard.
- Promised not to fight anymore.
Dad says do not let make fun of me.
Ignore him.
¡Be still!
Does it hurt?
- And that cake?
- Forget the cake.
Go find your father
When your turn ends.
Tell him to come home directly.
I have been told that you had problems with a detonator.
You're alive, what is the problem?
Ya know, this new standard to work alone.
Let's see the supervisor.
It is negotiating with your committee.
- All the better.
- Wait.
He dictated that standard,
It will not help.
Well, I'll stop boring.
With your contract?
Have someone read it to you.
He said nothing of helpers.
This mine is bloodstained.
The blood of my friends working alone
They were crushed because anyone watched the detonator.
Nobody sounded alarm.
That is the task shift foreman.
He wants to extract mineral.
We want everyone out alive.
You will work only.
If you work overflows,
I'll find another.
To a squirrel?
At an American.
Do not say anything on the cake.
Will strike?
I do not want to worry, but in the shop told me ...
... that if we do not pay another within the radio, ...
... will they take.
Only owe a month.
I tried to convince them.
That's not right.
Is not it good?
And is it OK to buy this artifact?
But you wanted.
You had to listen radio.
I hear at night ...
... when you are you in the bar.
"No entry in easy installments. "
Diré you something:
Deadlines are the curse of workers.
- Where are you going?
- A talk with peers.
The water is cold again.
- Sorry, the fire was extinguished.
- Forget it.
They forget!
Short firewood five times day, I can not forget.
Do not forget that miners
Anglos have running water ...
... and toilets at home.
Do you think I like live like this?
What can I do?
... ask for better conditions ...
... would have to demand decent plumbing.
We did, but we to resign.
- What?
- All at once can not be.
Now we requirements most important.
What's most important that healing?
Safety at work is more important.
This week has been five accidents ...
... to increase production.
You are a woman and do not know anything in the world.
First we have to get equality at work.
Then we will the rest.
- That's a guy thing.
- I understand.
Men do strike by your demands ...
... but you leave for later what we women.
Do not start again to criticize the union.
What have you done for me your union?
Remember what it was like before the union, ...
... when Estela sick and we could pay the doctor?
We founded the union for our families.
Okay, you will have your strike.
I'll have my son.
The hospital will not admit me being the wife of a striker.
Store fail to rely and children will go hungry.
We can not pay deadlines ...
... and the radio will be.
What all you care is this radio?
Just think of yourself.
I do ...
... because you never think of me.
Never.
Basta!
We are seeing children.
Be resolved the problem.
The company always says the same.
For a miner, is dangerous work alone.
Nobody works alone in other mines.
Anglos work in pairs.
And I have to risk life because I'm Mexican?
- We have already asked.
- We are negotiating.
We have not achieved anything in three months of negotiations.
Even with the help of
Barnes, International.
Ni increases, nor old ...
... nor safety.
Have a drink.
We must act now.
Do others think like you?
Speak for everyone.
What if employers want to strike?
Do not want, and less contract with the Army. then
Why refuse?
They have agreed with other sections of the union.
But here most
We are Mexicans.
We want equality with
Anglo miners.
The same pay, the same conditions.
Exactly, but employers do not want this equality.
His only argument against the Anglo sections is:
"We give more than the Mexicans ".
So what? discrimination
Anglo hurts ...
... but me.
And I'm sick.
If you declare strike when they want, ...
... will crush the union.
Wait till you can win.
Employers do not expect.
No running water, my children sick.
The doctor did not expect.
Cobra cash.
We must within the radio.
The store does not hold:
"Pay or we get along."
Why such a hurry
Shop employers?
They want to scare us so that we do not protest.
Want us to conform with what we have.
But I am not satisfied,
I'm not afraid.
I'm sick.
What are you doing here?
- Is something wrong with your mother?
- Have you forgotten?
- Forget what?
- Today is the holy mother.
He's a great guy,
It is in everything.
Today is the holy my wife.
I would like to ask you viniérais to haunt.
- At this hour?
- The later the better.
Why sing?
Sing to me.
Can we turn candles?
We can now turn them on.
Happy Birthday!
He never wanted to mourn.
Why do I cry, if I'm happy?
I'm an idiot.
No, you're not.
Was very expensive beer?
I invited Antonio.
Forgive me for saying ever think of me.
I'd forgotten.
Luis reminded me.
I spent a week thinking that round
Never had such a nice holiday
It was a song that filled my being ... and mitigated the harshness of everyday work
One, two three. forget all our problems ...
... even Ramón
That night I could not dance ...
... because of my state ...
... but I was jealous when he danced with the other
It was wonderful to see you smile again one morning, was hanging laundry
We were chatting when they arrived ladies.
Formed a kind of delegation
They spoke of health facilities
Anglo miners had sinks with hot water
Why not us?
I know, talk about it
Ramon
... just a week ago
He says the union it has removed from their demands
We need to raise awareness men about this.
Teach the banner
"We want health, non-discrimination. "
We and many more take you to the mine
While it is trading at the office ...
Arrive in groups to take the site
Both parties see that we mean
- A squad of Women?
- Why not? count me in
We should form a union of woodcutters
We cut wood for breakfast, to wash their clothes ...
... for washing for laundry, to make dinner ...
... and when you come home night, says:
Have you spent the day reading comics?
Come on, Esperanza we have to
I can not.
If Ramon found out of
I'm in a pinch ...
Do you fitting?
It is Mr. Kalinski
Hurry.
Carefully.
I want to see!
- I want to see him now!
- He'll be fine, Mrs. Kalinski.!
I want to see him now!
How did this happen?
He entered the gallery they were dynamiting
I warned, this occurs because we work alone.
- Why did not they tell you?
- I had to do the foreman
When I looked there was no
It would be sleeping.
Not come down to the well, Kalinski
I saw you at the office
Pancho lie.
You're a dirty ...
Enough!
Do not lose control.
There is a wounded man.
I'm sorry too, you know?
Accidents hurt us all
But the company
No reason to stand like party
Back to work.
The party is over, all to work.
What do they say?
Not "know".
Barnes, tell your men back to work
No work for me,
I work for them.
Luis.
What you decide, comrades?
"We want health, non-discrimination. "
That night, there was a union meeting ...
... to give official appearance
Did not take long.
The strike was approved by 93 votes to 5.
Teresa said it was the time to introduce.
I did not want.
Never been in a union meeting.
But others said:
"If you are one, we all."
When we arrived, the meeting
I was about to end
Charlie Vidal outlined the situation.
Said the strike had one goal.
Equality.
But employers do anything ...
... to avoid them to get equality.
Try to divide workers ...
... between Anglos and Mexican-Americans.
Who sold it to his brother would be rewarded.
Women ye make a statement ...
It is not a statement
- Women want ...
- Higher!
Consuelo, speaking from the podium
Women have spoken sanitary facilities.
If you want to achieve equality ...
... as you say, ...
... you should ask the same equality ...
... sanitary facilities
Reivindicadlo also the strike.
We have also thought ...
... we could create a female auxiliary section.
We want to help in any way possible.
I think I speak on behalf of my colleagues ...
... to thank the women offering us their help, ... but it's late and I suggest postponing the issue.
The board will accept a motion to adjourn.
- I presented it.
- The seconded.
Who is in favor?
Who is against?
Approved.
You need to plan
Why did not you defended?
You are worse than others.
Teresa, can not be forced
Therefore the situation.
Ye you force us to accept unfair conditions.
Why not consult me?
It was embarrassing!
At least you did not ridicule as Consuelo.
It's not a bad idea; should demand better health.
- But honey ...!
- Put a notice on the door ...
"No dogs allowed or women. "
"We want equality with other miners. "
"We are guided by the union."
"Less talk and more money."
So it all started, and other strikes.
The company said not negotiate ...
... until the workers back to work.
But the ploy will not work for them.
They hired strikebreakers of other peoples.
But his mind was cooled ...
... when they saw the size of the picket.
The sheriff and his men
They were always there ...
... wearing their weapons.
But men just marched ...
... day after day ...
... week after week.
At first, women we stayed at home.
The union brought food
We tried and we ...
... feed our families.
One morning mrs. Salazar
He went to the picket line.
Her husband had died in a strike for many years.
She wanted to be there.
No one remembers how it happened.
One day Mrs. Salazar he joined the march.
And it was not separated from them.
Several women began bring coffee to their husbands ...
... and tacos, because
Men have just ...
... tired and hungry acting on picket.
It was then that the union decided ...
... that should be set a female auxiliary section.
At first I did not go with them.
Soon give birth.
In addition to Ramón did not like.
But Ramon loves good coffee ...
... and swore that of other women appeared ...
... dregs of zinc.
So, one day I made the coffee.
"They did not move."
"Solidarity with the miners."
Three days ago I do not see him
Ramon, listen to this.
The foreman gave me last night me shift manager ...
... if I am the first returning to work.
"Jenkins, why are you doing
For these Reds?
I replied that the Reds
I like every day.
Two scabs managed to pass
- We stopped to rest.
- Les ye searched?
They were Anglos other peoples
But they were not miners, they would not know the zinc.
Good job.
Go to tomer coffee.
Ramon comes the supervisor.
- Good Morning
- How is here?
We picked up the types to you. hired ...
... and we came in trucks this morning.
When they saw the picket they turned
Not seem so scary.
Mr. Hartwell, some
They are brave men.
Especially the leader the picket line.
How is it called?
Raymon, or something.
Yes, I know him.
This is the main picket.
They have another on secondary road ...
... and patrol the area.
The land is in the company.
Why not throw them?
Everything is of the company,
Mr. Hartwell.
The shop houses ...
... everything.
Where would miss them?
And who would?
Do we let go?
Sooner or later.
Just want to impress with his power.
Why do not you let go these gentlemen?
Do you know who will in that car?
The cashier brings us
Moscow gold.
No, it's the president of the company.
Comes to appoint Jenkins
Managing Director
Come on, let him go.
How childish!
They are like children
Sometimes you have to pamper them,
... other must scold
... and others have to punish them without eating.
Here comes my saying.
It is quite a character.
He claims that his grandfather owned land mine.
Want to go to your office
Mr. Alexander?
Sure, I have not stopped for coffee.
To that we can invite.
No thanks.
Men want to know who is this gentleman.
- It is not his business
- Leave it, it's not a secret.
My name is Hartwell, work in the offices of this.
- In Delaware?
- No, in New York.
By any chance are you the president of the company?
- no
- What a shame.
The man always wanted see President
He could resolve the strike.
Is that possible?
Yes, negotiating.
Is a union spokesperson?
Not exactly.
I wish it were.
Know more of mines puppets with whom we associate.
Seriously, I've seen your personal record.
I was going to promote you to foreman when the strike began.
You had future in the company.
You've been swept by these red ...
... but you will betray.
When awaken, Ray?
Your name is Ray, no?
Call me Quintero.
Mr. Quintero.
Are we allowed to pass or I to call the sheriff?
Nothing stops him.
I was wrong, do not want to
Jenkins CEO.
I want my!
You should have heard to that liar.
Foreman said he would appoint me.
- What's the matter?
- It's nothing just a cramp.
Dad, come here!
What makes Luis here?
Another time playing hooky?
Come back here!
We have seen two scabs
They have hidden there.
Wait, fellas.
You three, accompany me.
The others follow in line.
Luis, come back!
They go by.
Ramon, listen, for God's sake.
You!
I would have expected from an Anglo.
I needed the job.
You, Judas! leech
It was for my kids!
Do not eat enough.
Do you think mine itself?
Dirty Rat.
I know I did wrong but do not hurt me.
Do you think I'm going to hit you?
I would not mess with you hands.
There comes a child, warns women, fast!
Why are we stopping?
Tell us why agrediste that boy.
That's a lie.
Do not talk to a white.
Go back and then produce a blanket to move it.
Did not you say this torero had much stamina?
No one would say now.
The chile gives much energy.
Like as it prepares your "tiny" Pancho?
We need a doctor soon, that woman will give birth
Do you take me for the driver an ambulance?
Notify your physician of the company.
Nobody here has a car.
The company doctor will not attend
Picket anyone.
No time to take her home,
Put it in there
Raise your head Pancho, that's no way to sit.
Do not you go out with your pigs.
You like what you have searched.
OMG!
Forgive me for having desired my son was not born
Have mercy on my son.
Do not let me die.
OMG!
Ramon was in the hospital a week.
... and one month in prison ...
... charged with assault and resisting authority.
I decided to postpone christening ...
... until Ramón out from jail.
We christened the name John.
That night there was double celebration.
Christening Juanito and the return of Ramon.
Children to bed in the bedroom ...
... as always ...
... and men occupied the living room, ...
... as usual.
- Five thousand dollars.
- Too much for me.
- Ascend to ten thousand.
- I'm going, what do you have?
Three aces.
Come to Daddy.
Do bailiffs
Vicente arrested?
Yes, there have been many provocations.
Assume that locking up leaders on false charges ...
... were able to end the strike.
Do they let play poker all night?
- I want to dance?
- With the husband from whom?
With either, even with mine.
If you dance with my husband, will have to endure this.
Your attitude toward Anglos
It is unbecoming of a leader.
What attitude?
Do you distinguish between workers and Anglo employers
To him I invited him to my house
Is not it?
Do you also suspect him? perhaps
Has much to learn on our people.
Still, say it all.
You are the organizer.
Strategy plan and you hit almost always
You think of everything we do the rest.
We do not have to think about anything.
Do you think that laziness us prevented from taking the initiative?
You know not.
Maybe not, but there is more.
Tonight on entering,
I hear you ask your wife ...
"That man is your grandfather?"
Is Juarez, Mexico's father.
If I did not recognize
George Washington ...
You'd take me for a stupid Mexican.
It never fails.
You try to advise Ramón and you respond with an insult.
He's right. I still much to learn.
Well, settled matter.
Who gives the cards?
Be comforted, even listening women less.
What do they talk?
Their weaknesses.
Did you have?
Now it criticize Ramon.
If we exclude women the union struggle ...
Come on, bet!
Let's change the game.
There are housewives,
They are our companions.
They deserve to be treated as equals.
Look who's talking.
The defender of women.
Enough, Ruth.
I follow him everywhere.
The miners organized, village after village ...
... in Montana, Colorado or Idaho ...
... but never thought in organizing women.
Women also have
Angles in sections.
Nor do I approve as
Ramón treat your woman.
Dr. Barnes has his remedy for women ...
... but have not tried at home.
It is breastfeeding her child.
Goodbye to the game.
I'm glad. Consuelo, up the volume.
Top Dad.
Standing.
Look at him!
He is a fighter.
Born fighting ...
... and hungry.
Chupa Juanito.
You'll never be so happy as now.
Yes, it will be happier ...
... someday.
What did they say to you?
I make you suffer.
Suffer if you're in jail.
In this cell
I could not sleep ...
For bugs, heat and the stench.
And he told me:
"Think of something beautiful ..
... into something beautiful. "
And I thought of you.
And I felt my heart pounding ...
... of love for you.
Not only Juanito ...
... you too will be happy.
The strike will triumph.
Why are you so sure?
If we lose, we lose more than a strike.
Lose the union and men know.
If we win, we will win more improvements.
We will win something ...
... much more: hope for our children.
Juanito need more than milk.
- Do you live here Quintero?
- What do you want?
- We come to garnish.
- What about the warrant?
- Also have.
- We do not want problems.
Just took the radio. sorry to interrupt the party ...
... but the owner of the radio has achieved a garnishment order ...
Do not touch.
We do not seek problems
Mr. Quintero.
We order repossess the equipment.
I said do not touch it!
- Let them take her
- Passing over my dead body
I do not want your corpse, or see you in jail.
It is yours and not they carry.
If you resist will an excuse to lock you up.
Gladden those faces.
We have real music!
But the strike continued.
It seemed interminable.
They spent four months, five, six ...
The company was without wanting to negotiate.
They tried to turn against
Anglo miners us.
They said I had to send the
Mexicans back to their country.
How I can back the place where it went?
The barracks where I was born is now Company
Why would anyone sends patterns his people?
Patterns so there would throughout New Mexico.
- Hopefully we will see that day.
- Jenkins is not an employer.
In his ilk
They let them stay.
You can not give the desert
Oklahoma, it would be inhuman
I was born in Texas
That would be even worse!
He reached the seventh month
The company store he refused to serve us.
Box resistance
It was exhausting
Several families could not stand it.
Nobody knows where they went.
The union decided that desperate cases ...
... should apply for a job in other mines.
This was done.
About getting employment helped with their pay ...
... for others they could eat.
Ramon was not a hopeless case.
Only had three children to feed.
Still, employers us they would have starved ...
... but we received support
International, Denver ...
... and other sections.
We thought that anyone outside the county ...
... he was interested in our problems.
We were wrong ...
"Solidarity with the miners.
Construction union. "
Letters came from our
Southeast compatriots.
From far:
Butte, Chicago,
Birmingham, New York ...
Messages of solidarity ...
... and crumpled banknotes men working.
The women were helping ...
... not only as cooks or making coffee.
Some men mocked ...
... but you had to do the job ...
... and allow us to do so.
Nobody realized the magnitude of change ...
... until the day of the crisis.
The sheriff smiled.
We learned that brought bad news.
The company had achieved a writ ...
... prohibiting mining manifest in the pickets.
It was based on the law
Taft-Hartley.
Punishable by heavy fines and a prison ... miners who disobeyed
You had to make a decision immediately
Ignoring the mandate or do not comply.
If we obey ...
... the strike will fail
The scabs come as the needle was going
If we disobey ...
... the strikers will be arrested
... and the strike will fail anyway.
So things are peers.
Employers are we at their mercy.
I want to add something.
Whatever your decision ...
... I support the International ...
... as it always has.
We are a union democratic.
The decision ...
... is yours.
Comrade President.
If we surrender now ...
... and to the odedecemos
Taft-Hartley rotten ...
... we are fools and cowards.
We can only do one thing to fight.
- To fight and win.
- There would win anything.
We would be detained
The men discussed.
There were great speeches.
Apparently Barnes was right.
The company had them at their mercy.
Apparently the strike had failed.
Companion president.
If you read the injunction carefully ...
... you will see that only prohibits manifest miners. women
We are not miners.
We will relieve you on the picket lines.
Do not scoff.
We have a solution and you do not.
Quintero is right saying that lose ..
... the achievements of 50 years fight if the strike fails. also lose women and children.
So we promise ...
... relieve you on the picket ...
... to strike not fail ...
... and scabs
I do not take the job.
Only union members may submit proposals.
- I present.
- The seconded.
You heard the proposal.
Start the discussion
Light asked whether they preferred hide behind their wives ...
... or humble themselves before employers.
Comrades, we ignore our women.
Employers or even think about them.
They will show employers what now ...
... why there is no unity among men ...
... their wives and her companions?
Carlota Sanchez said the pickets ...
... were unfit the ladies.
It was not right.
Perhaps even it were sin.
Give an opportunity to the women.
What do when police ...
... hit our women?
We will not stay idly.
We will have to intervene and back to the top
Or worse, more humiliated.
Companions.
I beg you,
You do not permitáis.
Let's vote.
Discussed the issue. we all know we voted:
The female section will be responsible for the pickets
Raise your hand if they favor.
President, I appeal to regulation.
I do not understand these discussions ...
... but the men you go to vote ...
... what to do or not women.
I think it would be fair ...
... that we allowed to vote.
Especially if we to do the job.
Comrades, would go against all rules ...
... allow women vote in a union meeting.
If no objections ...
... postpone the meeting.
Wait.
We can continue as assembly of citizens.
So we all adults entitled to vote.
- I propose
- OK.
Hands up who want to postpone the meeting.
Who is against?
Approved.
Now all adults entitled to vote.
Returning to the original topic
Those in favor of women formed picket ...
... to raise their hands.
Who is opposed?
Approved the motion by 103 votes to 85.
Then came the women.
From Zinctown,
Hills ...
... and other mining towns ...
... traveling up to 45 km.
The we had never seen before.
They had no connection with the strike.
They had heard of women pickets ...
... and going.
The men came too.
I think feared ...
... women not abide.
Or perhaps feared that we did so.
But not all women joined the pickets. some husbands they banned it.
I was a them.
It's unfair, I would to be with them.
It was I who asked they could vote.
The union does not send in my house.
Those Anglo motivate you and you do get ridiculous.
- I do not see them in line.
- Yo si. I see Ruth Barnes
The woman organizer?
Is your duty to be there! no
It's there because he wants
I also see Mrs. Kalinski
And Jenkins? his wife is not on the picket
There are also late Anglo husbands
- What did you say?
- Late
Can I download to animate?
- How small?
- He likes to wander.
This will throw the air ...
Do you wish to see my gun, girls?
Shut up!
Would you disobey fun an injunction?
I'm not so sure that violate the law.
The injunctive only mentions miners
Which side are you on? calm down, will rush as chickens
Here we go, before
100 women come more
Forward guys.
- Use gas?
- It will not be necessary.
Back, do not intervengáis
Han run over my wife!
Do not give them excuses to shoot.
You will go to jail
Back!
- Stand back
- Do not be involucréis
Do not stay still.
Do something!
Calm down.
If we do not intervene, there will be victims.
Do not get it wrong
Besides, you already have hands full.
Let's go!
Now they go, gather the banners.
It protects the union
We will not move!
It protects the union
We will not move!
Continue as a tree, firm riverside.
They do not move!
- I'm hungry.
- Me too.
- And your mother?
- It was a meeting.
Did you see how he took gun to the sheriff?
I never want to see you there.
- Are you okay?
- Sure.
Was it an unforgettable experience, right?
- I hope it does not recur.
- I Will go tomorrow.
- Could hurt you.
- It is possible.
If you think I'm going to deal
I child, you're crazy
Wear all day caring for them.
I will care for born.
Tomorrow I will not stay with them.
So tomorrow ...
... come with me to picket.
I returned the next day ...
... and every day for one month.
Juanito remained in the gatehouse.
If you did good day and no disturbances ...
... pulled the cradle
Outdoor.
Estela playing with small ...
... and Luis was ...
... at school.
Ramon came every day to observe.
Women ...
... Ramón criticized by not stay with the children.
The sheriff left us in peace for a while ...
... but his men insulted us.
We said terrible things.
And he began again.
They returned to using gases harnessing the wind. we disperse as planned.
I put the little one safe as planned.
They failed to break our ranks.
They could not break
We have tried everything less fusilarlas.
Have you tried locking them?
Do you want the stop all?
No, only the organizers ...
... which stand out and those with many children.
Where is the boy?
Hey you! Come over.
Well, girls
You can choose ...
... among returning home or go to jail.
No buts.
Dissolve the picket or you will be arrested.
Okay ... What?
This is the ringleader,
Teresa Aguilar.
Under arrest.
Do you prefer your home or dungeon?
Follow-up displayed based discipline
There will resist authority.
Follow-up
The Ms. Salazar, old.
Chana Diaz, the blue dress.
Luz Morales, that.
Ms. Kalinski, Anglo.
Ruth Barnes, women
Organizer.
And Ana Alvarez, the beauty.
And former.
- Does the child?
- Is the wife of Quintero.
He does not want to come
- Leave Juanito.
- Do not worry about it.
- Also take care to Estella.
- No, the child comes to me
Solidarity Forever.
Solidarity Forever.
Solidarity Forever.
The union makes us stronger
Solidarity Forever.
Solidarity Forever.
Solidarity Forever .;
The union makes us stronger
Be quiet!
I told you ten times.
We have no food.
We have beds.
Baths have not.
So, please ...
... Shut
You can not take this milk, you feel bad.
Not infant formula.
I should bring.
Do not worry.
Will succeed.
The child can not romar that milk, we want the formula.
- What do you want?
- Formula.
We want the formula.
We want the formula.
"Office of the Prosecutor the district. "
Get to commit to leave the pickets.
Or set a high bail for them to stay in jail.
I can not keep of my own pocket.
Mr. Hartwell,
I wonder ...
... how long this will last.
You. Not want to negotiate ...
What do you want?
The company has other mines.
You have to see the whole picture.
If they get their way ...
What are you doing here?
Are not you sick of me?
I come to my children.
They are in their cells.
And has taken all their triumphs.
Not all.
For example?
Profit not silence them.
Say something of a formula.
A special compound for the small.
It is his son.
Hush, hush!
I have given milk for the child.
What comes fuss?
This milk is useless.
The child needs formula.
If you sick. It will responsible.
This is not a pharmacy.
Guilt is only yours.
In one hour you would be with your families.
You just have to sign express to the waiver.
We will not sign anything, stinky!
We want the formula!
We want the formula!
Where is that guy?
Come here, Pancho.
Where is the child?
And the girl?
Kids, get out of those baskets!
Three hours to heat water just for laundry.
I assure you ...
... although the strike succeed, which I doubt ...
... I will not return to work if you do not put hot water.
The union had
I have demanded before.
Who do you tell?
Charlie according Vidal, there
Two types of slavery:
The wage, and housewife.
It is the problem of womanhood.
What problem?
The problem of what do about it.
What does he do?
He says they deserve equality at work ...
... equality at home and also ...
... gender equality.
What does it mean
"gender equality"?
You know.
Charlie is a real organizer.
Oraganiza women and disrupts their homes.
Can I go? no meeting of the youth section.
We can help in many ways.
You only get you send to a reformatory.
- All help is easy.
- You'd have to help at home.
Mom did not make me drying dishes.
You should help without being asked.
- How are you?
- I'm fine
How did you sleep these four nights?
We set the fuss we brought bunks.
I almost ran hoarse.
And Estela? And the little one? are sleeping
¿Firmásteis waiver continue with picket? never we would have done.
If you continue,
They lock you again.
They are not, fed of us.
The locos were returning.
The group of Consuelo morning will rest.
- We the relieve you.
- Well, let's plan it.
We need to talk.
Later, now we have a meeting.
We must organize the picket tomorrow.
If you want, you can attend.
Let's see.
Who is available?
Chana's husband was to the governor. many men they go hunting tomorrow.
They will be about forty, their women can not come.
We will ask you care of children.
What we do with his attitude?
Still have not learned
The lesson? our DELEGATION
I could talk to him.
This I have
I solve it alone.
I know someone who works in the Ministry of Mines.
You know that saying?
That never again to exploit this mine.
Is it possible?
He says the mineral is exhausted.
All this is nonsense.
That mine is rich,
I know.
But that does not matter, ever want to negotiate.
Look at this!
Him!
- President of the company.
- Let me see.
Hear this
"Mr. Hamilton Miller distinguished gentleman ...
... it's banker, businessman, director of Continental ...
... and president of
Delaware Zinc Inc. "
- Let me see.
- Wait, there's more.
"Amateur sport and experienced hunter ...
... Mr. Miller finds time for every year ...
... a safari in Africa.
Party this month heading to Kenya ...
... where he hopes hunt his thirteenth lion. "
I frame it,
Ramón look.
Must see complete picture.
So that will hunt lions.
Did you expect out hunting rabbits?
Guys, would like to get some deer.
For weeks
I tasted the meat.
What do you think of disappearing for a couple of days?
Do not ask me
I do not direct this strike.
If you want permission to take the field ...
To ask Him female section
I waited lifted until midnight.
Do not expect me.
The meeting lasted just 10 minutes.
My first night at home ...
... and you go to the brewery.
What's up?
Do not endure this aspect of me?
Shut up!
You wanted to talk.
Speaks.
Speaks.
We can not continue.
I can not go on living thus you.
True, we can not go on ...
... or we can return our old life.
And what is your new life?
Do you think that entitles you to neglect your children?
- Where are you going?
- A hunting.
- When?
- At dawn.
- Only?
- Do Not.
You can not leave.
Why?
I am not required.
You are.
And especially now, with so many men absent.
You're the captain of the squad booking.
Yes, we reserve for the funeral.
What funeral?
We were not doing too badly.
We have not seen scabs three days.
Because the company knows which can starve us
Even if it takes other two or three months.
For them it means nothing
The mine is still closed.
It means a lot, would do anything to reopen.
They have other mines.
Do not see the whole picture.
They are millionaires.
They can outlast us and they know it.
Are you willing to give up?
Who speaks of surrender?
I do not humiliate to return to the company.
You want to lose with honor,
Is that it?
For I would not lose.
I want to win.
We are not weakening.
We are stronger than ever.
They are weakened.
They wanted to destroy our pickets and could not.
To win, you have to do something big surprise
Like what?
I do not know.
But I feel it in the air.
It is the calm prece the storm.
Charlie Vidal says ...
Vidal Charlie Fuck!
Do not give me now
Charlie Vidal.
He is my friend.
I need friends.
Why are you afraid to accept me as a friend?
I do not know what you mean.
True, you do not.
Have you not learned none of this strike?
Why do you fear I fight by your side?
Do you still think you can have dignity if I do not?
You speak of dignity after what you've done?
Yes, I speak of dignity.
Employers despise you and that's why you hate.
You say "stay on your site
Mexican dirty. "
Why do I say to myself
I fall on my site?
Do you feel better if someone inferior to you?
Calla, say nonsense.
Who do I have to tread to feel superior?
And what good will that do?
Do not want anyone you feel so inferior as me.
I want to get up and fight for all along.
Are not you shut up?
If you do not understand, you are stupid.
You can not win this strike without me.
You will not gain anything without me.
That would backtrack.
Do not ever try.
Never again.
I'm going to bed.
Sleep anywhere ...
... but not me.
They have only tested a while the lives of women ...
... And run away.
Ramon is right.
I downloaded all my bitterness ...
... And he felt hurt.
You learn so that causes suffering.
These changes come with pain.
Also for other husbands ...
... Not only for Ramon.
Are you willing to give up?
You want to lose with honor
Why is that?
For I would not lose.
I want to win.
We are not weakening.
They are weakened.
Have not you learned anything this strike?
I can feel it in the air.
It's the calm before the storm.
They wanted to destroy our pickets and they could not.
To win have to surprise and quickly.
Companions!
We should go back.
Where is Ramon?
Was hunting with the others?
Do you know where we can find?
¿Hunters?
They're deserters.
Something wrong?
Speak, Charlie.
The company has a order of eviction.
Eviction!
Where?
Eviction!
Do not worry, Quintero has gone hunting.
Vacate your home and the rest will be easy.
Let the neighbors see it to see if escarmientan.
Can we do something?
Back girls.
What's up?
They are evicting Quintero.
We are going there.
Let alone children
Come back here and finish the job.
Ignore
Continue with the rest of the furniture.
It's what we were expecting.
What do you say?
This means that waive to end the picketing.
Now we can fight together.
Women back to enter it all.
Quintero, these women obstruct justice.
Oblíguelas to behave.
I can not do anything.
You. I know, no longer obey men.
Wants to return to confine them?
Do you really want enclose?
Do not enter!
Look, the boys from the quarry.
And the crusher.
Any other ideas?
I do not decide policy.
I'll talk to New York.
I think you better ...
... Solve this.
Yet.
We did not know then we had won.
But our hearts were radiant.
Ramon said:
Thank you ...
... Colleagues.
Esperanza, thanks for your dignity.
You were right.
Together we can rise ...
... And move forward.
I knew then that we learned something we could never take away.
Something that could bequeath
Our kids.
And they, the blood of the earth they would inherit
Then, Christians, die you shall!
Go! Both of you!
Into your kingdom!
For the big fisherman.
- Prefect. Where's the prefect of the guard?
- Here, sire.
- How long till sunrise?
- Two hours, sire.
My lady.
Wait here.
Open.
- Where's Claudius?
- In his own room.
Doesn'tyour husband sleep here?
- What have you to report?
- This is very interesting, sire.
This is the report of Pontius Pilate, our governor in Jerusalem.
- The legends of a Messiah have...
- Don't waste my time with legends.
I want to know one thing.
Gallio and the lady Diana...
Why weren't they afraid to die?
Perhaps they're not dead, sire.
- Not dead?
- According to their superstition.
Their king, this Jesus, claims to have "overcome death...
...not only for himself, but for all who had faith in him".
These are his words as a spy reported them.
You mean those Christians thought they were going to live for ever?
- Ridiculous.
- Of course, but the point is they believed it.
Therefore they were not afraid.
Everyone's afraid of death.
Take you, my dear uncle.
Are you prepared to die now?
Of course you're not.
You're sweating. Your knees are shaking.
Very amusing.
Death's one inch from your heart, one little push on the dagger.
Shall I, Claudius?
If you do, sire, my knees will stop shaking...
...I will not sweat any more.
I won't be half as amusing dead as I am alive.
The question is: Are you alive?
Would you say so, Messalina?
As his wife, you're in the best position to know.
My devotion to my husband is well known, sire.
It's the talk of the Forum.
And your devotion to your emperor?
Your wife is truly beautiful, Uncle.
Except for her ears.
They're shaped like keyholes.
Who are your spies at court?
Never mind. I'll find out.
Suppose it were true. Suppose this Jesus had found the secret of eternal life.
It's only superstition, sire.
Philosophers have disproved the idea...
Philosophers! Their brains are full of mildew!
I have the power of life and death over every being in the empire.
My power is as great as any god's. True?
- True, sire.
- Then why should I have to die?
Why should I have to suffer death like any plebeian, any slave?
- Is that logical? Is it?
- No, sire.
Perhaps there was a spell.
A spell to make one immortal.
Like a god.
What have you found out about the robe?
- The robe?
- Yes. The robe.
The robe of this Jesus.
Tribune Gallio was carrying it at his trial today. Where is it?
The lady Diana gave it to a slave as she left the hall.
She said something about it being for the fisherman.
Fisherman.
Yes, that fits.
One of their leaders is called the fisherman.
You're observant, Messalina.
It may please me to reward you.
I wouldn't let her sleep alone, Uncle.
No one in this palace can be trusted.
Prefect! Prefect of the guard!
He's calling for his guards to find him the robe to bring him eternal life.
- He's mad.
- No.
Quite logical, when you consider that most of the emperors go more or less mad.
Every emperor stakes his life on the loyalty of the Praetorian Guards.
So if they can keep him alive at all, why not for ever?
He nearly killed you.
Men do not kill what they despise.
Only what they fear.
Why don'tyou send for a slave to do that?
Or do you enjoy being on your knees?
With a tyrant, it's better to live on your knees than stand erect and be killed.
And you have the blood of the Caesars in you.
Rome was full of heroes once.
They're all dead...
...and their wives are widows.
Our friends, Marcellus and Diana, are with Him.
Let us not mourn them.
Let us rather envy them...
...that they could go joyfully and with pride in the service of their belief.
Jesus spoke to us of death...
...the night he faced his own.
The night they took him before Pilate.
It was our last supper together.
After we had risen from the table, he washed our feet...
...and then he spoke.
He told us that in his Father's house are many mansions...
...that he went to prepare a place for us there.
"That where I am," he said,
"there you may be also."
Our friends are in our Father's house.
Some day we'll all walkthat same road...
...and at its end we'll find them.
Find our master...
...and his everlasting love.
- Amen.
- Amen.
I know whatyou say is true, Peter.
But it's still in my mind that only yesterday they were warm with life.
Young, breathing...
...laughing.
- Now it's...
- They never doubted.
I'm sorry, Peter...
...but I loved them so much.
Even Jesus himself on the cross thought he was forsaken.
I remember.
Only you, of all of us here, have that memory.
You saw him on his cross.
But we all saw desolation give way to joy, death to life.
Friends, while I'm away in the north...
...Demetrius will be my eyes, my ears, my voice.
Come to him with your problems as you would come to me.
This was our master's robe.
He wore it when he healed the sick.
He wore it when he comforted the sorrowing.
He wore it when he spoke to the multitudes as no man has ever spoken.
He wore it when he went to the cross to die for us.
Keep it for me.
Keep it.
You saved it for us.
- God be with you all.
- God be with you, Peter.
Good morning, Demetrius.
- You never make a mistake, do you, Kaeso?
- I'd know your step anywhere.
- Peter's safely on the road.
- Good.
- Have you had your breakfast?
- No.
Lucia will get it for you. Lucia!
Lucia!
- Where is that girl?
- Coming.
- Demetrius has had no food.
- It's ready.
Here's your breakfast. I saved you some apricots. I know you like them.
- I hid them for you.
- Thank you.
If there was only one apricot left in the world, she'd give it to you.
Peter gave me our master's robe to keep for him.
- May I?
- Of course.
I never thought of Jesus as being so tall.
- Was he as tall as you, Demetrius?
- Just about the same.
You'd think his robe would be made of silk and gold.
He was a carpenter.
All his life he'd worked with his hands.
- Like us.
- Just like us.
By order of the emperor,
I am authorised to pay 20 pieces of gold...
...for information concerning the robe...
...which once belonged to the criminal called Jesus...
...crucified for sedition in Jerusalem.
Well? 20 pieces of gold.
The penalty for concealment is death!
Start the search.
Anyone here know of this robe?
It's said to be of homespun, red in colour.
Are you slave or free here?
I am a born freeman.
All the others have been freed.
Christians?
I'll have a look around.
Get backto your work.
You! Come back here!
Why did you run? Why did you...?
Demetrius of Corinth. Assaulting a decurion of the Praetorian Guard...
...in the execution of his duties.
- Is the decurion here?
- Here, sir.
The evidence seems impressive.
Are you slave or free?
Free, sir.
Mark of a slave, sir.
I was a slave, but my master freed me, sir.
A slave may be freed by emancipation before a praetor, inscription in the censor's record...
...testament on death of master or declaration before witnesses.
- Can you provide proof of any of these?
- No, sir.
- Were you bought or born to the house?
- Bought, sir.
Where is your master?
- Dead.
- A Greek can invent a better story than that.
Flavius. Do you think he'd make a gladiator?
Look at the decurion's face!
Sentenced to be trained for the arena.
- Where is the master?
- Strabo!
- More prisoners.
- Open up.
You prisoners are lucky to be sentenced to train as gladiators in the Claudian school...
...rather than to one of the imperial schools.
This is the best. We have the best trainers, the best physicians...
...to watch over your skins, your health, your food.
We'll feed you well and dress you well.
You'll have meat at every meal.
Gladiators trained in this school are sought after for the most important festival games...
...and also for the emperor's private enclosure.
That's because we have an iron motto:
"We live well, we die well."
Unchain them.
It may seem in being sentenced here you're being sentenced to death.
That's not necessarily true.
I, Strabo, was sentenced here as you are, but I fought well.
I won fame and a fortune, too.
And I won my freedom.
The emperor himself calls me by name.
Even the most famous of the charioteers has to give way to me.
I fought 52 times in the arena.
I killed 52 men.
Perhaps one of you will do as well.
Come.
Dardanius here is the best of netmen.
You've seen his name often where the girls have scratched it on the walls of Rome.
He likes the way we live here.
He likes to kill. He's a born butcher.
But he can have his choice of fair ladies. Tonight he will.
And so will you when you're ready for the arena.
Glycon was a king in his own country.
Now he's the king of swordsmen.
Learn to use a sword like him and you may earn your freedom...
...as he'll earn his very soon, perhaps tomorrow.
You'll train with wooden swords till you're ready for the steel.
These men here will fight tomorrow.
Half of them will live.
Half of them will die.
They know it.
Some men who are sent here don't seem to like it.
They'd rather live badly than die well, so they try to escape.
Like this one.
All his training was wasted.
He dies badly like a common criminal.
Try to escape and this is your reward.
Strabo, Claudius is arriving.
Line up the men who fight tomorrow.
You're luckier than most recruits. On your first day you'll see the owner of the school.
Come.
My lord Claudius.
My lady.
So these are the men, eh?
I hope you drew up a better list than last time.
They know it's for a special occasion, my lord.
Oh. Probus.
Dardanius.
Barak. Good.
Tomorrow is the emperor's birthday.
You men will have the honour of competing in the palace itself...
...in the emperor's private arena.
I expectyou to make a good impression.
You are my birthday present to Caligula.
They'll do you proud, my lord.
Every man has sworn to die well if he has to, to die with style.
I've also told them there's some special entertainment tonight, thanks to our lady.
Say a word to them, my lady.
I'm sending you a feast prepared in my own kitchens.
Rare delicacies from every province of the empire...
...and wine from the imperial cellars...
...packed in snow and brought by runners from the Alps.
I can assure you the rest of the entertainment will be... of the very highest quality.
Guard! Guard!
Lockthe gate! Stay where you are!
Mark him!
- Stay where you are.
- Stop him!
Stop him! Mark him!
Lockthe gate!
- The best prospect had to be a coward.
- I'm no coward.
Then why did you run? Bind him!
Messalina) Wait.
Why did you run?
I don't think you're a coward. You had no real chance of escaping. You must have known.
This is a place where men are trained to kill each other like animals.
- And men aren't animals?
- No.
We admire a magnificent animal who fights.
Why not a man who fights?
Because God didn't put man on earth to destroy his own kind...
...nor a woman to enjoy their agonies as they die.
- Dog!
- Wait.
- What's your name?
- Demetrius.
You spoke of a god, Demetrius. Which god?
There is only one God.
He's one of them. This is very interesting.
A Christian.
- Are you a Christian?
- Yes.
- And you won't fight?
- No.
- He can't. It's against his religion to kill.
- We'll see about that.
- Strabo.
- Yes, my lady.
Put him in the arena tomorrow.
Messalina, he won't fight.
You know what Caligula will do.
I'm more interested in what this Christian will do...
...when he sees that his choice is kill or die.
Here they come!
- Look, Dardanius!
- Sit here and watch the game.
- Watch me win this.
- Get on with the play. Ah!
You may see a fewthings you didn't bargain for. These men aren't children.
- They know half of them will die tomorrow.
- I'll try not to be shocked, Strabo.
Your name is Demetrius?
I'm from Corinth, like you.
This is my first time here.
- Do you always eat like this?
- I don't know.
This is my first time, too.
And you're fighting tomorrow!
You must be a famous warrior.
I'm a potter.
Only a potter? And they're sending you into the arena tomorrow?
You must have done something awfully bad.
I did.
I'm a Christian.
Strabo...
...when you were fighting in the arena what did you think about the night before?
It doesn't pay a gladiator to think, my lady.
When you caressed a woman...
...was your mind on her or on death?
You don't expect to die.
You never think it'll be you that gets it.
There's only one man down there who knows he's going to die.
You're wrong, Strabo.
When the time comes, he'll fight...
...because he wants to live, like any other man.
My lady, I tried to train him this afternoon.
He wouldn't make a move to defend himself.
And he was a warrior once.
He was brought to Rome as a prisoner of war, but he won't fight.
Why, you...!
- All right, you're out of the game. Get back.
- He's out. Come on, whose throw?
- Mine. Let's go.
- Throwthe dice.
Watch this one.
The stakes must be high.
They're gambling for a longer life. The winner gets me for his opponent tomorrow.
Venus. I threw Venus.
I win.
I won you, Christian.
Tomorrow you're mine.
Now I want to show you something.
Watch.
Is it true that when you strike a Christian, he must turn the other cheek?
Go ahead. Turn the other cheek.
Let's see you.
Anyone else?
I am no Christian.
- Who is he?
- Glycon, the Nubian.
My lord Claudius has been considering giving him his freedom.
Oh, yes. I remember.
Have him fight the Christian tomorrow.
That should make it even more interesting.
Listen to me. The worst sort of life is better than the best kind of death.
Forgetyour religion for just one day.
Kill him. He is no good.
Your god will thank you for it.
Thank you for whatyou did.
This god of yours.
They say he thought as well of a slave as of a patrician, even an emperor.
Can this be true?
It was one of the greatest of his truths.
No wonder they crucified him.
The gladiators have arrived at the palace enclosure, sire.
Well? What have you to report?
The robe is no longer in Rome, sire.
The man who has it, the one they call the fisherman, is said to have gone north.
- I've issued orders to...
- I want the robe, not excuses!
Find it!
I hope you've provided better entertainment than last time, Uncle.
Senators...
...my subjects...
...my loyal guards...
...we are touched by your devotion.
In honour of our birthday, a gift of 50 gold pieces for every member of the guard.
We will proceed now with the marriage of life and death.
Hail Caesar!
We, who are about to die, salute you.
Begin the games.
Get ready.
Demetrius. Glycon.
Take it.
There's one chance for you - a slim one.
- Have you ever used a sword?
- Yes.
Fight as hard as you can.
Try to kill me. Use your shield well.
Sometimes, rarely, if two men put up a good enough fight, they let them both live.
Understand?
If they think we're pretending, they'll cut our throats.
If they begin to guess, defend yourself because then I'll have to kill you.
- Good luck.
- Good luck.
- That's Glycon, isn't it?
- Yes, sire.
Good. I don't knowthe other one.
A Greek. A most unusual man, sire.
We thought he might amuse you.
Cut hard at me, make it look good. Attack!
It's poor, Claudius.
Your gladiators are too fond of each other.
It's no good. They know.
Sorry, friend. Fight for your life.
- Glycon, pick up your sword.
- I can't. You've won.
Look, Glycon. It's life.
Notyet. The emperor decides.
They want him spared, sire.
Cut clean, friend.
Sire, I'm a freeman of Rome.
- I claim my right of appeal to the emperor.
- Your rights are what I say they are.
Butyou may speak.
- I ask you to withdraw your command, sire.
- Why should I?
I'm a Christian. I can't take a man's life.
Very well.
Your request is granted.
- The Nubian goes free.
- Thank you, sire.
Christian!
Stay there.
Macro, go down and cut the dog's throat.
Take your time with it.
Let him die slowly.
Sire, is that worthy of you - a man who won't even fight back?
What do you mean not worthy?
Are you daring to plead for his life?
I'm only thinking of your own amusement.
Why waste his death?
Make him a birthday present to your tigers.
I think I begin to understand, Claudius.
She wants him to have a chance for life.
I didn't know your taste ran to Christians.
It doesn't, sire.
Your eyes betray you.
Very well.
When the tigers are finished with him you won't want what's left.
Macro...
...give him the dagger and come back.
Release the tigers!
- He's lost much blood, my lady.
- I want him to live.
- What are you doing?
- We will bleed him.
The blood of slaves is impure.
By letting some out he will improve.
Bleed him when his trouble is loss of blood?
Get out, both of you!
The fools. Who can be trusted?
I'll stay with him, my lady.
Get blankets. He should be kept warm.
And heat some wine for him.
Heated wine.
- I wish I knew howto pray to his god.
- Save your breath. The wine'll do more good.
- You're responsible, Strabo.
- I'll do all I can, my lady.
If he dies, I'll send you backto the arena.
Leave us.
- I understand I have you to thank for my life.
- Caligula would have wasted you.
You could become a valuable piece of property.
- Why did you send for me?
- I didn't.
My husband wants to question you.
- Claudius.
- Yes?
- The slave Demetrius is here.
- I'm not a slave.
You're our property, whatever you want to call it.
- Good afternoon. I hope you're feeling better.
- Yes, sir.
If you survived our physicians, you could survive anything.
But it's hard to kill a man who believes he'll live for ever.
- You do believe that, don'tyou?
- Claudius, come to the point.
Oh, yes.
The emperor is interested in the robe that Jesus wore to the cross.
Can you tell me where it is or the whereabouts of the man who has it?
Peter, I believe he's called.
No, sir. I can tell you nothing.
Caligula might take it into his head to question you himself. He has his methods.
I know his methods.
And you'd die for this robe?
You're intelligent.
You can't believe it could cast a spell.
Only the spell of memory.
I took it from the foot of the cross myself before he died...
...calling on his Father to forgive his enemies.
He did that?
What men will do under the inspiration of their beliefs!
I have none myself, none at all, though my wife is a priestess of Isis.
I'm sure the Christians look on my faith as debauched superstition.
- Don'tyou?
- The priestess of Isis knows what her faith is.
- We believe that love rules the world.
- So do we.
Then why are you such hypocrites? Why do you pretend to be so pure, above temptation?
You misunderstand, my dear.
When a Christian speaks of love, he means...
I'm asking Demetrius.
Jesus said "Love ye one another as brothers."
Tell me...
...how do you manage to love a woman as a brother?
You don't.
It's a pity you can't tell me something about the robe. It might even mean your freedom.
I can tell you nothing, sir.
Albus.
- Return this man to the gladiator school.
- Why, Claudius?
You might have further questions for him.
We could find useful employment for him here among our bodyguards...
...at least until he's fit for the arena again.
As you say, my dear.
Besides, when he knows us better, he might be willing to tell us more.
Albus, feed him, then return to me for instructions.
Yes, my lady. Come.
Have you exhausted all other sources of your amusement?
- But don'tyou find him interesting?
- He's a remarkable young man.
He has something that Rome has lacked since the early days of the republic.
Something to believe in: Faith.
Our early conquests weakened it and my family, we Caesars, killed and buried it.
Strange, if the memory of a dead Jew should bring it to life again.
Messalina.
Don't hurt him.
Don't destroy what he has.
- Are you going to interfere?
- No, my dear.
I never interfere.
This is your post. Don't leave it.
It's warm. Open the door.
Guard!
Pick it up.
Do you have a woman, Demetrius?
No.
There's one thing aboutyour religion that still puzzles me.
Why should one want to live out such a dull life for ever?
To be a Christian these days is anything but dull.
My husband tells me you wouldn't fight because of a rule...
...a commandment, issued by your god.
- There are ten of them.
- Tell me about them.
They're very simple.
Thou shalt not kill, thou shalt not steal...
...thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbour.
Thou shalt not covet thy neighbour's wife.
And so forth.
Where shall I put these?
Back on the floor.
Tell me, are Christian wives all so ugly that no one desires them?
I didn't say they weren't desired. I only said there's a commandment against it.
A commandment against everything.
Don't look, don't touch, don't fight...
...don't breathe, don't live.
Is there nothing human in your religion?
Well, there's no commandment that says a woman can't talk like a fool.
Be careful, Demetrius.
My claws can be sharper than the tiger's.
My lady, the emperor wishes to see you at once.
Come with me.
Do you knowthese objects?
Yes. They're my uncle and my cousin.
They made an attempt on my life.
What should be done with them?
- The penalty for such a crime is death.
- You have sentenced them.
Macro, take them out.
Sire, I claim my right of trial before the Senate.
You've had your trial!
Let their heads be hung in the Senate House as a reminder.
Go.
They said that I must die because
I aspire to be a god, because I'm mad.
- Butyou knew about their plan, didn'tyou?
- No, sire.
Don't lie to me!
I've heard who put them up to it.
There isn't a man in Rome who'd dare.
Butyou'd dare, Messalina.
You'd dare anything. Deny it!
- Deny it, I said!
- Sire, I didn't!
I'll give you witnesses to your treachery.
You, you'll swear she's guilty.
- Yes, sire.
- And you! And you! And you!
You hear?
I deny nothing, sire. But what I said was falsely reported to you.
Do you deny saying that I aspire to be a god?
I said you are a god.
Isis herself revealed it to me in the temple.
Isis?
That I'm a god?
She said the gods themselves look upon you as one of them.
I spoke of this wonder in the court, but your faithful courtiers laughed in my face...
...the same who have accused me.
- Is this true?
- Is it true?
- No, sire.
Liars! Traitors!
So, you deny that I am a god.
I'll hang your heads in the Senate House!
I'll have you torn to pieces!
Kneel.
Kneel!
Kneel!
Kneel to your god!
Some wine. There on the table.
Now you've seen it. Now you know.
Do you wonder that I behave as I do?
That we're all a little mad here?
Many innocent people know what it is to be accused.
Innocent? Who said I was innocent?
Caligula was right.
I put those two up to it and they bungled it.
Oh, if I were a man... If I were Claudius,
I'd have killed Caligula long ago.
I'd have won the guards to my side and taken the empire for my own.
But he's no better than the rest of them.
Where was he tonight when I needed him?
I had only my wits to save me.
And not for the first time.
I don't want another night like this.
I have a villa by the sea.
Claudius never goes there.
I need protection, and I wantyou to come with me. Will you come?
Why do you ask me?
You said yourself I was your property.
I'm not asking you as my property.
I can free you. We'd be equals.
I'm offering you life, Demetrius, and a great deal more.
Why do you choose me?
Because you'd never crawl to anyone.
Because you're a man.
Think, Demetrius. You're not blind.
Do I have to say it all?
For ten years I've been married to a man old enough to be my father.
I've never been close to another man.
I've never wanted to.
I need you, Demetrius. I need your strength.
You don't need me, Messalina.
A woman with your wit, your courage and your reputation.
All Rome knows why you married Claudius.
If anything happens to Caligula,
Claudius becomes emperor.
Since then, all Rome knows that a procession of men has stood guard atyour door.
Albus!
When the truth is ugly, only a lie can be beautiful.
It would have been better if you'd believed me.
- My lady.
- Return this man to the gladiator school.
Tell Strabo I'll send instructions in the morning.
Yes, my lady.
White ball.
- Lycidas draws a black ball.
- Last week and this week, too!
Dardanius draws a black ball.
- He has a right to choose like the rest of us.
- He has a right, and I have orders.
Demetrius draws a black ball.
White ball.
- What do you want?
- This is Kaeso's pottery?
- I've been a while finding you.
- We don't sell at this hour.
I didn't come to buy.
You are friends of a Corinthian named Demetrius?
What do you know about Demetrius?
You've seen him, he's alive?
Yes, he's alive.
He told me about this place and you.
I couldn't get him out of my mind.
- That's why I came here.
- Where is he?
It won't do you any good to know, but I'll see him tonight,
- if you want to send him a message.
- Where is he? Tell me.
He's been sentenced to the arena.
He's in the gladiator school.
- Can you read?
- A little.
What does it mean?
It's the pairings for the combat tomorrow in the palace enclosure. There - his name.
Take me to him.
To the gladiator school? They'd never let a girl like you through the gates.
Please. I don't know your name or why you came here, but please help me.
Please.
Here they come!
Lucia!
Who is that girl with Demetrius?
I've never seen her before, my lady.
- She hasn't quite the look of the rest of them.
- No, she hasn't.
Sometimes a man's sweetheart finds out he's here and sneaks in.
Please don't be angry.
I took another's place. I had to come.
You're not angry?
Of course not.
We tried to find out what had happened to you. No one would tell us.
I prayed that...
Oh, Demetrius.
I'm very grateful, Lucia...
...butyou can't stay here.
- You must go.
- No, Demetrius, I won't go.
I have a right to be here.
Tomorrowthey'll... they'll kill you?
Yes.
I've loved you since you first came to us.
You never knew.
And I'd never have told you.
No, Demetrius. I won't letyou send me away.
These last few hours belong to me.
I've changed my mind, Strabo.
The Christian's not to fight tomorrow.
I'm glad, my lady.
Then he isn't entitled to entertainment.
Send him out.
- But, my lady...
- You knowthe rules.
Yes, my lady.
Demetrius!
- Demetrius!
- Stop!
Demetrius!
Get back, all of you. Backto your quarters.
You're wasted on that Christian.
- Forget him.
- No. No!
Demetrius!
Demetrius! Demetrius!
God, help her!
God, help her!
If you are a god, help her!
Demetrius!
Get away!
Move!
She's dead!
- Give me a sword.
- You're not fighting today.
I said give me the sword!
Let him have it, Strabo.
If you want to give the emperor some sport, send these others out to him one by one.
Why, it's the Christian.
- Again?
- He wasn't to fight.
I didn't draw him, Strabo!
You can't send me out there!
- You knowthe rules!
- We've changed the rules!
- We go now, together.
- Come on.
Not Glycon! Go back!
Sire, I speak for the guards.
The Prefect Cassius Chaerea may speak.
Never at any games in history have Romans seen what we have seen here today.
We say that this man has earned his freedom for life.
And we'd like to have a sword like his in the Praetorian Guard.
You forget that these Christians owe allegiance to another king, another god.
- Silence!
- Sire, the guards want a hero. Listen to them.
Ask him, sire. Put him to the question.
Christian...
...do you renounce your false god, this king of an invisible kingdom...
...who expects to come back some day and rule the earth?
There is no other king but Caesar.
There is no power greater than his, in this world or any other.
By the mercy of Caesar, you are a free man.
Prefect, you may induct him into the guards with the rank of tribune.
Tonight let him sacrifice in the temple.
Isis...
...Queen of the Mysteries, Mother of Egypt...
...Protectress of Rome...
...your servant Demetrius offers you sacrifice.
Well, are you waiting for your goddess to strike me dead?
What have you and I to do with gods?
I rejected mine because what he taught was against all reason and reality.
Do you think I'll accept this obscenity in his place?
We need no gods, you and I.
We have each other...
...for as long as we live.
There is no past.
No future.
Only now.
Do you see her, Claudius?
The goddess Diana.
Every night she comes to me...
...to my arms.
There.
There she goes.
- Now do you see her?
- No, sire.
Why not?
Only you gods are privileged to see each other.
Of course. What are you doing here?
You sent for me, sire.
Oh, yes.
I thoughtyou might be lonely, Uncle.
Caesar is considerate.
We haven't seen Messalina for nearly three months.
- She has been busy at the temple.
- How pious.
- Which temple, Uncle?
- The temple of Isis, sire.
Oh, no, Uncle.
No. Messalina worships this summer at the temple of Venus.
Even now at the seashore
Venus is rising from the waves...
...and Messalina's there to welcome her.
Deny that she is there, Uncle...
...and that our newest tribune is her constant visitor.
Shall I take steps?
After all, I'm responsible for the morals of the court.
Messalina is my wife, sire.
Any steps that are to be taken,
I prefer to take myself.
My poor uncle...
...the tribune's so young, so strong, so handsome...
...and so brave.
A hero of Rome.
I made him one myself.
Did you know when he leaves the palace, the guards cheer him louder than they do me?
Did you knowthat, Uncle?
The first cup for thirst...
...the second for joy...
...the third for delight...
...and the fourth for folly.
Glycon.
- Who is that?
- A man to see the tribune, my lady.
I'll see him. Leave me alone with him.
- You're the fisherman.
- And you're Claudius's wife.
- What do you want?
- My business is with Demetrius.
- This is my house.
- I know.
I was told, if I wanted to see him, to come here.
You're wasting your time.
He doesn't want to see you.
I'm sure he can say that for himself.
You can leave now.
Why are you afraid?
I, afraid?
You'll never get him back.
What can you offer him? The company of slaves and beggars, the refuse of Rome?
Poverty and self-denial?
Prayers, tears, death?
You see, I've studied your teachings.
And I, Fisherman, I can give him the world.
If he has to choose between us, do you think he'd hesitate for one minute? Of course not.
And that's why you hate me.
I can see it in your eyes.
Whatyou see in my eyes is pity.
- Get out!
- Messalina!
- So they sent for you.
- No, Demetrius.
My work in the north was finished.
If you found enough fools to satisfy you,
I can't be important to you.
Jesus himself thought no man was unimportant, and no woman.
He was wrong, as he was wrong in so many things.
You are no longer important to me, Peter.
I have nothing againstyou, but whatyou say doesn't interest me.
So far I haven't said anything.
Then why did you come here?
Do I have to give a reason for wanting to see an old friend?
He's right, Messalina.
We can't refuse our hospitality to an old friend.
- Send him away.
- No. Not until he's had some wine.
- Glycon, bring wine.
- Thank you. I've already had some.
Ah, you shouldn't have done that, Messalina.
He's my friend.
We travelled from Galilee, persuading people to give up their lives for a beautiful dream.
Take it, Peter. It's real.
Hot, spiced with cinnamon and cloves.
It wasn't made out of water.
Did you knowthat Jesus could turn water into wine?
- That was only one of his tricks.
- Yes, only one.
Anything that was base, he'd make noble.
He found a leper and he made him clean.
He found death and he made life.
- He found you a slave and freed you.
- Get out!
Now you've won a victory over him, Tribune.
You've made yourself a slave again.
Let him go, Demetrius.
Peter!
I'm through with it. All of it.
Don't ever try to come back.
- I have no intention of coming back.
- I know you better than that.
You never give up.
You didn't let go of Marcellus until he died.
- You brought him to me.
- And in doing so condemned him to death!
Butyour tricks won't work on me because I knowthem.
Tell that to Jesus the next time you see him.
Has he made any miraculous appearances lately?
Walking through the Forum, perhaps, or strolling on the surface of the Tiber?
Tell him what I said. Tell him, Peter.
He'll know without my telling him.
You talked to Peter, didn'tyou?
What did you tell him about me?
I don't discuss your affairs with anyone, sir.
You freed me and I am grateful.
You must have told him something.
I asked him if one who'd killed
30 men in the arena, as I have...
...could ever hope to sleep at night.
Why did you ask him that?
Why should he knowthe answer?
Take your hand away.
You're under my orders, Glycon.
I forbid you to ever see this man again.
I won't obey that order, Tribune.
You are my superior, but I'll choose my friends.
We were friends once, Glycon.
I know.
I suppose I should blame myself for what has become of you.
When I put that sword in your hand it killed more than Dardanius and the others.
It killed you.
I hope you sleep well, sir.
Good night.
Demetrius?
Demetrius.
Demetrius!
So, the mob can jeer me in the Forum...
...tear down my statues.
Where were the guards when these sacrileges were committed?
Sire, my men were under arms all night, but we haven't enough to patrol the entire city.
Are you insinuating that the entire city is against me?
- Sire, there's a shortage of grain...
- And I must take the blame for that, too?!
There's a shortage because
I've emptied my treasury for the guards.
They take my gold and give me nothing in return.
These are my orders:
One more desecration of this sort...
...one more unpunished insult to your emperor...
...and every tenth man in the guards is to be crucified at the city gates!
Post that at the guards' headquarters!
Sire, not the guards.
Your power depends on their goodwill.
- Don't publish such an order.
- I'm the emperor!
I can do what I please with whom I please!
The lady Messalina, sire.
Show her in.
You didn't tell me she was back in Rome, or didn'tyou know it?
Stop there. Search her.
It pleases you to question my loyalty, sire.
I've come to give you new proof of it.
It must have been an irresistible impulse to bring you from the seashore at this hour.
- I think you'll agree it's important.
- Speak up.
I have no secrets from your husband.
My news concerns the robe. The magic robe.
Yes, yes, I remember. Have you got it?
I know howto get it.
The man who owns it, the one who calls himself the fisherman, is back in Rome.
Sometimes, Uncle, I think I made a mistake not to marry her myself.
The workings of her mind appeal to me.
She leaves her warm bed in the cold dawn to rush here full of zeal and loyalty.
Why, Messalina?
The robe, sire, holds the secret of eternal life.
Seize this fisherman. He's dangerous to you, a threat to your power.
Dangerous to me...
...or to you?
Has this fisherman been making trouble for you with your lover?
Of course.
You're not interested in the robe for me.
You want to get rid of the fisherman.
And you! Why didn'tyou bring me this news?
This fisherman comes and goes as he pleases making fools of the whole Praetorian Guard.
I want the robe. And I want it today!
I'll do my best, sire, but the Christians will protect their leader.
They'll hide him and the robe of their king.
It may take more than one day.
I didn't ask you for excuses!
Get me the robe! Take hostages! Kill them!
Torture them by the hundred till they agree to give it up! You'll find one that will talk.
Wait.
There's one tribune who has special qualifications for this duty...
...who knows their leaders, their hiding places.
We'll give Demetrius an opportunity to earn the cheers he receives.
These are my orders. Go!
Guards, forward march.
Guards, halt.
What do you want here?
- Don'tyou know me, Kaeso?
- The footsteps I heard were of a stranger.
- I want the robe. Where is it?
- I haven't seen it.
Perhaps I can help you, Demetrius.
- What do you want with it?
- To take it to the emperor.
- Why?
- To give you a chance.
Unless he gets his hands on it, he'll wipe you out.
You mean we can buy our lives with our master's robe?
It's only a piece of cloth.
And you'd let a thousand people die for it?
That's whatyou want, isn't it?
You and your god...
...who let his own son die on a cross.
Who let Stephen and James die,
Marcellus and Diana, and a hundred others.
The same god who turned his face from me when I begged him to save an innocent girl.
- You blame God for that?
- Who else can I blame?
- Then you still believe there is a god.
- I believe in nothing.
Where's the robe?
You'll find it in there.
She's not dead.
No.
Lucia.
Ever since the night she was so cruelly hurt she's been as you see her...
...in some darkness where her injured mind has crawled for refuge.
It's very strange.
No one's been able to take it from her.
It's as if, even in her darkness, she finds some comfort in it.
- Get it from her.
- How?
How should I know?
One of your miracles. Wake her up.
Would it be kindness to bring her backto remembrance and shame?
To learn that her sacrifice was for nothing?
That the man she worshipped now reviles and ridicules his god?
You could do much for her.
Only you.
When she comes into the light again she'll need infinite kindness, infinite love.
If you want the robe, pray for it.
Once you knew how.
Lucia.
Lucia.
Oh, God.
Father, forgive them, for they know not what they do.
Father, forgive me.
Forgive me, Father.
Demetrius, what...?
Why are you dressed like that?
Like our enemies?
I've been no one's enemy but my own.
Like you, I've been in darkness.
I... I had a terrible dream, Demetrius.
- I can't remember...
- Don't try.
Let me have the robe, Lucia.
You must take it to the emperor, if it will save lives.
No, Demetrius.
Peter's right. There's no danger.
You'll come back.
You came backto me.
I said there was no danger, but there is for you. Do you understand?
Make your way to the palace.
You knowthe Augustan steps?
Wait for me there.
I'll come out to you as soon as I can.
They're not cheering. Do you notice it?
Yes, sire. Your threat against them was posted on the gate as they came in.
And they dare take offence?
I've pampered them long enough.
- Well?
- The tribune has returned, sire.
That's it?
That's the robe?
Give it to me.
Wait here.
Get out!
Kill him!
No!
Rise.
Rise!
By the power of this robe,
I command you to rise!
It's a fraud. You've cheated me.
This is whatyou asked for, sire. The robe that Jesus of Nazareth wore to the cross.
You lied. It has no magic powers!
- No one ever said it had.
- It's a fraud, and so was Jesus.
I tried it. I had a prisoner killed.
I ordered him to rise.
- He's still dead.
- You did that?
You killed a man to test our master's robe?
Stop him! Seize him!
Threaten your emperor, will you? Christian!
Macro, get the armour and the weapons!
You shall kill him out there.
I took you out of the arena.
Now you'll go backto it...
...and die as you should have died long ago.
May God forgive you for whatyou have done.
My loyal guards...
...by your sullen attitude you have questioned steps that I have found it necessary to take...
...in order to preserve the imperial dignity.
Now I will show you proof that my actions were justified...
...that treason is everywhere...
...that it has even shown its face among those who are sworn to protect my person.
In your own ranks.
Let whatyou'll see now be a lesson to all among you...
...who fail in loyalty to your emperor.
The instrument of my justice will be the greatest gladiator who fought in the arena.
Macro.
- Put them back.
- What have you done?
- No shield.
- It's not too late. I'll go to Caligula.
Come on.
Don't let him kill you. Fight him.
We'll go away from here.
It doesn't matter you're a Christian.
I'll be a Christian too, if you say so.
Don't let him kill you, Demetrius!
Watch, my loyal guards.
Watch him die.
Life! Life!
Let him live! Let him live!
- Let a traitor live?
- Sire...
...the guards demand mercy.
They demand life.
Demand!
No one makes demands of God!
Claudius, stand clear!
No. No!
Hail Claudius.
Hail Claudius! Hail Claudius!
Hail Claudius! Hail Claudius!
You have made me emperor and I will try to serve Rome well.
I want it clearly understood that I am not a god...
...nor am I likely to become one.
Nor am I quite the fool that
I have pretended to be all these years...
...in order to preserve my life.
That is ended.
You have made me Caesar, and I will act the part.
Hail Claudius!
Messalina.
It's no secret from any of you that I've mocked my marriage vows...
...that I've openly disgraced my husband and myself.
That, too, is ended.
I am Caesar's wife, and I will act the part.
Hail Caesar!
- Sire.
- Tribune.
Sire, I've deeply wronged you.
You wronged yourself.
You merely disappointed me.
I give you your last commission as Tribune of the Guards.
Go to your Christian leaders.
Tell them that as long as they commit no acts of disloyalty to the state...
...they will have nothing to fear from me.
- Thank you, sire.
- Messalina) Demetrius?
My husband and I wish you good fortune.
Visiontext Subtitles: Natasha Cohn
ENGLISH SDH
IVAN THE TERRIBLE
Part Two
THE BOYAR`S PLOT
Written and Directed by
SERGEI EISENSTEIN
This story about Ivan the Terrible,
the founder of the Tsardom of Muscovy,
tells of his struggle against the foes of Russian unity.
In the role of Ivan the Terrible:
Nikolai Cherkasov
The Oprichniki:
Malyuta Skuratov:
Mikhail Zharov
Alexei Basmanov:
Amvrosy Buchma
His son, Fyodor Basmanov:
Mikhail Kuznetsov
Philip, Metropolitan of Moscow and of all the Russias:
Andrei Abrikosov
Pimen, the Archbishop of Novgorod:
Alexander Mgebrov
Pyotr Volynets:
Vladimir Balashov
Efrosinia Staritskaya, the Tsar's aunt:
Serafima Birman
Her son, Vladimir Staritsky:
Pavel Kadochnikov
Prince Andrei Mikhailovich Kurbsky: 
Mikhail Nazvanov
Sigismund, King of Poland:
Pavel Massalsky
It is the year fifteen hundred and sixty-four,
the year in which the Tsar formed his special bodyguard,
the Oprichniki.
The year in which Tsar lvan withdrew to Alexandrov.
The year in which the people organized a procession
to beg the Tsar to return.
The year in which Prince Kurbsky
committed the base treachery of surrendering
the Russian armies to the Poles
and transferred his allegiance to King Sigismund.
There are certain defeats that are more resounding than victories.
The defeat of my Russian army near Revel will spark off the revolt.
Tsar Ivan has fled the wrath of the boyars and taken refuge in Alexandrov.
The Moscow boyars, the Kolychevs, have managed to get some messages through.
The Tsar is assailed on every side like a baited bear.
The boyars are seething with revolt, the Tsar will fall without a blow being struck, and the throne of Moscow will be free for a new Tsar well-disposed towards Poland.
God in his wisdom decreed that Lithuania, Poland and the Baltic States should serve as the outposts of Europe, in order that the civilized nations of the West might be protected from the Muscovite barbarians.
They say the Muscovites eat children alive.
Russian soil is fertile.
The herds are well-fed.
The sub-soil conceals inexhaustible riches.
Of course, the Russians have to be kept down, but a strong man on the throne of Moscow would shatter the most cherished dreams of all the European sovereigns.
We need the dim-witted Vladimir Staritsky.
We must support the rebel boyars.
The solitary reins of absolute power must be wrenched from the Tsar and returned to the feudal princes.
We must destroy the unity of Ivan's Russia.
Once that has been done, the Christian kings will embark on a new crusade.
We will force the Muscovite to serve the West.
We will drive the Russians out of Europe and force them back to their Asian steppes.
Hurrah! Hurrah! Hurrah!
Tsar Ivan is on his way back to Moscow!
So I've caught you!
You didn't expect me back, eh?
You were delighted by the Tsar's departure!
You've shown yourselves for what you are, traitors!
The rogues.
They wanted to govern the land themselves!
Alright, if that's what you want!
From now I'll give you land to govern!
I'll give you land.
But as the widower,
I shall keep the widower's portion... the towns along our borders.
From there
I will watch over the security of the State and guard the integrity of Russian frontiers.
And I shall stamp out treason!
I have no confidence in you boyars.
Therefore as God created man in his own image, so I have created men in mine.
They will carry out my orders and only they will enjoy my confidence.
That is why I have christened them Oprichniki.
These plans come not from God... but from the devil.
He who defies ancestral traditions, shall not remain sovereign for long.
Fyodor Kolychev!
Say no more.
Why are you so severe with me,
Fyodor Kolychev?
Why, my good friend, are you so cruel?
You should really pity me!
I am not Kolychev, I am Philip the monk.
I carry out the will of God, not the designs of the Tsar.
Listen,
ever since I was a child,
the boyars showed their hatred of the Grand Duke of Moscow.
After my father's death,
my mother was killed.
They have poisoned me!
Ah! I am dying!
My son!
They have killed me!
Watch out for poison!
Beware of the boyars!
Elena Glinskaya is dead.
That's how I came to be an orphan, alone and abandoned, whilst the boyars governed in my name and handed over Russian territory to foreign enslavement.
Ivan Vasilievich, Grand Duke of Moscow, has graciously ratified a commercial treaty and agrees to pay duties for the transit of goods via the Baltic, to the great Hanseatic League of the German merchant towns.
The Grand Duke of Moscow has reconsidered his decision.
He has concluded the treaty with the Order of Livonian Knights.
Someone has certainly been lining 
Shuisky's pockets.
The Hansa!
It was the Boyar Council's decision.
The Grand Duke is free to annul the council's decisions.
But he has pledged his word.
The Grand Duke is the sole arbiter of his word.
He gives it or rescinds it as he pleases.
It is the Grand Duke's will which constitutes the law.
But the will of the Grand Duke is to conclude a treaty with the Hansa.
The Grand Duke's will is to concede the privileges to the Livonian Order.
The Grand Duke's will is law!
We must pay the Hansa!
No, we'll pay the Livonians!
The Hansa will be more profitable to the State!
You mean more profitable to yourself!
And you have been bribed by the Livonians!
The money must go to the Hansa!
We'll pay the Livonians.
We will pay no one!
We're not obliged to pay.
The coastal towns were built by our ancestors.
Those lands are our inheritance; they must be returned to Moscow.
Who would be fool enough to give them back?
Anything that falls off the back of a wagon is lost.
If they won't return them voluntarily, we shall take them back by force.
By force?
And where will we find this force?
You have wasted Russia's strength.
It has been frittered away by the boyars.
O Lord! I'll die laughing.
Take it off.
Off, I say.
Get off my mother's bed!
My mother, who was murdered by you, you dogs!
A dog, am I?
Well your mother was a bitch.
She used to sleep with that dog Telepnev.
No one even knows who your father was!
Race of dogs!
Seize him!
Seize him!
The leading boyar handed over to the kennelmen!
I shall reign alone!
Without the boyars!
I will be Tsar!
Now... I hold great power.
The people support me.
My personal guard form an iron ring around me.
My enemies are kept at bay.
But I have no close friends.
God refuses me the sweet consolations of friendship.
On whose shoulders can I rest my head?
With whom can I share my joys and sorrows?
I am alone, abandoned.
I had a single close friend, Anastasia.
She has left me.
I had a friend, Kurbsky.
He has betrayed me.
No, not just myself but our great cause.
I don't fear the trouble-makers.
I don't fear the sword, poison or betrayal.
I fear not for myself.
But I tremble for our great cause.
A new cause, on which one had hardly embarked.
There is no higher destiny than to reign according to ancient traditions.
As our ancestors did.
Pay heed to the boyars.
Share your authority with them.
You lie, monk!
These are old wives' tales!
You reject the counsel of your spiritual guide? 
Very well!
Remain alone!
Condemned, accursed... and alone!
It is no longer the Tsar who pleads with you but a friend crushed by the burden of authority.
Don't leave me in my isolation.
Stay with me.
Help me to re-establish Russian power.
And for this accept the office of Metropolitan Bishop of Moscow.
Will you allow me the right to plead in favor of those you accuse?
I never accuse the innocent.
Wait!
Very well. It shall be as you say.
Why give the bishop such power over you?
Why let yourself be humiliated by an ignorant priest?
None of your business, dog!
I know I am a dog... but a faithful dog.
You are wrong, Tsar, to prefer a priest to a dog.
I know, you want friendship.
You languish without friendship.
For friendship you are ready to bow at his feet.
Do you not see that Philip has only one idea, to conceal your enemies under his own skirts?
A friend, eh?
He's hardly worth more than Kurbsky!
You dare pronounce that name.
Ah! I know you love Kurbsky!
It's not his treachery which wounds you.
It's the loss of a friend!
You don't sleep at night!
Hold your tongue, dog!
You don't show any gratitude or affection to those who are loyal to you, who'd give their lives for you, who carry the weight of your power on their strong shoulders.
My power is carried by the shoulders of the people and their will is my strength.
I hear the voice of God through them and I carry out His holy designs.
Tsar, I beg you, don't let the priest do as he pleases.
Don't trust anyone.
You hold the power. Use it!
I understand. 
You've given your word to the priest.
You've made him promises.
You can't go back on your word.
I understand.
So we must see that the Tsar's word is respected and wipe out the traitors too.
It's just going back on your word that worries you, isn't it?
There is a way out... use a cat's paw.
No, a red-headed dog, me, Malyuta.
I'll take the Tsar's sins on my shoulders.
I'll give my soul for the Tsar.
I'll go to hell if need be, but I'll keep the Tsar's word.
What does the hound do when the game tries to go to earth?
Flies straight as an arrow to the lair.
He outwits it... heads it off, outruns it.
Outstrip the priest?
Is that what you're suggesting?
So he won't have time to double back?
You'd give your soul for the Tsar!
Eh, dog?
You complain the Tsar doesn't spoil you?
Be off with you!
Do what you have to do. 
By God's will, be judge and executioner.
And to outstrip the priest, we'll start on some of his distant relatives, the Kolychevs.
Kolychevs are untamed, but we'll tame them!
By what right do you set yourself as a judge, Tsar Ivan?
By what right do you wield the sword of justice?
Let me not drink of this cup.
You cannot avoid it... 
Even though some cups contain poison!
The cup?
The goblet.
They poisoned her!
They poisoned my sweetheart!
Who gave the fatal goblet to the Tsarina?
She received it from my own hands!
And who gave it to you?
Efrosinia!
Efrosinia?
Is it possible?
The Tsar's aunt?
My own blood relation?
Silence! 
Not a word of your suspicions to anyone until I have ferreted out the truth. 
Come!
In the name of the Father, the Son and the Holy Ghost.
Our Sovereign Ivan Vasilievich,
Tsar and Grand Duke of all the Russias, has pronounced these boyars of the Kolychev family to be traitors.
The aforementioned boyars having been in communication with the king of Poland, with the aim of submitting to foreign domination.
Ivan Vasilievich,
Tsar of all the Russias, has condemned them to be beheaded for high treason.
Too few!
By God's power invested in you, bring the Tsar to heel.
I charge you to excommunicate him.
I shall return to my monastery.
You daren't. 
If you don't bring the Tsar to heel, you will answer for it before God!
Ah! my lord!
I ask for justice against the Tsar, and protection.
I ask that the boyars' cause be defended.
No, I do not ask, my lord, I demand!
That's not all I'm demanding.
I demand that the Tsar be humbled.
I do not ask,
I demand!
God be my witness.
It is not for myself nor for the members of my family who have been executed that I take up the sword.
It is on behalf of the boyars.
Justice must be done against the Tsar.
Beneath my priestly robes beats the heart of a Kolychev!
And a Kolychev who is a prince of the Church!
Even the Tsar can do nothing against the Church.
Come tomorrow to the cathedral!
I shall humble the Tsar.
I shall crush him with the weight of the Church.
God be praised.
Mother... 
What's the story of the fiery furnace?
The story tells how a heavenly angel led three youths called Shadrach, Meshach and Abednego, out of the fiery furnace of Babylon, into which a ferocious heathen Tsar, 
Nebuchadnezzar, had thrown them.
Now, there are no such angels.
Innocent, we were flung into the burning, fiery furnace
lit by the Chaldeans,
for having disobeyed the heathen Tsar.
Chaldean! Hey! Chaldean!
What is it?
Is this the Tsar's work?
The Tsar's!
They disobeyed the Tsar?
They disobeyed!
So, we are going to hurl them into the burning, fiery furnace!
We are given into
the hands of lawless princes,
wretched apostates.
Into the hands of an unjust Tsar
who is the wickedest in the world.
With her staff the old lady...
Hands off the Tsar's aunt!
She's Tsarina in her own house!
So she slapped your faces, you and your henchmen!
I recognize the family spirit right enough!
Perhaps this is the right moment to polish off the Staritskys with one blow.
They've opposed the Tsar's will!
It is not for you, Alexei, to tell the Tsar what to do.
Not for you, Fyodor, to raise your hand against the Tsar's family.
No harm shall come to Efrosinia, as long as she calls herself the Tsar's aunt and does not claim to become the mother of a Tsar, a Tsar who submits to the boyars.
As for you, Basmanovs... learn to keep your place!
And the poisoned goblet... have you forgotten that?
Be quiet.
Be quiet, Fyodor! 
Don't mention that grave charge!
God grant it was not she who was guilty!
Why, shameless Chaldeans,
do you serve a lawless Tsar?
Why, bewitched Chaldeans,
do you serve a devilish, blaspheming and despotic Tsar?
Why do you torment us with fire?
Why do you burn us?
And now, bear witness to a miracle.
The terrestrial lord will be humbled
by the Lord of Hosts.
The Tsar of all the Russias begs your blessing.
I do not recognize the Orthodox Tsar in his pagan actions!
In what way, monk, do my actions concern you?
Your actions are those of a bloodthirsty beast!
Silence, Philip. 
If you question my sovereignty you will incur my anger!
Now bear witness to a miracle.
The terrestrial lord will be humbled
by the Lord of Hosts.
Ivan, like Nebuchadnessar, you cast those who are close to you into the fire.
But the avenging angel will descend from heaven and free them from their prison.
Silence, Philip!
Submit to the authority of the Church, Ivan!
Repent!
Dissolve the Oprichnina before it's too late!
Ivan... dissolve the Oprichnina before it is too late!
Silence!
Mother, is that the terrible and godless Tsar?
Mother, it is the terrible and godless Tsar!
It is her, Fyodor!
It is her.
From now on I will be just what you say I am!
I will be terrible!
Philip has been arrested.
He's been forbidden to go back to the monastery.
He'll be given a savage trial.
He will be condemned.
In the old days they would have handed Philip over to us for trial.
We'd never have let him be humiliated.
It's no good living in the past.
We must find a solution.
There is no solution.
There is a solution.
Just one.
The last.
Kill the Tsar.
Either kill the Tsar or lay our own heads on the block.
But who will do it?
Only the pure in heart would be worthy of carrying out so elevated a mission!
Pyotr Volynets,
I consecrate this mission to you.
Come, my brothers, embrace for the last time.
God's servant, Peter, who lately dwelt among us.
He has vowed himself to the grave.
He will repose beneath a cold slab.
He is entering into the shades.
He bids farewell to friends and relations.
He will lie with the dead.
He confiscated Church property.
We will exterminate the beast!
We must save Philip, because he has incurred Ivan's wrath for our sake.
That will depend on Philip's judges.
Who will preside at the Tribunal?
To whom must we send our gold, plate and furs?
It is I who will preside at the tribunal.
That means he's saved!
That means he's lost!
Philip is more useful to our cause as a martyr.
A corpse, a martyr.
A saint is more valuable to our struggle.
A dead man... A saint is invincible, even for the Tsar!
His cowl is white, but his soul is black.
Why are you always trying to make a leader of me, mother?
Why do you want to sacrifice me?
A black beaver was bathing in the river
In the frozen Moscow River
He didn't wash himself cleaner
He only got blacker
Having taken his bath, the beaver
Went off to the capital's High hill
To dry himself, shake himself and look around
To see if anyone was coming to look for him
The hunters whistle
Searching out the black beaver
The hunters follow the scent
They will find the black beaver
They want to catch and skin the beaver
And with its fur then to adorn a kingly mantle
In order to array
Tsar Vladimir!
I'd suffer the pangs of your birth a hundred times over for you to ascend the throne.
To see you seated on the Tsar's throne!
Take the crown.
Take the collar.
I've always been frightened of blood.
You won't have to shed it.
That will be Pyotr's job.
Yes... but after to be haunted by remorse for the rest of my life, always seeing him wherever I go, enduring his silent reproaches.
Whatever else you need fear, it's not that.
When the throne is yours, you will punish the regicide.
And others, too.
A sovereign should not stray from the path of righteousness if he can help it, but he must be prepared to tread the path of evil if necessary.
Our great sovereign offers you a cup of wine.
Moreover our great sovereign invites his cousin Vladimir Andreyevich to the royal table.
The hand of God!
Our cause prospers!
You will accompany Pyotr to the banquet.
And don't forget to wear your new kaftan.
I'll remind him!
The hand of God!
Our cause prospers!
It's empty!
Holla! Holla!
Faster! Faster!
Bravo! Bravo!
Ah, Brother Vladimir, you don't love me.
You don't care that I am so alone, that I'm just a poor abandoned orphan whom no one pities.
It's not right for the Tsar to fraternize with the landowners, and above all not with the Staritskys!
It is not for you, Alexei, to teach the Tsar his business, nor to raise your hand against the Tsar's relations.
But it was you who taught me to weed them out.
The Tsar's connections outshine all other connections.
As the celestial tamarind outshines homely oak.
Aren't we the new forest growing around you?
I don't hack down oaks to make room for wretched aspens.
Don't touch the Tsar's relations!
The ties of blood are sacred!
Aren't we who are closest to you bound to you by other blood, blood which has been shed?
You're no relation of mine.
You are my slaves.
I raised you from the dust to crush the boyar traitors.
I express my will through you.
Your function is to serve me, not to teach me how to behave.
Keep to your place, Basmanovs!
You are beginning to catch the boyars' sickness.
You are beginning to get ideas about rank.
Would you like to put yourself beside the Tsar?
I've sworn never to fraternise with the boyars nor with the landowners.
I am alone, a poor orphan.
No one loves or pities me!
The guests have assembled in the courtyards of the boyars
In the courtyards of the boyars
The axes skim the necks of the boyars
The axes, the axes
Come along! Come along!
What happens next?
What happens next?
Come on, tell us more
Come on, tell us more
Strike with the axes
The gates have split down the middle
Down the middle
The golden goblets pass from hand to hand
From hand to hand
Come along. Come along
What happens next?
What happens next?
Come on, tell us more
Come on, tell us more
Strike with the axes!
Oh, you are wrong,
Tsar of all the Russias,
- you have friends.
- I haven't one.
- Yes, you have!
- Don't lie.
- I'm not lying.
- Then who is my friend?
- Well, me for one.
- I don't believe you!
I swear it!
Don't swear it. 
Prove it by your actions!
I will prove it!
And when the guests are parting having drunk their fill
Drunk their fill
They set fire to the castle
Set fire to the castle
Come along. Come along
What happens next?
What happens next?
Come on, tell us more
Come on, tell us more
Strike with the axes!
What is Archbishop Pimen's man doing amongst the servants?
Pimen assigned him to the service of Vladimir Andreyevich.
You lie... You won't prove anything!
I will... I will prove it to you!
You sit here celebrating and you don't even know some people want you out of the way.
- Is that so?
- I swear it!
And who do they want in my place?
You'd never guess!
I said to her, who'd want to be Tsar?
Plots... executions.
As for me... I'm just a peaceful man; all I ask of life is to drink and live in peace.
Indeed, who'd want to be Tsar?
The task is a heavy one!
That's exactly what I said.
Why do I want to be Tsar?
But she insists.
Take it... take the crown.
Take the collar.
Take the collar...
Take the crown.
Take it!
Take it! Why not?
Take it, cousin!
Bring the Tsar's regalia!
He likes it, this lackey of the Poles!
The farce is over.
Enough of this ungodly revelry!
Brothers, let's address ourselves to the Almighty!
Let us think upon our last hour.
Awake, my soul
Awake
Lead us to the cathedral!
A Tsar does not draw back.
The Tsar is always first to enter!
Ivan is no more!
Good people, look!
Ivan is no more!
The brute is dead!
Russia shall flourish under a boyar Tsar! 
Vladimir!
Holy Mother of God...
No!
Torture me!
Execute me!
You'll never make me speak!
I won't give anyone away.
Why are you holding him?
It was not the Tsar he killed... only the fool!
Let him go.
And it was not only a fool he killed but the Tsar's worst enemy!
My grateful thanks!
As for her...
They want to catch
and skin a beaver
And with its fur then to adorn
A kingly mantle for... for...
Tsar Vladimir
As for her...
A black beaver was bathing...
I swear before God to accomplish
In Russia, my royal mission
To purge the Motherland of her savage enemies
To shed with my own hands the blood of the guilty
Without mercy, either to myself or others
For the sake of the great land of Russia.
A Tsar must always weigh and assess.
Mercy and gentleness for the good.
Cruelty and torment for the wicked.
A Tsar who hesitates in this will never make a Tsar!
Today in Moscow, we have struck down the enemies of Russian unity.
My hands are free!
From now on the sword of justice shall flash against those who dare to oppose from without the greatness of Russian might.
We will not let Russia be abused!
Ladies and gentlemen, young and old, this may seem an unusual procedure, speaking to you before the picture begins, but we have an unusual subject: the story of the birth of freedom.
The story of Moses.
As many of you know, the Holy Bible omits some 30 years of Moses' life, from the time he was a three-month-old baby and was found in the bulrushes by Bithiah, the daughter of Pharaoh, and adopted into the court of Egypt until he learned that he was Hebrew and killed the Egyptian.
To fill in those missing years, we turned to ancient historians such as Philo and Josephus.
Philo wrote at the time that
Jesus of Nazareth walked the Earth, and Josephus wrote some 50 years later and watched the destruction of Jerusalem by the Romans.
These historians had access to documents long since destroyed, or perhaps lost, like the Dead Sea Scrolls.
The theme of this picture is whether men are to be ruled by God's law, or whether they are to be ruled by the whims of a dictator like Rameses.
Are men the property of the state, or are they free souls under God?
This same battle continues throughout the world today.
Our intention was not to create a story, but to be worthy of the divinely inspired story created 3,000 years ago: the five books of Moses.
The story takes three hours and 39 minutes to unfold.
There will be an intermission.
Thank you for your attention.
And God said, "Let there be light."
And there was light.
And from this light,
God created life upon Earth.
And man was given dominion over all things upon this Earth, and the power to choose between good and evil, but each sought to do his own will because he knew not the light of God's law.
Man took dominion over man.
The conquered were made to serve the conqueror
The weak were made to serve the strong.
And freedom was gone from the world.
So did the Egyptians cause the children of Israel to serve with rigor; and their lives were made bitter with hard bondage, and their cry came up unto God and God heard them.
And cast into Egypt, into the lowly hut of Amram and Yochabel, the seed of a man upon whose mind and heart would be written
God's law and God's commandments.
One man to stand alone against an empire.
Divine One, last night our astrologers saw an evil star
- enter into the house of Egypt.
- Meaning war?
From the frontiers of Sinai and Libya to the cataracts of the Nile.
What nation would dare draw the sword against us?
The enemy to fear is in the heart of Egypt.
What?
The Hebrew slaves in the land of Goshen.
I number my enemies by their swords, not by their chains, High Priest.
Chains have been forged into swords before now, Divine One.
Among these slaves, there is a prophecy of a deliverer who will lead them out of bondage.
The star proclaims his birth.
Then let the Hebrews die.
Slaves are wealth, Commander.
The more slaves we have, the more bricks we make.
I would still see fewer bricks made and fewer Hebrews in Goshen.
It is our eastern gate.
Since this deliverer is among their newborn, only their newborn need die.
Every newborn Hebrew man-child shall die.
So let it be written, so let it be done.
So speaks Rameses I.
No!
Oh, no!
Please! Please! No!
God of Abraham, take my child into thy hands, that he may live to thy service.
But Mother, we have not even given him a name.
God will give him a name.
Follow it, Miriam.
Watch it from the reeds.
- See where the Lord will lead him.
- Yes, Mother.
- Why didn't you say no?
- She didn't think of it.
Here! Throw!
- You're getting fat.
- Too many sesame cakes!
Catch a lotus and you catch a wish.
What will you wish for,
Tuya, gold or a man?
Gold, of course.
- Then I could have any man!
- Gold will never fill an empty heart.
Quiet, you chattering geese.
Memnet, you're only happy when you're miserable.
You fools! Talk of empty hearts before the Pharaoh's daughter.
What is there in her heart, but the memory of a dead husband?
We meant no harm, Memnet.
Look, there's something here!
Be sure it's not a crocodile!
Bithiah can charm tears from a crocodile.
What is it, Bithiah?
What did you End?
Only a drifting basket.
- Shall we come and help you get it?
- Memnet, send the girls away.
I'd rather be alone now.
Now see what you've done.
Back to the palace, all of you.
- Go on. All of you. Musicians, too.
- We wouldn't hurt Bithiah.
Bithiah's tired of you and so am I.
Off you go.
- You're tired of everything.
- Go on. Off you go.
Go on. Hurry up!
You've hurt her enough.
- What have you found?
- The answer to my prayers.
You prayed for a basket?
No. I prayed for a son.
Your husband is in the house of the dead.
And he has asked the Nile god to bring me this beautiful boy.
Do you know the pattern of this cloth?
If my son is covered in it...
...it is a royal robe.
Royal? It is the Levite cloth of a Hebrew slave.
This child was put upon the water to save its life from your father's edict.
I am the Pharaoh's daughter, and this is my son.
He shall be reared in my house as the Prince of the Two Lands.
My mother and her mother before her were branded to the Pharaoh's service.
I will not see you make this son of slaves a prince of Egypt.
You will see it, Memnet.
You will see him walk with his head among the eagles.
And you will serve him as you serve me.
Fill the ark with water.
Sink it into silence.
Raise your hands, Memnet.
What you have buried in the Nile shall remain buried in your heart.
- Swear it.
- I will be silent.
The day you break that oath will be the last your eyes shall ever see.
You will be the glory of Egypt, my son.
Mighty in words and deeds.
Kings shall bow before you.
Your name will live when the pyramids are dust.
And...
...because I drew you from the water, you shall be called Moses.
Moses! Moses!
Moses...
He proclaims his coming from afar, does he not, my son?
Such favor with the people can be dangerous, Great Sethi.
To whom, Rameses? To me or to you?
It would not be the first time that fame has turned a prince against his Pharaoh.
Or that envy has turned a brother against his brother.
Envy is for the weak.
And beauty is for the strong.
That is what you have in mind.
If you mean Nefretiri, yes, my father.
Is it the princess' beauty that attracts you, Rameses, or the fact that she must marry the man
I choose to follow me on the throne?
I am the son of your body.
Who else could be your heir?
The man best able to rule Egypt will follow me.
I owe that to my fathers, not to my sons.
- Then I shall follow you.
- Shall you?
Do not let ambition shave your prince's lock.
I sent Moses to destroy a city.
He returns in triumph.
I sent you to build a city.
Where is it?
It will rise when I have put fear into the stiff-necked
Hebrew slaves who build it.
But this I know, my father: no pretended brother will ever have your crown...
...or Nefretiri.
Indeed?
Whoever I choose shall have my crown...
...and Nefretiri.
I think I see him, Memnet.
Moses...
Yes, I can see him!
Moses!
Listen, Memnet. Listen.
The trumpets tell all the world he's come back to me.
Hear them.
And all those shouts are drowned by the beating of my heart.
- Moses!
- Do you hear, Memnet?
- The whole city calls his name.
- I hear them, Nefretiri.
The Lord Moses, Prince of Egypt, son of the Pharaoh's sister, beloved of the Nile god, commander of the Southern Host.
Welcome home!
- Prince Moses!
- The blessings of the god Amun-Ra be upon you, Great Prince.
He has brought down the pride of Ethiopia.
- Yes, that is...
- The old windbag.
- I agree with him.
- May your name be exalted on Earth, o' conqueror, even as the sun is exalted in the heavens.
Welcome to my sister's son.
We have heard how you took ibis from the Nile to destroy the venomous serpents used against you when you laid siege to the city of Saba.
May my arms stay strong in your service, Great Sethi.
Who is this fair young god come into the house of Pharaoh?
No need to tell you how I share her joy at your return-
No need, my brother.
Great one, I bring you Ethiopia!
Command them to kneel before Pharaoh.
Command what you have conquered, my brother.
I bring the Ethiopian king and his sister in friendship, as an ally to guard our southern gates.
My son has dealt wisely with you,
Ethiopia. Welcome as a friend.
Great king, I will ask but one favor of your friendship.
This green stone from our mountains, that I may give it to your
Prince of Egypt, for he is kind, as well as wise.
It is pleasing to the gods to see a man honored by his enemies.
And such a beautiful enemy!
See to their comfort.
Divine One, here is the full count of Ethiopia's tribute.
Bearers!
I am sending down the Nile 20 full barges of such wealth as you see here.
Logs of ebony and trees of myrrh, all for your new treasure city.
A handsome tribute indeed, Moses.
Unfortunately,
I have no new treasure city.
And you will have none.
The stiff-necked slaves die more willingly
- than bend their backs in your service.
- Why?
They believe a deliverer has come to lead them from their bondage.
Deliverer? Deliverer?!
He has been foretold by every falling star since my father's time.
Now, you make him an excuse for your failure to build my city.
I am not one to make excuses-
If you doubt me, let Moses build a city.
No! No.
He's just trying to keep Moses away from you, Sethi.
Or you, perhaps.
I think our roosters would crow more softly on another roof.
Stand before me, both of you.
Would you please your Pharaoh, Moses?
- Your wish is my will.
- Then you build my city.
A wise decision.
A noble task.
Rameses, do you believe this slave deliverer is a myth?
What I believe is of no account.
What matters is the slaves believe in him.
Of course, of course.
Then you, too, shall go to Goshen-
Learn if this deliverer be a myth or a man.
If a myth, bring him to me in a bottle.
If a man, bring him to me in chains.
So let it be written, so let it be done.
Your fragrance is like the wine of Babylon.
I could...
But you are the throne princess, and by the Pharaoh's law, you can marry only a Pharaoh.
I shall marry a Pharaoh...
...you.
Rameses might not agree with that idea.
But Sethi might.
While you were gone,
I kept your name on his lips, your praises in his ears.
But now, unless you can succeed, you'll be the prince of some desert province and I'll be Rameses' wife. Oh, Moses!
Build a city for him, and Sethi will deny you nothing.
I will build the city for love of Sethi, not for the throne of Egypt.
But I am Egypt.
Now, the flame you lighted burns close to the throne.
Your tongue would dig your grave, Memnet.
A conqueror already conquered?
The first face I looked for and the last I find. Mother.
I was thanking the gods for your safe return.
But I find you in grave danger here.
In intoxicating danger, Mother.
Marry her if you can, my son, but never fall in love with her.
I'll be less trouble to him than the Hebrew slaves of Goshen.
Goshen?
You've guzzled enough.
Bring those bricks up and get on.
You, there's other swine to water.
Water girl! Water!
Get those bricks back on.
Here! Water lily!
My name is Lilia.
To me you are a lily, and I want water.
Joshua...
Joshua, I thought you'd never come down.
Water before love, my girl.
Does it take the whole Nile to quench your thirst?
No, just your lips.
Be careful, my love.
Dathan's eyes can see through stone.
Dathan is a vulture feeding on the flesh of his own people.
When he looks at me, I'm afraid.
If he touches you,
I'll strangle him with his own whip.
And bring death to 1,000 others?
Is life in bondage better than death?
Joshua, we must have hope.
God will send us the deliverer.
Hope? On the heels of every hope walks Dathan.
You're Dathan, the Hebrew overseer.
Chief Hebrew overseer, mighty one.
Baka, the master builder, has told me that I can rely on you.
I am warmed by his favor.
Rely on you to sell your own mother for a price.
And who am I to deny the word of the master builder?
Where is this would-be deliverer who would set the Hebrews free?
Who can say, immortal prince?
They do not confide in me.
- But it is possible to learn.
- No doubt.
You have rat's ears and a ferret's nose.
To use in your service, son of Pharaoh.
Add to them the eyes of a weasel and find me this deliverer.
Lean your backs into it!
Old woman! Old woman!
More grease under the center stone.
- Yochabel!
- Help me!
Stop the stone!
Keep pulling up there.
Yochabel is caught. Stop the stone!
Come on, pull!
Pull!
Pull!
- Pull!
- You'll kill her! Stop the stone!
We don't stop a moving block for an old woman.
Lay on the lash! Keep it moving!
Stop the stone! Stop the stone!
Hold the ropes!
Water! Water!
- Cut the old woman loose.
- She'll stay where she is, and you'll die in the lion pits.
- Joshua!
- Run to the prince and beg mercy.
- Mercy from Rameses?!
- No, no.
The Prince Moses, there on the pavilion.
- After her! After her!
- Hold him!
Stop her!
Stop that girl!
The water girl, stop her!
Stop that girl! Stop her!
Mercy, Prince Moses!
- Mercy, Prince Moses!
- Come here.
- Mercy? What have you done?
- Not for myself, Lord Prince.
For a slave who saved old Yochabel and me from death between the granite blocks.
A delicate flower to be pressed between walls of stone.
How were you saved?
A stonecutter struck the overseer.
There can be only one punishment for the stonecutter.
Blood makes poor mortar. Come.
Prince Moses!
Get away, you!
Would you bury the old woman alive in a tomb of rock?
My noble one, it caught.
I had not the strength to free myself.
Your shoulder should not bear a burden, old woman.
The Lord has renewed my strength and lightened my burdens.
He would have done better to remove them.
They use the old ones to do the work of greasing the stones, Lord Prince.
If they are killed, it is no loss.
Are you a master builder or a master butcher?
If we stopped moving stones for every grease woman who falls, the city would never rise.
If the slaves are not driven they will not work.
If their work lags, it is because they are not fed.
You seem strong enough.
I am a stonecutter.
The Pharaohs like their images cut deep.
Hold your whip!
You know it is death to strike an Egyptian?
I know it.
- Yet you struck him? Why?
- To save the old woman.
- What is she to you?
- An old woman.
Lord Prince, send him to his death.
The man has courage.
You do not speak like a slave.
God made men.
- Men made slaves.
- Which god?
The God of Abraham, the Almighty God.
If your god is almighty, why does he leave you in bondage?
He will choose the hour of our freedom and the man who will deliver us.
- Lord Prince, this man speaks treason.
- It is not treason to want freedom.
Release him.
Difficulty with the slaves, my brother?
None that could not be cured by a ration of grain and a day of rest.
A day of rest?
When your horses tire, they're rested.
When they hunger, they're fed.
Slaves draw stone and brick.
My horses draw the next Pharaoh.
Is there any grain stored here in Goshen?
None that you would dare take, my brother.
The temple granaries are full.
Bring the push-pole men and some women with baskets.
I will... great prince.
I warn you, Moses, the temple grain belongs to the gods.
What the gods can digest will not sour in the belly of a slave.
- Push-pole men!
- You, back where you belong!
I have the prince's orders.
One and two poles, up!
- Bring 100 women with baskets.
- Elisheba, bring your basket.
Push-polers, follow me.
Out of the way!
Break open the bins.
Out of the way. Stand back.
Well, well.
Divine One.
There!
My jackals have your hounds at bay-
Dogs at bay are dangerous.
When they walk upright and feed on temple grain.
Of course. You've been bringing petitions against Moses for months.
Well, the city's being built and I'm winning this game, so don't interrupt us with trifles.
Before your city is finished, these trifles will surprise you.
Life is full of surprises.
And today I have one for you, my kitten.
Moses!
And Rameses.
You crocodile!
Triples. You've lost.
I'll never let you win again.
You thought that by losing to me you would win for Moses.
Well, you know, crowns are sometimes lost by smiles and dimples.
- And so is patience.
- Yours?
Are the plans for my jubilee complete?
All but your proclamation for the marriage of Prince Rameses to Nefretiri.
No.
Are you quite sure it will be Rameses?
Who else could be your successor?
Moses, of course.
Because of Moses there is no wheat in the temple granaries.
You don't look any leaner. You're both very generous with your advice.
Will you take mine?
No, I will choose my own successor-
Did you lose your head, my sweet?
I sent you to Goshen to bring me the head of the jackal who would free the slaves.
Where is it?
The slaves do not need a deliverer now.
- They have Moses.
- Is that a riddle?
He gives them the priests' grain and one day in seven to rest.
They call it the day of Moses.
- This man makes himself a god.
- I prefer him as a man.
You would prefer him as Pharaoh.
- Are you afraid of Moses?
- Yes.
'Cause now he holds Ethiopia in his left hand,
Goshen in his right, and you, my Pharaoh, are in between them.
Do you imply that he would raise the slaves against me?
- I've been his father.
- Ambition knows no father.
Moses could no more betray you than I could, Sethi.
He can tell me that when he arrives.
- He will not be here, my father.
- What?
I sent for both of you.
His word is that he cannot attend you, being pressed by...
...other matters.
Did you hear that? Other matters?
My escort.
I will ride with you, my son, to see what rears itself in Goshen, a city or treason.
You lying adder! You'll destroy yourself with your own venom if you try to turn Sethi against Moses.
You would turn Sethi against me.
Remember, my sweet, that you must be wife to the next Pharaoh, that you're going to be mine, all mine, like my dog or my horse or my falcon.
Only I will love you more, and trust you less.
You will never do the things to me you would have done to Moses.
I know you, my sweet.
You're a sharp-clawed, treacherous little peacock.
But you're food for the gods, and I'm going to have all of you.
None of me.
Did you think my kiss was a promise of what you'll have?
No, my pompous one, it was to let you know what you will not have.
I could never love you.
Does that matter?
You will be my wife.
You will come to me whenever I call you.
And I will enjoy that very much.
Whether you enjoy it or not is your own affair.
But I think you will.
That drop puts too much strain on the stone. We need more sand.
I'm going to risk it, Baka.
There's little time till the day of jubilee.
If the stone cracks, you may crack with it.
Ready blue signal.
Blue pennant.
Blue pennant!
- The snubber is ready.
- Green pennant.
Mallet men, ready!
Mallet men, ready, stand by!
Clear the main hawser!
Mallet men ready.
You are not pleased to see me here.
I am, Great Pharaoh, but now
I have important things to do.
Red pennant, stand by.
So Rameses tells me.
More important things than obeying my orders?
You ordered me to finish this city-
The strain in that stone is too great-
We cannot wait. Red pennant.
Red pennant... strike!
- The stone will break.
- There are 2,000 slaves on the ropes.
There is the obelisk of your jubilee.
Baka, put 1,000 slaves to removing the sand until the stone settles to its base.
- Pharaoh is pleased?
- With the obelisk, yes, but not with certain accusations made against you.
By whom?
- You raided the temple granaries?
- Yes.
- You gave the grain to the slaves?
- Yes.
You gave them one day in seven to rest.
Yes-
Did you do all of this to gain their favor?
A city is built of brick, Pharaoh.
The strong make many.
The starving make few.
The dead make none.
So much for accusations.
Now, judge the results.
The pylons commemorate your victory at Kadesh, where you broke the Amorites.
- Are there any higher in Egypt?
- There are none higher in the world.
With so many slaves, you could build... an army.
But I have built a city.
Sixteen of these lions of Pharaoh will guard its gates.
And it shall be the city of Sethi's glory.
Are these slaves loyal to Sethi's glory, or to you, Moses?
The slaves worship their god...
...and I serve only you.
Let your own image proclaim my loyalty for a thousand years.
Superb!
Rameses.
And this you call treason?
Who would take a throne by force that he has earned by deeds?
With this and Ethiopia, your name shall be carved beside mine on every pylon.
Yours, Rameses, will be nowhere.
In my judgment book, you have accused your brother falsely.
Come.
Great Pharaoh, he is the son of your body.
I need no help, Moses, to hold what is mine.
I decide what is yours.
Come with me, Moses.
Will you lose the throne because Moses builds a city?
The city that he builds shall bear my name.
The woman that he loves shall bear my child.
So it shall be written.
So it shall be done.
Yes. This is for the temple ceremony.
This...
This...
...is for my wedding night.
You will never wear it.
Why not?
I have brought you a cloth more revealing. Send them away.
Go, then, while I hear what this puckered old persimmon has to say.
Well? What croakings of doom have you today?
You prepare for a marriage that will never be.
You've been drinking honey wine!
I shall not let the Pharaoh and Rameses be betrayed.
Why should a slave care which Pharaoh rules?
For 30 years, I have been silent.
Now, all the kings of Egypt cry out to me from their tombs,
"Let no Hebrew sit upon our throne."
What are you saying?
Rameses has the blood of many kings.
- And Moses?
- He is lower than the dust.
Not one drop of royal blood flows through his veins.
He is the son of Hebrew slaves.
I'll have you torn into so many pieces, even the vultures won't find them.
Who hatched this lie? Rameses?
Rameses does not know... yet.
You will repeat this to Bithiah!
It was Bithiah who drew a slave child from the Nile, called him son and Prince of Egypt, blinding herself to the truth and the pain of an empty womb.
Were you alone with Bithiah?
A little girl led me to the Hebrew woman Yochabel, that the child might be suckled by his true mother.
Take care, old frog.
You croak too much against Moses.
Would you mingle the blood of slaves with your own?
He will be my husband.
I shall have no other.
Then use this to wrap your first-born.
Torn from a Levite's robe.
It was Moses' swaddling cloth.
And your shroud!
You think I care whose son he is?
- Rameses cares.
- You won't live to tell him.
Nefretiri?
Nefretiri! Have you closed your doors to make a beggar of a prince?
I'm the beggar, Moses, begging you to hold me in your arms. Kiss me.
Just kiss me.
You're no beggar, my love.
You're a conqueror, and I am your captive for life.
One lifetime will not be half enough.
You will be King of Egypt.
And I will be your footstool.
A man stupid enough to use you for a footstool would not be wise enough to rule Egypt.
Princess!
Princess, the raven has dropped a black feather at your door.
- Who can...?
- No, Moses, leave the world outside.
Pardon, pardon, royal one.
- The old nurse, Memnet...
- Go away.
- I don't want to hear anything.
- What about Memnet?
She's dead. She must have fallen from the balcony.
I will not hear unhappy things tonight.
Go away!
Old Memnet must have walked that balcony a thousand times.
What is the death of one slave to us?
She was a faithful servant to you.
Can one so rich in love be so poor in pity?
What kind of a woman holds me captive?
One who loves you and will not lose you.
One who will be your wife. Nothing in the world can change that. Nothing.
Neither Rameses' princely plots nor Memnet's evil lies.
You've heard Memnet grumbling all your life.
Why should it upset you now?
Because she grumbled against you.
Oh, let her threats be buried with her.
Look, the night's a crown of stars, and the darkness a robe of forgetfulness.
Come, love. Let's share them.
We'll use the moon for a scepter.
- A piece of Hebrew cloth!
- Memnet may have dropped it.
Memnet was not Hebrew.
Why would she bring this here?
- I don't know.
- Yes, you do.
- Tell me.
- She was taking it to Rameses...
- ...to destroy you.
- To de...?
How could Rameses destroy me with a piece of cloth?
Moses, Moses, why do you question me? Why do you care? Yes!
I killed her.
What does it matter?
A hundred slaves die every day.
- What's done is forgotten.
- It is not forgotten.
What is this cloth to do with me? Tell me.
It will make no difference between us?
How could it make a difference?
A child was wrapped in it.
- What child?
- Bithiah took him from the river.
Memnet was with her.
Who was this child?
Memnet is dead. No one need know who you are. I love you.
I killed for you.
I'll kill anyone that comes between us.
Why did you kill for me, Nefretiri?
If you love me, do not lie.
Who was the child?
Hold me in your arms.
Hold me... close.
You were not born
Prince of Egypt, Moses...
...but the son of Hebrew slaves.
You believe that?
I'll believe anything you want me to believe.
Say you are not,
I'll believe you are not.
Love cannot drown truth, Nefretiri.
You do believe it, or you would not have killed Memnet.
I love you.
That's the only truth I know.
Did this child of the Nile have a mother?
Memnet called her Yochabel.
I will ask Bithiah.
How could you doubt me?
You did not doubt me when I held you as you took your first step.
It's a wicked lie spun by Rameses.
Mother, did Rameses spin this?
The word of your mother against a piece of cloth found by Memnet?
How did you know it was Memnet?
Who else? Memnet nursed Rameses.
She shall pay for spreading his lies.
- She has paid.
- She's dead?
At the hand of Nefretiri.
Put away any fears or suspicions that may remain with you, my son.
Why, your will will be law in Egypt when you are crowned and sceptered as her king.
Memnet spoke of a Hebrew woman named Yochabel.
Did you ever know her?
No.
Yours was the face
I saw above my cradle, the only mother I've ever known.
Wherever I am led or whatever I must do,
I will always love you.
My chariot. I will drive to Goshen.
A chariot here in Goshen?
- You know who I am?
- It has been many years, great one.
- Who are they?
- All that remain of my children.
I will speak to you alone.
Why have you...?
- Why have you come here?
- Because Moses will come here.
- My son?
- No, my son.
And that's all that he must know.
My lips might deny him, great one, but my eyes never could.
You shall leave Goshen, you and your family, tonight.
We are Levites, appointed shepherds of Israel.
We cannot leave our people.
Would you take from Moses all that I have given him?
Would you undo all that I have done for him?
I have put the throne of Egypt within his reach.
- What can you give him in its place?
- I gave him life.
I gave him love!
Was it your hand that dried his tears?
And when he was troubled, was it your heart that ached for him?
Yes-
My heart ached for him.
And my arms ached to hold him, but I dared not even touch the hem of his garment.
His heritage from me could only have been misery, poverty and the lash.
No, I will not take from him the glory and riches you have given him.
For this you shall be well cared for.
You and your family shall be taken from Goshen tonight.
No matter where you send me, if the God of Abraham has a purpose for my son, he will come to know it and fulfill it.
Come, gather your things, quickly.
Quickly.
I shall see you want for nothing.
You and your children shall be given freedom.
Has my mother forgotten?
Only the Pharaoh can free a slave.
Moses! Do not enter.
There is only sorrow here.
Are you comforting it, my mother?
I followed you here to find this woman, Yochabel...
You were the woman who was caught between the stones.
- Until you came.
- My son, if you love me...
I love you, my mother, but am I your son?
Or yours?
No, you are not my son.
If you believe that men and women are cattle to be driven under the lash, if you can bow before idols of stone and golden images of beasts...
...you are not my son.
My son would be a slave.
His hands would be gnarled and broken from the brick pits, his back scarred from the taskmaster's whip, but in his heart would burn the spirit of the living God.
Does this god demand a scarred back and broken hands as the price of his favor?
This desert god is the hope of the hopeless.
Your place is in the palace halls.
You have mounted to the sun on golden wings.
You belong to me, to Nefretiri, to Sethi, to all those who love you.
Do they love less who have no hope?
Will you swear in the name of this god that you are not my mother?
We do not even know his name.
Then look into my eyes and tell me you are not my mother.
Oh, Moses, Moses! I cannot, I cannot.
I am your brother Aaron.
I am Miriam, your sister.
- I am your brother Moses.
- No! Get ready to leave. Hurry!
They're going away, Moses.
The secret's going with them.
No one need ever know the shame I brought upon you.
Shame?
What change is there in me?
Egyptian or Hebrew, I am still Moses.
These are the same hands, the same arms, the same face that were mine a moment ago.
A moment ago, you were her son, the strength of Egypt.
Now, you are mine, a slave of Egypt.
You find no shame in this?
There is no shame in me. How can I feel shame for the woman who bore me?
- Or the race that bred me?
- God of my fathers.
Moses, what will you do?
This is the binding tie...
...and here I will stay.
- Moses...
- To find the meaning of what I am.
Why a Hebrew, or any man, must be a slave.
Put back your things.
You are not leaving.
Moses?
Has she done more for you than I?
Will the life she gave you be more useful in the black pits of slavery?
Cannot justice and truth be served better upon a throne where all men may benefit from your goodness and strength?
I do not know what power shapes my way, but my feet are set upon a road that I must follow.
Forgive me, Bithiah.
God of our fathers, who has appointed an end to the bondage of Israel, blessed am I among all mothers in the land, for my eyes have beheld thy deliverer.
Thou shalt not muzzle the ox that treadeth out the com, making straw for the bricks of Egypt, nor spare the arms that endlessly winnow the grain in the wind to separate the wheat from the chaff wheat borne stolidly on the backs of countless slaves from the heavy-laden Nile boats to the teeming shore.
Endlessly they plod beneath the sheaves of wheat and endlessly return for more.
A golden harvest to the threshers, a grain safe to feed the masters, bitterness to feed the slaves, and to feed the brick pits, straw, carried on the bowed backs of women down into the never-ending valley of toil and agony, stretching mile after mile.
An inferno of mud-soaked bodies, where the treaders' feet churn clay and straw into the mixture for the Pharaoh 's bricks.
And everywhere the lash of watchful taskmasters ready to sting the backs of the weary.
Blades chopping straw.
Mattocks chopping clay.
A ceaseless cycle of unending drudgery.
From the mixing feet of treaders to the pouring hands of brick molders moves the constant stream of mud, the lowly seed of tall cities, day after day, year after year; century after century.
Bondage without rest, toil without reward.
These are the children of misery, the afflicted, the hopeless, the oppressed.
And he went out unto his brethren and looked on their burdens.
Water girl!
Here, here's water.
That's a hard dance you do, old man.
We've been dancing it for 400 years...
...to grim music.
And the only deliverer that has come to us is death.
Back to work, you braying mules.
You're strange to the pits.
Your back is unscarred.
You bring a warm smile with your cool water.
My smile is for a stonecutter.
- The water is for you.
- I thank you.
Your voice is not strange.
- You are...?
- One of many who thirst.
You there!
Come here.
That is Baka, the master builder.
- Does he call me or you?
- You! Water girl! I'm thirsty.
He does not thirst for water.
Beauty is but a curse to our women.
- Water, noble one?
- No, wine... the wine of beauty.
What beauty can my lord find in these mud pits?
The lotus flower blooms in the Nile's gray mud.
Dathan, she will do well as a house slave.
Do not take me from my people!
There would be danger.
Danger from such lovely hands?
There are other hands, strong enough to kill.
Our mud flower has a thorn.
Oh, please, Lord Baka, I beg you.
Tears..-
When you have been bathed in scented water, when your limbs have been caressed by sweet oils and your hair combed with sandalwood, there will be no time for tears.
She is not worthy of your magnificence.
Let my eyes...
Your eyes had best find the deliverer,
Dathan, or you will have no eyes.
Bring the girl.
May the hand of God strike him.
Dance, you mud turtles, dance!
You rot our bodies, steal hope from our souls.
Must you also shame and defile our women?
Dance, you squealing goat!
We are not animals, we are men, made in the image of God.
This will change your image.
Dance, you.
Get that straw cutter.
Leave him, or you'll be murdered with him.
I'll not leave a man to die in the mud.
Thank you, my son.
But death is better than bondage, for my days are ended and my prayer unanswered.
What prayer, old man?
That before death closed my eyes
I might behold the deliverer who will lead all men to freedom.
What deliverer could break the power of Pharaoh?
You, mud-carriers, throw this carrion to the vultures.
You, take his place.
And dance the straw into the mud, you dogs.
Clear a path there!
Clear a path!
Stand aside, you. Make way.
Clear a path.
Come on, get back. Out of the way!
Keep your eyes on the ground.
I need another oarsman for my barge, a strong slave.
- Your word is our will, great lady.
- The large one there.
- You, come up here.
- No, not that one.
The very dirty one there.
Yes, that one.
He may serve my purpose.
You!
You! Out of the pit!
Out of the way!
Back to work!
Clear a path!
Stand aside, you.
Back to work!
Clear a path!
First friend of the Pharaoh, keeper of the royal seal,
Prince of On, Prince of Memphis,
Prince of Thebes, beloved of the Nile god, conqueror of Ethiopia, general of generals, commander of the Egyptian Host...
...a man of mud!
Is that what you want? To be a slave?
Then why aren't you kneeling at the feet of a princess?
I'm afraid the mud pits have stiffened my knees, royal one.
Shall I call back the guards?
- Do you think they could bend them?
- Oh, Moses! Moses!
You stubborn, splendid, adorable fool.
I'm not kneeling to a princess.
No. You are kneeling to a woman who's been worried about you day and night since you disappeared.
What is there in the mud of these slave pits
- that could keep you from my arms?
- My people.
They may be your people, but do you have to wallow with them?
Smell like them?
If they are stained, it's with the mud of slavery.
If they reek, it's with the stench of injustice.
If you want to help your people, come back to the palace.
And hide the truth from Sethi?
That I am Hebrew and a slave?
The truth would break his dear old heart and send Bithiah into exile or death.
Think of us and stop hearing the cries of your people.
Their god does not hear their cry.
Will Rameses hear it if he is Pharaoh?
No. He would grind them into the clay they mold, double their labors.
What about me?
Think of me as his wife.
Do you want to see me in Rameses' arms?
- No.
- Then come back with me.
Oh, Moses! The gods have fashioned you for greatness.
The splendor of your name will last beyond the pyramids.
When you are Pharaoh, you can free your people, worship whatever gods you please, so long as I can worship you.
I will come to you at the palace on the day of Sethi's jubilee.
Come with me now.
No, my love.
First I have a call to make on the master builder.
No, no, no, no, no.
Not red with the sammur gown.
My eyes can best be used elsewhere,
Lord Baka.
Before you go, let them look upon what you thought unworthy.
You would let beauty such as this go unseen?
You would let such a flower go ungathered?
Dathan, you can see only mud, so pick up her muddy clothes and go.
Go, all of you.
Did you know, my dear, that this golden web was spun from the beards of shellfish?
- Please let me go to my home.
- You are at home.
Here, taste this.
The blood of Thracian grapes, the wine of love.
No wine can change my love.
Then your love shall be my wine.
There's fire in the chariot house!
The chariot house.
Guards! Guards!
You women take water to the roof.
Dathan, take charge. Guards, after him.
Pull it out of the shed.
Take it clear of the house.
No, no, your wings must not be singed, my dove, at least not by that fire.
- Joshua!
- Run, Lilia, run! The way is clear.
The master builder will not follow.
Neither will you, stonecutter.
Bind him between the columns.
See that his arms are tightly stretched.
You will die on your feet, stonecutter.
He'll cut him to pieces.
Now, go after the girl!
- Don't come back without her.
- We'll find her.
You foolish, stupid man!
I would have kept her only a short while.
She would have returned to you, shall we say, more worthy.
Now, to whom shall I return Lilia?
You will not be there, Joshua.
You've seen me drive my chariot.
I can flick a fly from my horse's ear without breaking the rhythm of his stride.
You've seen me use my whip.
You make no outcry, Joshua.
But you will.
You will cry for the mercy of death.
One day you will listen to the cry of slaves.
This is not that day, Joshua.
You hold your tongue almost as well as I hold my temper.
It's a pity to kill so strong a stonecutter.
- Death will bring death, Baka.
- Who are you?
One who asks what right you have to kill a slave.
The right of a master to kill you or any slave.
- Then kill me, master butcher!
- Moses!
Why have you done this?
- Where is the girl, Lilia?
- Gone.
Why are you dressed as a slave?
Why does a prince of Egypt kill the Pharaoh's master builder to save a Hebrew?
I am Hebrew.
God of Abraham.
Four hundred years we've waited.
The Pharaoh's soldiers won't wait so long.
The Almighty has heard our cries from bondage.
You are the chosen one.
- I know nothing of your god.
- He knows you, Moses.
He has brought you to us.
You cannot turn your back upon us.
You will deliver us. The finger of God points the way to you.
- Where was his body found?
- Buried in the sand, royal one.
This is BakaÂ’s knife.
But there was no wound on the body.
Baka was a powerful man. It would take strong hands to break him.
The slave, Joshua, is a stonecutter.
Go find me this Joshua.
Joshua's strength didn't kill the master builder.
Now speaks the rat that would be my ears.
Too many ears tie a rat's tongue.
Go. All of you.
Well? Who killed him?
I am poor man, generous one.
What I bring is worth much.
I have paid you much and you have brought me nothing.
Now I bring you the world... true son of Pharaoh.
You offer me the world when you cannot even bring me the deliverer.
Who killed Baka?
- The deliverer.
- Would you play at words with me?
No, lord prince.
This murderer has now fled to some distant land?
No, lord prince.
Name him!
One who made himself a prince and judge over us.
If he knew I were here, he would kill me as he killed the Egyptian.
I will hang you myself if you tire me further.
There are those who would pay much for what my eyes have seen.
You haggle with me like a seller of melons in the marketplace?
No, I will not haggle, great prince.
Here's your money.
But for ten talents of fine gold,
I'll give you the wealth of Egypt.
Give me my freedom and I'll give you the scepter.
Give me the water girl, Lilia, and I'll give you the princess of your heart's desire.
Give me this house of Baka, and I'll give you the throne.
Give me all that I ask...
...or give me leave to go.
I will give you more than leave to go.
I will send you where you belong.
I belong in your service, glorious one.
Very well.
I will bargain with you.
If what you say pleases me,
I will give you your price, all of it.
If not, I will give you the point of this blade through your lying throat.
- Agreed?
- Agreed.
The deliverer...
...is Moses.
Draw one more breath to tell me why Moses or any other Egyptian would deliver the Hebrews.
Moses is not Egyptian.
He's Hebrew.
The son of slaves.
I will pay your price.
Imagine poor Nefretiri, not knowing in which bed she will sleep.
- I'd be happy in either.
- But where is Prince Moses?
No Moses, no jubilee.
I am told, my tiger lily, they're wagering against me.
Two golden debens to one.
Yes. I wagered five myself!
You'll lose your debens if Moses keeps me waiting any longer.
I double the wager. I'll watch for Moses, you watch the dance!
While you wait to honor Moses,
I will honor Sethi's jubilee...
...with a gift.
Strange gift.
You said if the deliverer were a myth,
- to bring him in a bottle.
- The bottle is empty.
Yes. It is empty because he is not a myth.
- You have found such a man?
- Yes, my father.
I have found him in the midst of treachery and treason, with the blood of your master builder red upon his hands.
Shall I summon him to Pharaoh's justice?
Summon him!
- Bring the Hebrew in.
- Bring the Hebrew in.
Moses.
Great Pharaoh...
...I stand in the shadow of your justice.
Whose work is this?
I warned you of his treason, my father.
- Treason?
- Judge now if I spoke truly.
The evil star foretold him as the destroyer of Egypt and deliverer of slaves.
It is not possible. A prince of Egypt?
He is not a prince of Egypt.
He is not the son of your sister.
He is the son of Hebrew slaves.
Speak... my son.
I am the son of Amram and Yochabel.
Hebrew slaves.
My brother, it was I who deceived you, not Moses.
- He was only a child.
- Leave me.
I shall not see your face again.
Moses, come to me.
I do not care who you are or what you are or what they may say about you, but I want to hear from your own lips that you are not a traitor, that you would not lead these people in revolt against me.
Tell me, Moses. I will believe you.
I am not this deliverer you fear.
It would take more than a man to lead the slaves from bondage.
It would take a god.
But if I could free them,
I would.
What has turned you against me?
From the time my sister brought you to the court, I loved you, reared you, set you before my own son, because I saw in you a worth and a greatness above other men.
No son could have more love for you than I.
Then why are you forcing me to destroy you?
What evil has done this to you?
The evil that men should turn their brothers into beasts of burden, to slave and suffer in dumb anguish, to be stripped of spirit and hope and faith, only because they're of another race, another creed.
If there is a God, he did not mean this to be so.
What I have done,
I was compelled to do.
So be it.
What I do now,
I am compelled to do.
No! No!
Rameses,
Egypt shall be yours.
Hear what I say, Rameses.
When I cross the river of death, you will be Pharaoh in Egypt.
Harden yourself against subordinates.
Put no faith in a brother.
Have no friend.
Trust no woman.
I protected the helpless,
I nourished the orphan.
Great one!
He who ate my bread and called me father would make rebellion against me.
What manner of death do you decree for him?
I cannot speak it.
Let it be as you will.
I will not live if you must die!
The feet of a Hebrew slave is not the right place for the next queen of Egypt.
Take him away.
- Do not look upon him.
- Traitor to Pharaoh.
Let the name of Moses be stricken from every book and tablet.
Stricken from all pylons and obelisks.
Stricken from every monument of Egypt.
Let the name of... Moses...
...be unheard and unspoken, erased from the memory of men for all time.
No, Moses.
It is I who will possess all of her.
You think when you are in my arms it will be his face you will see, not mine?
Yes. Only his face.
I defeated you in life.
You shall not defeat me by your death.
The dead are not scorched in the desert of desire.
They do not suffer from the thirst of passion or stagger blindly towards some mirage of lost love.
But you, Hebrew, will suffer all these things...
- ...by living.
- You will let him live!
I will not make him a martyr for you to cherish.
No phantom will come between you and me in the night.
Yes, my sweet. I will let him live.
Dead...
...you alone would possess him.
From where I send him there is no returning.
And you will never know if he has found forgetfulness within another woman's arms.
Now, look upon each other for the last time.
Now, look for the first time,
Abiram, upon the governor of Goshen.
Dathan, my brother, you have the favor of the Lord.
I prefer the gratitude of the prince.
Nearer.
Yes. Very lovely.
Not that purplish flower.
The purity of white will cool the blush of your cheek.
Leave us. All of you.
Yes, you, too, my brother.
Continue your playing, but in the house.
Yes. That's better.
A flower behind a flower.
Dathan, if you fear God, let me go.
I'm here, girl, because I put no trust in a desert god and his mud-pit prophet.
I prospered because I bowed lower than my brothers before the Egyptians.
Now, the Egyptians bow low before me.
Joshua wanted you.
Baka wanted you.
But you belong to me.
A gift from Rameses to His Excellency.
I will bow before you, Dathan.
I will work my hands raw for you.
But please...
Please do not shame me before my Lord.
Your Lord is the governor of Goshen.
What difference to my shame?
No difference to you, my dove of Canaan.
But to a condemned slave like Joshua, it could make the difference between death on the spikes and life in the copper mines of Sinai.
What would you do to influence
His Excellency's clemency?
Anything, Dathan.
Anything.
Joshua will always be grateful to you, my little mud flower.
His fate is better than the one that waits for Moses.
The slave who would be king.
Captain. Robe of state.
His Hebrew mother brought it to the prison before she died.
I'd rather this for your armor.
You will have need of a scepter.
Give me this binding pole.
Here is your king's scepter and here is your kingdom, with the scorpion, the cobra and the lizard for subjects.
Free them, if you will.
Leave the Hebrews to me.
Give this prince of Israel one day's ration of bread and water.
One day's ration?
It will take many days to cross this wilderness, if he can cross at all.
I commend you to your Hebrew god who has no name.
If you die, it will be by his hand, not by mine.
Farewell, my one-time brother.
Into the blistering wilderness of Shun the man who walked with kings now walks alone.
Torn from the pinnacle of royal power; stripped of all rank and earthly wealth, a forsaken man without a country, without a hope.
His soul in turmoil, like the hot winds and raging sands that lash him with the fury of a taskmaster's whip.
He is driven forward, always forward, by a god unknown toward a land unseen.
Into the molten wilderness of sin, where granite sentinels stand as towers of living death to bar his way.
Each night brings the black embrace of loneliness.
In the mocking whisper of the wind he hears the echoing voices of the dark.
Moses!
- Moses!
- Moses!
His tortured mind wondering if they call the memory of past triumphs or wail foreboding of disasters yet to come or whether the desert's hot breath has melted his reason into madness.
He cannot cool the burning kiss of thirst upon his lips, nor shade the scorching fury of the sun.
All about is desolation.
He can neither bless nor curse the power that moves him, for he does not know from where it comes.
Learning that it can be more terrible to live than to die, he is driven onward through the burning crucible of desert, where holy men and prophets are cleansed and purged for God's great purpose.
Until, at last, at the end of human strength, beaten into the dust from which he came, the metal is ready for the Maker's hand.
And he found strength from a fruit-laden palm tree and life-giving water; flowing from the well of Midian.
- If only sheep were men!
- Unmarried men!
- Can you think of nothing else?
- I don't know. I've never tried!
I wish sheep could learn to water themselves.
You needn't have painted your nails, Lulua.
There isn't a man from here to Horeb.
- What do you see, Sephora?
- What are you looking at?
- A man.
- What?
A man?
What kind of a man?
- A young man?
- Only one?
Is he handsome?
- Look at his sandals!
- Egyptian!
- His robe is not Egyptian.
- Who cares? He's a man.
Yes!
- He's eaten a whole bunch of dates!
- Could he be dangerous?
- Are you sure he's alive?
- I hope so!
- Do you think he's married?
- Look. There's real trouble.
- Amalekites.
- Amalekites!
- I'll talk to them.
- Talk to them? Get stones!
- They'll scatter the flock!
- Desert thieves!
- We drew this water!
- Out of the way, girl!
This is the well of Jethro, our father.
You have no right here!
Our goats don't know your father!
- Jethro's mark is on the well.
- They can't read either.
Nor can we!
- He's the Sheik of Midian!
- Then let him breed sons
- to guard it, not daughters.
- Get your hands off her!
Drive them away!
Let them be first whose hands have drawn the water.
The stranger is wise, and strong.
Drive back your goats until the sheep are watered.
All right, all right.
We should draw water for you and wash the desert dust from your feet.
- Of course we should!
- Here's fresh water.
- I have soap weed.
- Let me first remove his sandals!
Never did a lost sheep have so many shepherds.
- We have no towel.
- My veil will serve.
- But I...
- Here, let me pour the water!
- Am I to be bathed or drowned?
- I'll hold it for you.
Is it true that Egyptian girls paint their eyes?
Yes. But very few have eyes as beautiful as yours.
And who...?
Who is the brave one who stood against the Amalekites?
That's Sephora. She's the oldest.
Since you have already divided the stranger among you,
I will ask a welcome for him in our father's tent.
- Our father is Jethro.
- He's Sheik of Midian.
Strength to you, stranger.
I am Moses, son of Amram and Yochabel.
Health, prosperity, life to you,
Jethro of Midian.
Sephora has told me of your kindness.
Let us break bread while my daughter brings meat.
You have come far.
From Egypt.
Across the desert? On foot?
He who has no name surely guided your steps.
No name? You Bedouins know the god of Abraham?
Abraham is the father of many nations.
We are the children of Ishmael, his first-born.
We are the obedient of God.
My people look to him for deliverance.
But they are still in bondage.
Tomorrow we leave for the high pastures beneath God's holy mountain.
My tent would be favored if you joined us.
I am a stranger in a strange land.
I have no wealth, no skill as a shepherd.
And it is death to give sanctuary to a runaway slave.
- Slave?
- Death?
Not among our people.
You have wisdom.
You need nothing more.
And there are seven here to teach you the tasks of a shepherd.
Sephora is the eldest.
You can learn best from her.
I will dwell in this land.
- Today he sleeps.
- Who sleeps?
He who has no name.
Does your God live on this mountain?
Sinai is his high place. His temple.
If this god is God, he would live on every mountain, in every valley.
He would not be only the god of Israel or of Ishmael alone, but of all men.
It is said he created all men in his image.
And he would dwell in every heart, in every mind...
...in every soul.
I do not know about such things.
But I do know that the mountain rumbles when God is there.
And the earth trembles and the cloud is red with fire.
At such a time, has any man ever gone to see him face to face?
No man has ever set foot on the forbidden slopes of Sinai.
Why do you want to see him, Moses?
To know that he is.
And if he is, to know why he has not heard the cries of slaves in bondage.
Moses, it would be death to look upon his face.
How many of my people have died because he's turned away his face?
Can a man judge God?
No, Moses.
We cannot see his whole purpose.
Even Ishmael did not know that God drove him into the desert to be the father of a nation.
Is it not enough to know that he has saved you from the Pharaoh's anger?
How do you know that?
You walk like a prince.
And you tight like a warrior.
There is word in the caravans of a great one who was driven out of Egypt.
This is not the scepter of a prince, but the staff of a wanderer.
Then rest from wandering.
My father has many flocks, and no son to tend them.
There would be peace of spirit for you, Moses, in our tents beneath the holy mountain.
You have strong faith in this God,
Sephora.
But, for me, there is no peace of spirit until I hear the word of God, from God himself.
You haven't much time!
I wish every day was a shearing festival!
I know. And all the men following you like sheep to be sheared!
- One would be enough for me!
- If he were Moses!
Never before, my brothers, has our wool brought so rich a payment.
Because Moses has sold the whole shearing of all the tribes in one piece, at one price, to Lugal here.
His words are truth.
His trading is just.
Peace be with you, sheiks of Sinai.
Why are you dressed like that?
Aren't you going to dance with us before the sheiks?
No, I am not going to dance before the sheiks. Here.
And I am not going to be displayed like a caravan's wares before Moses or any other man.
Tonight I tend the sheep.
You needn't laugh.
Moses may not choose you either!
Moses shall no longer be a stranger among us.
- We should give him of our flocks.
- And let him choose.
I shall give him choice of my seven daughters for wife.
Seven to choose from.
- A strong son.
- A happy union.
The shadow of my wisdom has fled.
Can a man choose from among the stars of the sky?
Consider them as they dance.
Cohath, strike your bow.
- A pleasant task.
- Indeed!
A bride, a shawl.
Choose one, not all.
One shawl, one wife.
Your choice for life.
Pearls of great price.
- Which, Moses?
- Which will it be?
Make your choice, Moses.
It is a garden of many flowers, Moses.
I wish you had my years and I had your choice.
In the tent of Jethro there is dignity, honor, freedom and beauty.
All that a man could ask of life.
But my heart is still a prisoner of the past.
I... I cannot choose now.
- Strength to you, sheiks of Sinai.
- May God guide your heart.
Moses!
Tonight he is awake.
Which of my sisters did you choose?
I made no choice, Sephora.
She was very beautiful, wasn't she?
This woman of Egypt who left her scar upon your heart.
Her skin was white as curd.
Her eyes, green as the cedars of Lebanon.
Her lips, tamarisk honey.
Like the breast of a dove, her arms were soft.
And the wine of desire was in her veins.
Yes. She was beautiful...
...as a jewel.
A jewel has brilliant fire, but gives no warmth.
Our hands are not so soft, but they can serve.
Our bodies not so white, but they are strong.
Our lips are not perfumed...
...but they speak the truth.
Love is not an art to us.
It's life to us.
We are not dressed in gold and fine linen.
Strength and honor are our clothing.
Our tents are not the columned halls of Egypt, but our children play happily before them.
We can offer you little...
...but we offer all we have.
I have not little, Sephora.
I have nothing.
Nothing from some is more than gold from others.
You would fill the emptiness of my heart?
I could never fill all of it, Moses.
But I shall not be jealous of a memory.
May the gods bless you as you go to join them in the land of the dead.
The old windbag.
What an infernal fuss.
After all, dying is only a part of living.
You won't die, old crocodile.
You'll cheat death the way you cheat me at hounds and jackals.
I'm afraid he won't let me cheat the way you do.
You'll be Pharaoh by sunset, Rameses.
I hope you're content... at last.
I am content to be your son.
You have restored Egypt to her greatness.
I shall make her greatness feared among nations.
No doubt, no doubt.
You can overcome anything, but your own arrogance.
Don't exhaust yourself, great one.
- Dear great one.
- Why not, kitten?
You are the only thing I regret leaving.
You have been my joy.
- And you, my only love.
- Uh-huh.
Now you're cheating.
- There was another.
- Yes.
I know.
I loved him, too.
With my last breath,
I'll break my own law and speak the name of...
...Moses.
Moses.
The royal falcon has flown into the sun.
Did the little boy die in the desert, my father?
No. God brought Ishmael and his mother, Hagar, into a good land.
The same God who lives on the mountain?
- It may be, my son.
- Moses! Moses!
Your mother is calling.
Here!
Moses! There is a man among the sheep!
You stay...
You keep sounding the alarm, Gershom.
But stay here till your mother comes.
In the cleft, behind the rock.
Your eyes are sharp as they are beautiful.
Turfa!
Khataf! Back!
Khataf! Back!
Back, Khataf. Come down!
Moses.
Down, Turfa!
Praise God I have found you!
Joshua?
We thought you dead.
In the copper mines of Geber, the living are dead.
Sephora! Bring water.
How did you find me?
A merchant buying copper saw you in the tent of Jethro.
Here, you too will find peace.
Peace?
How can you find peace or want it, when Rameses builds cities mortared with the blood of our people?
You must lead them out of Egypt!
God made a covenant with Abraham that he would deliver the people.
Am I the hand of God?
- Sephora, give him water.
- Water! Bless you!
The desert sun has set fire to his mind.
His name is Joshua.
I once killed that he might live.
They told me you were condemned, but I knew you were chosen to take the sword of God into your hand!
I am not the man.
I am a shepherd with flocks...
That light on the mountainside...
Do you see that strange tire?
- A bush that burns?
- No.
It is on fire, but the bush does not burn.
Sephora, take him.
Serve him food in our tent.
I will turn aside and see this great sight.
Moses.
Moses.
I am here.
Put off thy shoes from off thy feet.
For the place whereon thou standest is holy ground.
I am the God of thy father.
The God of Abraham, the God of Isaac and the God of Jacob.
Lord...
Lord, why do you not hear the cries of their children in the bondage of Egypt?
I have surely seen the affliction of my people which are in Egypt.
And I have heard their cry by reason of their taskmasters.
For I know their sorrows.
Therefore, I will send thee, Moses, unto Pharaoh, that thou mayest bring my people out of Egypt.
Who am I, Lord, that you should send me?
How can I lead this people out of bondage?
What words can I speak that they will heed?
I will teach thee what thou wilt say.
When thou hast brought forth the people, they shall serve me upon this mountain.
I will put my laws into their hearts.
And in their minds will I write them.
Now, therefore, go.
And I will be with thee.
But if I say to your children that the God of their fathers has sent me, they will ask, "What is his name?"
And how shall I answer them?
I am that I am.
Thou shalt say,
"l am hath sent me unto you."
Is the holy mountain forbidden to men?
Yes. And I am afraid for him.
Then he is more than man, for look...
Look at his face.
He has seen God.
Moses... your hair... your sandals.
I stood upon holy ground.
Can you tell us, Moses?
My eyes could not look upon him.
Did he speak?
He revealed his word to my mind.
And the word was God.
Did he speak as a man?
He is not flesh but spirit.
The light of eternal mind.
And I know that his light is in every man.
Did he ask something of you?
That I go to Egypt.
You are God's messenger!
He has set the day of deliverance.
I will get water and bread that we may leave at once.
But Egypt holds death for you.
If it be his will.
Where he sends you, I shall go.
Your God is my God.
I will lead men against the armory at Migdol and get swords for the people!
It is not by the sword that he will deliver his people, but by the staff of a shepherd.
And the Lord said unto Moses,
"Go. Return into Egypt."
And Moses took his wife and his son and he returned to the land of Egypt.
And Moses took the rod of God in his hand.
Let the ambassador from Priam, king of Troy, approach the Pharaoh.
Great Pharaoh, the gift of Troy is a fabulous fabric from the land of the five rivers.
Our thanks to Priam.
It is fabulous indeed.
- It shimmers like the Nile. What is it?
- How is it made?
No one knows, great Pharaoh.
It is spun on the looms of the gods.
- They call it silk.
- The ambassador from Jericho.
What kingdom has sent you?
The kingdom of the Most High.
These must be ambassadors from...
Bedouins?
- What gifts do you bring?
- We bring you the word of God.
What is this word?
Thus sayeth the Lord God of Israel,
"Let my people go!"
The slaves are mine.
Their lives are mine.
All that they own is mine.
I do not know your God, nor will I let Israel go.
Who are you to make their lives bitter in hard bondage?
Men shall be ruled by law, not the will of other men.
Who is this God that I should let your people go?
Aaron.
Cast down my staff before Pharaoh that he may see the power of God.
In this you shall know that the Lord is God.
Mother! Mother!
He turned his staff into a cobra!
Nothing of his will harm you, my son.
The power of your God is a cheap magician's trick.
Jannes.
Mother, look!
Jannes, do you see?
Moses' serpent swallows up the others.
You gave me this staff to rule over scorpions and serpents, but God made it a rod to rule over kings.
Hear his word, Rameses, and obey.
Obey?
Moses, Moses.
Are there no magicians in Egypt that you have come back to make serpents out of sticks?
Or cause rabbits to appear?
I will give your staff a greater wonder to perform.
Bear it before your idle people and bid them make bricks without straw.
How can people make bricks without straw?
Let his staff provide them with it.
Or let them glean straw in the fields for themselves.
But their tally of bricks shall not diminish.
So let it be written.
So let it be done.
We are free!
Aaron! Aaron, when do we leave Egypt?
We do not leave Egypt.
But Moses promised us.
But you said we'd be freed!
I have brought more evil upon you.
God forgive my weak use of his strength.
- Weak use?
- Moses, what have you done to us?
It is Pharaoh's order that you be given no straw
- to make your tally of bricks.
- No straw?
How can we make bricks without straw?
You will glean the stubble of the fields by night.
And your women and children, too.
Is this the deliverer?
You've brought the wrath of Pharaoh upon us!
You put a sword in their hands to kill us!
Stone him! Stone him!
Stand aside! Come!
Follow!
There goes your deliverer.
Now, go find your straw.
Remember, the tally must be the same.
Not one brick less.
I cursed you.
Each time Rameses took me in his arms, I cursed you, not him, because I love you.
The Moses who loved you was another man.
No, he was not.
You believe you've changed, but you haven't.
You call yourself a prophet, a man of God, but I know better.
I don't believe that only the thunder of a mountain stirs your heart, as you stir mine.
Nefretiri, I have stood in the burning light of God's own presence.
It was not he who saved you just now.
I did that.
Oh, Moses, Moses.
Why, of all men, did I fall in love with the prince of fools?
But I believe anything you tell me when I'm in your arms.
Why must you deny me and yourself?
Because I am bound to a God and to a people and to a shepherd girl.
A shepherd girl?
What can she be to you?
Unless the desert sun has dulled your senses.
Does she... grate garlic on her skin?
Or is it soft as mine?
Are her lips chafed and dry as the desert sand?
Or are they moist and red like a pomegranate?
Is it the fragrance of myrrh that scents her hair?
Or is it the odor of sheep?
There is a beauty beyond the senses, Nefretiri.
Beauty like the quiet of green valleys and still waters.
Beauty of the spirit that you cannot understand.
Perhaps not.
But beauty of the spirit will not free your people, Moses.
You will come to me or they will never leave Egypt.
The fate of Israel is not in your hands, Nefretiri.
Oh, isn't it?
Who else can soften Pharaoh's heart?
Or harden it?
Yes-
You may be the lovely dust through which God will work his purpose.
Fill every jar in your house with water-
Tell the others that for seven days there will be none to drink.
- But this well has never run dry.
- And the river is high.
What does it mean?
- Whose word is that?
- One who knows.
So fill your jars or go thirsty.
- Miriam is always right.
- Yes, I'm going back for more jars.
No water for seven days.
Yes, Joshua.
She comes to the well every day.
Wait, and you will see her.
It is wise of Dathan to send you to the well, Lilia, or he might find his water poisoned.
They told me you were dead.
To all I love, Joshua, I am dead.
- Dathan?
- Yes. Dathan.
Of your own free will?
Of my own free will.
You are no man's slave.
The hour of deliverance has come.
Not for me, Joshua.
Hail to thee, great god of the Nile!
Thy life-giving waters are the blood of Egypt.
Hail to thee, maker of barley, feeder of cattle, carrier of ships, greatest of all the gods.
Pharaoh of Egypt!
You have not yet obeyed the Lord.
Let my people go!
- The point of the sword...
- Let him rave on, that men shall know him mad.
Obey the Lord, or he will raise his hand against the waters of the river.
I have come to bless the waters, you have come to curse them.
We will learn if a god of shepherds is stronger than the gods of Pharaoh.
Water of life, give drink to the desert
- and make green the meadow.
- Aaron.
Stretch out my staff against the waters.
- Look!
- There!
Where he struck the river, it bleeds.
The water turns to blood!
Blood flows from the god!
See how it spreads.
It is blood!
That you may know the power of the Lord, for seven days, Egypt will thirst.
Seven days without water!
Fill every jug and jar!
- Pestilence will be everywhere!
- Were it seven times seven days, no magician's trick will set your people free.
Sacred water, make pure the flood from which you came.
And God smote the land with all manner of plagues, but still Pharaoh 's heart was hardened.
Great one, you hear the cry of Egypt.
They would cry louder if they had to make the bricks.
- Send them away.
- The people have been plagued by thirst, they've been plagued by frogs, by lice, by flies, by sickness, by boils.
They can endure no more.
Back to your homes!
Why do you bring this worker of evil before me?
The people desert the temples.
- They turn from the gods.
- What gods?
You prophets and priests made the gods, that you may prey upon the fears of men.
When the Nile ran red,
I too was afraid, until word came of a mountain beyond the cataracts which spewed red mud and poisoned the water.
Was it the staff I gave you that caused all this?
Was it the wonder of your god that fish should die and frogs should leave the waters?
Was it a miracle that flies and lice should bloat upon their carrion and spread disease in both man and beast?
These things were ordered by themselves, not by any god!
Now, go.
That you may know these things are done of God...
...you shall see hail fall from a clear sky and burn as fire upon the ground.
You shall see darkness cover Egypt when the sun climbs high to noon.
And you shall know that God is God and bow down to his will.
Nothing of this Earth can make me bow to you, Moses.
Behold, the hail comes.
When darkness has covered Egypt for three days, your ministers will send for me.
In the three days of darkness, you have whined like frightened children in the night.
Moses said the sun would shine in three days and it is true.
Oh, great one, let his people go, or all of Egypt will be barren from the cataracts to the sea.
Will my father free the slaves?
Can taxes be collected from dead cattle and blighted harvests?
Does fear rule Egypt, or do I?
We fear no army of the Earth, but can we fight plagues with swords?
There is no shame in this.
The strongest tree bends.
It is not Pharaoh who yields to the slave, but his counselors.
I have summoned Moses at your request.
People will bless you, great one.
No other choice, Pharaoh.
Does the world bow to an empty throne?
Empty?
Does a Pharaoh harden his heart against his son?
If you let the Hebrews go, who will build his cities?
You told Moses to make bricks without straw.
Now, he tells you to make cities without bricks!
Who is the slave, and who is the Pharaoh?
Do you hear laughter, Rameses?
Yes, the laughter of kings in Babylon, in Canaan, in Troy, as Egypt surrenders to the god of slaves!
Bring the Hebrew in.
Go into the garden.
It's not good for a son of Pharaoh to see his father humbled by a son of slaves.
My son, stand beside me.
Have the days of darkness made you see the light, Rameses?
Will you now free my people?
Great one, bid the scribe read the order.
Give me the writing.
Sublime, ye Pharaoh.
You cannot resist the power of his god!
I know not his god!
Neither will I let his people go.
How long will you refuse to humble yourself before God?
If you bring another plague upon us, it is not your god but I who will turn the Nile red with blood.
As your father's father turned the streets of Goshen red with the blood of our male children!
If there is one more plague on Egypt, it is by your word that God will bring it.
And there shall be so great a cry throughout the land that you will surely let the people go.
Come to me no more, Moses, for on the day you see my face again, you will surely die.
So let it be written.
I will give this spawn of slaves and his god an answer the world will not forget!
Commander of the Host, call on the chariots from Tanis.
There shall be one more plague, only it will come upon the slaves of Goshen!
First-born of each house shall die, beginning with the son of Moses.
You are the shepherd girl that Moses married?
The queen of Egypt is beautiful, as he told me.
My husband is not here.
Is this Moses' son?
Yes, this is our son.
What do you want of us?
You need have no fear of me.
I feared only his memory of you.
You have been able to erase it?
He has forgotten both of us.
You lost him when he went to seek his God.
I lost him when he found his God.
At least he left you a son to cherish.
I am here to save his son.
- From what?
- From Pharaoh's decree that the first-born of Israel must die.
Die?
God of Abraham!
Don't let him do this!
Not to the children!
A caravan for Midian is waiting for you and your son.
My chariot will bring you to it.
I'm surprised you noticed me.
You didn't at the palace this morning, you know?
Why? Were you afraid to look at me?
What do you want, Nefretiri?
You, Moses.
Everything about us is coming to an end!
You will destroy Egypt or Egypt will destroy you.
I belong to you, Moses.
She's gone with your son to Midian.
Why would she leave?
She knew you would try to save the other children before your own son.
Save the other children? From what?
Rameses is massing the Libyan axmen, the chariots, the Sardinian swordsmen.
Why? Tell me why!
- To destroy the first-born of Israel.
- Oh, God!
My God!
Out of his own mouth comes thy judgment!
- But I have saved your son, Moses.
- It is not my son who will die!
It is... It is the first-born of Egypt!
It is your son, Nefretiri!
You would not dare strike Pharaoh's son!
In the hardness of his heart,
Pharaoh has mocked God and brings death to his own son!
But he's my son, Moses.
You would not harm my son?
By myself, I am nothing.
It is the power of God which uses me to work his will.
You would not let him do this to me.
I saved your son.
I cannot save yours.
Your god listens to you, Moses.
About midnight, the destroyer will come into the midst of Egypt and all the first-born shall die, from the first-born of Pharaoh to the first-born of his servants.
When you were Prince of Egypt, you held me in your arms.
When you were a condemned slave,
I threw myself at your feet before the court of Pharaoh.
Because I loved you, Moses.
It is the Lord who executes judgment, Nefretiri.
Go back to your son.
Your love for me is stronger than the power of any god.
You will not kill my son.
Turn from thy fierce wrath, O Lord!
Death cometh to me
To set me free
Death cometh to me...
No, Lilia, death will not come to you.
Joshua!
Joshua, you risk your life in coming here.
- You are first-born.
- So are you.
I bring lamb's blood to mark the doorposts and lintel, that the Angel of Death may pass you by.
Joshua, it is enough that you have come to me.
I am outcast among our people-
Don't save me from death, Joshua, save me from life.
Tomorrow will bring a new world for us, Lilia.
There will be no new world!
And no blood on this door!
Dathan, it will save her life!
Moses has God's promise!
Moses has words, Pharaoh has spears.
Remember, Joshua, of her own free will she's mine.
And under his wing shalt thou trust
"Though we stand in the shadow of death, the Lord is our God.
The Lord is one."
"The Lord is our God.
The Lord is one."
His truth shall be thy shield
"Shield us through this night of terror, O King of the Universe."
Why is everyone afraid?
Why is this night different from all others?
Because this night the Lord our God will deliver us from the bondage of Egypt.
Thou shalt not be afraid for the terror by night
Stand all!
- Pharaoh's soldiers!
- Or worse!
Or from the arrow that flyeth by day
Bithiah!
In fear of your god, they have set me free.
May a stranger enter?
There are no strangers among those who seek God's mercy.
My bearers?
All who thirst for freedom may come with us.
The darkness of death will pass over us tonight.
Tomorrow the light of freedom will shine upon us
- as we go forth from Egypt.
- I shall go with you, Moses.
- A princess of Egypt!
- From the house of Pharaoh!
- The gods of Egypt.
- An idol-worshipper!
This woman drew me from the Nile and set my feet upon the path of knowledge.
Mered, bring a chair to our table for the daughter of Pharaoh.
There is a great light that shines from your face, Moses.
Perhaps some day
I shall come to understand it.
He is God's messenger, Princess.
If it is not forbidden to look upon the breath of pestilence, then see, for it is here.
Do not look, Eleazar.
Close the door, Joshua, and let death pass.
Will it pass, Moses? Will it pass?
That is God's promise, Elisheba.
"Blessed art thou, O Lord our God, who bringeth forth bread from the Earth."
Run! Run!
There shall no evil befall you, or any plagues come near you.
A thousand shall fall at thy sight
Why do we eat unleavened bread and bitter herbs, my uncle?
- The herbs...
- Faster! Take the other road!
The herbs remind us of the bitterness of our captivity, Eleazar.
But it shall not come nigh thee
This is the bread of haste, that you will remember this night from generation to generation forever.
Oh, my baby! Give me back my baby!
- They are my people.
- All are God's people.
Death is all around us!
But it passes those who have believed the Lord.
Always remember, Eleazar, he passed over your house.
Are the captains of Egypt afraid of a night mist?
- The death cry is everywhere.
- Some devil's curse! Look!
I've known battle for 30 years, Pharaoh, but I've not known fear till tonight.
Aide.
Have the captains join their men.
At the coming of dawn, we will strike.
No first-born Hebrew shall live.
Let the Hebrews go, great one, or we are all dead men.
He was your son?
My first-born.
There is no magic cure, no spell to use.
He is the first-born of Pharaoh.
We have no skill before this... pestilence.
- My father.
- My son.
Your own curse is on him.
- Where did you hear this?
- From Moses.
I would not let his people go because your serpent's tongue hardened my heart.
You only thought to keep Moses here.
You cared nothing for my throne, or my son-
I asked Moses for his life.
The shadow of death is on his face.
No... he will not die.
Captain.
Take my fastest chariot.
Bring Moses to me.
I will bring him, mighty Pharaoh.
He's my only son.
You have conquered, Moses.
The foot of a slave is on the neck of Egypt.
You were saved from the Nile to be a curse upon me.
Your shadow fell between me and my father, between me and my fame, between me and my queen.
Your shadow now fills all things with death.
Go out from among us, you and your people.
I set you free.
It is not by your word, nor by my hand that we are free, Pharaoh.
- The power of God has freed us.
- Enough of your words!
Take your people, your cattle, your god and your pestilence.
Take what spoils from Egypt you will, but go!
O Lord God, with a strong hand thou dost bring us out of bitter bondage.
Tomorrow we go forth a free nation, where every man shall reap what he has sown and bow no knee except in prayer.
We will go with our young and with our old, with our sons and with our daughters, with our flocks and with our herds will we go, for I know that the Lord is great and that our Lord is above all gods.
He's dead.
Sokar, great lord of the lower world,
I, who have denied the gods of Egypt, bow before you now.
Show that you have power above the god of Moses, and restore the life he has taken from my son.
Guide back his soul across the lake of death to the place of living men, and I will raise a temple to you mightier than the pyramids.
Hear me, dread lord of darkness...
Arise, O Israel!
Behold the dawn of freedom!
And it came to pass, after the stifling night of terror; came a day such as the world had never seen.
From east and west, from north and south, they came with all they had, driving their Hooks and their herds and their camels before them.
By tens, by hundreds, by thousands, unending streams of man and beast and burden, and even very much cattle, poured into the Avenue of Sphinxes.
Beneath the stone feet of the four colossal images of Rameses, which their own.sweat and blood and sinew had hewn from solid rock, a nation arose and freedom was born into the world.
Grandfather, have you got Rebecca?
No, I haven't got Rebecca.
Here's the kneading trough.
Sling it on your shoulders.
This is a blessed day!
- Where's Rebecca?
- Here's Rebecca!
- Ben Caleb!
- Thank you!
- Can we take the cattle?
- We're moving to the gates.
Horn and hoof.
Rachel, help me with this brick yoke.
Don't forget the oil for the lamps.
Where are we going, Naomi?
To some land flowing with milk and honey!
I've never tasted honey.
Anybody know the way?
It's away from the whip! Freedom will wet your throats in the desert.
Fill your water skins.
This is the governor's house!
You cannot enter.
Out! Out, all of you!
Why do soldiers come here?
I put no blood on my door.
Then stone bleeds!
- Harness the mules!
- Your stonecutter did this to me!
All your gold cannot wipe that mark from your door, Dathan, or from my heart.
Just for that, you'll walk all the way to...
Where are we going?
- Do you know where we're going?
- To hell, I hope!
Like Dathan, they did not know where they were going, and they cared no more than the flocks and herds they drove.
Now they used the brick yokes to carry a very different burden.
And there went forth among them planters of vineyards and sowers of seeds, each hoping to sit under his own vine and Hg tree.
Out of this glorious chaos, it is Joshua who brings order and purpose.
Set the standard of each tribe before all the people!
Levites in the center, Judah to the right, Hephron to the left. Go!
Hallelujah!
Watch where you're going!
Watch out, you ribbon-carrier!
Keep your big feet out of my geese!
His son Joseph
Many colors was his coat
Aaron and the elders carry a shrouded body, Grandfather!
They bear the bones of Joseph, to rest in his own land.
Nubians, Grandfather!
- Here come treasure wagons!
- Spoils of Egypt.
All who shared the toil will share this gold! Here, boy!
For the blind one!
It's a little golden calf,
Grandfather, with horns!
An idol. For idol-worshippers!
Grandpa, fire-bearers!
Plant your tires at night beside the tribal standards, where all may come to light their torches!
- They'll be burning, Joshua!
- Eleazar, hang this on the wagon.
Now, the cradle.
Here, Miriam.
Joshua!
Joshua!
I have wagons for the midwives and physicians.
- Where shall they be placed?
- Five thousand cubits, one...
Where's your whip, Dathan?
I'll pay you back every lash you gave me, Dathan!
Now, is this a day for us to have hard feelings?
I've felt your whip!
- Yes, every day.
- Lilia is no slave, Dathan!
You can carry your own carton.
Let her ride!
So, now, my brother, we have new taskmasters.
- We serve no masters now!
- Yes, but not for long.
Here. Old woman.
- That's it.
- Joshua!
Make way for the governor!
- You know who I am.
- I know who you were, Lord Governor.
I go to serve the Pharaoh-
Tell Rameses I'm coming back to my house.
That rabble may follow Moses into the desert today, but when their eyes are seared red by the sun, when their cracked lips bleed with thirst, when their stomachs cramp with hunger, they will curse the name of Moses and his god.
Then I, Dathan, will lead them back to Pharaoh and the brick pits.
There are so many-
So many.
How shall I find thy road through the wilderness, Lord?
How shall I find water in the desert for this multitude?
Moses, the people are assembled.
Then let us go forth to the mountain of God, that he may write his commandments in our minds and upon our hearts forever.
We march, praising his mighty name!
- What is the word, Joshua?
- The word is given!
Let the trumpets sound!
Hear, O Israel!
Remember this day, when the strong hand of the Lord leads you out of bondage!
The Lord is our God!
The Lord is one!
- Come on! Come on!
- Yes! Come on!
Joshua!
Four hundred years in bondage, and today he won't move!
The Lord is one!
Praise to God!
Thank thee, O Lord!
My litter can carry him.
I am poured out like water, my strength dried up into the dust... of death.
We shall plant your fig tree in the new land.
Children shall eat of its fruit.
Do you hear that?
Do you hear that?!
You have a strong new son!
And he brought forth the people with joy and gladness.
He bore them out of Egypt as an eagle bears its young upon its wings.
But again,
Pharaoh 's heart was hardened.
How many more days and nights will you pray?
Does he hear you?
Dread Lord of Darkness, are you not greater than the god of Moses?
I have raised my voice to you, yet life has not come to the body of my son.
- Hear me!
- He cannot hear you.
He's nothing but a piece of stone with the head of a bird.
He will hear me.
I am Egypt.
Egypt?
You are nothing.
You let Moses kill my son.
No god can bring him back.
What have you done to Moses?
How did he die?
Did he cry for mercy when you tortured him?
Bring me to his body!
I want to see it, Rameses!
I want to see it!
This is my son.
He would have been Pharaoh.
He would have ruled the world.
Who mourns him now?
Not even you.
All you can think of is Moses.
You will not see his body.
I drove him out of Egypt.
I cannot fight the power of his god.
His god?
The priests say that Pharaoh is a god, but you are not a god, you are even less than a man.
Listen to me, Rameses, you thought I was evil when I went to Moses, and you were right.
Shall I tell you what happened,
Rameses?
He spurned me, like a strumpet in the street.
I, Nefretiri, Queen of Egypt!
All that you wanted from me he would not even take.
Do you hear laughter, Pharaoh?
Not the laughter of kings, but the laughter of slaves on the desert!
Laughter?
Laughter?
My son, I shall build your tomb upon their crushed bodies!
If any escape me, their seed shall be scattered and accursed forever!
My armor. War crown.
Laughter?
I will turn the laughter of these slaves into wails of torment!
They shall remember the name of Moses, only that he died under my chariot wheels!
Kill him with your own hands.
Let the trumpet sound.
Alert the watch towers.
Assemble all the chariots at the city gate.
- I obey!
- Nura and Thebes will draw my chariot.
I will bring you back your temple treasure!
Bring it back to me stained with his blood.
I will.
To mingle with your own!
Nura, Thebes!
Guards salute!
Hail!
Hail!
Remember your first-born!
- Death to the slaves!
- Death to the slaves!
- Death to their god!
- Death to their god!
Hail!
Forward!
Do you hear thunder? Over the sea?
No, it comes from the desert.
That's the thunder of horses!
Look! Pharaoh's chariot!
We're trapped against the sea!
Caleb, warn the north tents!
Joshua?
That's Joshua's horn!
All men to the pass!
Get carts, wagons! Form a barrier!
- What's the alarm, Joshua?
- Pharaoh's chariot!
Block the pass with carts!
Women and children, to the sea!
- Bring shovels, pounders, mattocks!
- Hear me! Hear me!
Can mattocks stop arrows?
Will your little carts stop Pharaoh's Chariots?
You women, do you want to see your men killed?
- Moses!
- Joshua, what is it?
Pharaoh's chariots!
I've ordered men to block the pass!
- How can we fight chariots?
- Nothing can stop them!
Order the men to move back, Joshua.
Move back? Where? Into the sea?
Into the hand of God.
Deliverer?
Yes, he has delivered you to death!
Run! Run!
Look! Look!
Blame Moses for this!
Deliver him to Pharaoh!
Stone him! Stone him!
The god of Moses is a poor general, to leave him no retreat.
Ten times you have seen the miracles of the Lord!
And still you have no faith!
He's a false prophet who delivers you to death!
Stone him! Stone him!
Listen to Moses!
He speaks God's will!
Forward!
- They will stop for me!
- A charging chariot knows no rank.
Was it because there were no graves in Egypt that you took us away to die in the wilderness?
Why must we die?
Fear not!
Stand still, and see the salvation of the Lord!
- A pillar of fire!
- It is the work of God!
Through it!
No, great one!
You cannot breach the fire of God!
Gather your families and your flocks.
We must go with all speed.
Go where? To drown in the sea?
How long will the fire hold Pharaoh back?
- Will it hold?
- After this day, you shall see his Chariots no more!
No! You'll be dead under them!
The Lord of Hosts will do battle for us!
Behold his mighty hand!
The wind opens the sea!
God opens the sea with the blast of his nostrils.
Lead them through the midst of the waters.
His will be done!
He opens the waters before them, and he bars our way with fire.
Let us go from this place.
Men cannot fight against a god!
Better to die in battle with a god, than live in shame.
Praise God and down into it!
God has delivered us from the son of Pharaohs.
Jacob cherished
His son Joseph
Many colors was his coat
- Help us!
- Never mind the wheel!
Pull! Pull for your lives!
Is your life worth so much?
Jacob cherished
His son Joseph
Many colors was his coat
God of A 'Dram
Isaac, Jacob
Ever bless us with Thy hand
Get tow-lines on the midwife's cart!
Save the bread if you can!
Ben Caleb! Order all wagons to turn clear!
Moses! Stand on the rock where the people can see you and have hope!
Above us!
Help that wagon!
The fire dies!
Sound the pursuit!
Chariots, halt!
This is work for a butcher, not a Pharaoh.
Destroy them all.
But bring Moses to me alive.
Level spears! Forward!
- Here! Take him!
- Wait for me! Wait for me!
Grandfather, look, the horses are coming!
The chariots! Run! Run!
Run for your lives!
Better to serve the Egyptians than to die here!
Who shall withstand the power of God?
Thou didst blow with Thy winds, and the sea covered them!
Who is like unto Thee, O Lord?
From everlasting to everlasting,
Thou art God!
The Lord is one! The Lord is one!
Before you strike, show me his blood on your sword.
You couldn't even kill him.
His god... is God.
And Moses led Israel from the Red Sea into the wilderness of Sinai.
And they camped before the holy mountain.
And when the people saw that Moses delayed to come down out of the mountain, they gathered themselves together.
Ask Aaron. Could anyone live on that fiery summit for 40 days and 40 nights?
- Yes! By the will of God!
- Who knows the will of God?
Do you? Do I?
Or you, Sephora? His grieving wife.
She came back among us to find her husband.
But he's dead.
Even she cannot hope that he lives!
Moses went up into the forbidden ground to receive God's law!
Yes, but he's not returned!
We share your pain. We sympathize.
But will sympathy lead us to this land flowing with milk and honey?
- Now, we have no leader!
- Don't be fooled!
Moses will return!
Would a God who's shown you such wonders let Moses die before his work is done?
- His work is done.
- His mother!
So beautiful is the hope of a mother!
But there are other mothers among you!
What will become of your children?
- We must have faith!
- Faith in what? You, Aaron?
Can you lead us to this land of promise?
Do you know where it is?
- Tell us!
- Where is it?
Across the wilderness!
- Then who is to lead us?
- You, Dathan!
Where could I bring you, except to Egypt?
- Where there is death?
- No! Where there is food!
- Pharaoh would kill us all.
- Not if a god of Egypt went before us!
- You could make one for us, Aaron.
- No.
- Aaron knows the art of the temple!
I will not!
He will not!
He would rather see our flesh rot in the wilderness.
You will make a god for us!
A god of gold! A golden calf!
Korah shall be the high priest!
Bring baskets! Buckets! Shawls!
Anything you have!
Break off your earrings, your bracelets, your necklaces!
We will make of them a golden calf!
- The golden spoils we took from Egypt!
- There!
Spoils of Egypt!
From the burning bush, O Lord, you charged me to bring the people to this holy mountain, to behold your glory and receive your law.
What have I left undone?
Lam... lam...
I am the Lord thy God.
Thou shalt have no other gods before me.
Thou shalt not make unto thee any graven image.
And they overlaid the image with pure gold.
And Aaron fashioned it and smoothed it with the hammer; ready to be graven by cunning art and man's device.
And he fastened it with nails that it should not move.
And he that smote the anvil did beat the molten gold into thin plates.
For they had gathered their treasure into the midst of the furnace, and did blow the fire upon it to melt it.
And they adorned themselves in rich apparel and costly array, with veils of blue and purple and scarlet, and fine twined linen wrought in Egypt.
And the women tread grapes from Midian into new wine.
Thou shall not take the name of the Lord thy God in vain.
Remember the Sabbath day, to keep it holy.
Honor thy father and thy mother:
Thou shalt not kill.
And the people sinned a great sin, for they had made them a god of gold.
And they bore him upon their shoulders and rejoiced, saying, "This be our god, O Israel."
Are you mourners of Moses afraid to face the new god of gold?
They were as children who had lost their faith.
They were perverse and crooked and rebellious against God.
They did eat the bread of wickedness, and drank the wine of violence, and they did evil in the eyes of the Lord.
And the people cried,
"The graven image hath brought us joy, Â” and they worshipped the golden calf and sacrificed unto it.
Here is your sacrifice!
Make way!
Make way for the sacrifice!
Thou shalt not commit adultery.
Thou shalt not steal.
Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbor:
Thou shalt not covet anything that is thy neighbor's.
Written with the finger of God.
Go! Get thee down, for thy people have corrupted themselves.
And the people rose up to play, and did eat and drink.
They were as the children of fools and cast off their clothes.
The wicked were like a troubled sea whose waters cast up mire and dirt.
They sank from evil to evil and were viler than the earth.
And there was rioting and drunkenness, for they had become servants of sin.
There was manifest all manner of ungodliness and works of the flesh.
Even adultery and lasciviousness, uncleanness, idolatry and rioting, vanity and wrath.
And they were filled with iniquity and vile affections.
And Aaron knew that he had brought them to shame.
Abiram! Korah!
Bind the sacrifice with cord!
Even unto the horns of the altar!
The light of God shines from you, Moses.
Do not kneel to me, Joshua.
These tablets of stone...
The writing of God.
His Ten Commandments.
There is a noise of war in the camp.
It is not the noise of war.
It is the noise of song and revelry.
- Moses!
- Look!
Joshua!
Woe unto thee, O Israel.
You have sinned a great sin in the sight of God!
You are not worthy to receive these Ten Commandments.
Aaron!
We are gathered against you, Moses!
You take too much upon yourself!
We will not live by your commandments.
We are free!
There is no freedom without the law.
Whose law, Moses? Yours?
Did you carve those tablets to become a prince over us?
Who is on the Lord's side,
- let him come to me!
- I am!
Moses!
- You have cursed us.
- Dathan and the people made me do it.
Joshua! Joshua!
He showed you no land flowing with milk and honey! I show you a god of gold!
Come with me! Follow me!
Blasphemers! Idolaters!
For this you shall drink bitter waters!
God has set before you this day his laws of life and good and death and evil.
Those who will not live by the law...
...shall die by the law!
And the Lord's anger was kindled against Israel.
And to prove whether they would keep his commandments or no, he made them wander in the wilderness 40 years, until all the generation that had done evil in the sight of the Lord was consumed.
But Moses' eye was not dim, nor his natural force abated.
And he went up from the plains of Moab unto the mountain of Nebo, and the Lord showed him all the land that was beyond the river Jordan.
The Lord was angry with me because I disobeyed him by the waters of strife.
And he said unto me,
"Behold the new land with thine eyes.
For thou shalt not cross over this river Jordan."
Then I shall stay.
I am called by the Lord, Sephora.
I go alone.
Look, Moses.
The people have come to the river Jordan.
In the Ark, they carry the law you brought them.
You taught them not to live by bread alone.
You are God's torch, that lights the way to freedom.
I love you.
Joshua...
Joshua,
I charge you and strengthen you, for you shall go over Jordan to lead the people.
As for me and my house, we shall serve the Lord.
Mered, give me the books.
Eleazar, set these five books in the Ark of the Covenant, by the tablets of the Ten Commandments, which the Lord restored unto us.
Go.
Proclaim liberty throughout all the lands, unto all the inhabitants thereof.
The battle scenes have been filmed with the participation and collaboration of the Public Security Squad and of Carabinieri Squad.
The Huns have been here.
An irresistible horde of barbarians from the distant deserts of Asia, driven by an insatiable hunger of prey, is moving toward the rich western lands.
The Huns, a sea of blood, destruction and death.
They are driven by a savage chief whose name is as talked about as the devil's, as threatening as a sword,
Attila.
It's the year 450 A.D.
The Western Empire is languishing.
At the eastern border, on the Danube, a Roman legation is advancing.
It is commanded by the only man who really knows Attila and is capable of getting the heart of his secret ambitious schemes.
Born in Pannonia, he's been living in the Western Roman Empire for years.
Ezio, Roman general.
Look, Prisco.
That's the Hun's territory.
We'd better be cautious.
What do we have to fear?
They're allies of ours.
For two days, I've been feeling a sort of invisible presence.
Who are you?
What are you doing here?
I'm Ezio, Roman general.
I'm carrying a message from our Emperor to Rua, your king.
Follow me.
Go on, Bleda.
Come on. Hit him.
Faster. Again. Come on.
Faster. Jump on him!
Knock him down.
Go on.
Grab him again.
Go on. You're winning.
Don't let go of him.
Shoulders on the ground!
What are you waiting for?
Come on. Come on!
- He's bleeding.
- It's nothing serious. Come on, Bleda.
- Leave them be. They're children.
- Better they learn while they're young.
Come on, Bleda. What are you waiting for? Turn him over.
Attila. The Roman general is here.
- Let him in.
- Enough, Pilai. Let go of him.
Get off.
Come here.
We'll take a look at your arm.
- Here we go.
- Does it hurt, Bleda?
He'll have to get used to it.
But our children are still young.
Our children?
My children!
Water.
It's nothing.
- Does it hurt?
- No, not at all.
Like father, like son.
General Ezio, ambassador of the Roman Empire.
Hail.
I'm carrying a message from the Western Emperor to Rua,
King of the Huns.
News arrives late in Ravenna.
Rua, our uncle, has been dead for over two months.
It grieves me to know this.
According to my uncle's wishes, my brother and I now rule together.
- Attila!
- I've been waiting for you.
- Welcome.
- I haven't seen you in years!
But your fame as a leader has come to us.
You have become a leader too.
But you have been crowned king.
But you are still a friend of mine,
I hope. That way it will be easier
- to solve the problems I'm here to...
- I won.
What is it? Shut up!
My youngest son.
He's named after my brother.
He has already killed a wolf.
So, tell me.
What's new in the capital of your empire?
Nothing. Nothing has changed since you were there.
We're only bothered by the incidents at the borders.
And, unfortunately, your tribes are amongst the most riotous.
The Emperor would like...
It's pointless.
I know nothing of politics.
Bleda.
It looks like the Emperor has some complaints.
Onegesio.
Onegesio is our counselor in such matters.
He will speak on our behalf.
I, Onegesio, wish a long life to Ezio from Pannonia.
We know the Emperor has sent you to renew the peace treaties with us.
But we can no longer trust you.
You have detained our hostages longer than agreed and forced them to convert to Christianity.
- You have also violated our borders.
- What are you talking about.
Your allegations are groundless.
The hostages stayed in Ravenna of their own free will.
Many married Latin women.
It's true that some of them have become Christian, but of their free wills.
And as far as...
The bishop of Margus has violated the tombs of the Hun's king's.
- That's false.
- There's no bishop in Margus.
It makes little difference whether he was a bishop.
It's what he has done that is important to us.
I can't believe that a priest would...
We have proof that a person from your church, maybe a simple priest, violated the graves of our ancestors in Margus.
And this is an insult to us.
I swore on my children that I would take revenge.
After such events, we expect guarantees before renewing our peace treaty.
We will come to an agreement.
- We'll discuss...
- No, there's nothing to discuss, Bleda.
The culprit must die, whether he's a bishop or a priest.
Is this all you want?
No, not only this. You'll give back our hostages and the deserters.
You'll also pay a tribute double the one we've been silly enough to pay you up until now.
This is our proposal.
And it won't change.
What do you say?
Yes or no?
How can this be your proposal?
You say "Yes or no?" to a child or a defeated enemy.
Not to an ambassador of Rome, not to the Empire.
We've overcome the Goths and crushed the Franks.
- We're not afraid of your Roman Empire.
- Attila! Ezio!
Attila has been impulsive.
You'll have time to think about it. Etere!
See the general to his tent.
Go now.
You'll see the barbarians, too, know how to honor their guests.
Let the sacrifice begin.
What does the blood say, Grune?
Prosperity awaits the Huns.
Our herds will increase and our appetites will be satisfied.
Our friends will present us with a lot of gold and many horses.
But I can see another woman next to you, Attila.
Let him have all the women he desires.
I can see her.
She's beautiful and very ambitious.
I can see you, Attila, at the gates of Rome.
Why just at the gates?
In Rome!
What else can you see, Grune?
Do you see how easy it is?
A little wine is enough to overturn the fate of empires.
How dare the Roman...
History is written in blood, not in wine.
Wine is used to drink to victories, both past and future.
My brother is right.
History is written in blood not wine.
It is with blood that we've conquered the land for our plows, the wood for our hearths and the food for our women and children.
Until a few years ago, our tribes, decimated by hunger and cold, roamed the wastelands in the north.
Until a few years ago, it was upon the passing by of a herd of buffaloes that the existence of thousands of Huns depended.
Now, we, too, have rich soil to till and build our houses upon.
We'll befriend all of our neighbors and we will live in peace because we want peace.
The world is big.
There's enough land for everybody.
Huns and Romans can live side by side like brothers.
I hope they will never take up arms against each other and that, instead, they will be able to fight side by side against common enemies.
It is to this that I drink, to peace between Huns and Romans.
Peace, peace for everyone.
- He's right.
- Yes, but first let them give back
- the hostages to us.
- And the prisoners.
Noble words, Bleda.
I receive them with joy.
I long for peace, too.
As do all Romans, from the last of the legionaries to the Emperor.
This is why I'm here tonight, to renew our alliance.
On behalf of my Emperor,
I wish the two Kings of the Huns long life and glory.
I drink to their fortune and that of the Huns.
I wish the Emperor what he wishes us.
And now, guests,
I'll present you with a fight.
A Hun.
- And now, a Roman.
- No.
There are no fighters in our legation.
That's strange.
All Huns are fighters.
If you want to challenge us, come to Ravenna.
Maybe I will.
A Hun king doesn't disdain a fight with one of his soldiers.
In fact, I'm proud to fight him.
Come on!
- The sword!
- Here, Attila! Use the sword!
- Come on! Be careful!
- Fight back!
I don't want any bloodshed tonight.
My brother can't stand the sight of blood.
Not even if it's a game.
- What did you see in the blood?
- I'm scared, Attila.
- Of whom?
- Of who will fight you without weapons.
This is the right time. Go with him.
I'll stay with Bleda.
Bleda, I'll try to persuade Attila.
Prisco will explain our plans for the agreement.
I need to talk to you, Attila.
I didn't like your behavior a moment ago.
You insulted my Emperor.
But I'll forget that because we're friends.
Or because the Roman Empire is weak.
The Empire has several flaws.
But it's strong because it has faith.
You only have one god.
Only one.
We have many.
Come on, Ezio, make a decision.
- What do you say?
- Your price is too high.
Say no, then.
If I said no, what would happen?
Look!
- Attila!
- Attila!
There go the Huns!
They've never been defeated.
I know.
Your cavalry is famous for its valor.
20,000 knights here,
100,000 men on those hills and an entire people behind them.
No city, no fortress will ever stop them.
That's the Roman general.
They say he's come to make peace.
Then he might as well leave.
- Nice weapon.
- Yes, when it's in our hands.
We're barbarians.
That is our strength.
Are they all eager to fight?
How many children do you have?
Three, Attila.
All male. They are seven.
- What about the others?
- The famine got them.
This is our fate.
We fight to live.
You have an Empire now, Attila.
Surrounded by enemies.
What are they talking about?
I don't know.
I don't get it.
Let's hope they can reach an agreement and leave us be for a while.
Ezio, you are a soldier like me, not a diplomat.
Leave Ravenna and come to me.
Together, we will conquer the world.
At what price?
Lands laid to waste, cities set ablaze, carnage and destruction.
The hatred of entire peoples.
No, Attila.
You're becoming a philosopher.
Call me what you like.
I'd rather love than hate.
And build rather than destroy.
I have faith in human fraternity.
Christian fraternity, at most.
I'm not here to talk about this, anyway.
Let's get back to what we were talking about.
I've already told you everything.
You'd like me to say no, wouldn't you?
You can't wait for a chance to attack us.
But why do you hate civilization so much?
What is civilization?
The one you can find in Ravenna?
Corruption, intrigues, slavery.
An empire of cowards and an Emperor who wears makeup.
No, Attila.
If this were true,
I'd come with you.
But law and order, freedom and justice, a god who promises resurrection, this is our civilization.
These are not material goods, but moral values.
Many Huns have understood this, including your brother.
As for me, I'll fight to death for this ideal.
All right, Attila.
I'll sign the treaty on your conditions, you will have the hostages, the deserters, the prisoners and the gold.
And may God forgive you.
This is Ravenna, the new seat of the Western Empire.
On its humble and industrious population, unaware of Attila's threat, weighs the burden of the imperial court.
Valentiniano, the cowardly and hysterical Emperor, and his mother, Galla Placidia, are the representatives of this court that dissolves the remains of an Empire into its own refined ruin.
Why are you so sad, son?
Smile.
It's a pleasure to see the Emperor of the Romans drinking with such relish.
Will you shut up?
You'll bring me bad luck.
Dear brother, you must trust in the affections of your subjects, as you're not afraid someone may have poisoned your wine.
But, after all, you are a god and as such you are immortal.
But my taster is not immortal.
Why have you deigned to come down and see us?
Blame it on loneliness, Mother.
Unlike you,
I do not have a son to take care of.
You wouldn't know how to care for a child.
The way you didn't, for as long as men were still interested in you.
- Death!
- Death!
Bring that to Ezio.
I offer it to the victor of so many battles.
Enough!
Go away.
All of you!
I want to see Dominicus.
What could have made you forget your glorious past as a general and sign such a treaty?
It's an unprecedented humiliation for the Empire.
Who will pay the tributes you let Attila impose on you?
Not satisfied with causing such damage to the Empire, you're also demanding to establish a permanent army that would only serve the purpose of satisfying your ambition.
Come on, speak!
Defend yourself.
What am I supposed to say?
They're just words.
I won't diminish myself by defending myself from words.
These are not just words.
These are precise charges.
The treaty you signed on behalf of the Emperor is unworthy of Rome and it brings us dishonor.
By accepting it, you betrayed your Emperor and your people.
Maybe you even plotted against his life with Attila, too.
- All is against you.
- All right.
Give the praetorians the order they've been waiting for.
But remember,
Attila won't have mercy on the Empire nor on your son.
Dominicus, what does the Pope think about this?
The Pope trusts in understanding among men of good will.
Yes, but these are not men of good will.
These are Huns!
Huns!
By Attila's side is Bleda, his brother.
He is a generous and noble man.
Yes, it's true.
There's Bleda.
Why don't you tell us about Bleda, then?
Because only very few Huns are like Bleda, brother.
Onoria, I warned you!
Never speak words of ill fortune.
Not you, nor anybody else!
I'm scared.
And I can't stand fear.
It makes me feel ill.
I was afraid, too, when I was there.
I was afraid for you,
Valentiniano.
For the Empire.
If I accepted the Hun's conditions, it was only as a way to stall them.
Yes, we can still organize a defense, arm our legions and form alliances.
But we must hurry!
If these precautions aren't taken immediately, when Attila invades Italy there will be no horse fast enough to save you, no forest will be enough to hide you.
Enough! Make him shut up!
Arrest him!
Do whatever you want, as long as he shuts up!
Son!
Arrest him.
The Emperor has ordered it.
He wanted an equestrian statue like that of Julius Caesar.
Ezio, the Savior of Rome.
Nobody can enter this house by order of the Emperor.
Let her in.
"The enemies divided the cavalry into three parts, two arranged themselves on our flanks while the other one started out by attacking us frontally, crossing our path.
Hearing the news, Caesar ordered the army to form three lines..."
Leave me, Prisco.
Greetings, Ezio.
Onoria. Why are you here?
Never ask a woman why she has come to see you.
I left the palace because
I felt stifled there.
My mother is blinded by fear of conspiracies and love for my brother.
She wants to ruin you because she knows you are stronger than they are.
She hates you, Ezio, as she hates me because I remind her of my father, Ataúlfo, who enslaved her for so many years.
She knows my blood is not the same as Valentiniano's and I'm as strong as she is.
If I were a man, I would be the Emperor already.
No, Onoria.
I won't serve your ambitions.
I couldn't be less interested in your mother's destiny, or Valentiniano's.
But you should be interested in mine.
I can set you free.
How?
My mother, Galla Placidia, has lived too long as Empress.
Without her, Valentiniano...
You're just like them, Onoria.
You're bloodthirsty and merciless.
I can see it in your eyes.
There's the same fixed, glassy look your brother's eyes have when he decides to have someone killed, as you want to have them killed.
I want freedom and greatness.
Mine and the Empire's.
In Galla Placidia's and Valentiniano's hands, Rome's days are numbered.
Only we can save it.
Nothing has ever been saved through crime.
Will you let them lead you to slaughter without even defending yourself?
Galla Placidia hates me, but she knows she may need me.
She won't have me killed.
When Attila's hordes show up at our borders, she'll call me back and I'll lead the army once again.
And you'll go back to fighting for Valentiniano?
I'm faithful to my oath,
Onoria.
Accept it.
It's not my fault destiny assigned us to opposing factions.
We'll see who the strongest is, me or your destiny.
The power is in my hands now.
I can give away what you won't defend.
Farewell, Galla Placidia's general.
I declare that...
Silence! Silence.
Take your seats.
Onegesio has just begun.
Listen to him until he has finished.
Rebellion is brewing in all the Western Roman Empire.
For example, the Avari are waiting for the right moment to rebel against the authority of Ravenna.
It's time to attack.
The weapons are ready.
And so are we.
Let us give the Avari their opportunity.
The Roman Empire has never been so weak before.
But how can we attack the Romans?
We have just renewed our treaties.
Treaties go with the wind.
But the word of a king is sacred.
And how can we be sure we'll win this war?
Be patient and Onegesio will explain.
We've never been so strong.
We have braver soldiers and better weapons than the Romans.
We also have powerful alliances.
Today the Mongolian chiefs have arrived to ally with us against the Roman Empire.
Now is the time to strike.
Give me two months and I'll lead you to Rome.
It may well be, Attila, but remember what happened to Alarico.
Alarico wasn't a Hun.
A single Hun soldier is worth a hundred.
They say the god of the Christians killed him.
- Of the Christians!
- They say he died from a mysterious illness soon after invading Rome.
Tall tales for silly women.
Listen to me, everybody.
This is our chance to conquer Italy.
And the Mediterranean.
After which, we'll conquer the world.
With the blood of thousands of our men?
No, brother.
Our people have suffered enough already.
Let us stay on this land.
Our people live in tranquility.
Our neighbors pay large tributes.
What more can you possibly expect?
The treaty with the Romans is profitable.
We have fought a lot.
Let us devote the rest of our lives to the well-being of our people.
Our father taught us to fight,
- not to be idle.
- But the treaties...
Ezio signed them to stall.
He's recruiting new troops.
But the Romans don't renege on treaties.
You're naive because you trust them.
Not everybody is like that.
We must crush the Romans!
If we don't do it now, they'll send us back to the muddy banks of the Danube!
Is this the well-being you were talking about?
You misunderstand me.
I only said not to shed blood in vain.
I say, "Live and let live."
And I say,
"Kill if you want to live."
- It's necessary.
- You're a madman!
My tribe is with Bleda and with peace.
To think that as a young boy
I loved you and looked up at you as a hero.
You've become a chicken.
You have insulted my chief and the honor of my tribe.
You have drawn your sword.
Come on, use it against me.
A Hun doesn't draw his sword unless he means to use it.
A coward doesn't need his right hand.
You're a savage.
They're right when they call us barbarians.
You can't conceive of anything but violence.
Your only ideal is your own ambition.
You think you can conquer the world with violence.
You'd destroy entire peoples to satisfy your hunger for power.
We have too much power already.
To preserve it, we need to bring down Rome.
- I'm with you, Attila.
- My men won't follow you.
Mine will.
I'll go to the end of the world with Attila.
So, do it!
But my tribes and I can't support you in this crazy endeavor.
- I commit 5,000 soldiers.
- So do I, Attila.
- I will give you 10,000.
- My Mongols are with you.
We can do fine without their help.
All right, now go.
- We won't abandon you.
- Who cares about Bleda and his tribes.
Your brother doesn't act like a Hun, but like a Roman.
Attila, I need to talk to you.
I'm sorry for creating this conflict.
Especially because it happened in front of all the chiefs.
Let's try to come to an agreement after tomorrow's hunt.
I'm sorry I had to contradict you.
But you were wrong.
You are the one who is wrong.
We are a people, a race.
Our father fought to bring us together.
And you have divided us.
I will never forgive you for this!
Bleda!
Bleda!
Attila!
I have news from Ravenna.
- Wake him up. It's important.
- Leave him be. He's tense.
- I'm telling you, you must wake him up.
- Let him sleep.
He's leading the hunt today.
- I must do it, Grune.
- What is it? Attila, what's wrong?
- What do you want?
- I have news from Ravenna.
- Good or bad?
- It's a message from Onoria.
Read it.
"I, Onoria,
Emperor Valentiniano's sister and Galla Placidia's daughter and descendent..."
Skip to the facts!
"I beg you to free me from the slavery of a corrupt court and take me as your wife."
Can't you see?
In Ravenna you can make her keep her word.
Her dowry to you will be half the Western Roman Empire.
See, brother?
You can conquer the world without fighting.
I don't like intrigues.
But Onoria's offer protects us from a Roman attack.
The tribes would welcome a marriage that would give us half the Roman Empire.
Without striking a blow, we would ensure for a long time the peace we all desire and need...
Peace! Peace! Peace!
Who says the Romans want peace?
- That letter is from a lying woman.
- Look at this.
She sent her ring as a pledge.
This ring represents the possession of an Empire.
Empires are made with iron, not with women's intrigues.
So, let's question the gods as our forefathers taught us.
The gods have already spoken.
On horseback.
We're going hunting.
Attila, don't go today.
I beg you.
I have to.
Not today, son.
But I have to kill another wolf today.
Why can't he come?
Go ahead, Bleda.
I'll catch up with you.
The next time you'll come,
I promise.
Bring him inside.
Halt!
That way!
Where's Attila?
Follow me.
I know what you want...
Louder.
Make them bark louder.
Can you hear that? They've captured the boar. They're close.
Shoot.
Attila! Brother!
Listen to me.
You think killing me will silence the last voice hindering your rise to power.
But you can't conquer the world shedding innocent blood because innocent blood won't wash away.
It will come back to you.
Shoot!
He doesn't know anything.
He's just scared.
And so am I.
What are you going to do?
Attila, the funeral pyre is ready.
Bleda's followers have gathered.
The field is in a state of ferment.
We must be cautious.
They must be plotting.
Let's get rid of him right away.
After the funeral, it'll be worse.
We must be cautious.
Somebody has drawn his sword already.
My tribe is faithful to Attila.
He was a traitor and he was punished.
- We should all use force.
- More blood will be shed.
The people loved Bleda.
- I did, too.
- Attila.
Attila! Attila!
- Assassin!
- Assassin!
Fratricide!
Are you suffering?
I'm suffering more than you.
To you he was a king.
To me he was a brother.
He was my own flesh and blood.
But I killed him.
Why?
Was it for the crown?
I already have one and I don't wear it.
Was it because I hated him?
My son bears his name.
I loved him.
And if I killed him, it was only for the welfare of my people.
We fought side by side in deserts and mountains.
We suffered from cold and endured pangs of hunger... leaving behind a trail of corpses.
But what was the purpose?
It wasn't to conquer destitution... but to conquer dignity... and make the Huns a united people, unassailable and invincible.
Now that we are about to achieve what we have fought for for so long,
Bleda wanted to betray all our ideals and accept a mediocre existence.
The king, my brother, would have divided us.
He would have destroyed the unity of the Huns.
This is why I killed him.
No sacrifice is too big for the glory of our people.
To obtain it, I would sacrifice the lives of my own children.
And here, now,
I am entrusting you with mine.
Take it if I deserve to die.
No, Attila! You must live and lead us to victory.
Then let the fire burn.
May these flames unite us and give us further strength.
Beyond those mountains is the enemy.
It's time to face him and that what is ours by right.
People of one race, of one blood and one destiny...
Huns,
Attila will lead you to conquest.
Today, Rome.
Tomorrow, the world.
King Attila!
Have fun now!
It would have been better to kill him right away.
Not like this.
His death won't be slow enough, anyway.
But he's a priest.
He violated the tombs of our forefathers.
Beware the god of the Christians, Attila.
Un-nail yourself, if you can.
Come on.
You may ravage our cities and our lands, but you won't be able to destroy our faith.
You will never be able to win, Attila.
Ask your god to save you.
I've already been saved because I'm dying for Him, as He died for me.
For each one of us you kill,
100 will come against you.
You can't win by killing, Attila.
History will prove me right.
History will remember you, but as the Scourge of God.
Unbelievable. Attila was looking for an excuse to attack us and you gave him one.
Read what he has written.
The King of the Huns holds me in higher esteem than you.
You're despicable.
You offered yourself to him who has sworn to ruin us.
You, sister of a Roman emperor, wife of a barbarian.
You're one to talk. You were Alarico's lover and his brother Ataúlfo's wife.
Only to save my life.
I didn't betray my blood out of ambition, like you.
There's not a drop of your blood in me.
I'm barbaric like my father,
Ataúlfo.
Had I never given birth to you!
You've always been my enemy.
When you were 14, you plotted against me.
At 17, you eloped with a praetorian.
You are the embodiment of corruption and betrayal.
I learned from you.
You killed your lovers when you grew tired of them.
Galliano, Fabio, dead from poisoning.
Teodoro, who you stole from me.
You stole him from me.
If I hadn't had him killed, you'd have convinced him to kill me.
I should crush your head like a viper's.
Why don't you? You're afraid of killing
Attila's woman, aren't you?
Go away.
I never want to see you again.
Go away.
But remember, when the Huns arrive, you'll kneel in front of me begging me to save your life.
My God. My God.
I think it's too late,
Galla Placidia.
You wasted the precious months
I had obtained.
Attila has taken possession of all of Illyria and is quickly advancing towards the Alps.
You'll stop him when he's crossed them.
I can't see how.
When our troops from Spain arrive,
Attila's will have occupied the plains.
Let's marshal all our troops along the Po.
If you manage to prevent them from crossing the river we'll have more time and the reinforcements will be here.
You have no idea how courageous the Huns are.
Nothing will stop them.
Attila has trained them perfectly in the last few months.
And they're thrilled by their victories...
- What about our troops?
- Our troops?
Are you sure we can trust them?
You let them rot in idleness.
They don't know what discipline is anymore.
Have you lost your faith in God, Ezio?
This man is treacherous.
He's a traitor. A friend of Attila's.
Let someone else lead us.
Enough! Shut up!
I decree that from this moment onwards,
Ezio will be the commander of all the Roman troops.
Don't trust him, Augusta.
I trust you, Ezio.
I trust only you.
And I apologize for the many ways I have wronged you.
I promise to support you with all the authority I have left.
I am about to end a life that has been a series of mistakes.
I realize that now.
I have no more aspirations, nor personal ambitions.
My end is near.
Whatever the result of the war,
I am more than certain
I'll never see Attila coming up the steps of this palace, nor you triumphant in the streets of Rome.
It is only for the sake of my son that I am talking to you.
His shoulders are too weak to carry the burden that awaits him.
He needs a man like you by his side.
Can you see?
I have no pride left.
Save Valentiniano.
Mother!
Mother!
He's dead! He's dead!
He was my life!
My only reason to live.
Don't do this, Valentiniano.
Don't cry, son.
Dominicus, I want him to go to heaven.
I want him to go to heaven immediately.
It's an order, do you understand me?
Take a look, Ezio.
These are the people for whom you will fight.
Look at the heirs of Rome, the rulers of the world.
Don't laugh, Onoria.
Sometimes desperation carries an unexpected strength.
Your mother has proven it.
It's not madness, Onoria.
It's the extraordinary effort of a mother who loves her son and tries to save him.
Listen to me.
So far, I have fought against the enemies of Rome to save what is left of it, its prestige, its grandeur, the civilization it has created in so may centuries of history.
But from now on,
I will fight for its people, so that they can continue to work free and happy.
Because they are the true heirs of Rome's traditions.
And I swear that, as long as I live,
Attila won't occupy Italy.
For too many years words have muddled Roman minds.
If men of war start to use them to muster up courage, it means that it's all really over.
Farewell, Ezio.
Farewell, Mother.
Stop her!
Arrest her!
No, don't.
Let her go.
She's unhappy, too, like us.
The Huns are moving forward.
Having left Gaul and Germany behind, the invaders encounter no resistance as far as the Alps, that, silent and undefended, lead to Italy.
The terrified populations murmur that grass will not grow where Attila's horse has trod.
In the exaltation of victory, only one thought torments the conqueror, that of Bleda's murder.
But remorse is not enough to stop his march.
By now, Attila has the future of all of Europe in his hands.
Attila, look.
Italy is at our feet.
The road leading to Rome passes through this valley.
- Ezio is nowhere to be seen.
- We'll see him soon.
Don't doubt it.
He's waiting for us in the hills.
This is the end of their world, Attila.
And the beginning of ours.
Come on, let's go.
Forward!
Let us ask God to forgive our sins.
The end of the world is near.
Attila has reached our doorstep.
Our salvation is in Rome.
To Rome!
To Rome! To Rome!
Hurry, we must reach the camp before dark.
Onegesio, how many armies does the Western Empire have left?
Only Ezio's.
But they say his soldiers won't fight.
It's the Romans themselves that spread these rumors.
Ezio knows how to control his men.
Don't fool yourselves, the battle will be harsh.
But he's been running from us for a month.
Maybe he hopes we will fall into a trap.
Attila won't fall into a trap.
He'll force Ezio to retreat to Rome hoping for an opportunity that will never happen.
Rome, cursed city.
Our true enemy is there.
And who is it? The Pope?
What can the Pope provide?
How many men and how many swords can he arrange for?
None, Kadis.
But I fear his god.
If he exists, we will soon endure his wrath.
You like that, don't you?
In what mood are the gods today?
They say you'll have more glory and power than you hope for, Attila.
I don't need the gods to tell me that.
But the gods are also warning you.
Beware of the man who has the name of an animal.
- You've already told me that.
- Be careful, Attila.
That man could destroy you.
I like you better as a woman than as a prophetess.
Attila, a Roman woman has asked to speak with you.
Onegesio has given her permission.
Glory and long life to you, Attila.
Is this the woman?
Don't let her come near you.
I'm Ataúlfo and Galla Placidia's daughter, Valentiniano's sister.
I know who you are.
- Why are you here?
- I sent you a message.
Oh, yes. I received it.
But we barbarians can't read.
Send her away.
Don't trust her.
Forget what happened in Ravenna, Attila.
Prove yourself generous.
Go.
So, you remember, too.
Time has taught me many lessons.
Was one of those lessons to offer your body to a barbarian?
I can offer you much more than that, Attila.
What?
Valentiniano and I have the same rights.
Half of the Western Empire is mine and it will be yours when I'm your wife.
So when we enter Ravenna, nobody will be able to call you a usurper.
You'd marry me?
I can still taste the wine you threw in my face.
Look at me now.
Take a good look.
It's still me, the barbarian you insulted because he had touched you.
Why have you come here?
What made you change your mind?
I'm here because
I know my destiny is to live by the side of the conqueror of the world.
How do you know that the conqueror of the world wants you?
You don't know what a woman like me is.
You've only had the women of your camps, animals crawling at your feet.
You wouldn't crawl, would you?
But according to the gods, you can ruin me.
Why would I destroy that which I desire the most?
The Empire needs strong men like you, not puppets.
Attila, nobody is more worthy than you of the imperial crown.
What if you're wrong?
What if Ezio wins?
Ezio won't win.
How I have longed for your lips!
Don't despair, Grune.
Maybe we will conquer an empire without fighting.
The Romans!
They are near.
Look.
Those are their outposts.
But the greater part of the army is on those hills.
The Huns have all gathered.
They're now arranging their carts around the camp.
Defensive formation.
They won't attack us before dawn.
Attila, what are you thinking about?
I've been waiting for this day for years.
The eve of the last battle.
Tomorrow, I'll march to Rome with you.
Will you?
Do you think you'll lead me to Rome by the hand?
With me by your side, everything will be easier.
I came to meet a conqueror and I found a man.
I will never leave you.
- Go away.
- I am an Emperor's daughter.
That doesn't make you any better than any other woman.
Remember what I can do for you.
Go back to your cart.
What are you doing?
Leave the horse be.
Attila, you can't humiliate me like this.
Fabiano, you'll face the enemy's first strike.
Place the best archers in the middle.
But be careful, and this is important, not to let Attila see them.
That way we'll be able to take the horses by surprise.
Giustino and Valerio, you'll command the two wings.
You'll engage only upon my order.
Romans, for 50 years the defense of the borders has fallen on the shoulders of the allies of Rome.
Since then, nobody has asked you to risk your lives for the safety of your families, of your houses and lands.
Today, salvation depends on you.
If we don't succeed, everything will be destroyed.
There'll be death and slavery for you and yours.
But I have faith.
I trust that Roman soldiers won't let a herd of barbarians beat them.
Your forefathers conquered the world.
Prove yourselves worthy of it.
And above all, remember that, after you, there will be nobody left to save the country.
Romans, everything depends on you today.
The men are ready, Attila.
Pretend you're going to attack the wings, then go for the center. Go.
Don't let them fool you.
Wait for them to be within shooting range.
Shoot!
They're retreating.
Troops, the signal.
Forward!
Forward!
They won't stop us this time.
Ezio! Ezio!
Ezio is dead!
Ezio is dead!
Here she is!
Onoria is on this cart.
You'll pay for your betrayal.
Don't spare him!
Here are the naughty Romans, descendants of Caesar and Augustus.
They won against the Gauls and against Carthage.
Look at them now.
They're reduced to shapeless lumps of flesh.
Let's go away, Father.
I'm scared.
Scared of what?
They can't scare anybody now.
Take me away, Father.
Take me away.
You must get used to the sight of blood.
But I'm scared.
Why, son?
After a victory, there's joy.
And the taste of glory is sweet.
Bleda.
Bleda!
Bleda!
- Bleda!
- I didn't mean to hit him, Attila.
That arrow was for you.
May God forgive me for killing an innocent.
Bleda! Bleda!
My son!
Bleda!
- Do you want to drink?
- No.
Can't you hear that?
Hear what?
I can't hear anything.
You can't hear either?
It's the wind whistling in the branches.
It's like a lament.
A child weeping.
Why don't we put up camp?
You've got a temperature,
Attila.
We've been riding for three days and three nights.
No, we're moving forward.
Mother!
- Mother!
- Don't go.
Don't leave me.
Don't go.
Don't go away!
Tell me, where is Ippolito?
He abandoned us, too.
He ran away, like everybody else.
They're all going to Rome.
There's nobody left in this palace.
Nobody.
Dominicus,
Costanzo, Ezio.
All those who could save you have died.
- And I'm going to join them.
- No, Mother.
No, Mother!
You can't leave me now.
I'm not used to being alone.
What would I do without you?
Maybe the Lord wants you to be alone. Go.
Don't worry about me.
Go to Rome.
Seek the protection of the Church.
Go! You must go, Valentiniano.
You are right, Mother. Rome.
I will go to Rome.
I will be safe there.
Farewell, Mother.
Valentiniano!
Onoria!
I don't want to die alone.
It's too cruel to die like a beast... alone.
Valentiniano!
Attila, what are you looking for?
What is it that you want?
Is this because of the fever, too?
- What is it, Attila?
- I can hear it too.
So can I.
It's like a chant.
It's like a far away chant.
Beware of the man who will face you without any weapons.
- Be careful, Attila.
- It might be a trap.
Do you think I'm afraid of a few wooden planks?
Who are you, daring to cross my path?
I'm Pope Leo.
The servant of God's servants.
I don't know your god.
But He knows you, Attila.
He sees your every gesture and what is in your heart,
He speaks to your spirit in the voice of those you have sacrificed to your ambition.
I didn't cross the Alps to listen to lectures.
I know.
You are impatient to get to Rome.
There's no one there to defend it.
You can turn it into a pile of ruins.
You can kill everybody... old people, women, children.
But remember, Attila, innocent blood won't be washed away.
Remember, brother.
Innocent blood won't be washed away.
It will come back to you.
What further words did the Vicar of Christ utter trying to calm the barbaric fury of the Hun leader?
Nobody heard them.
This is considered one of history's greatest mysteries.
But maybe it's not a mystery.
Pope Leo couldn't have used any other language than the divinely simple one of the Gospel, a language comprehensible to all men of good will,
Romans and barbarians, great or humble, slaves or leaders.
But could Attila understand him?
I have nothing more to say.
It's your decision.
Back!
Open the door, please.
Breakfast, your highness, and a telegram.
Are you quite sure the doctor said that gargle should be swallowed afterwards?
That's what you said, your highness.
Did I? Sometimes I think that doctor's a little too progressive.
I can't believe it.
Elsa, my smelling salts.
No, no. Dress me at once.
No, no, never mind. Send for Caesar.
I must speak to him immediately.
In here, your high-- yes, yes!
Have their highnesses breakfasted?
Oh, well, it doesn't matter.
It makes no difference.
Oh, very well, then, downstairs, but hurry, hurry.
Caesar.
Your highness, good morning.
I want to see everyone.
We haven't a moment too many.
Everyone?
Yes. The Butler, the housekeeper, the head gardener, the head groom, the chef-- particularly the chef-- oh, and the huntsman and the head gamekeeper, but I won't wait while you hunt for those.
Get on with your work.
Yes, Mr. Caesar.
Auntie.
Auntie!
Aunt Symphorosa.
Aunt Symphorosa.
Oh! Beatrix. I was bicycling.
It's happened, just when I'd given up all hope.
What is it, dear? Someone died?
It's a telegram.
"His royal highness will honor you
"with a 4-day visit beginning 23rd.
"No other guests.
"Train arrives 2:30 A.M. no reception.
Will meet family next day."
He's coming to see Alexandra.
Not Albert.
Albert.
It took him 2 years to answer the invitation.
He must have looked at every girl in Europe, but he's coming.
I knew he was in Lisbon, but I wasn't worried about the infanta.
She's 6 foot 2.
And with the crown, another 7 1/2 inches.
But I thought he was going to Dresden.
He must have seen a photograph of Maria Teresa, and that finished her.
Coming. I always said dear Alexandra would have her opportunity in the end.
Have it and take it.
Alexandra a queen.
Oh, if only her father could have lived for this.
It's so awkward without a man in the house.
A man can help in so many ways.
So many ways.
I shall wire Karl.
Have you a pen somewhere or a pencil?
It must go at once.
It will be nice to see dear Karl, but didn't it say no guests?
Karl? He's your nephew and my brother.
How can he be a guest?
Oh! I'm inside out.
Oh!
Must you still write with a feather?
This is the 20th century.
I don't like the 20th century.
For the purpose of the experiment, the wall isn't there.
Now, if I take this one and flip it-- good morning.
Good morning, mother.
Your highness.
Mother, aren't you going to dress today?
I'm looking for a pencil, and what exactly did
I find going on here?
Oh,
I was just teaching their highnesses some elementary statics and dynamics.
Those are statics and dynamics?
No, your highness. Marbles-- a game the peasant children play,
I believe.
Oh, the professor's an absolute fizzer at it. Show mother, professor.
George.
Professor Agi, I must ask you again to confine yourself to the normal kinds of education, and I want the boys particularly well up in their studies.
We're to be honored within the next day or two by a visit from his royal highness crown prince Albert.
Prince Albert!
George!
I know. He wants to look at Alexandra.
Arsene.
Prince Albert is your cousin, and he hasn't seen us for many years.
He's coming here purely and simply to visit the family.
Now, get on with your lessons so you won't disgrace us, and put on your coats.
The pencil, your highness.
Thank you.
Professor Agi, did you write that name up there?
Yes, your highness.
I don't want that man's name mentioned in my house.
Why not, mother?
Napoleon was a genius.
He beat almost everybody.
He won the battles of Marengo and Austerlitz and Borodino.
But not the battle of Waterloo.
He was an upstart.
Please remember what I tell you.
You're here to give the boys an education, not to fill their heads with a lot of historical gossip.
Your highnesses had better pick up the statics and dynamics.
Do you know why mother hates Napoleon?
It was through him that we lost our throne and had to come and live here.
We won't much longer, I'll bet.
Will we, professor?
We're going to practice some vulgar fractions. Get out your exercise books.
Couldn't we do it with marbles?
I'm afraid not.
Mother probably wouldn't approve of vulgar fractions either.
Not with a queen in the family.
We haven't got one yet.
Well, cousin Albert's a crown prince, isn't he?
So Alexandra will be a crown Princess.
So one day she'll be a queen.
As for the menu,
I want details submitted for all meals by tomorrow morning.
They must not only taste delicious, they have to match the services.
The gardens--I notice the roses are already beginning to bloom.
They're just at their best, your highness.
I don't want them at their best till the day after tomorrow.
Hold them back.
Caesar will let you know the exact time.
Next, the carriages. I--
Alexandra.
You sent for me, mother?
Yes, dear, I sent for you.
Caesar, there's very little time.
Please get everything started.
Yes, your highness.
Alexandra, wonderful news--
Albert is coming day after tomorrow.
A wire this morning.
There will hardly be time to see to everything.
Albert.
Yes, mother.
Oh,
I hope so much that you'll like him.
I'm sure I will.
I haven't seen him since he was 10, of course, but they say he's charming, quite charming.
Doesn't take after his mother at all.
And he's been all over Europe, looked at every Princess and turned down every one of them, and now he's coming here to you.
I expect he can't bear the site of another Princess by now.
Alexandra, this is the most important moment you'll ever have to face.
My dear, you're not going to be nervous?
No, mother. I hope not.
Hoping's not enough.
You must tell yourself not to be.
Oh, my dear child.
This is the one thing, the one opportunity that all your life I've been praying for-- for you to become a queen.
Yes, mother. I know that.
You must prove to
Albert in these 4 days that you have all the qualities he's looking for in a wife, a wife who'll share his throne one day.
You must be gracious and dignified, warm and charming and amusing.
Oh, I know he's seen a great deal more of life than you, but you can make that an advantage, too.
Let him see how sweet and unspoiled you are, and, darling, you must try your hardest not to be shy.
Men don't like it, especially a man like Albert.
After all, that's one of the first duties of a queen.
She always puts other people at their ease.
You remember my telling you that?
Yes, mother, I remember it.
Albert's the law unto himself, they say, but don't let that frighten you.
Look on it as a challenge, and never forget that first impressions are everything.
Of course, you must be natural, too.
That's more important than anything, but above all, don't be nervous.
No. I--I... No. I know, mother.
You do?
You sure you do, all these things?
Yes, of course I do, but if you keep telling me, it's just going to make me more...
It's time for my fencing lesson now.
May I go?
Don't worry, mother.
Your highness.
You're late this morning.
Forgive me, your highness.
To speak the truth,
I supposed your highness would be too busy this morning.
Busy?
With the visit of his royal highness.
I thought there would be no more fencing lessons...
For the next few days, at all events.
What--what I meant, your highness-- should the lessons be discontinued at any time, you will be notified.
Yes, your highness.
En garde.
En quarte.
Allongez Le bras. Defendez-vous.
Coup droit.
Battement droit.
Marchez, marchez.
Rompez, rompez, defendez-vous.
It's too low. It should be here.
Point. Left foot flat.
Regardez ainsi.
In retreat. Parry prime, seconde, tierce, quarte, quinte, sixte, septime, octave.
Good. En garde en sixte.
Un, deux, trois.
Doublez.
Doublez.
Good.
Triplez.
Much too low. Once more.
Fine. En quarte.
En marchant.
Battement dans la ligne opposee.
Coup droit, parry, riposte. Up.
Alexandra!
Alexandra!
Have you heard it?
Alexandra, have you heard the news?
Yes, I heard it.
Your highnesses will sit down, please.
I shall take you in a few minutes.
Your highness, this morning we're going to practice the art of making a feint-- the sham attack followed by a genuine one in another quarter.
The offenser is always in danger of revealing his intentions to his adversary, and that he must never do.
His opponent must never know from one moment to the next what he is thinking.
Like everything else, it's a question of practice.
No one ever knows what
Alexandra is thinking anyway.
That can never be said of you, Arsene.
Alexandra, are you going to fence with cousin Albert?
Of course she isn't.
She might cut his head off.
I don't know what mother would say to that.
There goes our crown.
Be quiet, both of you, or else I shall cut your heads off.
Prince George, prince Arsene, sit down.
Well, thank you, brother Sebastian.
All right. I can manage.
I'll wire father guardian when I need to be rescued.
God bless you, father.
You, too, and you, Beulah, girl.
Caesar.
Your highness.
What a pleasant surprise.
Well, how's the rheumatism, eh?
Did the lemon juice work?
Oh, it didn't do any harm, but, then, I don't believe in miracles, your highness.
Caesar, after all this time, do I have to remind you that I'm not
"your highness" anymore?
No, your father-- Uh, father.
Beatrix!
Beatrix!
All right.
Get on with your work.
Beatrix!
Karl.
Oh, Beatrix, dear.
Your manners are a disgrace.
Karl, dear, I thought I heard you.
Aunt Symphorosa.
You're looking well, both of you.
We're a little exhausted.
What do you suppose?
I couldn't tell you in the wire.
Such wonderful news.
I know all about it.
You do?
The whole countryside knows.
And what are they saying?
Not out here.
Excuse me, father.
Thank you, my son.
That's not all your luggage.
When you renounce the world, Beatrix,
I'm happy to say you renounce luggage along with it.
Later. Later. Do you mind?
Quite enough people.
Karl, I--Karl, if all goes well, my life's ambition will be realized.
You don't know what such a moment means to a mother.
If I could be sure
Alexandra would sit on a throne,
I'd willingly die this minute.
I very much doubt if heaven wants you on those terms.
And where do I come into it?
Oh, you'll be such a help, Karl.
I know you will.
You must go through the wine cellars with the Butler.
Yes. He stays down there sometimes, and it isn't good for him.
And I want you to talk to the chef.
He's so accustomed to planning just for us.
Look at these menus-- or have you forgotten what real food is?
No. I partially tamed my spirit some years ago, but my stomach is still holding out.
And Alexandra-- how is she in the midst of all this?
Oh, Karl, one can't help but be proud of her.
Ah.
Remember how her poor father used to call her his swan?
Mm-hmm.
"My proud, white swan," he used to say, and that's how she is, so dignified, so silent, so regal.
And the boys?
Same as ever--savages.
Except for Arcturus, they're the 2 most brilliant stars in the northern sky.
Now, we should be able to see them more clearly tonight than any other time of the year.
Let me see.
First we're going to look at Vega.
What are you reading?
Almanac.
On an evening like this?
Mother wants me to know all about Albert's relations.
All about all of them?
There's some she's crossed out.
I'm not surprised.
Come outside and get a little air.
Can you see it?
It's the one with the bluish light.
It doesn't look very big.
That's only because of the distance.
A great many of those stars that you see up there are larger and more brilliant than our own sun, but they're so far away, it's almost impossible to re-- to realize it.
Would your highness care to see?
Scoot, your highness.
That's Vega, star of the first magnitude of the constellation Lyra.
Can you see it, your highness?
I can see several.
Allow me.
There. That's better.
It's the brightest, in the very center.
It's moved right across.
How fast it's going.
It's we who are going so fast.
Oh, it's gone.
You see, the earth, your highness, we are going through space at over 68 miles an hour.
68,000. Forgive me.
Karl,
I wondered what had become of you.
Oh, what a day. I'm utterly exhausted.
Alexandra, what became of your dear little photograph, the one in the sailor blouse?
There's only the frame.
I don't know, mother.
It was awful anyway.
No, it wasn't.
I want to put it in Albert's bedroom.
To make him seasick?
George, Arsene, up to bed now.
Oh, no, mother-- professor. And you, too, Alexandra.
Don't forget, you have to look your very best in the morning.
We all do.
Good night, boys.
Good night, uncle Karl.
Attention! Eyes right!
I thought there was to be no reception.
They wouldn't count a guard of honor, sir.
Yes, captain?
Does your royal highness wish to decorate the engine driver?
Mounted inspection.
Gesundheit.
This way, your royal highness.
Let's hope there's a bed at the top, however, after 2 nights on that train,
I'm prepared to sleep even on pink marble.
I'm hungry.
It isn't good for anyone to sleep as long as this, but, of course, he was traveling all yesterday.
Yes?
Not yet. Bring them after dinner.
Just time for a nap, and we'll have to start putting on our tiaras.
Shall we go out?
Ah.
I don't understand it at all.
Perhaps he's ill.
Perhaps he's dead.
Caesar, in a case like this, what would you do?
Eat.
Oh, thank you, my son.
For what we are at last to receive, the lord make us truly thankful. Amen.
Amen. Amen. Amen.
How can I eat?
I already have indigestion.
Really, this is quite intolerable.
Why does he think he was invited here in the first place?
Mother, please.
I'm sure there's some good reason.
If he tries to make any excuses,
I shan't speak to him. I couldn't.
I've never been so humiliated in my life.
Oh, my dear boy.
You look splendidly well, and what a change from the little Albert I remember.
Captain Wunderlich, your highness.
His royal highness sends word he will be down in a few moments.
Caesar, we shall start again.
Come to the salon.
Oh.
Auntie.
Yes, captain?
I'm flattered.
May I show you?
Here, let me try it.
Ha! You didn't even get started.
Whose turn now, professor?
Mine.
Are you with cousin Albert?
When is he going to wake up?
He has.
My cousin Arsene, I'm willing to bet.
Yes, cousin Albert.
And my cousin George.
Yes, cousin Albert.
And this is professor Agi, instructor in languages, mathematics, history, geography, geology, astronomy, fencing, riding, marbles.
How do you know all that?
That's what aides are for, young man, and that's one pleasant thing about being crown prince-- no more lessons.
The aide learns all the lessons and passes them on in small doses as required, but this he didn't mention.
Now, what particular science-- we were just passing the time, your royal highness.
A thing I often have to do myself.
May I?
Certainly, cousin Albert.
This must be a new game.
I've never seen it before.
Hasn't your aide seen it either?
Touche.
This boy's going to be something in the world...
Probably an assassin.
It's an old game, cousin Albert.
It's a game that children play in the villages.
The professor made it for us.
He did? Carpentry, too?
Remarkable. How did you do it?
You need only a penknife, sir, and a little Patience.
Just the same as an assassin. Now.
The professor did 86.
Then we must do better.
Albert, my dear boy.
Uh, Albert?
Cousin Beatrix...
I'm willing to bet.
Albert, my dear, such a pleasure to see you-- you've no idea-- after so long.
23 years, I believe.
I'm delighted to pay a return visit.
86? Are you quite sure?
I'm afraid so, sir.
Oh. Remarkable.
It hardly seems possible, does it?
I beg your pardon?
Oh, where are they?
They went to bed.
I hope you slept well.
I'm afraid I did.
I'm so happy to hear that.
And how good a country breakfast tastes.
When one's in town, one always forgets.
Breakfast?
I had it in my room a half an hour ago.
I shouldn't have liked you to wait dinner.
How thoughtful.
And here is the family so very eager to see you.
This is-- no, no. You mustn't tell me.
Well, now, the face is cousin Karl,
I'm willing to bet, but the remainder...
I changed my uniform 15 years ago.
Lucky fellow.
I change mine every 15 minutes.
How are you?
This is-- and this is aunt Symphorosa,
I'm quite sure.
Albert, dear.
As Beatrix says, so utterly unlike your mother.
And this is...
This is our dear Alexandra.
So happy, cousin Albert.
Well, who can hit the target every time, eh?
Well, not if the target moves.
Speaking of my mother,
I ought to tell you, cousin Beatrix, she'll be here on
Thursday to pick me up.
The queen here?
Purely informal. No fuss, please.
Why don't you sit down?
Delightful boys you have.
I found them quite charming.
Too good of you.
I'm afraid I'm ridiculously proud of all my children.
I'm sure you are. And the tutor.
The tutor?
Naturally.
Cousin Albert appreciates that the pupils are bound to reflect the qualities of the tutor.
C'est ca.
And vice-versa.
Auntie, you look tired.
Tired?
Yes, dear.
You're usually in bed by this time.
I should be quite all right when I've had something-- when you've had some sleep?
I'm sure you will, and I'm sure Albert will forgive you.
Naturally.
But, Beatrix, we haven't-- good night, dear.
Albert, dear, if I might have your permission to retire.
Certainly, aunt Symphorosa.
I'm sorry to go rather early, but I'm so very hungry.
Sleepy is what I meant.
The air here is extremely conducive to sleep.
I noticed that myself.
Yes, when one's new to it.
Karl, for instance, arrived only 2 days ago, and he's very tired.
Hmm?
Oh, uh, Albert, if you'll allow me.
It's a peculiar thing, but I feel the need of a little late supper.
I suppose that's the air, too.
You've been fasting too much.
I accuse you of it.
Guilty.
Have I your permission to retire?
Certainly, cousin Karl.
Dear Karl.
Those boys, I'm never quite certain they've gone to bed until I make sure.
Will you forgive me, Albert?
By all means, cousin Beatrix.
Here in the country,
I suppose the family retires early.
Yes, they do.
But when you're out of the country, later?
We're seldom out of the country.
You're seldom out of the country.
Very seldom.
May I offer you some wine?
Thank you. I don't drink it.
Neither do I...
At least, not just after breakfast.
The guard of honor at the station was provided by the 45th regiment.
The regiment served with great distinction at Solferino.
Did you know that?
Yes.
The carriage you drove in has a very interesting history.
It was used by your great uncle
Frederick the day he was shot at.
Did you find it comfortable?
Thank you. Yes.
You're occupying the blue suite,
I believe.
Yes. It is blue.
A few days ago, I was in Lisbon, a beautiful city.
Over 350,000 inhabitants, and the river Tagus runs through the middle.
Have you ever been there?
No.
No. Of course.
Seldom out of the country.
I should have remembered.
It's a beautiful evening.
Yes, it is.
Do you suppose it's chilly outside on the terrace?
Oh, not more so than here...
At this time of year.
It might even be warmer.
Shall we try?
Full moon...
And a great many stars.
It's hard to believe that some of them are even larger than the sun, that they look like that only because of the distance.
Remarkable.
I was looking at one through the telescope the other night.
It was called Vega.
You know their names?
Only a few.
I was never introduced.
It isn't a great deal warmer, is it?
Would you prefer to go in again?
This air of yours is like a sleeping draft.
If I'm not careful,
I shall sleep the whole 4 days.
What would you like to do?
Well...
When in Rome, I think one should do as the Romans do, eh?
With your permission, I shall give myself permission to retire.
Poor child.
She was very upset for the moment, but I told her, "one skirmish lost?
That's nothing."
She'll win the next. There.
That makes a 14-hour day and every minute of it arranged for.
What time does it start?
Alexandra will be with him for 13 hours and 15 minutes.
Judging by yesterday, you're a little optimistic.
Don't judge by yesterday.
He's not going to sleep all day today.
If he wasted all last night, I didn't.
They should have played the national anthem.
Then he would have to get up.
His father once slept through a 41-gun salute.
Andrew, how could you?
Yes?
His royal highness has rung for a tray.
I wonder mother isn't conducting it herself.
That's enough for music, your highnesses. Time for algebra.
If the band doesn't get him out of bed to see Alexandra, mother's going to use a gun.
Cousin Albert's not afraid of guns.
He's only afraid of Alexandra.
All right. That's enough.
He's going to stay in bed all day every day till it's time to go home.
Unless she goes up and pulls him out-- silence, both of you.
You forget your manners, and you forget that his royal highness is not only the crown prince, he is a guest of this house.
You should have more respect.
And this one-- don't tell me. Never tell me.
His majesty king Henry of transdenubeer.
My dear Henry's grandfather.
No question of it.
King Henry I, I believe.
And the last.
For the time being.
His son, a very retiring man.
Yes, indeed.
He died when he was barely 30.
And this, of course.
Of course. Of course.
What do you think of it, captain?
An excellent likeness of his late highness prince Henry, sir.
I think so, too. Excellent.
My poor dear Henry.
Your father and he were closer than brothers.
How many hours they spent here talking, and always of their children.
They had only one ambition-- to be grandfathers.
Yes. Grandfathers of the same children.
Their dearest wish was that one day the families would be united.
And who is this?
King Henry's wife-- Queen Elena.
Yes. What was it they used to call her?
She's the image of Alexandra, eh, isn't she?
They called her what?
I can't quite remember.
Yes, you can, dear--Elena the iceberg.
Alexandra, dear.
Good morning, cousin Albert.
Did you tell the boys?
Yes, mother.
They're so anxious to show off their fencing.
At 11:15.
I shall be charmed.
It'll take them a little time to change.
In the meanwhile, let's see, now...
The rose garden.
Splendid suggestion.
Alexandra takes the greatest pride in her roses.
Your roses?
Yes.
The rose garden is mine.
You planted it yourself?
Well, not exactly, but I take care of it.
Remarkable.
Don't you prick your fingers?
Yes, quite often.
You should wear gloves.
I do... But my fingers get pricked just the same.
Then you should wear thicker gloves.
I suppose so. I shall try that.
That's life, n'est-Ce pas?
One must defend oneself.
How charming of you to take such an interest, and how right you are.
Oh, well, one's had a certain amount of experience.
Now,
I know you're impatient to see them.
Delightful.
And they're at their very best today.
Isn't that fortunate?
Yes, captain?
Well, I'm sure your royal highness would be most interested, too, in the dairy.
I saw it yesterday, sir.
The cows are milked by vacuum.
By vacuum? Like carpets?
The same principle, sir.
Oh, fantastic. Where is it?
I must certainly see that.
By vacuum. Did you have it installed yourself, cousin Beatrix?
Yes, I did. If I may say so, Albert, the dairy is quite a distance.
In that case, we ought to go at once.
Whatever you wish.
We'll go to the dairy.
Please.
I wouldn't think of dragging everyone.
The captain knows the way.
He'll take me.
You've changed your mind, your highness.
The program has been changed.
There'll be time beforehand for my usual practice, that's all.
Et la!
Touche. Good.
Et la!
Touche. Good.
Et la!
Touche. Very good. Wonderful.
Get it now, George!
All right. I'm getting you on this one.
Oh, come on. Over this way.
Oh, no, you won't. I'll teach you.
Come on. I've got it.
Certainly you haven't.
Oop!
Ooh!
Albert and the family at this end-- oh, that tutor. He has no control over the boys whatsoever.
Nor the ball either.
Karl, stop that.
Do you have to behave like a child?
Now, stop that. You'll hit something.
Goal!
Oh, auntie! Really!
Haven't I enough to contend with?
Aw!
Albert's last day here, and where is he?
Out again somewhere with that captain.
The whole of the first day in bed.
The next, he wouldn't leave those wretched cows.
I should think that machine's quite worn out, to say nothing of the cows.
All yesterday duck shooting.
Well, at least he's a splendid shot.
Splendid. We shall be eating duck for the rest of our lives.
Yes, captain?
If I might have the football, your highness...
Uh, for his royal highness.
And today he has to play ball.
I just can't understand it.
He came to see Alexandra.
There's no doubt of it, and now that he's here, it's as if she didn't even exist.
There's only the ball tonight, and then he'll be gone.
It will be our last chance, the last chance for our whole family.
Alexandra won't be young forever.
I...
Oh, I know I shouldn't talk this way.
Beatrix, you're usually so calm and collected.
In time of peace, yes, but this is war.
Look at him.
He's even fallen in love with the tutor.
At least he's a good judge of character.
Better than you are, my dear.
That tutor is quite impossible, and Albert's spent more time with him than he has with Alexandra.
Perhaps Alexandra should spend more time with the tutor.
Then she'd see something of Albert.
Aunt Symphorosa, if you can't even be sensible...
Perhaps you're not so stupid as you sound.
Why not, dear?
Of course, it's a dreadfully overworked plan of attack, but there it is.
Beggars can't be choosers.
Beatrix, when you talk like that, all I can say is don't do it.
My mind is made up.
Alexandra.
Alexandra, what are you doing?
You're not well?
I'm quite well, thank you, mother.
Well, then, what are you doing?
It's enough he's spent half his time in bed. You don't have to start.
Suppose he were to ask for you?
He won't ask for me.
Darling, I know so well how you feel, but don't be discouraged.
Any little hurt to your pride will soon heal.
After all, roses are more beautiful than cows, whatever he may think.
Oh, mother.
We've had a few little setbacks, but tonight we're going to put everything right.
Mother, what use is it?
What more can I do?
Get out of bed, for heaven's sake, to begin with.
Haven't I been humiliated enough?
Must it be in front of all the guests this time?
Alexandra, you have my blood in your veins, and you can't have that for nothing.
Your whole life, your whole upbringing, has been devoted to just one thing-- to make you fit to be a queen.
A queen can't afford to be shy.
She can never be humiliated.
She's above it and beyond it.
Oh, my darling.
I know you'll do what has to be done unflinchingly.
Do what, mother?
My darling,
I know it's a dreadful thing to ask, so banal, but believe me, in this desperate extremity, your mother knows best, and you won't hate me for it, darling.
You must love me all the more.
Promise me you will.
Yes, mother. All right. But what is it?
We're going to invite the tutor to the ball tonight.
Professor Agi?
Or rather, you're going to invite him.
I can't invite him.
My dear, I know he's not one of us, but god will forgive you,
I'm sure, and god will forgive me, and I shall never forgive the tutor.
But why, mother? It seems so strange.
It will look as if suddenly
I have some interest in him.
Is that so terrible, especially if it looks the same to Albert?
Albert?
My dear child, how do you suppose I came to marry your father?
You don't think a man just gets an idea into his head and asks a woman to marry him?
Of course not.
All your father ever cared for was horses.
He wouldn't even look at me, so I looked once or twice at the riding master.
Your father proposed the very next afternoon on horseback.
Well, I don't have to go on, do I?
You do understand, don't you?
Yes, mother, I understand.
I would have sent to Vienna for a Duke, but there wasn't time. A Duke wouldn't have been as good anyway.
Alexandra, you're not going to be upset.
All right, mother.
I shall invite him to the ball.
But not in that tone of voice.
Of course not.
And you'll allow him to dance with you?
Well, you'll be wearing gloves, darling, long ones.
After all, he's just as much one of god's creatures as we are...
Or nearly.
Your highness.
Am I disturbing you?
Certainly not.
I was just making up the list of acceptances for tonight.
The ball tonight is in the nature of a farewell.
His royal highness is leaving tomorrow.
I understand that in the evening, you seldom go out, that you study in your room.
When the 2 young princes have gone to bed, yes, your highness.
What is it you study? Astronomy?
Among other subjects. I'm only at the beginning of most things.
One evening, then, won't make so much difference.
Your highness?
You will have to forego your studies tonight.
As your highness wishes.
I...
I have expressed my desire to invite you to the ball.
I'm so deeply honored.
It will be a somewhat formal evening,
I'm afraid.
I hope you won't find it stupid.
With your highness present?
You should talk to me about the stars.
With the greatest of pleasure.
So we shall expect you, then?
Your highness, I don't need to say I'd be delighted, but...
What is it?
My clothes--I have nothing suitable.
Oh, I'm sure Caesar will attend to it.
At 9:00, then.
You are most kind, your highness.
No, professor...
No, not at all.
I'll meet you at the other end.
Ah, the professor. I'm delighted.
What's he doing here?
Shh!
Won't you join us, professor?
Oh, professor, please.
Cousin Beatrix, may I have the privilege?
Thank you, Albert.
You promised to tell me about the stars.
You remember?
Yes, your highness.
It's difficult even to visualize them at this moment.
You were talking the other evening about Vega and some companion star.
Tell me about the other.
Capella. Yes, your highness.
But they are barely companions-- many millions of miles apart.
See, Capella is in the constellation
Auriga, the charioteer...
A golden-colored star of the first magnitude.
The constellation is in the shape...
Of a pentacle.
You seem to have opened the ball.
Thank you, Albert.
* bum bum bum * would you mind now if we...
Oh, have we finished?
I'm afraid dancing is really for you young ones.
Oh, by all means.
You may ask me to dance.
Thank you so much, Albert.
Where's Alexandra?
She's dancing with the professor.
So she is.
Ahh, so she is.
Karl, look at the way he's holding her.
If he has to go to the slaughter, at least let him enjoy it.
Beatrix, have you seen them?
I have, yes.
Aunt Symphorosa is so proud of Alexandra's dancing.
Dances like a queen.
Will you excuse me, Beatrix?
It's always the same, your highness.
When his royal highness sees one, he just can't resist it.
When he does want to hug something, it has to be the bass viol.
That's the last straw.
And the last hope of rescue gone for the professor.
Do you have to keep harping on him?
I suppose Alexandra's happiness, the whole family's, means nothing to you.
My dear, you've seen me so long in this rig out, you forget the meaning of it.
All that matters to me is the peace of a man's soul, and any woman who can play so lightly with that...
Well, my dear sister, she certainly needs to have a cast-iron conscience.
Ohh...
Your highness.
I'm sorry. I...
I don't care to dance any longer.
I want to drive a little.
May I borrow this?
Your highness, it's a pleasure.
No. I'll drive myself.
There's no need for you to come.
Your highness can't go alone.
Forgive me.
You don't think they're going to stay out there.
Go and signal her and do something.
You put your money on a horse, Beatrix.
Let it run.
Ohh...
My brothers are always boasting that you can speak on any subject under the sun.
Is that only in school hours?
I'm sorry, your highness.
I think I was afraid to speak, lest the mirage disappear.
The mirage?
Have you never seen a mirage, your highness?
No, I've never seen one.
I was born in the lowlands.
People see them quite often in that part of the country.
I saw one myself once.
We were traveling on the open plain, and suddenly, there it was:
A whole city shimmering in the sun...
A thousand church spires...
And it was very close...
So close, it seemed, and so real that you could swear to it.
Another time, it might be something beyond imagining, the shapes and colors like nothing in this world, like something in a dream...
And so beautiful that no words can possibly describe it.
You go towards it eagerly, and all the time, you seem to be getting closer and closer and closer...
And then it's gone...
And you can never see it again, just that same vision.
Never.
So when you see a mirage like that, you're afraid to turn your head or blink your eye or even to speak.
Don't say anything more.
I have to get back.
Dear aunt Symphorosa, always looking for wallflowers.
The little botanist.
Yes, captain.
Your royal highness hasn't forgotten...
There was a memorandum to be sent.
So there was, so there was.
Um, Beatrix, if you'll forgive me un petit moment...
The palace, a memorandum.
Naturally.
And don't worry about Alexandra.
I'm sure she's still with the professor.
A memorandum.
There can be only one destination for that--the queen-- and only one message--no.
You're jumping to conclusions.
He wouldn't wire her, anyway.
She'll be here in the morning.
Yes, here.
The last few hours, and Alexandra isn't even trying any longer.
Where is she?
And where's that awful young man?
I think I'm going to faint.
Beatrix, I forbid you to.
You have a ballroom full of people.
Not the people I want and--
Alexandra's gone and so is Albert.
If you go, too, there will really be talk.
Now, pull yourself together.
All right, Karl. All right.
Just find me some smelling salts.
Here's the memorandum, sir.
I thought we'd never get to it.
May I?
Thank you.
Oh, um, by the way...
Where did they go?
Sir?
One has to admire such courage, sir, for a lowlander like the professor to tackle Mont Blanc.
Permission to retire.
Your royal highness.
Princess...
If I may ask, don't go in for a moment.
There's nothing that needs to be said.
But there is something.
There have been times when a man thought what he saw was a mirage...
And it was the real thing.
Before tonight, everything you've said to me has been curt and sharp, official.
Even your politeness was a formality.
It was only your indifference that was genuine.
But now, all of a sudden, everything has changed.
For the first time, you look at me as if I were a man, as-- no, no. Don't say anything more.
No. I must say it.
Every day since I've been here, you've seen someone whose face, whose voice, whose whole manner has been composed and official, too, while in his heart, there's been a raging fire.
All this time,
I've kept a discipline over myself, but now...
I didn't want it to be like this.
A thing can't always be helped, can it?
I'm so ashamed.
Is it so shameful?
If there is something you can tell me, won't you tell it?
I wouldn't have said a word if I hadn't seen that something was troubling you, too.
Never mind what happens afterwards.
Give me that much happiness.
You don't understand.
How could you?
But if it's happened, that's all that matters.
There is something...
But it's not what you think.
I must tell you.
If I don't, I'll never respect myself.
You serve our family.
I serve it, too...
And the family-- My mother-- has but one aim in life-- to make me the wife of the crown prince, to regain the throne that was lost.
But so far, it doesn't seem as if anything...
As if it will happen.
Oh, can't you see how difficult this is for me?
How shameful it is?
The prince paid no attention to me, and so my mother thought that if there was someone else, another man, that it might have some effect.
I never hurt anyone in my life before, not knowingly.
You're the first person, and I wouldn't have hurt you either.
Why do you think I was always cold and curt to you?
Just because I always suspected,
I always felt that somehow, with me, you weren't at ease, but I was weak.
Ever since I was a little girl,
I've never said no to my mother.
It was my mother who suggested
I invite you this evening.
If I had known what that would mean...
If I had known how a man's eyes can look when he feels like this or that anyone could look at me as you have...
I don't ask you to forgive it, but...
Can't you respect me a little for having told you?
Haven't you anything to say?
Oh, won't you please say something?
You only did what you were told.
I had no right to blame mother.
That was hateful.
I'm guilty, too.
I want to be a queen.
Then I can go.
The decoy must have done its work by now.
The rest of the evening is for making the kill.
Don't reproach me.
Why should I?
We all have our place in the scheme of things.
Have I hurt you so much?
No. It was just a box on the ear.
I respect you, and I want you to forgive me.
Will you?
No, your highness.
Don't go through like an express train.
We have missed you.
Princess-- and here's the professor, of course.
You look much better for the fresh air.
What's been going on-- some outdoor tuition?
The professor's been telling me about the stars--
Vega and Capella.
His talents run in so many directions, one's quite overwhelmed.
Are you an expert on roses, too?
Roses?
Oh, apparently not.
You should get the
Princess to teach you.
Since you live here and her rose garden is so available, you shouldn't miss the opportunity.
But we're keeping you.
We mustn't do that.
Albert, I-- well, here we all are.
Splendid!
Some of us have just come back from a little visit to the heavens.
Yes. Back to earth.
And poor cousin Albert was resting.
After all, the bass viol is really quite strenuous.
Alexandra!
I hope you didn't have too much fresh air.
Beatrix...
Oh, thank heaven.
Albert, we're serving a little aperitif now and then supper.
I thought you'd prefer it privately, just the family.
The family circle. Delightful.
Give me circles every time.
Triangles are such a bore, eh?
Shall we go in?
I'm very much honored.
I always wish I had an appetite like the bourbons.
You know, Louis xv once ate
10 cutlets at a sitting.
Or was it Louis X and 15 cutlets?
Professor...
I'll have some supper sent up to your room.
You get up so early,
I expect you're tired.
I'm not tired.
If you want to go to bed, don't be afraid to admit it.
Bed, your highness?
I just woke up, barely 5 minutes ago.
Those two...
Something's happened.
I knew it!
I don't think Albert likes it.
And you know nothing at all about music?
Then I must congratulate you on your courage.
I fail to see why, your royal highness.
Do you?
I doubt if many a practiced performer would try to take part in a duet, a trio, and a full orchestra all at the same time.
Thank you.
I think cousin Albert feels quite triumphant, mother.
At last he's found a subject where he knows more than the professor.
And that's not so easy, after all.
Alexandra, I have a complaint to make.
You haven't looked my way the whole evening.
Perhaps I have learned one thing on the subject.
The greatest musicians aren't always the ones who blow their own trumpets.
Huh.
Alexandra, see that Albert tries some of the salmon canapes.
I insist on that.
If you don't feel well, professor,
I'm sure we can excuse you.
I feel splendid.
To the beautiful daughter of the house.
Health and happiness.
Quite a healthy gulp, too.
Prosit.
Why, son, this is a heavy wine, and one shouldn't take it that way.
It's a wine to be sipped.
I must confess something to you, father.
That was the first glass of wine I ever had in my life.
It was?
Yes, it was.
But tonight, anything can happen.
Alexandra!
Alexandra.
That was a little foolish, my dear.
I just explained that one shouldn't drink this too quickly.
I think she felt obliged to keep the professor company.
It was quite unnecessary.
You're not accustomed to wine.
No, mother.
So tonight I've had a new experience, too.
I should like to drink another toast.
To yourself?
To Napoleon...
Who made kings and destroyed them.
And who also made that profound contribution to thought--
"an army marches on its stomach."
Oh, how very uncomfortable.
He was a genius, and he knew that even the smallest detail was important.
In astronomy, I've learned that, too.
One should never despise even the smallest specks in the universe, those little specks in the sky.
Each of them is an immense world of its own.
Each of them?
Each one.
Don't you think some of them merely imagine it?
I'm sure it's difficult for the rulers of this earth to appreciate.
They speak of their
10 million population or their army of 2 millions.
It never occurs to them that each single one of all those millions is a sovereign world...
A world that is not to be destroyed.
I am quite sure, my son, that none of us wants to destroy any of your worlds.
Oh, I'm sure not.
Why don't you have a canape?
There are women who can do it...
With a single smile.
Don't you like what I say, your highness?
Perhaps I do.
I'm afraid her highness doesn't.
I'm a little unaccustomed to anything of the kind-- very unaccustomed-- and I do not care for it.
I think he talks delightfully.
They're meaningless phrases, most of them, but charming-- every star a sovereign world.
Not every one.
No?
No.
A planet, for all the importance of its title, has no light of its own.
It shines only with the reflected glory of the sun, the imperial sun.
I'm sure you're right, professor.
I hardly know about such things.
No, your royal highness, you don't know, and you don't want to know.
This is wonderful...
A man who dares to tell me there is something I don't understand.
No, you don't.
Professor!
Albert, I must apologize-- for 20 years, I've been waiting for a turn of voice like that.
At last a man who talks to me as an equal.
I'm enchanted with the professor.
Whether you're enchanted or not doesn't interest me.
And such candor, delightful.
I'm having an unforgettable evening.
Albert, perhaps you'd like to go to bed.
Ohh...
Beatrix, use your smelling salts.
No use! Beatrix!
Mother, what is it?
Oh, go away, go away.
What's the matter, cousin Beatrix?
Tu Te trouves mal?
Ma tete. Tout d'un coup, ma tete.
Beatrix, dear.
I'll take you to your room.
No, no.
I want Albert. His French is better.
Albert.
I'm here, cousin Beatrix.
Ici est Le prince.
Merci. Merci, Albert.
Non, Symphorosa. Allez-vous-en!
Oh, Beatrix.
Ne me laissez pas, Albert.
Ne me laissez.
No, my son. Wait.
Karl, how can you stand there?
It may be genuine.
My dear aunt Symphorosa, the genuine trouble is still in this room.
I saw it coming at the very start of the evening.
Oh!
Please.
Well, my boy...
Have you had enough of madness for one night?
It's my fault. I'm to blame for every--
All right, my dear.
Now, don't get excited.
Let's take this quietly.
That's why I stayed behind.
I couldn't stand it any longer, father.
I couldn't.
God knows I meant to keep a hold on myself, but I'm a man, and I'm in love.
How could I stand there and listen to him?
How could I let him-- are you angry with me, too?
No, father.
Then why do you shout at me?
I cannot only hear what you say.
I understand it.
Can you understand how anyone could be such a simpleton, how anyone could be fool enough to believe in that invitation, believe that a miracle could still happen?
When I found that it hadn't, something in me...
I had to do what I did.
I needed it. I need even more.
More?
Yes! More!
This is our serious, studious young professor.
Well, my dear. How do you like this?
Oh, uncle Karl.
I like it very much.
Why, this is even worse than I thought.
If only he'll forgive me.
I'll forgive you for him.
Oh, don't be ashamed, my dear.
These things happen.
We can't help them.
That's not why I'm crying.
Why, then?
I'm so sorry for him.
I had no idea how much he was hurt, much more than I thought.
When he looks at me, I...
I feel so...
How do you feel, Alexandra?
Tell me.
I asked him if I had hurt him so much, and he said, "no.
It was just a box on the ear."
The way he said that,
I suddenly saw him as a little boy down on the plains where he used to live in those little low-roof cottages with wide acacia trees and the mother who loved him and was so proud of him...
Even when she had to box his ears, and somehow I felt the same way about him, too.
What do you say to that, uncle Karl?
I ought to box your ears.
Oh, darling.
You see, I understand women.
I don't...
But I don't care.
Poor mother. I'd better get up to her.
You'd better do nothing of the sort.
What your mother did was very cruel.
Yes, she was cruel, and I was cruel, and out of it, I'm so happy.
Oh, uncle Karl.
How is it you understand so well?
My dear, you don't think
I was born in these robes.
Oh!
A fine position your mother put me in.
When the horses shied, she jumped clean out of the carriage.
Now, I suppose, it's up to me to take the reins.
It-- don't look at me so tragically.
How can I be severe with you?
I look at you-- Both of you-- and how can I say anything to you as you stand here?
Two children in such a desperate predicament, and yet so happy.
You'll never again be as happy as you are now.
Perhaps it's started to go already.
By the time we feel it, it's gone.
I know because I once had to face it myself.
And now you're going to take leave of each other, quietly and sensibly, like 2 intelligent people, and forgive each other and say good night.
God be with you.
What's your first name?
Nicholas.
How old are you?
And your village, what was it called?
Siglette.
Princess, at last we're alone for a few moments, and you ask me for facts and figures.
I want to know you.
I want to know everything about you all at once.
I--
I don't know where to start.
But this may be the last time we can ever see each other.
If you love me...
Tell me.
If it's love...
Then it's very like once when I was little with the emperor.
I had seen so many pictures of him in his robes with a golden crown on his head, all splendor and magnificence.
And when he came to visit us in an ordinary suit, I...
I didn't know him.
You're so sweet...
And so beautiful.
Don't come any closer, Nicholas.
I--I've never seen a man in love, and he happens to be in love with me.
Are you so afraid of me?
Oh, if I am, then I want always to be afraid.
I want to be so good to you.
Oh, I want a hundred things.
I want to tell you everything that's in my heart, all my secrets.
I adore Napoleon, too.
Little Princess.
I want to hear you call me by my name.
Alexandra.
Alexandra.
I want to be everything to you.
I want to look after you and spoil you.
Eat something.
I'm not hungry, Alexandra.
I'm thirsty.
You want some wine?
I'm thirsty for your lips, for your eyes, for that moment when we can't even speak.
You mustn't talk like that or...
Or look at me like that.
Alexandra...
I want to. I...
I want to look into your eyes, deep into your eyes, and see the lashes close.
Please. You're...
You're frightening me.
I never dared to think that you could give your love to me.
Can you blame me now if I want to take it?
If I want to take you and carry you off into the darkness out there?
Close your eyes.
Stop your lips.
Nicholas, Nicholas.
Ahh, Alexandra.
Your poor dear mother has gone to bed, but she's better.
And we had quite a little talk.
Very illuminating.
Well, I shall say good night.
Sleep well.
Oh, the professor.
That little discourse of yours...
Very interesting.
Original, too.
Something quite new-- astronomical impertinence.
Albert!
He took a modest drink with us, and the first thing we knew, he lifted us soaring up into the sky, stayed there himself, and let me drop back to earth with a thud.
Albert, you're not being fair.
He's not like us.
I've noticed that.
He comes of a freer world than ours.
Obviously.
He isn't bound by our conventions.
My dear, you're altogether too generous.
Your mother has told me everything-- how you have been the innocent target for these unpleasant attentions.
That isn't the truth.
You don't understand.
It's never easy to understand a bad joke.
Your royal highness, supper is served.
Your tolerance does you credit, but however charmingly you defend his bad manners, it doesn't alter them.
He remains an insolent upstart.
Your highness--
I won't let you call him that!
I do call him that.
I call him a great deal more than that.
He's a snob of the worst kind-- the upside-down variety.
Just an ill-bred astronomer who hopes to hitch his peasant cart to a star and drag you down with him into the mud.
Nicholas, don't answer him!
I forbid you to! Nicholas!
Ohh...
That's another matter.
Quite another matter.
In that case, professor,
I apologize.
Good night.
He called him a peasant and said he just wanted to drag me in the mud.
Shh.
You haven't touched your breakfast, your highness.
It doesn't matter.
Lisa...
Yes, your highness.
Do all the indoor staff live in?
Yes, your highness.
In the servants' wing.
Even Caesar?
Yes.
Or, for instance, the professor?
You go along the main corridor and through the staff door.
Then turn right, and the professor's door is the first on the left.
Thank you.
It was just a matter of interest.
What is that?
It's the queen.
It's her majesty, sir.
It can't be.
It is, sir.
There's no question about it.
At 9:00?
Dear mother.
How she loves to catch people on the wrong foot.
In this case, no feet at all, sir.
What will happen when she finds out?
Now you know.
Beatrix, you've seen?
I have. 2 hours early.
Typical!
But she's still going to be too late.
What's all that for?
She's going to the black sea without any breakfast.
And you're going downstairs to Dominika.
Beatrix, you can't escape this now.
Oh, can't I?
As that woman comes in the front,
I go out the back.
Now, listen, my dear.
You've been sitting snug in a monastery.
You don't know her!
She's never let our family forget that the wittenburgs gave us a home in exile.
Our poor little home. Where's my hat?
She'll take it away so fast, we'll barely have time to save our belongings. Oh!
Karl, if you don't stop her,
I shall jump straight out of that window!
She'll walk in over my dead body.
All right, my dear.
Just keep her long enough.
That's all I ask.
Don't cry, dear.
The good lord will help us.
He's the only one now who can!
Why, Karl, you aren't even dressed yet.
Oh, I forgot. You never are.
Your royal majesty, you bring honor and glory to this house.
I also bring some of my pickled beet root.
It's very good for
Beatrix’s complexion.
Uh...
You can stop bowing and go to work.
At the palace,
I stopped half the bowing and replaced it with elbow grease.
Where is Beatrix?
Uh, well, uh-- countess, get me out of this cocoon.
Caesar, I should like a cup of good strong bouillon with some Sherry in it.
If I know my son, he's still asleep.
Have his royal highness roused and sent to me.
Isn't she down yet?
Well, uh, no, she isn't. She-- well, I'll go up.
Oh. Oh, no, please.
Cousin Dominika, you mustn't do that.
This morning, I am a cousin.
It's a family affair, and no ceremony.
Oh, Dominika, please.
Why don't you go in the salon, wait for your bouillon?
Karl, don't dictate to me.
I don't like it. But-- and don't keep interrupting.
I like that even less.
You all have wonderful news.
I know that.
Beatrix is bursting to see me.
Albert is delighted, I know.
I shall stay for 2 hours, and then we shall have to go.
She's coming!
Alexandra is a dear child.
I remember her well.
I shall tell Beatrix to bring her to town in 6 weeks' time.
Beatrix!
Where are you?
Is that you, cousin Dominika?
Indisposed?
Yes, very.
Beatrix, you're seedy.
Now stop squirming.
It's quite impossible to curtsy in bed.
Why didn't you tell me?
Well, it's all been rather sudden.
Perhaps he thought she'd gone.
Gone?
She can't be as bad as that.
What is it?
Oh, it's nothing.
Just a little infectious rash.
Infectious? Hmm.
Nonsense. Let me look at it.
And a chill, Dominika.
I always get the two together.
Well, it runs in the family.
I know exactly how to deal with it-- hot water bottle for the chill.
Cold compress for the rash. Fetch them.
It's nervous excitement, of course.
Now, don't look so guilty, Beatrix.
When a dearly beloved daughter takes such a step as this, you're entitled to a chill and a rash.
You know all about it?
Of course I know, ohh...
And I'm delighted!
You are?
Why don't you run away and get some breakfast?
Well, we can all have some now now that dear cousin
Dominika is such a brick about what happened.
What happened?
What happened?
Beatrix, you're hiding something from me.
What is it?
Karl?
Symphorosa?
May I come in?
Albert?
Good morning, mother.
Cousin Beatrix, better, I hope.
Albert, something has transpired here.
What?
What?
What, indeed?
Bertie!
Uh...
Well, mother...
What exactly do you know?
I know just one thing-- that I'm to be told everything in the next 30 seconds.
I think it will be easier in there.
Up to last night, cousin Alexandra and I, we hadn't met.
Cousin Alexandra was, uh...
Well, um...
She was something of an icicle, and I was, um... What was I?
A fish. Hmm?
Fish?
Yes, I suppose I was.
Mind you, one that we're all devoted to.
An icicle and a fish.
Not much chance of warmth there.
Of course, it was very painful to me, and it was painful, too,
I suppose, to Alexandra and cousin Beatrix.
I should think so. Much more painful.
So there we all were, suffering.
I suffered.
Alexandra and cousin Beatrix suffered.
So did cousin Karl and aunt Symphorosa.
So did the boys and, uh... The professor.
What professor?
Now, that's just the point.
There's a professor with the boys.
Oh, stop groaning!
This professor, he's young, he's charming, and he suffered more than anybody.
I don't see why.
Oh, you will.
4 days went by, and the icicle didn't melt, and the fish was still...
Cousin Beatrix was quite in despair, and you know what desperation leads to.
In this case, it led to the professor.
How did you know that?
Captain Wunderlich is a very experienced aide.
Well, what about this professor?
Cousin Beatrix had the notion of injecting a little competition into the affair, but, unhappily, there was one thing she overlooked.
You see, the professor, this studious, young man-- ha ha! It sounds absurd, I know, but he was secretly in love with Alexandra.
And Alexandra with him?
Mother, you're interrupting.
So there he was, this poor fellow, just a means to an end, a worm to catch a fish, and so humble through it all, so silent in all his suffering.
Pathetic.
And then I insulted him.
Insulted him?
You had no right to do that.
What a woman.
Not only all brain. All heart, too.
Why did you insult that poor boy?
Ah, why?
Why?
Because you were... Jealous.
Of course.
Of course.
Ohh...
Oh, that motorcar.
Shall I?
Yes, yes.
So then what happened?
So there he was, this poor fellow, his romantic dream in ruins, a martyr, and all for the sake of the family.
I appeal to you, mother.
Don't you think such a young man worthy of high praise?
The highest possible.
Do you think such a young man deserves to be punished?
Certainly not.
Does he deserve to be disgraced, despised, discharged, perhaps?
Heaven forbid.
Does he even deserve to be reprimanded?
No, of course he doesn't.
Why, on the contrary.
I think he deserves--
I don't know, but I think he deserves to be...
He deserves to be kissed.
Well, that's exactly what happened to him.
What?
What do you mean, that's what happened to him?
What you said. Alexandra kissed him.
Alexandra?
Just exactly as you said.
I said?
I said...
Oh, yes. Yes, yes.
Yes. Wasn't it awful?
She couldn't bear to watch him suffer any longer.
A sweet, warm-hearted girl like her.
So she kissed him.
What could be more natural? Nothing.
No. I suppose not.
And there were you, cousin Beatrix, worrying yourself into bed about something which mother found perfectly natural.
Didn't you?
Well, yes.
Yes.
That is the most extraordinary nightgown
I've ever seen.
Well, I-- well, one can't always believe one's eyes.
Or even one's ears sometimes.
I want to see Alexandra.
I'll get her for you.
Uh-uh-uh-uh. I'll fetch her.
Mother!
Mother, professor Agi's leaving!
Why is he going, mother?
He's leaving this morning.
Silence!
Boys, behave yourselves.
This is not a Republic.
Now, come and greet me.
I am your sovereign and also your aunt once removed.
You should respect them both.
Now, what was all the shouting about?
Why is this professor leaving?
Has he been discharged?
It's because of Napoleon!
I bet it is!
Napoleon?
Mother and he don't agree on the subject.
Beatrix, you don't approve of that man!
Approve?!
My dear, I have a book.
I shall send it to you.
It's most comforting.
It proves conclusively that
Napoleon never existed.
Albert, you're not just a prince.
You're a gentleman.
I'm a liar, too.
I may also be an idiot.
Where is she?
Alexandra?
Alexandra?
I'm almost ready.
Nicholas...
I'm going with you.
Your highness has no need to carry things that far.
What do you mean?
With all respect, your highness shouldn't have come here.
Nicholas, what is it? What's happened?
Nothing.
Nothing has happened at all.
Well, then why are you like this?
What makes you talk like that?
The respect of a tutor...
For a Princess.
Oh, Nicholas. Didn't you understand?
I've made up my mind.
I've been thinking the whole night, and no one's going to stop us-- the family, no one!
I belong to you. Oh, my darling.
Did last night mean so little, or have you forgotten it?
Nicholas,
I know why you're behaving like this.
The way I behave and my departure this morning...
Well, they are simply my answer to the kiss your highness gave me, that kiss which had all your pity in it and all your contempt.
Contempt?
It meant that I wasn't even a man.
I was just a pet dog that somebody kicked, so you consoled him with a pat on the head.
Oh, is that how you took it?
If I could have taken it any other way...
Yes?
Then I would have returned it.
I am sure your highness understands that.
Yes, I understand. I--
I'm glad you're so clear in your head about it.
It's easy to be clearheaded in the morning when the sun is shining.
And not the stars?
Not the stars.
I'm glad. It's-- it's better like this.
Yes, much better.
The boys will miss you.
They'll soon forget me.
Alexandra...
I said you should make your farewells last night.
We did.
I was just foolish enough not to realize it.
The chapter is closed, eh, my boy?
Yes, father. Completely closed.
I wasn't mistaken in you.
Well, I shan't say good-bye.
You'll be hearing from me.
He said it was contempt-- contempt and pity.
How could he say that?
It wasn't.
It wasn't. I know my own feelings.
Do you?
My dear, you forget...
All your life has been spent learning to suppress them.
When they suddenly come to the surface for a moment, it's very easy to make a mistake.
I kissed him out of pity.
Is that what you really think, uncle Karl?
I think that one day, you'll decide for yourself that it must have been that.
Now, dry your eyes and come along.
Perhaps we can find your answer in here.
Don't be alarmed.
It's not a duel to the death, and it's not the guillotine.
What is it, then?
Your future...
And my part in it.
I haven't any future.
And even if I had,
I wouldn't want to share it with anyone who behaves as you do.
You've insulted me and my whole family, even before you came-- sending my mother a telegram with 2 days' notice, arrive here in the middle of the night and don't come down till the middle of the next.
True. I can't dispute any of that.
And when you did, you might just as well have stayed upstairs.
You behaved like a...
Like a fish.
You treated me as if I was some sort of... Not even that.
As if I were invisible.
Perhaps you were, to begin with.
And now, when your mother's here and you can't help yourself any longer, you want to put everything right.
Perhaps I can.
Mother's already survived part of the earthquake.
The rest will merely bring down a few more pillars.
I don't know what you mean.
I mean, take your professor, Alexandra.
Marry him, for better or worse.
It can't be worse than the alternative.
As a husband, I should be neither ornamental nor clever.
And my jokes aren't even amusing.
He has a few faults, too, but, uh...
If you love him-- and I think you do-- you won't notice them.
I'm sure if his hand touches yours, you won't jump 10 feet.
So, uh...
Go with him...
And with my blessing, if no one else's.
Uh, when I'm the monarch,
I'll, uh, see you're both allowed to come back from, um...
Wherever you go.
And if there's a law against that,
I'll get parliament to pass a new one, eh?
Thank you, Albert, but...
There's nothing parliament can do.
I beg your highness' pardon.
Don't go, professor...
At least not without what you came for.
Yes. Come and get your books.
I must say,
I admire you for being so calm and so self-controlled.
I just wonder why you couldn't have been like that last night, that's all...
Why you had to play on my feelings and my inexperience, carry me along through it all till I was ready to do anything, go with you anywhere, never mind if the whole world collapsed.
And all you wanted was a little excitement for one night.
You're right.
He is an upstart and selfish.
You don't care one thing about me or what happens to me!
Don't answer her, Nicholas.
I forbid you to.
My dear fellow,
I'm still somewhat in the dark, but all the same, it's been an education to know you.
Professor!
Professor, wait a minute!
Your father used to call you his swan.
At least I'm told.
I think that's a good thing to remember.
Think what it means to be a swan...
To glide like a dream on the smooth surface of the lake and never go on the shore.
On dry land, where ordinary people walk, the swan is awkward...
Even ridiculous.
When she waddles up the bank, she painfully resembles a different kind of bird, n'est-Ce pas?
A goose.
I'm afraid so.
So there she must stay...
Out on the lake...
Silent, white...
Majestic.
Be a bird but never fly...
Know one song but never sing it...
Until the moment of her death.
And so it must be for you, Alexandra-- head high...
Cool indifference to the staring crowds along the bank.
And the song...
Never.
Take me in, Albert.
THE HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME
Some years ago, while visiting...
or rather exploring Notre Dame,
the author of this book
found on one of the towers
this Greek word carved on the wall.
FATALITY
The word made the author wonder
what kind of tortured soul
would want to leave behind
this kind of infamy and crime
on the old cathedral.
Today, no trace remains
of this mysterious word,
nor of the tragic life it recalled.
Yet this book is based on that one word.
Victor Hugo, February 1831.
- I am Jupiter.
- Me too!
I know it's rather bold and too severe for a Feast, but it offers a new moral with many details that are quite risqué.
How do you know that?
I am Pierre Gringoire, the author.
- Charity, please.
- Silence!
- Charity!
- Charity...
Faith and Hope!
Hope that the play will be good.
- Quiet, the Cardinal's here.
- And the Ambassadors.
To Hell with them!
Today is freedom for all!
- I am Jupiter!
- You've already told us!
Just listen!
They've all gone mad!
Michel, let me quieten them.
The Mystery is entitled,
"The Virgin Mary's judgement".
Charity!
Silence!
You'll see Venus, the Virgin Mary, the Golden Dolphin and the Queen of Golconda.
But when will it start?
Enough! Bring on the mummers!
We also have the Feast of Fools.
In Flanders, they're up to all kinds of mischief.
It's a proper sight!
- Good day, Clopin!
- Greetings!
This beggar is a real king.
We met in Antwerp.
- I'm much travelled.
- Yes... but in Antwerp you had no arms!
I was cured on a pilgrimage.
When suddenly...
the radiant Princess was chosen
by the Virgin Mary.
The Golden Dolphin,
heir to the French throne,
saw it in a dream...
Come, Angels, if you fear not!
That's not in the play!
At last, some foolery.
It was beginning to bore me.
- A Mystery with no music...
- ...is too mysterious, I'd say.
- I didn't say that.
- Don't worry. Leave it to me.
Good people!
I don't know what we're doing here when we have a king to elect.
A play, however edifying, should not shroud this other event.
Long live the fools!
Wait for me, Clopin.
The word of the people is the Word of God.
But luckily, only once a year.
Clear that away!
- It's the grey man!
- Killjoy!
Sour face!
- It's allowed today.
- Not in the square.
- Everything's allowed!
- If you don't like it...
- ...we'll strip you!
- To your birthday suit!
Go to Hell!
Leave me.
Claude, the play can wait!
Lend your brother some money.
- For the Feast.
- This charade?!
- Where would my money go?
- To a cabaret.
- You have no soul.
- And yours is dead!
Mine's alive and in need of money!
- To the Devil with you!
- He's my friend!
Your meanness won't help me.
I'll turn to crime instead.
Master, I'm so grateful you came.
To see what? A disaster!
It's all gone.
Public, Cardinal, Ambassadors, music.
Those who go do not compare to those who stay and enjoy sacred music.
Djali!
The Feast of Fools has made her mad.
Esmeralda!
- It's Esmeralda!
- Gilles, don't you dare go!
Esmeralda?!
- Where is she from?
- Egypt.
She dares to dance on the square.
I'm trying to put a stop to it.
- A fearful creature.
- Indeed. She has ruined me.
No, the play was already ruined.
She has just finished the job.
In a light-footed way!
- Madame!
- It's the coronation.
Thank you.
- Here, take it.
- It's ours?
Today's a Feast. It's for you.
- And you?
- Everyday is a Feast.
Here.
Come, Djali.
Djali... The sound of far-off lands which evoke dreams.
You hear, Djali? Say thanks.
He's not ugly or funny!
There's lots like him about!
He's the best. He's the winner.
Long live the King of Fools!
Clopin, King of Coins, does the Court of Miracles approve?
You know him.
Is he any different?
I'll ask the Duke of Egypt,
King of gypsies.
He is already Emperor of Galilee.
Why refuse him other honours?
Not so fast! Here's the best!
Quasimodo!
Long live King Quasimodo!
Quasimodo, of course!
He grimaces from head to toe!
Move away!
Quasimodo, King of Fools!
The bells have made you deaf.
Deaf as a coot! Deaf as a boot!
King of the Deaf, hear our prayers.
He's so handsome!
She'll pay for that!
Once you've seen her, you'll never love another.
What good is a bed without her?
- Ask her!
- No! Not because I'm shy, mind you.
I just know she's not for me.
Nor us, yet we are her Kings!
- So whose is she?
- Tell us... We'll kill him!
I can hear music.
Yes!
It's like the bells.
Like thunder and lightning!
I can hear it.
What are you doing all alone?
- Come on, tonight's for love.
- Tonight's for living.
- Sacrilege!
- He's a killjoy!
Judas!
Sleep, good folk! It's 11 o'clock!
It's 11 o'clock! Sleep, good folk!
Sleep?! Easier said than done.
If sleep had a house,
I'd knock at his door.
- Master...
- Go!
You've changed.
- You seem to have... grief.
- Grief?
What else can I have?
Life is no Feast for me.
Go fetch her!
Master...
- She's so beautiful.
- Too bad for her, too bad for me.
Is it my fault how she dances?
Is it my fault her beauty drives me wild?
Go!
See?
You're trapped.
Help!
- The bell-ringer!
- The scoundrel!
Tie his legs up!
Arrest him!
- Only got one eye!
- Enough to look at girls!
- Thank you.
- Pretty mouth.
I'd love to see it in the light.
Beautiful!
Like a King's mistress!
You're trembling, my sweet.
I was so afraid.
You're not afraid of me kidnapping you?
You're different. You rescued me.
What's your name?
- Phoebus.
- It's nice.
- It means "the Sun".
- The Sun...
- Where to?
- Where indeed?
A nightlong ride with the Sun, till your horse stops at daybreak.
You are too lovely to wait till day!
There's a room.
The clean one upstairs.
Goodnight, Sun.
Am I to sleep alone?
- Sleep with your dreams!
- But you are my dream!
My dream for tonight.
Goodbye Sun. And thank you.
Pity! She was beautiful.
Beautiful, but a bit dishevelled.
That's just the way I like them!
Charity, please!
Last week I gave away the shirt from my own back.
I myself have no money to eat.
Nor to afford a bed.
We're not asking about you...
We're asking for charity!
Give us a little, or else we'll have the whole lot away!
You shouldn't have come here!
I don't disagree.
I am a victim of fate...
And somebody stole my hat.
- His hat!
- They took his hat!
- Who did?
- Here's one, for the meantime.
Look, a sinner!
He looks ripe for a hanging!
- Where am I?
- The Court of Miracles.
Then I'm not surprised...
A cripple just stole my hat.
Stole?!
He's moaning to us about stealing!
Are you so virtuous, then?
No, but I've never harmed anyone.
But you have broken the rules of our kingdom!
You came in with no credentials.
- And he came in running!
- In such a hurry to die?
You're not really going to...
We like to see an honest man swinging on a rope.
It's more honourable.
- What is your trade?
- I'm a poet.
In other words, you are a liar and a beggar!
The noose makes the tongues of poets and kings look the same as a robber's.
But... before you're hanged you'll get a fair trial.
A man's about to meet his fate.
Poor devil!
But justice must be done!
And ours is as good as the King's.
He doles out justice in iron cages!
Cages much too small for me!
Come, my lovelies, some justice will do us good!
Executioner, do your job!
- But I'm innocent!
- Like a lamb.
Innocent lambs makes better roasts!
I remember you.
You're the writer of that Mystery.
I am indeed the author of
"The Virgin Mary's Judgement".
I am Pierre Gringoire.
Is boring us to death good reason not to die?
You seem repulsed.
You bourgeois are too idealistic!
- Now if you were a criminal...
- I'd like to become one!
Have you ever cut someone up?
No, but if I'd known I should have,
I'd have tried.
He seems willing!
He'll make a fine corpse!
Executioner, do your duty!
Wait! We used to say... you can't hang a man if some woman wants him.
That's taking bread from my mouth!
Don't worry!
You'll have plenty of time to eat.
You are lucky, little man.
Fortune smiles upon you.
You can choose between a wench or the rope.
Either way I'm done for.
But I do prefer...
The wench!
Here, my lovely ladies!
Anyone fancy this one?
Hey, Colette! Elisabeth!
Marie and Marie!
Hey, Claude! Isabeau!
He'll cost you nothing!
Any takers?
One squeeze and I'd kill him!
Good for a kiss and cuddle.
But I'm past it!
I need someone useful.
- If I have him you'll be jealous!
- Cut him up, we'll share him!
You never find exactly what you're looking for!
Friend, you've no luck!
Nobody want him?
Going... Going...
Gone! Hang him!
Wait!
- Are you hanging him?
- Unless you want him.
I'll take him.
- You're joking?!
- No.
Death may be fun for you, but not for me.
She likes him!
I'd have let you hang and applauded.
Prepare the ceremony!
Throw it down.
Brother, she's your wife.
Sister, he's your husband.
For four years!
No curtains on the riverbank
No locks in the forest
The pretty girl runs The pretty girl swims
Dressed only in secrets
Only the Sun can undress her.
Did you make that up?
Nothing is made up.
It's all planned.
I recall things.
My troubles or grief...
And my desires.
It seems simple for you.
What do you do, poet?
If it doesn't come, I look.
- Where? In there?
- Alas!
Poor Gringoire! Why be a poet?
I was a good-for-nothing...
I was orphaned at six.
I grew up and tried anything.
I was a soldier, but I wasn't brave enough.
I was a monk, but I wasn't devout enough.
And I'm not a good drinker.
So I became a poet.
I've written a few books!
600 pages on the comet of 1465.
600 pages on a shooting star?!
Boring!
But now it's over.
You can turn to crime!
- Crime?
- Yes.
At night people are in the street...
You wait for them...
And kill them!
Or you can just rob them!
- But I'm so clumsy.
- So be a beggar!
Blind... one-armed... crippled!
- It's up to you.
- But I'm in good health.
I just said it to scare you.
You can work with me and Djali.
Help her with her writing!
- She writes?!
- Like you and I.
She'll learn a new word.
Do you hear, Djali?
Phoebus!
That means "the Sun".
- I know.
- He was an archer god.
- God...
- There were many to choose from.
- I've chosen...
- The Court of Miracles!
I was tired, hungry and about to die.
Now I'm saved, fed and off to bed!
A bed and a woman!
What a woman! And she's mine!
It seems a bit hard.
And a little small for two.
Don't you agree?
I'm sleeping in there as always.
- Why did you marry me?
- I couldn't let you hang.
So you just wanted to save me from the gallows?
Why else?
Why else?! I don't know...
Or rather I do, alas!
Goodnight, Gringoire. Sweet dreams.
- Charity!
- Wonderful thing, charity!
He's the King of Misers.
Thanks Your Majesty.
I'm getting too old for all this climbing.
Let's hope it's worth it.
You'll see, Sire. He's a strange one.
Remember, Charmolue, in front of Frollo I'm not the King.
I'm a friend from Touraine.
What are they doing up there?
- Thunder damage!
- May Notre Dame protect them.
Like me, she'll have coins on her hat.
It's here, Sire.
He lives like a hermit.
Certain women's names are so soft, so mysterious one has only to pronounce them during the experiment...
See, Sire, he's doing research.
He could hang for it.
What if he finds the secret of gold?
It would improve our finances.
And there's plenty of other witches to burn!
Let's go in.
I have tried medicine and astrology: nothing!
The human body: darkness!
The stars: darkness!
Master, I am a humble squire from Touraine, who bows before scientists, but allow me to ask you a question.
What do you believe in?
- In God.
- Our Father.
What else?
I believe in alchemy.
Gold is the light.
Gold?
- Have you made gold?
- If I had...
I would be King of France, instead of Louis.
- If the King heard...
- He'd merely ask after your work.
I have not worked for so long without seeing before me a light... a flame!
A flame?!
Tell me, Master... does your science not displease Our Lady?
I am sure Our Lady keeps watch over my work.
I respect men of science and letters.
You, in particular.
Come soon to the Bastille, where we may speak in peace.
Arise!
There is no King here.
We are too near Heaven.
Will you cast spells on us with your bells?
Antichrist!
Son of a witch!
Half-formed freak!
Something's happening in my good city!
Who are we whipping?
You should know, as Procurer to the King.
It's Quasimodo, Sire.
The people's pet hate.
The bell-ringer.
I can feel each lash myself.
Master Frollo brought him up.
He tried to teach him to read.
What has he done, this naughty boy?
He assaulted a gypsy girl last night.
Master, don't take it to heart.
After all, he's not a monk!
A man who lives apart from others, away from life, far from women, even despised by women...
Nature lays horrible traps for men like that.
This trap was particularly lovely!
Making temptation more dreadful!
It's not like the good old days!
You're here for fun but... Charity!
Thirsty...
That makes two of us!
Here!
- Help yourself.
- Don't be mean!
That's like closing the oasis to a man in the desert!
Three turns of the timer and you're done!
Here, water in easy reach.
Shame your hands are tied!
He's a villain. He's a maggot.
Drink!
He's thirsty.
Why not give him water?
Beautiful... Beautiful!
Beautiful!
Thank you, good people.
In a moment, Esmeralda will stun you with Djali, the magic goat!
What are you doing?
Words cannot feed me.
By the way, I got married.
Married?
In a rather strange way.
But to a beautiful woman.
You abandoned God to have this Egyptian girl?
I've not touched her, if that's what interests you!
But you say man and wife?
She's a simple, charming girl.
Fond of dancing and the outdoors.
Swear you did nothing!
I tried to.
On the wedding night.
- Through the door, I saw...
- Stop!
- The most beautiful...
- Stop!
- Gringoire!
- Excuse me, Master.
Work!
Here is Djali, who not only reads but can also write.
This goat's knowledge has no bounds.
It's a miracle.
Letters hold no secrets from her.
Today, she has only one name on her mind.
She read it shining in the stars.
It's a beautiful name meaning, "the Sun".
Witchcraft!
Phoebus!
How incredibly modest you are!
To slay a dragon and not tell your betrothed!
The dragon was more of a gargoyle!
Whatever!
The girls have been excited for days.
Neptune has suffered.
And the monks expect him at the abbey.
Lucky Neptune!
Am I jealous?
I am loved by a mermaid and have the right to love her back.
- What words!
- What feelings! From the heart.
Let your heart speak.
Had I a sister, I would prefer you to her.
Had I gold, I would lay it at your feet.
Had I a harem, you would be my favourite.
- Look, your Egyptian!
- My Egyptian?!
The one you saved.
I heard she had a white goat.
Possibly. It was dark,
I didn't get a good look.
Her dancing draws crowds.
May I be jealous before our wedding?
Chase her away to make me happy.
Easy! I'll give the orders.
Prove your love to me...
Chase her off yourself!
You left me all alone in the middle of the night.
Didn't expect to see me?
I did.
- Didn't forget me?
- Didn't try.
You are deep in my memory.
Here... How could I forget?
- What are you doing here?
- Following orders.
Be off with you!
The Place de Grève is good enough for you lot!
Goodbye! If my friends go, I go.
Can we meet again?
Why not?
- Tonight?
- Where?
The same place.
Where you left me.
The little house.
Will you come?
Perhaps.
Until tonight, Sun!
Mother, he loves me so!
Like your father loved me!
Where to now? "The Golden Cat"?
- I have a date.
- But I'll fall down without you!
Anyway, Esmeralda can wait, as she's so in love with you!
Maybe she's too impatient.
You can't abandon a friend for a woman!
This is a farewell party!
- Farewell? Why?
- Because...
I'm turning to crime.
Thanks to my brother!
You won't see me again.
Unless it's to arrest me or put a noose round my neck.
That's your job, after all.
My head's spinning.
Goodnight, villain!
In a poor man's bed you have rich dreams.
You were helping me to walk, too!
Stop!
Listen!
The statue's speaking.
I thought you were two statues, mind you.
- You have an appointment?
- With love.
And may I inform you... it's with the Queen of Egypt and her pyramids!
You speak both lies and the truth.
- You must be from Heaven!
- You are pitiful!
Pitiful? Me?!
He has a way with words!
Walk with me, statue.
Tell me some miserable things.
There's nothing like misery to cheer me up.
Help me cross the Red Sea.
I'm stuck between two types of wine!
Don't go to your appointment.
The woman is married.
So what's new?
I'll be married soon, too.
Why should love only sleep with marriage?
See that light?
It's time to say goodnight!
She's married and pure!
You can't!
Not even her husband has touched her.
Attacked by a hunchback, left by her man, protected by a shadow!
She must be a real queen.
- A queen waiting for her king!
- Have pity!
- Pity on whom?
- On her!
On her husband and his jealousy!
Goodnight, shadow... and thanks.
She's been waiting upstairs.
- For long?
- Love knows no time!
No, don't kiss me yet.
I'd like... all women to be in love with you.
Especially the most beautiful.
And I'd like...
- ...you to pass them by.
- Jealous already?
A little.
What is beauty compared to me?
Ugliness!
What if I were jealous?
- Of all men?
- Of your husband.
Gringoire? If you saw him, your jealousy would fade.
So you did marry?
Yes, but only to save his life.
I didn't give him mine.
That's for me alone.
I'm keeping it for the man I love!
Have you yearned for love?
Yes, but I have been happy.
Happiness is a gypsy's trade.
- But I was waiting for love.
- Have you found it?
Does he love me?
Don't doubt it.
If he loves me, as I do him...
- If he truly loves me...
- Child...
I have spoken meaningless words of love just to make someone happy.
My love for you is so true,
I've no reason to speak falsely.
Had I a sister, I'd love you more.
Had I gold, I'd give you all.
- Had I a harem...
- You'd be my favourite!
Liar!
I know the song.
- But what did I say to hurt you?
- Nothing. The same as all the others.
The same song.
I'm not sad because you lied... but because I still love you.
I have no use for it now.
Help! Help!
A witch has stabbed the Captain!
I can no longer write.
Maybe you can eat!
She often left without saying anything.
But never with no sign of life or fidelity.
Flowers in a vase...
Wine in a jug...
- Some money in your pocket!
- True.
Now, here I am, either a widower or a cuckold.
No, I trust her.
If she left me for another, she wouldn't hide it.
I'm worried.
She's so beautiful.
Beauty and happiness are like game that is tracked, watched and hunted.
- Just tell me if he's alive.
- Silence, woman!
You are a gypsy witch, in contact with the Devil, who is in the form of the goat that is your accomplice!
What are you saying?
The Devil? You hear, Djali?
Guards, stop them talking!
If this goat resists exorcism, it will be sent either to the stake or the gallows!
A name-writing goat!
A man killed by a witch!
A coin turned into a leaf!
It's obvious.
Bring the witnesses!
- Do you recognise the accused?
- It's her!
And is that her evil-smelling goat?
My poor room was covered in blood.
The loveliest, cleanest one, covered in blood!
And the poor Captain lying in it!
The girl dancing, her goat laughing!
- I swear it was!
- Madame Falourdel... tell us of the dark man who came and went like magic!
With the smell of sulphur and blood!
It was surely he who changed the coin into a leaf.
Here it is!
Pass it round!
A chestnut leaf that sheds no light on an affair that is straightforward.
The witch stabbed the Captain!
It was her knife!
True, the weapon is against her, but...
Continue, Master Frollo.
As an expert in witchcraft, we'll hear you.
I want to say...
There was this strange apparition.
A demon, Master Frollo?
Who knows?
Woman!
- Did you see the dark man?
- No, but he was there.
- You saw him?
- As I see you!
So it was human. What did he do?
As you well know...
He turned a coin into the leaf and disappeared.
Escort the witnesses!
He's clearly a dimwit!
But he was witness to some disturbing events.
It is often the simpletons that see hidden demons.
It's written in demonology texts.
Could it be the demon...
...and not the Egyptian that stabbed the Captain?
So you think she is innocent?
- Maybe.
- But you're not certain?
Girl, you should confess.
It will save you pain.
Kill me if that's what you want.
But just tell me if he's alive.
Yes, thanks to God. Happy?
Happy?
He's alive and you ask if I'm happy?
So why am I here?
He must have told you I'm innocent.
His statement says he recalls nothing.
He didn't defend me?!
Although he knows it wasn't me.
Or, if he does know... it's even more horrible, more sad.
It's of no matter.
I'm happy nonetheless.
I did him no harm.
- Love saved his life.
- Love...
Life...
Those are the words of a witch!
Of a most dangerous witch!
And the demonic dark man... even if he did the stabbing, it was while he was under the spell of this witch.
Woman, do you still deny it?
Given the obstinacy of the accused,
I demand an inquisition.
Agreed.
Do you still deny the facts?
There is nothing to deny.
None of what you say is true.
None of it!
Then I am forced to carry out my duty.
Where shall we start?
The foot clamp.
Take that away!
Proceed.
Stop!
Do you admit your contract with evil?
Evil? Yes, I know evil.
I'll confess what you want.
We only want the truth.
- Speak.
- I'm in pain. Give me a moment.
Speak!
I know the forces of evil.
I killed a bird for singing too well.
I pushed a child in the Seine for laughing gaily.
Don't bother us with that!
Did you stab Captain Phoebus?
Yes, I stabbed him while he was kissing me.
And I danced with the dark man.
Djali is the devil and my husband.
His real name is Gringoire, King of Rats.
The truth is out. Take it off.
That wasn't too bad.
You'll still be able to dance.
Please witness that we proceeded as gently as possible.
- But it hurt.
- Humanity obliges me to say your confession condemns you to hang.
On a day that pleases the King, you'll be taken to confess at Notre Dame, and from there to the Place de Grève, where you will be hanged on the city gallows.
At the Court of Miracles,
I was afraid of the rope and gallows.
But now it seems so simple.
So simple!
At Notre Dame, come and see
The woman hang from the gallows tree
It's a terrible thing
To see a young girl swing
Is there no more pity
In this God-forsaken city?
Alive today
Tomorrow the rope
Sweet Lord Jesus, is there hope?
We burn or hang so many witches we don't their names.
This gypsy girl
So I sing
Killed a captain
In the service of the King...
What's so good
What's so cruel
Do you hear me?
How do we understand
A soul so dark
And a face so soft?
I always like to see a pretty girl in a gown!
Are they hanging the goat?
Last year, they hanged a pig!
At Notre Dame, come and see
The woman swing from the gallows tree
Alive today, tomorrow the rope
Sweet Jesus...
Master Judge!
Sanctuary!
Man's justice ends at the Cathedral door.
Sanctuary!
Don't be afraid.
The rope... has gone.
I'm even uglier when I laugh. But...
I smile when I'm happy.
This is where I live.
Make yourself at home.
That's my bed.
Away!
- I was stupid when I fetched you...
- Keep away!
I'm going.
If you need me... blow on this.
I can hear it.
Please...
Don't be afraid.
You brought me water.
I'll bring you food.
I'll put it there.
Stay inside or they'll kill you.
If they kill you...
I'll die.
What's he been up to all this time?
He's all alone. Maybe he's asleep.
Nobody comes here to sleep.
Maybe he's dead.
Creatures from Hell!
What do you want?
She's guilty, you hear?!
Guilty of living! Guilty of being!
Guilty like you! Like this dimwit!
Guilty like me!
Now it's over...
May her soul rest in peace.
And my soul! Mine!
God! What about mine?!
Go away!
Alive! You're alive!
Who brought you here?
God or the Devil only know...
I know you!
You're the liar from my trial.
You were the worst one of all.
- Listen...
- You accused me and then they tortured me.
- You're the dark man.
- Quiet!
The dark man who stabbed Phoebus was you.
- Forgive me.
- Why did you want him dead?
Why did you want me dead?
What do you want of me?
You ask what I want with you?!
Sanctuary!
He was the one who told me to go and fetch you.
I know. I realise now.
I fear you less than him.
Don't go. Don't leave me alone.
- Can't hear...
- You... sleep... there.
Why are you hiding?
You don't want me to look?
In a land where they looked like you they'd throw stones at me.
I've always been ugly.
Always scared people.
I didn't care.
But to scare you... brings me pain.
For me?
With this, my hanging gown is almost pretty.
My foot doesn't hurt.
The judge was right.
I can still dance.
Look!
That's Big Marie.
She made me deaf.
But we're still friends.
The music is for you!
Only for you!
- The bells have gone mad!
- It's the gypsy!
Fine music for a fine queen.
Charity!
- Do you like them?
- Yes.
Thank you, Quasimodo.
See? You'll be fine here with me.
And the birds.
But they fly away.
Poor Quasimodo...
Do you really think we'll stay here together all my life?
They are bad down there.
Phoebus!
He didn't even look.
And yet he knows I'm here.
Do you want him to come?
I saw it in your eyes when you called.
It was just a memory.
Yes, go and fetch him!
I want to see him to tell him I no longer love him.
And that I also was only pretending.
Go!
Sanctuary...
To think that a pagan creature of the Devil can be safe in the House of God!
Sit down, Phoebus, you're wounded.
By her!
Fleur de Lys is more wounded than I.
I wish to apologise to her.
How long will she stay up there mocking our laws?
- Years, perhaps.
- She's wild.
She'll try to escape.
We'll see her
- ...and we'll have her.
- Hang her, you mean?
Hang her!
Won't that be just?
I am a soldier.
Even if my heart can forgive,
I will always obey the laws of the King.
Well said!
Phoebus, I have nothing to hide.
To forget her sorrow,
Fleur de Lys has also found sanctuary.
In the Abbey, on our land, which may become yours.
- You allow me to...
- She doesn't want to see you.
That means she's waiting for you.
- He looks happy.
- He's married.
To a witch!
Wait! Don't go.
She's up there.
Good for her. That way she'll live.
Take her flowers.
She likes flowers. Make her happy.
I told her I'd fetch you.
- Let me by.
- No.
She wants you to come.
She loves you!
If she didn't, I'd kill you!
Don't worry, Djali.
I won't be too naughty.
At first, I won't say I don't love him.
And then,
I'll show how happy I am to see him.
He wouldn't come.
I brought you some flowers.
I got them down there.
You're crying.
I was lying.
He's coming. He told me himself.
He bought the flowers for you.
You're a bad liar.
You're too honest.
Are you happy?
Poor Quasimodo!
If Phoebus had your heart, the world would be beautiful.
You were right to consult your friend from Touraine.
In God's name, the sanctuary law is sacred.
The people would be up in arms.
And if that happens, we'll end up killing them, which will cost us a great deal.
At least the Bishop we've come to see is an erudite man.
He will give excellent advice,
Master Frollo.
- Mercy!
- Sire, Mercy!
What good is the King's mercy without the foresight of judges?
A weakness!
- I'm innocent!
- I wish it were true.
I'm not here to cause you grief but to seek your advice.
- From me?
- Yes. I have a problem...
I'm sure you can shed some light.
Light?!
I haven't seen the sun in 14 years!
I was talking about your knowledge.
And they say solitude helps the memory!
Sanctuary law! That's my problem.
- Sanctuary is...
- A wonderful thing! We know.
But we want to know if there have been times when the law was not broken, but...
- You know what I mean.
- Yes, Sire.
Sanctuary has been overruled in the name of God and the State.
The Bishop of England, allowed a magician to be arrested in church.
St. Louis, King of France, did a similar thing at St. Paul's.
Enough! We won't forget this.
Mercy, Sire! Take pity!
Our Lady of Paris, forgive me.
I must punish the gypsy.
She is a witch who is unworthy of your protection.
It will be this once, and I'll donate a silver statue.
Lovelier than the one
I gave to Notre Dame of Ecouys.
Amen!
Poet, she's your wife!
- Not really.
- I know. Charity!
You will go to her for us.
Tell her we won't forget her.
- They won't let me up.
- Afraid of her guardian?
- Not exactly, but...
- Whatever! Just do it!
- Master, I wanted to ask...
- Not now.
About my wife...
If she were your wife before God,
I would pity you.
Why have they taken down the Good Lord?
- He'll be back tomorrow.
- Once justice is done.
Thus, he won't see his House profaned.
Get it? The sanctuary law...
If we do nothing, you'll be a widower.
Go away, there's nothing to see.
Until tomorrow,
Notre Dame is not a place of worship.
Come with me, Quasimodo.
You can be saved.
No, I know...
You want to hurt her.
Sanctuary!
Sanctuary!
The gallows is waiting
Try to escape
Hang the executioner
Who's whistling in the yard
The gallows is waiting
The hangman's noose
Runs from Issy to Vanvre
Is made with sisal not with wheat
No one steals the hangman's noose.
- Whose is the horse?
- I'd let down my brother, if I went into battle on foot.
I want to please him.
If I ever come across the cursed sowl, he'll be blind, not one-eyed!
It's you. You scared me.
You look wonderful in that!
Old armour makes the best soup.
Blood soup!
Don't move!
Poets need models, like painters.
Thank you. You are stored in my mind.
There's a place for you in my epic.
Many shall die!
Alas!
Many shall die, alas.
If I were one of them, this song for her,
by me, eaten by rats,
would later be sung by Esmeralda.
You don't risk dying, here.
If I were there I'd die of fright.
Then who would write my epic?
Who could describe fear like I?
This fear of fear...
In line, Egypt!
In line, Argot!
In line, Galilee!
Louis, Bishop of Paris!
I, Clopin, King of Coins,
Prince of Argot, Bishop of Fools, declare...
If your church is sacred, so is our sister!
If she is not, neither is your church!
Our sister, wrongly condemned, has taken refuge inside!
You must give her sanctuary!
To save the church, hand over the girl!
Or we'll take the girl and pillage the church!
In the name of whatever, I plant my banner.
May God protect you, Bishop of Paris!
Don't forget, there are 40 chests of gold inside!
Forward! To work!
To work, locksmiths!
The sky is falling on us!
These men are afraid of anything!
These doors won't budge an inch!
Here's the ram to enter Notre Dame!
Charge!
Courage, gypsies!
Tear it down!
Don't be afraid. Go back to sleep.
They want to hurt you.
But I'll kill them first.
Stop!
They are my friends, my brothers!
Don't be afraid.
They are trying to rescue me!
There're many of them...
But you'll see!
It's alright. Go back to sleep.
To victory!
We have the ladder from the bridge!
To the battering ram!
To the gold!
Long live crime!
Sanctuary!
You want to hurt her, too.
By God, I have no faith, no law,
No fire, no place
No god, no king
My brother's soul We condemn to Hell!
I have no soul
So I won't go!
Come on, the lock is giving!
They're coming in.
Come, I'll hide you.
One more charge from the battering ram!
We'll have our hands on the gold!
Look, Mathias, it was worth it!
Cut them down!
Cut them down!
Life is wonderful!
Charity for her, please.
My job is done!
Though she be dead, hang her!
She was judged and condemned.
They've gone.
It's over.
It's all your fault!
During the night of Esmeralda's death,
the grave diggers
took down her body from the gallows
and took it to the catacombs at Montfaucon.
Two years after these incidents,
they found two skeletons,
one mysteriously holding the other
in a fond embrace.
When they tried to move them,
they turned to dust.
THE GATE OF HELL
More than 800 years ago, at the end of the year of Heiji...
...emperor Taira Kiyomori, with some men of confidence...
...went towards the temple of ltsukushima.
Taking advantage of it, Yoshitomo
Minamoto and Nobuyori Fujiwara...
...attacked the castle of Sanjo, residence of the emperor in Kyoto...
...to organize a coup d'état.
That clash is known today as the War of the Heiji.
The south flank has fallen!
We have lost!
Yoshitomo and Nobuyori have organized the attack.
They have made use of the absence of Kiyomori.
It's necessary to save the family in the garden. They must leave for Rokuhara.
Yes!
Take the father and the sister of the emperor to a safe place.
Use volunteers to confuse the enemy.
Get out of the fortress.
Let's not lose any time!
Who wants to pass as the sister of the emperor?
It's very important.
A volunteer! Please!
- It will be a pleasure and an honor.
- Who are you?
- My name is Kesa, Master.
- Good. Your cart will be protected by Moritou.
There goes the sister of the emperor.
Come on!
Is anybody here?
Grandfather!
Grandfather. Where are you? Kakisuke!
Are you alright?
Wake up. This is the house of my family.
Here you will be safe.
You stay here.
I must return to Sanjo.
- Who are you?
- Rokurou of Mutsu.
- Rokurou? I haven't heard about you.
- And Moritada?
- My brother is not here.
- I will wait for him.
Trust me. I'm under the orders of Samanokami.
Samanokami? And why do you want to see my brother?
Your brother has done a good job.
Both Samanokami and Uemon...
- ...They are very satisfied with him.
- Has he collaborated with the rebels?
Who is that girl?
Which girl?
She's the sister of the former emperor.
Her clothes show it.
- Idiot!
- You are indeed the brother of Moritada?
Both Moritou and I have the blood of Endo.
And I am faithful to the emperor!
Curses!
- Moritou!
- Stop it!
Brother! Aren't you ashamed to support the rebellion?
Moritou, calm down! The world has changed completely since yesterday.
They chopped off the head of priest Shinzei.
Also, Rokuhara is surrounded by Yoshitomo's elite.
Brother! Please reconsider!
You have never been one of them!
I have my own opinion.What does it serve to be faithful to Kiyomori?
When you swear allegiance to a man, he is your master!
Only cowards would betray him in his absence!
It's not cowardice. Don't be mistaken.
I do it for my own interest.
You will never win! We will annihilate you!
Never!
Being my brother will save you.
Don't touch him! I want you to know that the route to the west is blocked.
Join us. Come on.
Let's not waste any more time.
The head of priest Shinzei hangs outside the Gate of Hell!
Let's get out of here!
- Is it really the head of priest Shinzei?
- Yes. We are all going to see it! Come on!
- The worst is already over, but the father...
...and the sister of the emperor are prisoners of the enemy.
And the head of priest Shinzei hangs by the Gate of Hell.
Surely Shinzei didn't expect to hang by the gate.
During the Houguen-war, he did the same with hundreds of heads...
...and he put the names on the door.
He has fully deserved it.
Look! Nobuyori, one of the chiefs of the riot, has come to admire his trophy!
We better not stay here!
Master, they are all afraid of you.
Moritou!
Koguenta. What do you know about Rokuhara?
I heard that he besieged Yoshitomo.
- What is it?
- Are you just like your brother?
- Why do you say that?
- His treacherous head has a price on it!
- If you are like him, I will kill you!
- That's foolish! I'm not like him!
Moritou. Can you prove it?
Yes. I will go and see Kiyomori on the island of Itsukushima.
To Itsukushima? Go if you want.
Heiroku and Tadatsuna will go there too.
Heiroku too?
What?
Father!
Why did you allow Nobuyori to build the castle?
And what do you know about my father and sister?
- Well...
- You don't know what to say! Call Moritou!
Yes, master.
Rokuhara is also in danger.
I'm surrounded by useless fools!
The head of Shinzei hangs by the Gate of Hell?
That's not all. Your father and sister...
- Have they been taken as prisoners?
- Yes. They tried to flee, but got caught.
- Who participated?
- Nobusumi, of the Sou-clan, and...
...Kanenari Sakagami. Right?
Yes.
My brother Moritada was in on it as well.
Your brother too?
That is all. You may go.
We don't have a minute to loose.
We must return to the house.
- I  know. But how?
- Father.
Moritou is right. If you're in doubt now, you will always repent.
We have no armor. How are we going to fight?
For the time being, as a precaution, the armor...
...is secretly hidden in our baggage.
- So you brought them?
- Yes. As a precaution.
Moritou. You may go.
Where are you going?
The great Kiyomori entered the capital with his troops, and defeated...
...the soldiers of Nobuyori and Yoshimoto by The Gate of Taiken's, in Rokuhara.
This was at the beginning of the year of Eireki, the year of the dragon.
The Taira-clan recaptured the control of the country.
Yes, there it is!
The name of Rokurou of Mutsu, whom I killed in Taiken!
Don't talk nonsense!
It was I who cut his neck!
Seriously? You could have killed
Shichirou of Mutsu, his twin.
Nobuyori didn't believe that Kiyomori would recover the country in one month.
There won't be any war for a long time.
DEAD IN COMBAT
Moritou. Light a little incense for your brother.
The poor bastard!
Tomorrow Rokuhara's awards is announced.
- I will ask them for a new armor.
- You think they will give it to you...
...who did so little?
It's you! This is incredible!
- It's you.
- I am glad to see that you're alive.
- Thanks for your help.
- It was nothing.
I have no relatives buried here, but wanted to pray for the victims.
This is my aunt.
- I am Sawa, to your service.
- Where do you hail from?
- From the village of Shirakawa.
- The place with many chestnuts?
Yes. In autumn the mountain hillside is covered with them.
And was she also born in this village?
Kesa was raised in our humble house since birth.
So Kesa is your niece?
When she started her employment at the castle, the sister of the emperor...
...gave her this name, master.
That's a nice name.
In the court she is considered popular.
She is the favorite of the sister...
- ...of the emperor.
- Aunt...
Why don't you come to my house?
I will offer you something to eat.
Thank you, master, but Kesa must return to her work at the castle right away.
- They're waiting for her there.
- I see! That's a shame.
Perhaps another day, when things are calmer.
Moritou, she is a courtesan, right?
Sadafusa, for your acts, I name you chief of Ise and grant you a horse.
- I am very grateful to you, master.
- The next one is Tomoyuki.
Tomoyuki!
I give you the country estate of Gokanosho in Tajima.
Thank you very much.
- Koguenta.
- Yes.
- I believe that you wanted to ask me for something.- Yes. The sword of Hachijin...
- ...and the doll Tsukune that you adore.
- It is strange, but I grant them to you!
- Thank you.
- Approach, Moritou.
Yes.
In spite of the treachery of your brother, you killed Masanaka, and fought well...
...by The Gates of Taiken.
Ask of me what you wish.
- Will you grant what I ask of you?
- Kiyomori always fulfills his word.
Unless you ask for my neck!
I want you, master Kiyomori, to be the godfather of my wedding.
- Godfather of your wedding?
- Yes.
Very well. So be it.
Whom do you want to marry?
She works for your sister.
Her name is Kesa, and I love her.
Kesa? I don't remember her.
But I'm sure she is attractive.
I will put you in touch with her residence.
Thank you. You make me very happy.
Why do you laugh? Few would show value enough to admit his feelings.
Moritou, your wish will be granted.
Master! Kesa is the wife of Wataru Watanabe.
She is employed at the castle.
Moritou, you heard it.
Kesa is already married.
Bad luck!
You will have to look for another one!
I appeal to the imperial power in order that they grant me this girl as a wife!
- Impossible.
- Fulfill your word!
She is married, so it is impossible. Are there no other desires that you want to realize?
Moritou, why don't you answer?
I see.
How do you want me to explain it for you?
What are you doing?
I've already cleaned that.
Relax. I was getting bored.
Leave it already, Kesa. Why do you clean as a housekeeper?
You know that I always liked dealing with the house. Tone, you continue.
Yes.
Although you do not realize, Kesa, sometimes you are too obtainable.
Don't you know anything about the rumour that runs in Rokuhara?
Apparently, everybody in the city speak about the same thing.
A soldier of lower rank, as an award to his services...
...asked the emperor permissioin to marry you.
He sweared he was in love.
It's incredible. How can he fall in love with a married woman?
His name is Moritou and is of rural origin. What was he thinking?
Her husband laughed when he heard it, before going to work.
- Tone, it's not appropriate to make fun.
- No. The topic is quite serious...
...and your husband will worry.
Nobody will make fun of you about this.
The Fujiwara-clan is very noble and respectable.
Also, the brother of this man, was one of the traitors in the rebellion.
I prefer not to speak about the topic.
The freshness of some people is hard to believe.
Listen to me, Kesa, a great lady must be elegant and reserved.
Otherwise, you might have many problems.
It seems like the master has already returned.
- Is our neighbor here again?
- Yes. I think she gets bored in her house.
- Welcome home.
- Has miss Mano left already?
Yes. She visits me frequently and shows me how the wife of a samurai should act.
I am very grateful to her.
Master, your face is pale.
- I am well. Do not worry.
- Are you sure? Does anything worry you?
- Why do you ask?
- I know of an absurd rumour...
...that you undoubtedly must have heard.
- I feel bad about it.
- Is this about Moritou?
Yes. I have never given him hopes, but he could have seen something in me...
...that has impelled him to act like that.
I feel responsible.
Do not worry.
It's not your fault.
It does not surprise me that your beauty was blinding him.
But you are my wife, and Moritou will never be able to approach you.
I was hoping to hear that from you, noble master.
But you must understand my worries.
We samurai may be tough, but we do have feelings...
...and a sense of humor too!
Give me a smile!
- There it is!
- Such foolishness.
Have a little sake.
Drink a little with me.
Yes. And if you get drunk, I will use the opportunity to ask you for many things.
You little devil...
A messenger says the emperor want to see the lady of the house as soon as possible.
- Me?
- Yes.
Tell him that I am sick and that I cannot get up.
No.
It would be inappropriate to not answer the call of the emperor.
In addition of you taking care of his sister, he is also the one that employs you.
It will be better that you go.
What does he want of me?
I have a bad foreboding.
- Stop worrying. Tone!
- Yes.
- Tell him the lady accepts the invitation.
- Yes.
I understand now.
- Is Moritou here?
- Yes.
Go get him.
I'll be around.
Do you hear that?
The one playing the Koto is Kesa.
Since you want her so much, I have decided to give you a chance.
If she loves you, she is yours.
But if she opposes, you will forget about her. And do not push it.
On your way. Go and see her.
What's wrong with you?
Such a coward!
Where is your staunch valor now?
I am not afraid!
With your permission!
It will be a big disappointment, for such a pig-headed fool!
Master, I believe you have gone too far.
Enough!
Please!
Enough!
I am unable to lie. When I told
Kiyomori about my desire...
...I didn't know you were married.
And I cannot abandon you.
- What you want is impossible.
- I know it seems impossible.
Kesa, if you give me your heart, I will be the best husband in the world!
- That cannot be!
- Why not?
Because I'm married and I already have a husband.
Perhaps I am of lower rank than your husband?
Let me go, please.
Kesa...
Kesa, the master wants you.
Wataru...what do you think?
I suppose it doesn't worry you that this peasant from Rokuhara...
- ...has fallen in love with your wife!
- Why would it? Your marriage is great!
Why would you worry about this Moritou?
Stop arguing! We are here as guests, for the horse-race...
...tomorrow. So let's change topics.
You are single, and these conversations always make you blush!
- Me?
- Yes!
Have you heard the lastest news? That
Rokuhara-idiot has done it again!
- Moritou?
- What has he done?
He has registered for the horse-race tomorrow!
- Does he want to compete with Wataru?
- This will be interesting!
Don't be stupid! This type is a brute! And in his state, he is capable of anything!
Wataru, if you want, I will take part for you.
No! Wataru is very good! Last year he won the competition.
Don't think he's going to lose before this poor wretch!
Right, Wataru?
It's only a competition. A race in homage to the gods.
Regardless of who my competitors are,
I will always act sportingly.
I don't agree!
This race is very important!
You must win to defend your name. 
You speak about sportsmanship against a man who hates you!
- You have to win!
- No. The gods will decide who wins.
The Endo are also samurai.
I'm sure his heart is noble.
Nevertheless, tomorrow promises to be interesting. It will be exciting.
- Tone. Has Kesa returned?
- Yes, she came in a little while ago.
I didn't know you had returned.
Why did he call you?
What is it?
He called me only to test my feelings.
Your feelings?
Kiyomori had set up a meeting with Moritou!
- And?
- I clearly told him no, but...
I felt so humiliated!
I understand. I am proud.
Feelings cannot be changed by force.
Kiyomori and Moritou have learned their lesson. Come, don't cry anymore.
I want you to rest for tomorrow.
It will be an entertaining day.
They said that Moritou will compete with you.
It's the tournament of the gods. I will compete and I will do the best I can.
Is it essential that you take part?
Do not worry.
I will surely win this year too.
Kesa, whatever happens,you must remain calm, or people will talk.
- Yes.
- Let's go in the garden to watch the moon.
Have all your friends retired already?
Yes, after too much talk and too much drinking!
Kesa. I won't let you leave me.
Understood?
Tomorrow will be a very fine day.
Isn't that Wataru Watanabe?
Yes. It's Wataru.
- I will crush him!
- Moritou! You must play fair!
I know that already! I will give him a lesson and they will all value me.
- Kakisuke.
- Yes?
See if they win the red or the violet ones.
- They won the red ones.
- We'll win for sure!
Moritou! Play fair!
Yes.
- This is getting interesting.
- This is the best race yet!
The protagonists of the scandal competing face to face!
Moritou has won!
Moritou is the winner!
Good boy.
- Let's go.
- Marvellously fought, Moritou!
I don't understand. You should have whipped the horse more!
- Did you let him win?
- Foolishness! He was better than me.
I  just don't get it.
Master, your wife told me to tell you that she is waiting for you.
Very well.
With this the ceremony of conciliation finishes.
Now the holiday begins.
Once in a year, the samurai...
...of the diverse houses amuse themselves together. To divert power.
It certainly was an interesting competition!
I am sure  Wataru allowed him to win.
- Everybody saw it.
- Wataru giving him the lead...
...is like saying that this is the only thing I'll give you!
That's true.
He hardly used his whip!
Right, Wataru?
- No. He was better than me.
- Come on! Tell the truth.
He wouldn't have won otherwise!
That's enough! If you believe that I was given the victory...
...then let's do it again!
- Interesting. Another competition?
- Sure. You can fight in the garden.
Yes! And if necessary, we duel!
Wataru!
Let's go the garden! The ones that think you allowed me to win...
...will have to answer before my sword!
Moritou. Do you forget the meaning of this holiday? You will not use violence!
Get out. Away!
Idiot!
It Is unworthy of a samurai to lose control because of a woman.
Go home!
Lady! You must hide!
Tone? What's going on?
The samurai Moritou of the Endo-clan is here...
...and he wants to meet you, because he wants to ask you something important.
- And what did you tell him?
- That the owner of the house was out...
...and the lady was out and hasn't returned.
But he said that he won't go away...
...until you return or I tell him where to find you.
I have talked to the person that accompanied the lady to the door.
The lady has gone to visit her aunt and will probable not return today.
- She went to her aunt?
- Yes.
Very well!
I know that your niece is here!
They told me so at the Watanabe-house!
- I can assure you that she's not here.
- Enough! I will search the house.
Nevertheless, you won't find her because she's not here.
- Are you lying to me?
- Why would I lie to you?
So she was in the house all the time!
This can't continue.
Of course. Call your niece.
I need to see her.
- That is impossible.
- It is a matter of life and death.
She is the lady of the Watanabe-house.
I cannot call her on a whim.
- I order you to do it!
- Master, please...
- Do you refuse?
- Yes.
In that case, I will kill all your relatives! One by one!
Master, even though I would request it, it is not certain that Kesa comes.
If you send a messenge saying you're in your death-bed, she will come!
- But I don't want to lie!
- Do you prefer to die?
Hello. I didn't known that you'd returned.
What wrong? They said that you spend all your time here.
- Yes.
- A messenger has arrived saying...
- ...that your aunt wants to see you, she is ill.
- My aunt is ill...?
- Do you want me to go and see her?
- No. It's me who should visit her.
Of course.
But don't go without company.
If her condition doesn't improve,
I will go and see her too.
The poor woman must feel lonely.
Be careful.
Yes.
Thanks for accompanying me.
Hello, aunt.
- Kesa has come.
- Light a lantern.
Hello, Kesa. Your aunt isn't sick.
Don't worry.
I'm sorry. I didn't want to call for you, but he forced me with threats.
- Please, leave us alone.
- Master, don't ruin her honor.
Leave us.
Finally I get to see you.
I don't know what you could possibly want from me.
I have made you come so that you may listen to the voice of my heart.
Master, that which roots in your heart will not change anything.
Kesa, I resign from everything I have.
Only you matters to me.
Why don't you take my feelings seriously?
Enough!
You saved my life once, and for that I am grateful.
What are you doing?
- Are you sure you don't want me?
- Yes.
Now we'll see!
Deep inside, you know you are mine.
I will never surrender to you.
I am an honest woman.
- Leave your husband. Leave Wataru!
- Never!
Leave him. If not I will kill him!
And not only Wataru, but your aunt also!
Even you!
I am capable of killing you all!
Do you try to get me by threatening me?
That's how things are. I can't go on living without you!
What do you say?
Do you still resist?
Come on! Answer me!
Do you want Wataru, your aunt, and even yourself to die?
Kesa, everything depends on your answer!
Please, let me go.
Yes.
Agreed. I will be yours.
You have listened to my heart.
But, in return, you will leave my husband alone!
I will kill him!
- It will be tonight.
- Yes.
- Will you help me?
- Yes.
Good. At 9 o'clock, turn off the light in Wataru's room.
If you disobey me, I will kill all of you!
If you move even a step out of this house, I will cut your neck!
Yes.
Oh! You're back already.
- Where is my husband?
- Not long ago I saw him in there, reading.
Really?
Is your aunt seriously ill, mylady?
No. She will be fine.
I am glad.
I was very worried.
Tone? Will you prepare some sake?
Of course.
When you have prepared it, you can retire to your room.
Very well.
Tone. Wait.
- I want to give you this.
- It is a very valuable gift.
- Keep it as a memory.
- Yes. I will always have it with me.
- Kesa?
- Hello. I am sorry to be so late.
How is your aunt?
It seems to me that she was feeling lonely, and that my visit revived her.
That makes me happy.
- Go to bed. I will come soon.
- No. I am too scared to go to bed.
- I'm afraid that someone will be there.
- What an absurd thought.
- It is a bad foreboding.
- I will take a look.
I don't see anybody.
It must have been my imagination.
- Have some sake.
- What's going on?
Nothing.
- Are you worried about your aunt?
- No.
Tell me what worries you.
- Today I'm not concerned about anything.
- I hope so.
Some music is always good for the mood.
Why don't you play something to me?
Yes.
Why do you play such a sad tune?
Are you crying?
- No.
- I believe you are tired.
- Why don't you take a little sake?
- Yes. I will take a little.
I have never seen you gulp it down so fast!
- Let's go to sleep.
- No. Let's stay awake a little bit more.
And tonight, please rest in my room.
- Sleep here?
- Yes.
Good, I will lie down and listen to your music.
- What time would you say it is?
- It's almost 9 o'clock.
9 o'clock?
Take care of yourself.
Die!
Kesa...
Kesa...
My God!
I never imagined that you would do this for him!
I'm sorry!
I'm sorry, Kesa!
To think that a wretch such as I have plucked you in the full blossom of life!
I didn't understand that your heart would always be faithful!
I am an idiot and a miserable poor wretch!
Wataru. Where are you?
Where are you?
Wataru!
Wataru!
Wataru!
Moritou!
- Wataru. Cut my neck!
- What?!
Love has maddened me! Believing it was you, I have killed Kesa!
To her it was a shame to be loved by me.
She has sacrificed herself by putting herself in your place.
It was wonderful.
And you have before you the wretch who killed her.
How could I believe that I might conquer her heart by force?
Idiot!
Finish me. Cut me to pieces.
Kill me as you want.
Kesa!
Was that a farewell?
Why didn't you tell me?
Did you think it would make me happy to see you like that?
Kesa. Listen to me for last time.
What a husband expects from his wife is total confidence.
Why did you not rely on me, my love?
Why did you not dare to ask me for help?
Wataru. Give me what I have well deserved.
You must finish me off for being the most miserable of men!
Don't you hate me?
I have killed your wife!
Why don't you unleash all your anger on me?
- The life is hard.
- What?
Even if I was to cut your neck,
Kesa would not return to life.
The killer of your wife deserves death! So cut my neck!
If I kill you, as you ask of me, your penance would have ended.
But, what will become of me after this tragedy?
Knowing that my wife not even trusted enough in me to prevent her death.
What is going to become of me now?
Wataru, you are right.
I will dedicate my life to suffer for what I have done.
Today is the first day of a life of sacrifices.
Moritou will be a disgrace up to his death.
Kesa...
THE END
The time is 1941,
a month before Pearl Harbor.
At eleven o'clock, on a November night,
a British submarine
surfaced in the Mediterranean
off the coast of Libya in North Africa,
behind the German lines.
- Are you sure the light carries that far?
- It should.
There they are.
- What's he saying?
- He says they're all set, sir.
Tell him we're coming in.
These were British commandos,
and the purpose of this carefully plotted raid was the death of one man.
Cover me.
- It's no use. Go on.
- Get hold of my arm.
- It's no use, I tell you. Get out of here.
Did we... Did we get him?
Are you serious, Englishman?
The following order from General Auchinleck is to all commanders and chiefs of staff of the Middle East forces.
"There exists a real danger that our friend Rommel is becoming a kind of magician or bogeyman to our troops, who are talking far too much about him."
"He is by no means a superman, although he is undoubtedly very energetic and able."
"Even if he were a superman, it would still be highly undesirable that our men should credit him with supernatural powers."
"I wish you to dispel by all possible means the idea that Rommel represents something more than an ordinary German general."
"Ensure that this order is put into immediate effect, and impress upon all commanders that, from a psychological point of view, it is a matter of the highest importance."
Signed: CJ Auchinleck, General,
Commander-in-Chief, MEF.
This is the North African desert
in June of 1942,
and these are British soldiers
taken prisoner the night before
by units of the German Afrika Korps.
Run, you fool! Run!
You, come on! Get out of there!
Get over with the other prisoners.
Who is the senior officer here?
- I am, I suppose.
- Come with me.
- Rank?
- Lieutenant colonel.
I want you to go with these two officers, under a flag of truce, and tell that battery to stop firing.
Tell them they're killing their own men.
- Sorry, I can't do that.
- I'm giving you an order.
Here, tie this on that rifle.
Listen, Major, I'm a prisoner of war.
You can't give me any such order.
- You know that as well as I do.
- I won't argue the point with you.
Either you do as I tell you or we'll soon find a way to make you.
- Are you going or not?
- Major! Major!
What's the row?
- The field marshal said you're right.
- Field marshal?
So this, then, was Rommel.
Erwin Johannes Eugen Rommel,
commander in chief of the enemy army,
and the most celebrated
German soldier since World War I.
Already a legend in the desert,
he was a fox who had chased his hunters
back and forth across North Africa
about as often as they had chased him,
and his tricks and turns
had made even the tommies chuckle,
which is scarcely the proper reflex
to the enemy in time of war.
In spite of which, he was still,
of course, my enemy.
The enemy not only of my country
and the army in which I served,
but of all life as I knew it.
Not only of democracy
as free men had fashioned it,
but of civilisation itself.
My name is Desmond Young.
At the time of my capture
I was a lieutenant colonel in the Indian Army.
This was my first and only sight
of the cool, hard professional soldier
whose scrupulous regard for the rules of
warfare had been exercised, in this instance,
so fortunately for myself.
Two years and four months later,
while the British and Americans were
still fighting their way across Europe,
Erwin Rommel was dead.
He was dead, the Nazis reported, of wounds
gallantly received on the field of honour.
But the Nazis were great liars,
of course, and many people wondered.
For already there were mysterious rumours
floating across the battle lines.
So when the war was over
and my military life behind me,
I gave myself a mission.
I set out to discover what
actually had happened to him.
what was the truth about his death,
and on what field of honour had he died?
In a modest home in the tiny village of
Herrlingen by Ulm, in Württemberg, Germany,
I talked long and often
with Rommel's son and widow,
and examined his letters,
reports and other papers.
In Germany I talked to soldiers who had
served with him, over him and under him,
in England, with men who
had fought against him,
from field marshals to desert rats.
And in both countries, of course,
I went to the official records.
Based on these facts, what now follows
is the true story of Erwin Rommel.
The beginning of the end
for this single-minded soldier
came at 9.30 on the evening
of October 23, 1942,
when, at El Alamein,
six miles of British guns...
Fire!
I discovered that, actually, Rommel was
not in Africa when the storm of battle broke.
Suffering from a chronic
diphtheria of the nose,
he had been relieved
of his command a month before
and flown back to a hospital in Germany.
But, when the telephone rang at his bedside
and a familiar voice from Berlin
called on him once more,
he rose and was in a plane
on the way back to the desert within hours.
- Thank you. Still the dandy, I see.
- Just luck, sir.
Welcome back, sir.
- Shall we look at those maps?
- Over here.
- How are you, Bayerlein?
- Very well. Did you see Frau Rommel?
Yes, she came and stayed a week, she and Manfred.
- How does it look today?
- They've simply got too much for us.
I've no idea how we'll get out of it.
Not with the amount of petrol we've got.
- We have petrol.
- Not enough.
- It's still on the way?
- No, nor any prospect of it.
- Who told you that?
- I've talked to Rome three times.
There's no petrol on the way nor any committed to us, as of ten o'clock last night.
Schultz. Aldinger.
- The tanks, did they come?
- None.
- None since I left?
- No. None since August.
- What about the guns?
- Nothing.
- And no petrol at all?
- Not a pint.
This is correct within the hour.
Get me a stool, will you?
Here's where it's worst.
The 15th's in a bad way. They drove...
- What's this?
- The Trento Division.
- Yes, I see. How far's this armour?
- No further.
Where are my maps?
Bring the 21st and Ariete north through here.
- Move the 90th and Trento forward here.
- So they'll hook up.
- Is Montgomery sending his infantry in first?
- Naturally.
Then the armour? Let's send our tanks in first and blow a hole through that infantry.
If it works, we'll be on top of his tanks, with our infantry pouring in to polish it off.
- Very good, sir.
- If it doesn't work we'll know better next time.
You're not going up now, are you?
- Oughtn't you to turn in?
- After three weeks of being turned in?
- We're away, sir.
- Let's head north and go in with the 21st.
But there was now another fox in the desert,
an even craftier one, perhaps.
And if the battle boiled into confusion
during the next few days,
it was a confusion that was clearly
more and more in Montgomery's favour.
- Have you found the field marshal yet?
- No, sir. He's out at the front again.
I don't know how the men in the line feel, but I'd just as soon have a commander in chief with a touch of cowardice about him.
Just enough to have him back at headquarters now and then. Keep after him.
By the tenth day of the battle,
not even Rommel could have
any doubt as to its outcome.
There's a limit to this sort of thing. You can't go on indefinitely until the last man's dead.
It's all very gallant, but it's also pretty idiotic.
Von Thoma wants to pull back to Daba.
- What about Müller?
- No answer as yet, sir.
- Where are you from?
- Goslar, sir.
Really? I was stationed in Goslar once with a mountain battalion.
- We skied there. Do you know that run?
- Very well, sir.
- Are you any good?
- Well, two years ago...
- He understood I need an immediate answer?
- Yes, sir.
- Are you keeping after Müller?
- Yes, sir.
- Did you try Berlin?
- He'll call if he can.
- Nothing yet, though.
- No, but he knows the situation.
- If there's anything he can do, he will.
- To Berlin, we're a sideshow and you know it.
Well, what?
- Müller's in a bad way.
- How bad?
Very. If he doesn't pull back soon, he won't have anything to pull back.
- Why can't we get an answer from him?
- His command car's gone. He's in a carrier.
If he's got more than 40 tanks left,
I'd be surprised.
- How about the Italians?
- They've had as much as they can take.
Rome calling, sir.
- Well?
- Field Marshal Kesselring regrets.
Well, that eliminates any further speculation anyway.
It's now a simple matter of mathematics.
With the petrol we've got left, we have two choices. We can remain here, be destroyed.
Or we can pull out tonight and dig in for the next round.
- You think we still can?
- Pull out? Why not?
- Montgomery's got no petrol shortage.
- Montgomery's a very deliberate fellow.
He wouldn't leap after me the way
I'd leap after him. He'd think about it first.
- I don't see what else there is to be done.
- Let's have Plan C.
Notify all commanding officers to stand by for important orders. If we move...
Berlin calling, sir.
- Who in Berlin?
- The Führer.
Signed: Adolf Hitler.
"The situation requires that the El Alamein position be held to the last man."
"There is to be no retreat, not so much as one millimetre. It must be victory or death."
- I can't believe it.
- Still got Berlin? Ask him to repeat that.
I know. But it's not him, I tell you.
It's those hoodlums again.
Those thieves and crooks and murderers.
Those toy soldiers.
Those dummy generals, with their books and charts and maps and pointers.
How can he listen to such nonentities?
How can he stand the smell of such filth?
Why doesn't he slaughter them and use his intelligence?
- I have your repeat.
- Go ahead, read it.
"The situation requires that the El Alamein position be held to the last man."
"There is to be no retreat, not so much as one millimetre."
"It must be victory or death."
Signed: Adolf Hitler.
- Incredible!
- You won't pay attention to such nonsense?
It's a military order from general headquarters.
A clear, straight, stupid, criminal military order from general headquarters.
And what are you going to do?
Double the insanity by obeying it?
We've got the best soldiers in the army.
They may be just hanging on now, but they're still fighting.
If we take them out now, they can fight again tomorrow. But this? This is sheer madness.
Nobody has said "Victory or death" since people fought with bows and arrows.
This is an order to throw away an entire army.
If I may remind you, sir, here in the field these men are yours, not his.
- I just can't understand it.
- He's insane.
He's not insane. He's...
But neither am I.
Pull 'em out, Bayerlein.
I'll argue with him about it later.
The end came in Tunis,
when the Axis forces were caught
between the British, the Free French
and the Americans under Eisenhower,
and surrendered unconditionally.
But the Afrika Korps went
into captivity without its leader.
For, a month before the end,
Rommel had again fallen ill and been
invalided back to the hospital in Germany.
- Morning, Sergeant.
- Morning, Frau Rommel. Manfred.
Morning.
- Dr Strolin.
- Karl Strolin, Lord Mayor of Stuttgart.
- An old friend of the field marshal's.
- You'll find him much better this morning.
All he needed was a little rest.
Frau Rommel...
Manfred Rommel... and Dr Karl Strolin.
From Stuttgart?
Not only from, but lord mayor of.
And don't tell me he's on the list.
Dr Karl Strolin, Lord Mayor of Stuttgart.
She says he's an old friend of the field marshal.
Nevertheless, here he is.
"To be kept under the closest observation whenever discovered outside Stuttgart."
Not that it could really be described as an argument.
It's impossible to have an argument with him in the sense that you and I could have one.
He raves. He screams.
He goes into such hysterics it's like trying to make sense with a panic-stricken woman.
He called him a coward.
Did he really use that word to you?
Not once, but several times.
In Russia, he said, officers like me have been put against the wall and shot.
Nor must I think it couldn't happen to me.
And that was his thanks. That was his gratitude for all that Erwin has done for him.
But you mustn't hold people accountable for everything they say when emotionally upset.
The war's not going well and he's naturally worried.
But I'm afraid it'll be a long time before
I forget what he did to the Afrika Korps.
What was that?
When the end was near, and I asked him to get them out, he said he had no further interest or concern in the Afrika Korps.
And that was their thanks.
Rommel, I should like to ask you a question.
If you don't care to answer, I understand, but, with your permission,
I should like to ask it nevertheless.
What is it?
Do you really believe that we can win?
- I'll tell you what he believes.
- Yes?
He doesn't think so.
He told you that himself?
He did.
And he understands what that'll mean this time?
Apparently.
Then why do we go on?
Because we have no choice.
Because no country we're fighting - England,
America, Russia - will make peace with him.
He admitted that?
And it's the truth, of course.
In other words, while he remains as leader of Germany we must fight on until we're destroyed.
Victory or death, as ever.
I take it that he didn't mention the obvious solution to the situation.
- What do you mean?
- Abdication.
Now, my dear Strolin...
I'm afraid we must go, dear.
- Already?
- I have a train to catch.
- We'll come back later.
- Let's have coffee.
Goodbye. Good to see you after all these years.
- We won't let it be so long next time.
- Do you think they really would?
- Would what, son?
- Shoot you.
No, no. That's just his wild way of talking.
You mustn't pay any attention to that.
- Shoot his greatest general?
- You shouldn't have said that in front of him.
Come along and stop talking nonsense.
- Until this evening, dear.
- Come early, will you?
- He's a good-looking boy, isn't he?
- And a very nice boy, too.
- But were you entirely truthful with him?
- About what?
When you told him that he would never put you up against a wall.
Of course.
Has it ever occurred to you that he might turn on you?
- Why should he?
- He's turned on others.
He'll never turn on me.
What about those round him that don't like you - Himmler, Bormann and that crowd?
- Don't they ever influence him?
- Very often, indeed.
You don't think they might influence him against you?
It's possible, yes, but...
I don't see that it's very likely.
But in the remote possibility that they did, have you ever considered what might become of Lucy and Manfred?
I've never thought about it.
But what on earth are you getting at anyway?
I think you should, that's all.
You haven't changed a bit, Doctor.
You always were something of an odd fish.
But there's no need to worry this time.
We're in no danger, none of us.
And if you'd take some advice from a friend, you'd better not talk like that to everybody.
I don't.
Only to those I know very well and am very fond of.
- Goodbye, Rommel.
- Goodbye, Strolin. Come again if you can.
I'll try.
An invasion of Hitler's European fortress
was now clearly but a matter of time.
And in November of 1943, Rommel made
a tour of inspection of the Atlantic defences,
preparatory to taking command
of the Nazi forces
that were gathering to resist the assault.
A month later, Rommel reported
to Field Marshal von Rundstedt,
supreme commander in the west,
at the latter's headquarters
in the Pompadour's Palace
at Fontainebleau outside Paris.
Field Marshal von Rundstedt, gentlemen.
- Ruge.
- Field Marshal.
Gentlemen.
- Good to see you, Rommel.
- Field Marshal.
Well, now that you've examined it closely, what do you think of our Atlantic Wall?
I'm afraid I haven't quite completed my report yet, but...
Then we'll discuss it whenever you're ready.
I don't imagine the mighty Eisenhower will be on us for another day or so anyway.
- Wasn't too much a tax on you, I hope.
- Not in the least. I'm entirely recovered.
- I'm delighted. You're well taken care of?
- Yes, sir.
Bauer, would you divert our friends while Field Marshal Rommel and I have a few moments of privacy?
Yes, sir.
Appalling, wasn't it?
I can't even see why it's called a wall.
The big ports like Havre and Ostend and Cherbourg are protected, but the enemy's not coming in on the Queen Mary
Nothing's been done about the beaches.
I saw 50 places where an army of children could come ashore.
The trouble is labour. We have the plans for fortifications the devil couldn't breach - solid steel and concrete from Denmark to Spain.
But I'm afraid our French friends aren't being as cooperative as they might be.
Even when driven to the job, they move like snails.
Either we break it up while they're still wading ashore or we're in trouble.
- Is that how you'd meet it?
- On the beaches.
Crowd the water with mines and traps and tricks and hit 'em while they're trying to keep themselves from drowning.
Here. Down here.
And here.
I don't agree with you.
But the difference of opinion will probably remain academic.
As it happens, neither you nor I will determine the tactics in this operation.
Not above the regimental level anyway.
You mean Berlin?
I mean the Bohemian corporal himself is assuming sole command of this operation.
You and I will function simply as instruments of his astrological inspirations.
And in case you're afflicted with scepticism, this is official.
- But that's an impossible situation.
- Then you should explain that to him.
You've made no protest yourself?
After you've interfered a dozen times or so with a man's enthusiastic determination to cut his own throat, there comes a moment when you're inclined to stand back and view it with a certain detachment.
No objection to my pointing this out to him?
On the contrary. I bestow my blessings on your courage and optimism.
I'm told you once referred to me as a clown, a clown of Hitler's circus.
Oh, did I?
If so, I think you should know I've been more explicit about you many times.
That's quite all right, Field Marshal.
I find it almost impossible to keep my mind on anything harsh said about me.
Did you say it?
Whoever said it, you've given him ample reason to regret such a foolish remark.
- Thank you, Field Marshal.
- Not at all.
- Is there anything else?
- I don't believe so, at the moment.
One suggestion, perhaps... in view of our cordiality.
If I were you, I wouldn't be altogether unguarded about what I had to say about this new strategic arrangement.
You should know that from now on you'll be under more or less constant observation.
- From Berlin?
- Friends of the management, I believe.
Have you any information as to why I should be singled out?
Oh, but you're not. We all are.
Apparently, you didn't have it in Africa, but here on the Continent it's an honour that goes with staff rank.
- You, too?
- My dear fellow, I'm the commander in chief.
Two months after that, in February of 1944,
during one of Rommel's
rare absences from the Atlantic frontier,
his old friend Dr Karl Strolin
sought him out again.
- Good afternoon, sir.
- Good afternoon.
Dr Strolin to see the field marshal and Frau Rommel.
Come in, sir.
Eisenhower won't try it until spring, of course.
- I doubt if I'll get home again before then.
- Are we ready for it?
We will be, I hope.
- To your very good health, Doctor.
- To yours, my dear Rommel.
How do you know this room isn't wired?
Wired? Why should it be wired?
Does Himmler have to have a reason for wiring a room?
No, I don't suppose he does.
But I don't think you have to worry about this one. Why?
Cos I want to talk to you without being overheard.
- About what?
- About the Hitler situation.
If this is politics, Strolin,
I don't want to hear it.
You'd rather see Germany destroyed?
It's not a matter I want to discuss, I tell you.
And I'm surprised at you.
That's a communist position.
Oh? Is it?
Defeat, against him, all that sort of thing.
You know it is.
Would you call General Beck a communist?
- Of course not.
- Or Carl Goerdeler, Lord Mayor of Leipzig?
- I've never heard that he was.
- What about Falkenhausen?
- No, but...
- What about Heinrich von Stulpnagel?
Von Neurath, von Hassel, are they communists?
Are you trying to tell me seriously that men like that are questioning his leadership?
Not just questioning it. They intend to end it.
- You mean you've talked to those fellows?
- To them and many others. Not only soldiers.
Churchmen, labour leaders, lawyers, doctors.
Members of the government, even. Not too many of them, but sound men every one.
How long has this been going on?
Since '38.
And what exactly are you after?
One: We want to get rid of Hitler and his gang.
If we are to be defeated, then we prefer to be defeated as human beings, not as barbarians.
Two: Whether we win or lose, we want to live again like decent people, without fear.
Look, Strolin, I don't want to get mixed up in this thing.
What they do in Berlin is their business, not mine. I'm a soldier, not a politician.
- You still think you're perfectly safe?
- Who knows who's safe and who's not?
- Under a sane man you'd know.
- That's a lot of rubbish. And you know it.
Well, I hope you're right.
And perhaps you are.
After all, you are his favourite, and no one's ever questioned the deep and enduring gratitude he's always shown to those who have served him well.
No one's in danger who does his job properly.
Of course, you have nothing to fear.
And if something did happen, unpredictably, you'd still know that the lives of Lucy and Manfred would be safe and snug in the soft, gentle, tender hands of that brave little band of patriots he's gathered round him.
- That kind of talk doesn't amuse me.
- I'm not trying to amuse you.
I'm merely reflecting on your extraordinary good fortune.
I wish you'd think about that, too, sometime.
Not the blood on his mouth, but what a godsend he is to you personally, not only in your home, but in the field as a soldier.
How many other generals can boast the favour and support of a leader so gifted in the arts of war?
That's enough.
You haven't forgotten how brilliantly he refused to be seduced into an invasion of undefended England right after Dunkirk?
Or how brave he was at Stalingrad, when von Paulus wanted to withdraw from the trap?
What other man on earth would have had the courage to send that brief, thrilling command
"Don't retreat so much as a millimetre.
Victory or death." Would Napoleon himself...
- That's enough, I tell you!
- Afraid even to think about it.
Stop talking to me as if I were a child and you a schoolmaster!
Don't you think I know what you mean?
But what of it?
Who asked me? And suppose
I told them what I thought - that what they're doing, beyond anything else, is stupid - who would listen to me?
- Have you ever tried?
- Yes! Been told to mind my own business.
And who's to say they're not right?
You aren't naive enough to think that a soldier must approve of his government before he can fight for it.
What army could exist like that, with every man free to decide what he will or won't do?
The truth is that a soldier has but one function in life, one lone excuse for existence, and that is to carry out the order of his superiors.
The rest, including government, is politics.
And if I must remind you again, I'm a soldier, not a politician. What the government does...
Stop hiding behind that bloody uniform of yours!
What do I care about your philosophy of the soldier?
All it means to me is that you're terrified, and hiding under a lot of rubbish about the functions of a robot.
Have you forgotten that
I've known you for 20 years?
I know exactly how you feel about that abomination in Berlin.
What I can't understand is this willingness to go marching right down into hell with a beast you loathe and despise.
Where's all the sense and courage you have in the field? Haven't you any of it here?
I think you'd better get out of this house. Now.
Not until you've shown an old friend the decency of honesty with him.
If reason won't work - very well, then, I'm prepared to go further.
I won't stir from this room until the truth has passed between us.
Or had you rather
I call the guard and charge you?
- That you will never do.
- And may I ask why you know what I will do?
Because Lucy told me that you wouldn't.
You... You've already talked to Lucy about this?
Of course.
- And she sent you to me?
- Not at all.
She merely told me how you really feel about our sainted leader and his glorious reign over Germany.
Father! Father, the car's here.
We saw it. Will you please not shout?
I've told you that a dozen times.
- He's just excited.
- I know, but...
He's all right. He's still only a boy, remember, in spite of that uniform.
Of course.
Take care of yourself, dear.
- You're not cross with me, are you?
- For what?
For speaking to Dr Strolin.
No, of course not.
Is he right?
I don't know.
I can't make up my mind.
But that's a dreadful thing he proposes.
A great, tremendous, dreadful thing. I don't know that I can go along that far with him.
- Then don't, if you don't think he's right.
- I didn't say he wasn't right, but...
Even so, is that the only way to handle it?
Treason?
That's what it comes down to, no matter how right you think you are.
You think it's better to keep things as they are?
No, no, I don't. But there must be some better way of handling it.
I mean, if I could see him alone again and explain the situation to him.
Can you tell me how a man can fight a war under such conditions?
Isn't it enough that we face an invasion...
No. Never mind now.
You don't have to decide this minute.
It'll come to you when it's time.
What do you think, really?
I can't tell you, dear. I don't know.
But never mind now. When the time comes, something'll tell you.
You'd better go along now.
You're late already.
- Write to me every day, will you?
- I will.
- This is a little something for the journey.
- Thank you, darling.
Goodbye, sweetheart.
And don't worry about me.
I'll try not to.
That's all, please.
Goodbye, son. Take care of your mother.
Be a good soldier. Make me proud of you.
I'll try, Father. Are you going to bring us back Montgomery?
The minute he steps ashore.
Goodbye, darling.
Goodbye, darling.
And then, finally,
after four long years of preparation,
it came: D-day.
And the greatest armada and
the vastest movement of men and arms
in the history of the world rose from England
and set out for the assault
on the beaches of Normandy
and the German fortress of Europe.
From the moment the Bohemian corporal promoted himself to the supreme command, the German Army has been the victim of a unique situation.
Not only too many of the enemy, but one too many Germans.
You don't think he's ready to give us the 15th Army yet?
I don't see how he can under the circumstances.
His astrologers have informed him that this is only a feint, that the real invasion is yet to come, north of Calais.
The 15th Army is sitting on those cold beaches up there.
Waiting for an invasion that has taken place is an excellent example of war by horoscope.
We've got to have those troops.
If we're not allowed to manoeuvre, we've got to be able to support these positions.
We've got to see him again about it.
I tell you this in confidence, Rommel.
I don't think anything we can do would be of the slightest use.
The pattern for defeat has already been set.
"Hold fast.
Don't give up a millimetre of ground."
"Victory or death."
Wars can't be won by men whose knowledge of tactics is based on copybook maxims.
They may stir schoolchildren, but they don't stop troops.
But give me a free hand for a few months and I'd make them pay for it.
I'd make them pay such a price in blood they'd wish they'd never heard of Germany.
I might not be able to stop them all, but they'd know they'd fought an army, not a series of stationary targets.
He'll never let us, of course.
You know how firm corporals are.
Do you happen to know Karl Strolin?
- Strolin?
- The Lord Mayor of Stuttgart.
I remember that name from somewhere.
Or Dr Goerdeler of Leipzig?
You too?
Every day that passes, every minute of the day, convinces me more and more that theirs is the only possible solution.
Your words, you must understand, mystify me.
They propose to arrest him, take over the government and move immediately to make peace with Eisenhower.
I shall, of course, deny that this conversation ever took place.
But that's a particularly childish idea.
Eisenhower won't make a separate peace.
And why should he, with things going so well as they are?
That part of your plan is doomed from the start.
But you don't disagree with the basic proposal?
I'm sorry, but I don't believe
I heard the question.
In any case, if they came to you for counsel or advice, would you receive them?
Oh, no.
No.
No, I'm afraid not, Rommel.
It's too late. Much too late.
Even if they moved immediately?
You misunderstand.
Not too late for that.
Too late for me.
I'm 70 now, too old to revolt, too old to challenge authority... however evil.
Berlin calling, sir. Marshal Keitel.
Keitel?
- Von Rundstedt?
- Here.
- Is this true about Cherbourg?
- I'm afraid so.
But this is dreadful.
How can I give such news to the Führer?
You've reported misfortune to him before.
Why should this be such a problem?
But that's just it. We've had nothing but bad news for weeks.
Isn't there any good news
I can give him at the same time?
Have you checked on the Russian front?
We're not discussing the Russian front.
We're discussing yours.
This situation in the west
becomes worse with every report.
I'm actually embarrassed to have to give him another disappointment like this.
Can't you think of anything we can do?
Certainly. Give us those 90 divisions of the
15th Army who are in Calais playing cards.
That's impossible. The Führer has explained the necessity for leaving them there.
Very well. Give us permission to pull out of
Normandy and set up a line we can defend.
Your orders are to fight where you are.
That's what he expects you to do.
You have no better suggestion than that?
One very much better, in fact.
Make peace, you idiot!
- Goodbye again, Rommel.
- He'll never report that.
This very instant he's knocking at the corporal's door, whimpering with happiness.
You must never forget this, my dear fellow.
Victory has a hundred fathers:
Defeat is an orphan.
Within 24 hours you'll be named my successor. I extend my deepest sympathy.
That's nonsense. He'll never let you go.
But not too old, I might add, to wish your friends the best of luck in their extremely interesting project.
Meanwhile, with their beachheads
irretrievably secured,
Allied tanks and men had fanned out across
France and begun their race for the Rhine.
Put these where you can get to them quickly.
Also those files there.
Keep the key yourself and use your own judgement about the rest.
Field Marshal.
- Where is he?
- In the small room.
- Aldinger.
- Yes, sir.
Colonel.
I'll try to be as brief as possible, Field Marshal.
- You'd better keep an eye on the corridor.
- Yes, sir.
- Well?
- We are faced with an immediate decision.
Three of our men were arrested in Berlin yesterday. They'll be made to talk, of course.
But, fortunately, their knowledge of the people involved is limited.
But in the opinion of everyone concerned, there's no more time to be lost.
We must act at once.
And it's all set, definitely?
So I understand, sir.
The general's anxious to know if you can speak for the commanders you mentioned.
At my word, from this instant, they are prepared to follow my lead.
Then I have your permission to inform General Stulpnagel we may now act at will and without further consultation?
Wait here, Colonel. Come with me, Ruge.
- Clear this room, Aldinger.
- Yes, sir.
Outside. Never mind about that. Outside.
Field Marshal Rommel speaking.
Put me through to Field Marshal Keitel.
I've got to be certain, absolutely certain.
We can't go through with this if there's a remote sign of sense.
Keitel?
- Rommel.
- Now listen very carefully, Keitel.
I've got to see the Führer at once, somewhere in France.
I can't explain now, but you must make him understand that it's a matter of great urgency.
I suggest tomorrow morning.
On June 17,
they met in Hitler's underground stronghold
at Margival, near Soissons.
This is an extremely difficult duty, my Führer, but circumstances leave me with no choice.
We've reached a crisis on this front that calls for a decision.
But you've said that. You've said that before.
Every time we talk, we're facing another crisis.
When the enemy has overwhelming superiority on land, at sea and in the air, and continues to grow stronger with every hour while we grow weaker at the same rate, that to me is a crisis by any standards that I understand.
- A crisis that should be examined promptly.
- That's you! That's you, like always.
When everything's going well, you're willing.
But at the first sign of a difficulty, you become a defeatist, complete defeatist.
Are you perhaps interested why you didn't succeed von Rundstedt? This is why!
Maybe I'd have been better if I had replaced you altogether.
Have you, perhaps, a little confidence in me?
More, it would seem, than the Führer has in me. May I continue?
And what my V bombs are doing to London, has no one told you?
Yes, sir. But why not to the beachheads?
Because that's not their purpose. They need a whole city for a target, then they cannot miss.
Then why not the embarkation ports?
Plymouth, Southampton, Portsmouth?
No, no, no, no, no!
That's exactly what I mean when I say you're no good at thinking above the battlefield.
The British don't care for those villages.
It's their London that they love.
They don't want to see it destroyed the way I'll destroy it.
In two more weeks, remember my words, they'll be screaming for surrender. You'll see.
To continue, sir.
The struggle is over on this front.
Within two weeks, you must prepare to see the enemy break through our lines and push out into the interior of France.
Militarily, the end is already in sight.
We have nothing more to throw in.
What is it you are proposing?
That we surrender?
I give you the facts, sir. I only ask that you draw the proper conclusions.
Proper to whom? To you!
I suggest, Rommel, that you confine your genius to fighting.
Leave the conduct of the war to those who are responsible for it!
My apologies, sir. Now, if the Führer will honour me with his advice.
The V weapon, for your information, happens to be only the first in a series of weapons that will completely revolutionise all warfare.
I've a second more powerful, and a third in mind a thousand times more destructive.
But the crisis under discussion is now.
I've a dozen others, all of them capable of turning the whole course of the war.
But what about now, sir?
What are we to do tomorrow morning?
While you've been deciding that all is lost, we've been working, working miracles, determining the course of history for centuries to come!
In the workshops and laboratories, we've made machines of destruction such as the enemy has never dreamed of!
I have one in mind! I have a weapon in mind!
Now definitely committed to
the plot to assassinate his Führer,
Rommel was still trying
to whip fight into his crumbling front,
when, on June 17, on a road near a village
with the ominous name of Montgomery...
Aircraft.
Three days later, while Rommel still lay
unconscious in a hospital in France,
Adolf Hitler and his staff
gathered for their fateful conference
in a fortified barracks at
his headquarters in East Prussia.
The Führer, gentlemen.
He handles his panzers like a cavalry officer.
Thank you, gentlemen.
- My Führer.
- Yes?
- Stauffenberg, sir.
- Yes, yes.
- Stauffenberg. From General Fromm.
- Yes, sir.
- Good to see you again.
- Thank you, my Führer.
Gentlemen, your attention, please.
Excuse me, please.
I have a report from General Fromm.
- Where's Göring?
- On his way now, sir.
Well, when you are fat, you don't move so fast, huh?
Colonel Count von Stauffenberg?
Telephone, sir.
Thank you.
Excuse me.
All right, suppose we start with the Russian front.
Führer?
The Führer!
Are you all right, my Führer?
Yeah. I'm all right.
For that failure, 5000 suspects
paid with their lives
during the few days
that Hitler spent in hospital.
As for Rommel, recuperating
at Herrlingen from injuries
that would have destroyed
any but the toughest of men,
all public mention of his name
suddenly stopped,
and a complete and official silence
settled over the subject
of the nation's most celebrated soldier.
For three months he remained
in this sinister isolation
until the afternoon of October 13 in 1944.
- Keitel?
- How are you, Rommel?
- Getting along, thank you.
- Well enough yet to come up to Berlin?
I'm afraid not yet.
In another week or two, perhaps. Why?
I could send a special train for you.
That's very good of you, but I really don't feel up to it yet.
Is there some particular urgency about it?
How soon will you be ready
for another command?
Another two weeks, I suppose.
Three at the most.
If we send someone there, would you be able to discuss the situation with him?
- Of course.
- Very well. I'll send Burgdorf. You know him?
I've met him.
Suppose I have him drive down tomorrow
morning, would that be convenient?
- Perfectly.
- He'll have full information and instructions.
- Give my best regards to Frau Rommel.
- I will. And thank you very much.
- Goodbye, then.
- Goodbye.
Keitel. He's talking about another command again.
- When?
- When I feel like it, I suppose.
Uh, he sends his best regards to you.
- We're here to see Field Marshal Rommel.
- I'll tell him, sir.
- Would you tell him...
- Come in, Burgdorf.
- Field Marshal.
- It's good to see you again. And you, General.
- I don't believe you've met my wife.
- No, sir.
May I present General Burgdorf and General...?
- Maisel.
- General Maisel.
- My son Manfred and Captain Aldinger.
- I hope you're not too tired.
- Not at all, thank you.
- Have you time for luncheon first?
Thank you, but we're due back as quickly as we can make it.
Very well, then.
If you'll excuse us, dear. This way.
- Our apologies.
- Of course, but I'm terribly disappointed.
- Another time, perhaps.
- I hope so.
I hope it's the Russian front, don't you?
Make yourselves comfortable.
Smoke, if you wish. I'm not like Montgomery - smoke doesn't make me unhappy.
At your service, gentlemen.
- We come directly from the Führer.
- Yes.
And what we have to say to you comes directly from his lips.
Yes?
Our instructions are to tell you, first, of his deep appreciation of your many heroic services to the state.
Go on.
And his regrets over your unfortunate accident.
I was sure his silence meant only that there were more important matters on his mind.
It's a pity that after such a record...
If you'll forgive me, may we skip your reflections and get to the message you have?
Of course, sir.
You'll observe that the charges are supported by an overwhelming body of testimony.
I can read, thank you.
You've been uncommonly fortunate,
I see, in deathbed confessions.
It's all perfectly legal, I assure you, sir.
You may inform the Führer that I look forward to answering these charges in court.
You don't intend to deny them, do you?
I said you may inform the Führer that I look forward to answering the charges in court.
The Führer is extremely hopeful that this matter can be settled without exposing it to the inevitable publicity of a court trial.
Very well, then.
Let him withdraw the charges.
His view is that nothing but harm for everyone could come from a trial.
My orders are to remind you, in the strongest terms possible, of the damage that testimony like this could do to your name and reputation.
What does he expect me to do?
Plead guilty? To you?
Well, naturally not that, of course.
I know what he wants.
He wants me to keep my mouth shut.
He doesn't want me to speak out where it can be heard.
Well, you may tell him for me that that's very thoughtful of him, but that I'm quite capable of taking care of my own name and reputation in my own way, which will be in a proper court of law.
But to what end, sir?
The verdict is already indicated.
He told you to tell me that, too?
The evidence is there.
What defence is possible?
Then... what does he suggest?
Before we go any further, the field marshal should be warned that this house is surrounded.
- My orders, sir. I'm sure you understand.
- And both of us are armed.
What does he want done?
His belief is that it would be to the best interests of all if you should see fit to relieve the situation yourself, quietly and without delay.
Go on.
The advantages of a solution like that over an exchange of recriminations in an open court are, in his opinion, several and obvious.
Most important to him, of course, would be the preservation of your name and fame.
And he would see to it that no suspicion would be attached to the way of your going.
As far as the rest of the nation would know, you succumbed finally to your war wounds.
That would be the official announcement.
And the state would then honour your memory and your family as well, with a generosity that would be historic.
That was his word - "historic".
Your name would live on in the glory it once deserved, while your wife and son would never want for either safety or comfort as long as they live.
- I have a choice?
- In a sense, yes.
The choice to die now or later.
It amounts to that, I'm afraid.
How long have I to make this choice?
We're due back in Berlin as early this evening as we can make it.
The penalty in this case,
I'm told, would be the garrotte:
Death by strangulation.
The drug I have brought with me is effective in three seconds and painless.
Tell him for me that in spite of the disadvantages you've been kind enough to point out,
I'll take the trial.
It may be, as you say, a futile defence, but I think it should be heard nevertheless.
There might be some value in it for those who hear it.
It might even move some to stop and think for a moment or two, as finally I did, though unfortunately too late.
In any case, it's my life, and that's my choice.
I confess my disappointment with your choice, sir.
My heart, of course, bleeds for you.
The unfortunate part of it is that if you insist on a trial,
I have no authority to offer any guarantees for the safety and comfort of your son... and widow.
They're coming out now.
- All over, sir?
- I believe so.
- We'll wait outside, sir.
- I won't be long.
Well, we hardly expected such a...
- Over already?
- Wait there. I'll be down in a few moments.
What is it, Erwin?
I want you to be strong, darling.
I want you to be very strong and very brave.
Do you understand?
Yes.
I've got to go away now, and I won't be back.
Do you want me to tell you any more?
There's no way out?
No. But it won't be too terrible.
They're giving me a drug.
It's painless and effective immediately.
We're leaving now and I'll do it as quickly as possible.
We've got guns. Can't we make a break for it?
No. There's nothing that can be done.
They've thought of everything.
Well, at least we could get them.
There's nothing to be done, I tell you.
I've got to do exactly as they say.
Yes, sir.
Are you going to be brave now?
I don't know.
You and Manfred will be all right.
They've assured me of that.
And nobody's to know about this but us.
Are you sure there's no other way?
No other, darling.
- Have you told Manfred yet?
- I'll tell him when I go down.
No. Let me tell him.
I can tell him so much better.
If you wish.
I'll get my coat now.
It's cold and I don't want to shiver.
The field marshal's coming out now.
- You're going now?
- Why not?
But are you well enough?
Of course. I've just been taking it easy on you and your mother.
Is it Russia?
Goodbye, Aldinger, old dear friend.
Goodbye, sir.
Take care of them.
Yes, sir.
Can't you tell me?
Don't ask so many questions.
You know better than to talk like that.
- But when will we know?
- Before very long.
- Goodbye, son. Be a good boy.
- Goodbye, Father.
You'll stop them, won't you?
We'll see.
Goodbye, darling.
Goodbye, dear.
During that last short ride,
what may Rommel's thoughts have been?
were they bitter - that he had learned
too slowly and struck too late?
Or did they go back to the desert, where his
military genius had first electrified the world?
First at Mechili.
Then Tobruk.
Yes, and even El Alamein.
In any case, his life and fate have best
been summed up, ironically enough,
in the words of Nazi Germany's
sternest enemy,
the Honourable Winston Churchill.
His ardour and daring
inflicted grievous disasters upon us,
but he deserves the salute which
I made him in the House of Commons
in January 1942.
He also deserves our respect
because, although a loyal German soldier,
he came to hate Hitler and all his works,
and took part in the conspiracy
to rescue Germany
by displacing the maniac and tyrant.
For this, he paid the forfeit of his life.
In the sombre wars of modern democracy,
there is little place for chivalry.
Daiei Productions Presents
YOKIHI
Produced by Masaichi Nagata,
Run Run Shaw
Screenplay by Matsutaro Kawaguchi,
Yoshikata Yoda, Masashige Narusawa
Cinematography by Kohei Sugiyama
Sound by Kunio Hashimoto
Art Direction by Hiroshi Mizutani
Historical Research by Lu Shi-hou
Music by Fumio Hayasaka
Cast
Yang Yu-huan/Kuei-fei - Machiko Kyo
Emperor Hsüan-tsung - Masayuki Mori
An Lu-shan - So Yamamura
Kao Li-hsi - Eitaro Shindo
Yang Chao/Kuo-chung - Sakae Ozawa
Princess Yen-chun - Haruko Sugimura
Hung-tao - Yoko Minamida
Chen Hsuan-li - Bontaro Miyake
Premier Li Lin-fu - Tatsuya Ishiguro
Yang Hsien - Isao Yamagata
Directed by Kenji Mizoguchi
- We have come to take you away, sire
- Please make yourself ready
Where are you taking me?
- To the Palace of the West, sire
- What?
The Palace of the West?
You're going to confine me there?
- Yes, sire
- No!
I refuse to leave here
I shall remain here
Here, at least I can listen to the sounds of the city...
...and there are many distractions to console me in my solitude
Go tell the Emperor that
Tell my son...
...not to cause his old father any further suffering
But it is the Emperor's order
We must carry out his imperial order to the letter
Please, make yourself ready to leave
You insult me!
Get out!
Out!
Out!
Kuei-fei...
Kuei-fei...
Where are you, my love?
Are you watching over me
from somewhere beyond the grave?
Alas, I am too old now...
... for any pleasures
this world may offer me
I wish only to see you again
Any place without your presence...
... is unbearable to me
Kuei-fei...
... where are you?
Well done.
You all played very well
I wasn't too sure of the piece at first...
...but I very much enjoyed your rendition
I think it is one of Your Majesty's masterpieces
However, there is a certain underlying sadness to it, sire
How can you expect me to compose anything joyous, the way I feel?
Majesty, you are the most fortunate person in the Empire
Look at me, do I really seem that fortunate?
Fortune is not a mere corollary of one's social status
If I were truly fortunate...
...then I would be able to compose more joyous pieces of music
This piece was composed in honour of my late wife
Well... let us play the next movement
Your Majesty...
...Premier Li wishes for an audience with you...
...to discuss pressing affairs of state
And as your schedule must be strictly observed...
...I must ask you kindly to finish now for today
Thank you, everybody
Wait
I just want to try this last piece
Premier Li, you can wait a little longer
I fear I cannot, Majesty
Besides myself, you are to address several foreign ambassadors, sire
We also have to plan your journey details
Affairs of state must always take precedence, sire
You constantly interfere with my pleasures...
...and bind me to ridiculous schedules and ceremonies!
You distract His Majesty from his duties of governance
Get out!
- Majesty...
- What is it?
Please look at this statue of the Bodhisattva...
...that came in tribute from the Silla Kingdom of Korea
She is truly a work of great beauty
And who is this?
You honour me by giving her recognition, Majesty
I have taken the liberty of selecting this highly capable lady...
...to take care of all your needs, sire
It's unnecessary
Nobody can take the place of the late Empress
Just forget about it
I heard that His Majesty turned her down
Did he refuse you?
It wasn't your fault
We may be the most beautiful women in the capital...
...but we're just not beautiful enough for His Imperial Majesty, that's all!
You just have to accept your fate with good grace
Oh, welcome, sire!
General An Lu-shan has arrived!
Welcome
Oh, welcome, sire
What a shame. I really thought your daughter would be accepted
She failed, despite all your intercessions on our behalf
What a shame
That's put an end to all our plans, General
Not so. All is not lost yet
Her acceptance would have hastened things along, that's all
All our hopes are dashed
She's the third sister to be rejected
I'll end up working here and never getting on in life
General, please take me with you to your fortress
- And what would you do there?
- But I've no future here in the capital
I'd rather be an official under you,
General...
...then I could take bribes and get rich quick!
You sound desperate, and I don't hire such desperate men
I'll worry about it later.
General, let's have a drink
- Good
- Come right this way
- Let's drink
- You go on ahead...
What's up with you? Look lively!
Master Kao will be arriving soon.
Let's go
Even on the branches of the willows
Throughout the town...
Hey, the guests have arrived!
Stop that singing!
- Who is she?
- She's my youngest cousin
Same family as the others?
She's their half-sister. A country girl, just arrived from the mountains
- General?
- Wait...
So, you're a daughter of the Yang family?
I'm more like their servant
Hey!
Show me your face
Please leave me alone,
I have work to do
Hey!
What are you doing?
What are you doing to me?
What...?
You're quite a beauty
Let go of me!
You're wasted here in the kitchen
General! What are you doing in this place?
- I've just found a real treasure
- What?
This one, here!
That was a real shame your daughter was rejected
No, not at all, one can't expect the daughter of a mere restaurateur...
...to attract the attention of His Majesty
It was our fault for thinking above our station
What do you mean, brother, that it was our fault?
You want to run this restaurant for the rest of your life?
Well, I don't! I want to be someone and get on in life!
I just think differently from you
You want to use your daughters to further your own ambitions
What's wrong with that? I'm doing it for the honour of the Yang Family
For the prosperity of the whole family
I'm only doing the right thing
No, your motives are evil...
Stop
- Let me see how you look in these
- No!
Don't answer back! Put them on quickly!
If I put those on, everyone will just laugh at me!
What a child! Come here
I'm just a country peasant
Since my mother died, I've been forced to work as a maid in the kitchens
You treat me worse than a dog!
Everyone has to start somewhere
Take me for instance, my father was a foreigner in this country
I suffered enormous prejudice and was maltreated as a child
But human beings have a destiny...
...and if you don't grasp at good fortune then you'll regret it for life
Don't you see, you have been presented with a wonderful opportunity?
Right then, try these robes on
And then what?
We're going to see where your destiny lies
You've never realised how beautiful you are?
No, not at all
Well, it's up to me to convince you otherwise
But you must be aware of your beauty, before you can convince others to see it
Yes?
Get dressed quickly
Follow the General's kind advice and put this robe on
Others may envy us...
...but our low birth stops us from progressing further
Is it only the Li family that can gain advancement?
There's nothing we can do about it for the present
No one can stand in the way of Premier Li Lin-fu
It's unfortunate the Emperor wasn't attracted to your daughter
He can't forget the late Empress
Wu-hui, can he?
She was a wonderful Empress
There could be no other like her in this world
Yes, there could be, Master Kao!
There could be another Wu-hui!
You're not the only one who wishes to see Empress Wu-hui reincarnated
Those who support the Emperor wish it, too
- Another Empress Wu-hui, you say?
- Yes, another. See for yourself
It's Yu-huan, isn't it?
She's beautiful
You're such fools!
How could you hide such a jewel in your kitchens?
Who is this?
My youngest cousin, Yu-huan
From here, we're heading for the convent on Mount Li
I will ask the Mother Abbess to present you to His Majesty's court
She is a relative of the Emperor and he trusts her implicitly
Master Kao is already there waiting for us
At last, our luck is going to change
I have no doubt that you will attract the Emperor's attention
As a reward for finding you...
...I will be called back to the capital in triumph and made a minister
And as the highest ranking concubine, you shall enjoy a most glorious life
You must take full advantage of the fact that you were born beautiful
What's wrong?
Why are you so quiet?
Don't you understand, if you become an imperial concubine...
...great status and honour will be bestowed upon all your family?
And I will simply become a tool for the family to use...
...just as I was when I was forced to work in their kitchens
Not at all!
This is for your own happiness
Our rewards will be a mere fraction of yours
You must understand that
Everything will turn out just fine...
Just fine
So, from this point onwards...
...everything about your past will be extinguished
What do you think of her,
Mother Abbess?
A lovely girl
- Everything is prepared, madam
- This girl is your servant
She will obey your every whim
Please allow me to show you to your room
Do you think she will be to the Emperor's liking?
Mother Abbess...
Just as you recommended Wu-hui as a wife for the Emperor...
...I would like to propose her suitability as an imperial consort
Do you think the Emperor trusts you more than he does me?
I'm not saying that at all. I mean...
Master Kao...
...do you have any idea how much the Emperor trusts my judgement?
- Of course I do, but...
- Then be silent!
Yes, madam
It was I who instructed the Empress Wu-hui
And I will mould this girl in the same way
You will see, I will make her worthy of the Emperor
Yes, madam
His Majesty has arrived
He's walking in the Plum Tree Garden
I've been told to fetch you, it's time for you to meet him
Do you think I'll be all right dressed like this?
You look very beautiful
If I am not to the Emperor's liking...
...I'll end up being confined to his harem...
...to live out the rest of my days
You mustn't concern yourself with such things
I think the Emperor will be amazed when he sees how beautiful you are
What kind of a man is the Emperor?
What kind of things does he like?
How did Wu-hui manage to capture his heart?
Please tell me
The Emperor is a very kind-hearted person
And he greatly appreciates people who show sincerity
The more you listen to his music, the more you will understand him
I see...
It is time for you to take some tea,
Majesty
I'm enjoying looking at the plum blossoms, I don't want any tea
But your physician has given strict instructions, Majesty
Why do you all constantly try to impede me?
You don't even allow me to enjoy my leisure as I wish
Please do not chastise me, Majesty...
...I am simply following the strict rules of court etiquette
Please, if you would kindly make your way to the tea house...
Your Majesty...
Even in the distance, the plum blossoms look so beautiful
It's not only the plum blossom that is beautiful...
...there is also a beautiful girl in full blossom, Majesty
I would like to express the colour and scent of the plum blossoms in music
I would like to be left alone this evening, please
Thank you. You may go now
You are dismissed
Master Kao, why are you still here?
Your Majesty, I understand your grief at the loss of Empress Wu-hui...
...but to continue mourning her like this...
I'm in no mood to listen to your sermons this evening
I asked you to leave me alone this evening. Understand?
Yes, sire
I would like to be left alone to reminisce about my late Empress
Who are you?
Who allowed you into my private chambers?
I know...
This must be Kao's doing
Because I talk so much of my late wife...
...he has taken it upon himself to bring me a woman who looks like her
Your resemblance to Wu-hui is uncanny
However, it is not her body that I yearn for, but her spirit
Majesty...
No one can replace Wu-hui
Please don't destroy my memories
I wish you to go now
Isn't that the piece I composed in the Plum Tree Garden?
You play very well
Very well indeed
Did you learn to play that piece to impress me?
Or did you play it simply to show me how clever you are?
Not at all, Your Majesty
Why did you play it, then?
I merely wanted to soothe and comfort your poor heart, Majesty...
...if only for a short moment
My poor heart?
Majesty...
...I did not enter your court of my own free will
Others will be delighted if my presence here pleases you
It has nothing to do with me...
...it is the will of those that brought me here
I am like their puppet and they pull my strings
I thought I'd have to spend the rest of my life here...
...like some ornament at Your Majesty's side
There was nothing I could do but accept the inevitability of my destiny
But then...
...when I realised how much love
Your Majesty still felt for Wu-hui...
...I felt ashamed of myself
Empress Wu-hui was a very fortunate person indeed
I never imagined...
...that a woman could be so loved by a man
I envy Wu-hui
If only I could meet a man who was as gentle and kind as Your Majesty...
...then I would be happy
I shall take my leave of you, sire
Wait a moment
Up until now, I believed only Wu-hui could bring happiness into my life
But you...
...of your own accord, played my composition...
...and gave me great comfort
Moreover, you have asked for no reward
Above all...
...you spoke to me with honesty, as you would address any other person
Not even Wu-hui was ever able to do that
Tell me what your name is
I am Yu-huan of the Yang family,
Your Majesty
Yu-huan, from now on
I wish you to remain close at my side...
...as a friend
Only if you wish, of course
Yes, sire
I would like that very much
That settles it.
You agree to stay at my side?
I take that as a promise
Tomorrow morning...
...I want you to prepare the hot spring in the Lotus Pool for Yu-huan
Lady Yu-huan...
...since Empress Wu-hui passed away...
...you are the first to have been allowed to use the Lotus Pool
His Majesty says that spring has returned to the court!
I can't stay long.
I have to leave tomorrow
It's unfortunate that I have to return to my old life as a provincial governor...
...without seeing how
Yu-huan is getting along
Does my presence here embarrass you?
Please, General...
...a governorship is an honourable post
What use is a provincial governorship?
I want a position in the capital
If Li Lin-fu falls from power, who will be the next premier?
Do you have your sights set on being premier, General?
One must be ambitious and aim high, for the premiership...
...or even the imperial throne!
The throne?
You just watch, your little kitchen help may one day become Empress
You're right...
Anything is possible
I will never abandon my ambitions
If Yu-huan becomes influential, you won't remain here much longer
General, it seems she's already been accepted as his mistress
Being one of his harem means nothing
The important thing is for Yu-huan to rise above the other women in status
The future of the Yang family depends on it
Don't forget that, Chao!
In accordance with the law, sire, it is dictated that Lady Cheng must die
I have no recollection of issuing such an order
You are the servants of a prisoner!
How dare you presume to speak in front of His Imperial Majesty!
Get out!
Out!
It is strictly forbidden by imperial decree for any lady in your harem...
...to involve herself in matters of governance
Therefore the penalty for such a crime is death
But Lady Cheng only involved herself in politics...
...because she wanted to secure a government post for her relative
I am only observing a law that you yourself decreed, Your Majesty
But laws should be made to safeguard the well-being of the people
Why can't you use the law for the benefit of the people?
If Your Majesty should care to make such laws...
...then I will faithfully carry them out
However, I must insist that if a law...
Enough!
I have no wish to listen to you
Your Majesty...
I thought that you had the power to do anything that you wished
For years, I was able to do as I pleased in all matters
But the laws and codes of practice that I myself made now constrain me...
...and the result is a curtailment of my powers
Sometimes it is important to relax and forget all your troubles
Forget all my troubles?
Let me accompany you, Your Majesty
- Where to?
- Into the city
This evening there is an annual festival, and the whole city will be celebrating
Festival of Lanterns
Hold on to me tightly so I don't lose you, sire
There are servants from the court approaching
This way
That was a narrow escape
Is it all right to remove my hood?
It's so uncomfortable
I'm sure we'll be fine here
- How kind of you, sire
- These are for me?
Many thanks. Please, accept these
Won't you try one?
Try it
Tonight, you must do exactly as I tell you
It's delicious, isn't it?
I'm not sure
Everybody is so kind
This is the first time in a long time that I've felt so free
Aren't you glad you ventured out?
These sweets are very tasty
Now you see!
We can't allow a pair of lovers to pass through
- Why not?
- You have to drink before you can pass
- I don't want to trouble you
- You're not troubling us! Have a drink!
Please forgive their impertinence
Let's celebrate your wedding!
- One more!
- One more!
First we drink, then we dance!
Your dancing was wonderful
Why did you never dance for me before?
Well, it was the beautiful sound of your lute that made me want to dance
Your movements kept perfect timing
Only because Your Majesty matched my tempo
I've had a marvellous evening
I feel so refreshed that my blood is tingling
It makes me so happy to hear you say that
This evening, I don't feel like an emperor...
...I feel like a man of the people, you can call me Li San-lan!
Me, too. I'm Yu-huan, just a simple peasant girl
Majesty...
May we have some tea, please?
Careful, it's hot
Here
You know...
...it feels like I've lived here with you for years and years!
As our governor-generals, it is your responsibility to defend our borders...
...against the invading barbarians
For a long time they have been troublesome and war seems inevitable
But it is important to win them over not by force but by diplomacy
It will all depend on your abilities
His Majesty is relying on you completely, generals...
...and each of you is expected to fulfil his duty
I hope you enjoy this gathering...
...that His Majesty has arranged in your honour
Well, if it isn't General An Lu-shan...
Welcome to the capital
Well, Chao...
You must call me by the new name and title that His Majesty gave me
So, you're Minister Yang Kuo-chung now, are you?
Close to the throne.
A lofty position indeed
Damn these upstart women!
They live in luxury, all paid for with our taxes
They're just taking advantage of His Majesty's love for Kuei-fei
They're jumped-up servants who think they're better than the rest of us
Make way for Her Ladyship! Move!
Move!
Move, you bastard!
What do you think you're doing?
What are you doing?
The Yang family has corrupted the whole court!
Death to the Yangs!
Don't just stand there!
Quickly, to the palace!
Kill them!
- Death to the Yangs!
- Kill them all!
- Down with the Yangs!
- Kill them!
Kill the Yangs!
- What's happened?
- What's happened, madam?
On the way here, we were attacked by a mob...
...and they were shouting,
"Death to the Yang family!"
How frightening for you
How dare they treat friends of His Majesty this way!
They're ruffians!
Were they arrested?
Our guards just stood by and watched them abuse us!
You were all useless! Someone must take responsibility for this!
I apologise, madam.
What were the guards doing?
Are you all right, madam?
What about Kuei-fei?
What happened?
Kuei-fei...
Are you hurt?
You were right when you said one should be ambitious and aim high
And you have been made governor of three provinces
You must be pleased with your progress
That's nothing compared to your promotion, Minister
And to whom do you attribute your success?
I attribute it to my own prowess
It certainly hasn't been easy, though
Don't talk nonsense!
It's all due to Kuei-fei
And Kuei-fei, in turn, owes all she has to me!
Listen, Chao...
Promote me to a central government post and make me a minister
Only the Emperor has the authority to do that, not me
So arrange for Kuei-fei to make a request to His Majesty
It is forbidden for women to have any involvement in politics
Listen to me, Chao...
...I have now consolidated my power base in the north
You'd be wise to retain my friendship if you wish to remain in power
- Minister?
- What is it?
Would you ask His Majesty what music he'd like the musicians to play next?
I will consider what you have just said, General
Does Your Majesty have any particular music you'd like to hear next?
Let me see...
I know...
...in honour of my new governors...
...I shall play for them myself
It has been a long time, madam
Congratulations on your new post,
General
I don't see it as any cause for celebration
I still nurture my ambition for a government post in the capital
Yu-huan...
Listen to me...
You have become a very influential concubine at court
I want to be a government minister...
...and I have the right to expect your help on this matter
General, please... not here
What?
So, you won't even deign to listen to what I have to say?
Are you too selfish to think of anyone but yourself?
Look how your three sisters have risen through the ranks
Even Chao has been rewarded with a ministerial post
Why, then, must I languish in the provinces?
Please don't raise your voice
- Excuse me
- Wait!
You really are exquisitely beautiful
I never thought you could look this radiant
If only I had taken you for my own that day we first met...
...both our destinies would be very different now
Yu-huan...
What are you doing?
I belong to the Emperor now
What do you mean,
"belong to the Emperor"?
You mustn't forget, Yu-huan...
...it was I who took you away from the drudgery of life in the kitchen
And has His Majesty not generously rewarded you for your efforts?
Some reward, indeed!
Yu-huan...
Surely you've heard that the people are cursing the Yang family?
Do you not see how the nation suffers under a heavy taxation system...
...while Chao abuses his position and lines his own pockets?
And your three sisters lead a life of ostentatious decadence
The people may revolt at any moment...
...and when they do, it'll be the Yang family they'll be after
If it goes on like this, even the Emperor's life may be in danger
Even the Emperor was once nothing more than a provincial warlord
Fortune favours the mighty...
...and any mighty feudal lord can make himself Emperor!
Listen, Yu-huan...
My future is as boundless as an ocean
Why don't you accompany me to my fortress?
This is the only way you can save yourself now
Kuei-fei!
Kuei-fei, His Majesty has finished his recital now
But why are you telling me this all of a sudden? Tell me the reason
The whole nation seems to be burning with rage at the Yang family
Please let me return to my former life as Yu-huan...
...and discharge my cousin Kuo-chung and my three sisters from the court
Your three sisters are of no consequence
And as for promoting Kuo-chung to a ministerial position...
...I have my own ulterior motive for doing that
I would never be foolish enough to allow my feelings for you...
...to jeopardise the governance of the country
I'm not thinking of just
Your Majesty's safety...
...but for the safety of the whole country
Wait!
Kuei-fei...
...I am sure that you are aware of the consequences...
...if a consort involves herself in the affairs of the state
Of course I am aware, sire
Therefore, please punish me as you see fit
Are you saying that you have no compunction about leaving me?
Perhaps I have committed a crime...
...and I am no longer worthy of the title of consort
Are you so willing to listen to what others have to say rather than me?
The other evening...
...the whole court knew that you were talking alone with An Lu-shan
Majesty, you must trust me, please
But you are still determined to leave me?
Please forgive me!
Enough!
Master Kao!
Take Kuei-fei to the harem immediately
But Your Majesty...
Do as I command!
Premier Li... what is it you want?
Majesty...
I heard that you have dismissed Kuei-fei
I must say, Your Majesty, that I admire your decision and congratulate you
Is that all you came to say?
Yes, sire
Kuo-chung, I hear you've been taking advantage of my illness...
...and have been acting as though you were the Premier
All with the blessing of His Majesty
Surely you should be considering retirement
You're too infirm to deal with the pressures of being Premier
I'll see that you receive notification of discharge of your duties
I won't hear such insolence!
Silence!
Your Majesty, Kuei-fei refused to enter the harem...
...but went to the house of her cousin Yang Hsien
What?
It's unacceptable for such a noble lady of the court...
...to stay in the house of a commoner
On your orders, I shall go and find her
We will bring her back immediately, sire
I'm so glad that you have come back here
It's better for your sisters and for Chao as well
You can remain here as long as you wish
I will protect you with my life
But what are your plans for the future?
I wish to become Yu-huan once again
You rose too high too quickly...
...that was your misfortune
There are many and varied ways...
... to live a good life
The province where I was born...
... is where I yearn to return
As they hang on the frame
over the door...
... the grapes are ripening
The sun is high in the sky...
When did you arrive here from the provinces?
- Last year
- Really?
- Do you like it here?
- Yes
Kuei-fei, what are you doing in such a filthy place?
Master Kao and I have come to take you back to the palace
I wish to see no one
But the Emperor himself has sent us
His Majesty ordered us to bring you back immediately
Please get ready as quickly as possible
Your palanquin is waiting
I will not go back
I prefer to stay here
This is all your fault, Hsien
You should be worried about your own future!
The people of Chang'an are after your blood!
It's impossible for a politician to please everyone
Consider how you have lorded it over the whole nation
You should resign from your post.
It is her wish also
What do you know about anything?
She is concerned for you!
Don't be so insolent!
- You damn upstart!
- What?
Someone help me!
What insolence!
We cannot just stand by idly and watch our country fall!
We must destroy the Yang family and save the empire!
By favouring the Yangs, His Majesty must also share some of the blame!
It is time to usher in a new era!
The nation must have a new ruler!
Our objective is to take the capital, Chang'an!
Onwards to the capital!
In an attempt to destroy the Tangs
and usurp the imperial throne...
... General An Lu-shan
heads a revolution
Giving himself the title
Emperor Taien...
... he advances with his army
toward the capital, Chang'an
Learning of the perils now threatening
the life of Emperor Hsüan-tsung...
... Kuei-fei decides
to return to him immediately...
... to be by his side
and face their fate together
Despite the many dangers,
she remains resolute and unafraid
Emperor Hsüan-tsung flees the capital,
and after an arduous journey...
... they rest in Mukuai,
a desolate village
Let me do this for you
You go and see to His Majesty
No, I'll prepare it
He looks exhausted.
Take this to him quickly
Yes, madam
Forgive me, I'm afraid this is all we can serve you, Majesty
And what about my men?
Aren't they hungry, too?
They'll be fed soon
I see...
No!
What's happening?
Look, men!
We've killed the three Yang sisters!
We've killed each one of them!
The people demanded their execution!
Listen, why did we flee from the capital without putting up a fight?
We Imperial Guards are a disgrace!
General An's forces are growing in strength!
Everyone who's anti-government is joining his ranks!
They're angry with the politicians
Kuo-chung and Kao!
We have no ill-feeling towards His Imperial Majesty!
It was for His Majesty's sake that we executed the three Yang sisters!
General An isn't our enemy, it's the Yang family!
The next to be executed will be
Yang Kuo-chung and Kao Li-hsi!
Commander, we must leave as soon as the men have eaten
General An has crossed the river and is advancing on Cheng-Tu
Understood, sir
What are you doing?
Prepare to move out!
What's going on?
It is Premier Yang Kuo-chung who is to blame for all this
Unless he's punished, the troops won't move an inch!
Silence! Who's the ringleader?
I want his head!
It's a unanimous decision
We decided to kill the three
Yang sisters as a blood sacrifice
You're powerless to stand in our way now
- Seize him!
- No... no!
Back, you insolent fools!
Kill Kuo-chung!
Kuei-fei...
I regret having caused you so much hardship
Being here alone with you...
...it reminds me of that night we spent during the Festival of Lanterns
The memories are comforting to me
It heartens me to see you so cheerful, Majesty
It takes a lot more than this to cause me despair
What is it?
It's terrible
Kuo-chung and the three Yang sisters were seized by the enemy...
- What?
...and they have been executed
Kuo-chung and the three sisters?
The situation is beyond my control,
Majesty
Please strip me of my title, sire
- What for?
- We are being besieged, sire
Why? Is this a revolt against me?
The army is not disloyal to you, sire
Majesty...
You see... Kuei-fei...
What about Kuei-fei?
Well...
Kuei-fei, would you leave us a moment...?
Wait! Why can't Kuei-fei remain here?
Your Majesty, please excuse me
Kuei-fei!
Master Kao, what is it you wish to tell me without Kuei-fei present?
The executions of Kuo-chung and the three sisters...
...have not appeased the people
Your Majesty, the soldiers are demanding the life of Kuei-fei
- What? They want Kuei-fei?
- Yes, sire
Never! Never!
Women of the harem have no responsibility for affairs of state
However, I have to say that under the circumstances...
...she is considered a member of the Yang family, sire
Kao... do you intend to betray us?
Was it not you who recommended
Kuei-fei to me?
And now you intend to kill her?
Majesty... your life is in danger!
We must make a decision to save you and the nation
Silence! What do you mean, to save me and the nation?
Have you ever considered your country before now?
You're just trying to save your own skin!
No, Your Majesty, no!
The soldiers are baying for blood...
...they've lost all reason, they're going berserk!
Majesty!
What are you doing?
The soldiers are demanding your life first, Kao!
- What? No!
- You're a traitor and must die!
Forgive me, sire, for spilling blood in your presence
I will pay the penalty, sire
Never mind about that
I must speak to the troops
Please wait!
- You must hand over Kuei-fei!
- We are loyal to you, sire!
Wait!
Calm yourselves down
Listen to what I have to say...
Kuei-fei!
...Kuei-fei is blameless
Majesty, Kuei-fei is from the Yang family
Your life is in danger, sire.
It is for your own safety
You must make a decision quickly,
Majesty!
All of you have been so attentive to me over the years
Pray for the quick restoration of peace and the return of His Majesty to power
I am praying for the return of a peaceful springtime...
...when the beautiful plum trees will once again blossom...
...and people can celebrate the Festival of Lanterns
I pray with all my heart that those days arrive soon
Hung-tao...
Please give this to His Majesty from me
Tell him...
...that I shall always and forever be by his side
- Will you tell him that?
- Yes, madam
- You must come with us
- Prepare yourself!
Let us proceed
Kuei-fei...
Kuei-fei...
Will peace now be restored to my nation?
After you passed away...
... there was nothing left for me
in this world
General An Lu-shan
soon met his demise...
... but by then...
... my imperial throne
had been usurped...
... by my very own son,
the Crown Prince
He was no different
from An Lu-shan after all
There was never any love
lost between us
What a heartless world we live in
Kuei-fei...
Kuei-fei...
Majesty...
... I have come to take you
away with me
Oh, Kuei-fei?
I have been waiting
for this moment for many years
Finally, the day has come
Give me your hand, Majesty
Let me guide you
I have waited so long for this
We'll be together forever now.
I'll never let you leave my side
Majesty...
no one can ever
tear us asunder this time
Now we can be truly happy
Yes, truly happy
And our happiness shall know no end
I can see you smiling now, my dearest
The End
Finish work!
Go to hut.
Yeah, that figures.
If the new prisoners see us digging graves, they may run.
No time for jokes. Finish work!
Dig, dig.
How about putting us on sick list?
Have a heart, captain.
Put us in hospital.
You no sick. You never sick.
Why you always play sick to me, Shears?
Don't want one of these over my head, I guess.
Captain Kanematsu... how about a butt?
I give you butt this morning.
Both of you.
That's what I mean.
I want to return the favour.
When a man gives a gift from the goodness of his heart... like you gave me that butt,
I remember it from the heart.
That's why...
I want you to keep this lighter.
Think I stole it?
It belonged to that English kid we just buried.
He willed it to me for a favour I'd done him.
Before I pass on,
I want to do the same for you.
You funny man, Shears.
Okay, you go on sick list. Him too.
One of these days Colonel Saito will catch you bribing him... then where'll we be?
Before that happens we'll be far away from here, chum.
Far away.
Okay, let's knock off.
Here lies...
Weaver, I forgot who we just buried.
Thomson.
Yes.
Here lies
Corporal Herbert Thomson... serial number 01234567.
Valiant member of the King's Own or the Queen's Own or something... who died of beriberi in the year of our Lord, 1943... for the greater glory of...
- What did he die for?
- Come off it.
No need to mock the grave.
I don't mock the grave or the man.
May he rest in peace.
He found little enough of it while he was alive.
"A" Company, mark time!
Mark time!
Halt.
Into line, left turn.
Stand easy.
We're gonna be a busy pair of gravediggers, Weaver.
Well done, well done.
That colonel doesn't know what he's in for.
- You gonna tell him the truth?
- Of course not.
You're neither an officer nor a gentleman.
My name is Nicholson.
I am Colonel Saito.
In the name of
His Imperial Majesty...
I welcome you.
I am the commanding officer of this camp... which is Camp 16... along the great railroad... which will soon connect
Bangkok with Rangoon.
You British prisoners have been chosen... to build a bridge across the River Kwai.
It will be pleasant work, requiring skill.
And officers will work as well as men.
The Japanese army cannot have idle mouths to feed.
If you work hard, you will be treated well.
But if you do not work hard... you will be punished.
A word to you about escape.
There is no barbed wire.
No stockade.
No watchtower.
They are not necessary.
We are an island in the jungle.
Escape is impossible.
You would die.
Today you rest.
Tomorrow you'll begin.
Let me remind you of
General Yamashita's motto:
"Be happy in your work."
Be happy in your work.
Dismissed.
Battalion, stand at ease.
Fall out, Major Hughes.
Battalion, stand easy.
Get the men to their quarters.
See who's sick.
I'm gonna have a word with this fellow. Colonel!
I heard your remarks just now, sir.
My men will carry on in the way one expects of a British soldier.
My officers and I will be responsible for their conduct.
You may have overlooked the fact that the use of officers for labour... is expressly forbidden by the Geneva Convention.
Is that so?
I have a copy of the Convention... and would be glad to let you glance through it.
That will not be necessary.
Sit down, please.
Yes, sir.
- I'm gonna have a word with Clipton.
- Very good, sir.
Clipton, don't let me interrupt.
- How's the arm?
- Nearly healed.
Sir, this is Commander Shears of the United States Navy.
- Good.
- How do you do, sir?
We found him and an Australian.
All that's left of the prisoners who built the camp.
U.S. Navy? Out here?
For a sailor, I am sort of landlocked.
- You lost your ship?
- The Houston.
I made it ashore, but I got separated from the other survivors.
And your group here?
Mostly Aussies. Some lime...
Some British.
Indians, Burmese, Siamese.
And what happened to them?
They died... of malaria, dysentery, beriberi, gangrene.
Other causes of death:
Famine, overwork, bullet wounds, snakebites...
Saito.
Then there were some who just got tired of living.
Has Clipton seen you?
Just about to, sir. Come over here, commander, you can shave later.
All right.
You'll stay with the officers.
We'll scrape up some decent clothing.
Don't bother about me.
I'm not anxious to get off the sick list.
Besides, this is working kit.
It's the fashion out here.
The officers in your party did manual labour?
I think you could call it that.
I raised that very point with Colonel what's-his-name.
Saito.
- I think he understands now.
- Is that so?
Yes. I must say he seems quite a reasonable type.
Well, I must be pushing on.
There's an officer's meeting at 7.
- Give me a list of your requirements.
- Yes, sir.
Anything we can do.
Oh, thank you, sir.
- What is it?
- Never mind.
Go on, say it.
I can think of a lot of things to call Saito... but reasonable, that's a new one.
Perhaps Colonel Nicholson defines the word differently.
Any other points?
- By your leave, sir?
- Yes, Jennings?
About the escape committee.
I've spoken with Commander Shears...
There won't be any escape committee.
I don't understand, sir.
Lieutenant Jennings has a plan.
Yes, yes, I'm sure Jennings has a plan, but escape?
Where? Into this jungle?
That fellow, Saito, is right.
No need for barbed wire here.
One chance in 100 of survival.
I'm sure a man of Commander Shears' experience will back me up on that.
I'd say the odds against a successful escape are 100 to one.
- Right.
- But may I add another word?
Please.
The odds against survival in this camp are even worse.
You've seen the graveyard.
They're your real odds.
To give up hope of escape... to stop thinking about it, is like accepting a death sentence.
Why haven't you tried to escape, commander?
I'm biding my time. Waiting for the right moment, the right company.
I understand how you feel.
Of course, it's the duty of a captured soldier to attempt escape.
But my men and I are involved in a curious legal point... of which you are unaware.
In Singapore we were ordered to surrender by command headquarters.
Ordered, mind you.
Therefore, in our case, escape might well be an infraction of military law.
- Interesting?
- Yes, sir, interesting point.
I'm sorry, sir,
I didn't quite follow you.
You intend to uphold the letter of the law, no matter what it costs?
Without law, commander, there is no civilisation.
That's just my point.
Here, there is no civilisation.
Then we have the opportunity to introduce it.
I suggest we drop the subject of escape.
Is there anything else?
I think we're all clear on the programme.
I want everything to go off without a hitch starting tomorrow morning.
And remember this:
Our men must always feel they are still commanded by us... and not by the Japanese.
So long as they have that idea, they'll be soldiers and not slaves.
Are you with me there, commander?
Well, I...
I hope they can remain soldiers, colonel.
As for me, I'm just a slave.
A living slave.
Queer bird. Even for an Ameri...
He's been in isolation too long, poor chap.
Cut off from his unit.
It should be a lesson to all of us.
English prisoners!
Notice I do not say English soldiers.
From the moment you surrendered, you ceased to be soldiers.
You will finish the bridge by the 12th day of May.
You will work under the direction of a Japanese engineer.
Time is short. All men will work.
Your officers will work beside you.
This is only just... for it is they who betrayed you by surrender.
Your shame is their dishonour.
It is they who told you... better to live like a coolie then die like a hero.
It is they who brought you here, not I.
Therefore, they will join you in useful labour.
That is all.
Officer prisoners, collect your tools.
Bradley, back in your place.
I must call your attention,
Colonel Saito... to Article 27 of the Geneva Convention.
"Belligerents may employ prisoners of war... who are fit, other than officers..."
Give me the book.
By all means.
You read English, I take it?
- Do you read Japanese?
- I'm sorry, no.
If it's a matter of translation,
I'm sure it can be arranged.
You see, the Code states that...
Stand fast in the ranks.
You speak to me of code?
What code?
The coward's code!
What do you know of the soldier's code?
Of Bushido? Nothing!
You are unworthy of command!
Since you refuse to abide by the laws of the civilised world... we must consider ourselves absolved from our duty to obey you.
My officers will not do manual labour.
We shall see.
All enlisted prisoners to work.
Sergeant Major!
Take the men to work.
Battalion, take up tools.
Move to the left in columnar route.
Left turn!
"A" Company, by the right, quick march.
Eyes right.
Eyes front.
Eyes right.
Quick march, eyes right.
"C" Company, by the right.
What's he up to?
Looks like he doesn't want any witnesses.
Now, you will be reasonable.
You will order your officers to work.
No.
I will count three.
If by the third count... you and your officers are not on the way to work...
I will give the order to fire.
He's going to do it.
Believe me, he's really going to do it.
One.
I warn you, Colonel Saito.
Two.
Stop!
Colonel Saito,
I've seen and heard everything.
So has every man in the hospital.
There are too many witnesses.
You can't call it a mass escape.
Most of those men can't walk.
Is this your soldier's code?
Murdering unarmed men?
You see, Jennings, there are certain advantages to being on the sick list.
I'll say this for the old man.
He's got guts.
"Into the valley of death rode the 600."
How's that, sir?
That kind of guts.
Also the kind they had in 1914... when officers fought with only a swagger stick.
- I see what you mean.
- You don't see what I mean at all.
The kind of guts that can get us all killed.
Excuse me, sir,
I'd like to go along too.
Arm's almost healed, sir, really it is.
What about him?
He didn't order us not to escape, he suggested.
Listen, when a man like your colonel suggests something, it's an order.
Here we go again.
Colonel Saito says all officers to punishment hut.
Tell them to go.
Not you.
Come.
Leave him alone!
They're gonna put him in the oven.
For he's a jolly good fellow
For he's a jolly good fellow
For he's a jolly good fellow
And so say all of us
And so say all of us
And so say all of us
For he's a jolly good fellow
For he's a jolly good fellow
For he's a jolly good fellow
And so say all of us
Timber!
One, two, three, four.
No, no, no!
Let go!
You wish to see me?
I've been trying to see you for three days.
It's about Colonel Nicholson.
He's been shut up in that hut...
I could have you shot.
Those prisoners who tried to escape, they were in your charge.
I knew nothing about the escape.
It does not matter.
One must even respect those who tried.
For a brief moment, between escape and death... they were soldiers again.
But it is insane to try and escape.
Two soldiers shot, the third drowned.
To what end?
It was an escape from reality.
There is your reality.
This shows the position work should have reached by noon today.
And this shows the position of actual progress.
Because of your colonel's stubbornness... we are far behind schedule.
That is not all.
Enlisted prisoners sabotaged the work.
Yes, I have seen it.
I could have them all shot.
Then who would build your bridge?
Besides, are you sure it's sabotage?
Perhaps the men don't work well without their own officers.
My officers will direct them.
Your officers will work beside them.
That's for Colonel Nicholson to decide.
As he said, it's against the rules.
Do not speak to me of rules.
This is war!
This is not a game of cricket.
He's mad, your colonel... quite mad.
Sit down, please.
I have decided to allow you one visit to your colonel.
Thank you.
Tell him that if his officers will not work...
I'll be forced to close the hospital... and your patients will work in their place.
And many will die, and he will be responsible.
Go and speak to him.
You have five minutes.
Hey, the doc's going to see the old man.
Sir...
It's Clipton, sir.
I brought you a few things.
- How are the men?
- Fine, sir, fine.
We scraped together a little meat and a coconut.
And the officers?
Oh, they're not so good.
They're still in detention.
And Lieutenant Jennings...
Jennings is dead.
- What?
- Killed, attempting to escape.
Also two others,
Corporal Weaver and the American.
Jennings. Poor, brave lad.
I warned him, didn't I, Clipton?
Look, sir, we haven't much time.
I'm going to clean you up a little while I talk.
I've got something to tell you.
I've just had a word with Saito.
That man is the worst commanding officer I've ever come across.
Actually, I think he's mad. Carry on.
Blackmail.
I know, sir, but he means it.
I'm sure he does.
It's a question of face, pure and simple.
And he can't give in.
It's still blackmail.
Sir, you can't stand much more of this.
Wouldn't the officers be better off working than suffocating in that hole?
The men are doing a wonderful job.
They're going as slow as they dare.
But Saito's cut their food rations... and if he makes the sick men work...
Well, they're going to die.
That's all there is to it.
Yes, Clipton, I understand. Truly.
But don't you see?
It's a matter of principle.
If we give in now, there'll be no end to it. No.
Sir, we're lost in the jungle, a thousand miles from anywhere.
We're under the heel of a man who'll stop at nothing to get his way.
Principle!
No one will ever know or care what happens to us.
Give in, sir. Please!
I'm adamant.
I will not have an officer from my battalion working as a coolie.
- Time.
- All right.
Please thank those concerned.
Everybody in the hospital contributed one piece.
Reynolds stole the coconut.
We'll be able to get you something from time to time.
We've bribed one of your guards.
Goodbye, sir. And good luck.
Many thanks.
- Clipton!
- Yes, sir?
Did you say that American chap was killed?
Yes, sir. Shot and drowned.
It's insane to plan escapes.
Three men killed, and to what end?
- Time!
- Here.
- Here is where we must win through.
- Time, time!
The doc just looked at us and shook his head. Whatever that means.
Means only one thing, colonel won't give in.
Well?
It's like this.
Colonel Nicholson won't give in to force.
It's a question of principle.
As medical officer, I protest to the way he's being treated.
It's a wonder he's still alive.
Should a tragedy occur, it would be tantamount to murder.
He is responsible.
Not I.
You sick?
Are they both mad?
Or am I going mad?
Or is it the sun?
Attention!
Battalion, attention.
English prisoners.
Let us ask the question... why does the bridge not progress?
You know why, because your officers are lazy!
They think themselves too good to share your burden.
This is not just.
Therefore, you are not happy in your work.
Therefore, the bridge does not progress.
But there is another cause.
I do not hide the truth.
With deep shame and regret...
I admit to you the failure... of a member of the Japanese staff.
I refer to Lieutenant Miura.
He is a bad engineer.
He is unworthy of command.
Therefore, I have removed him from his post.
Tomorrow we begin again.
I shall be in personal command.
Today we rest.
All work and no play make Jack a dull boy.
As token of regard for your efforts in the future...
I give presents to you all.
Let us be happy in our work.
Company, dismissed.
Battalion, dismissed.
Hey, take a look at this.
Red Cross! He's given us our...
Hey, he's given us our own Red Cross parcels.
"Tomorrow we begin again."
Hey, Harry, look.
They're letting the old man out.
Most likely gonna give him another pasting.
Good evening, colonel.
Do you mind sitting over here?
I am having rather a late supper.
English corned beef.
No, thank you.
Produce of Scotland.
I prefer it to sake.
I spent three years in London, you know.
I studied at the London Polytechnic.
Cheers.
Sorry.
Later, perhaps?
Perhaps.
I was not a good artist.
My father disapproved.
He felt I belonged in the army.
So I changed from art to engineering.
I must tell you, Colonel Saito.
I intend to make a full report of your activities in this camp.
I do not think you quite realise my position.
- I must carry out my orders.
- Oh, quite, quite.
My orders are to complete the bridge by the 12th day of May.
- I have only 12 weeks more.
- No doubt.
Therefore, I am compelled to use all available personnel.
But no officers, except in an administrative capacity.
But officers are working along the entire railway.
You know it. I know it.
I'm not responsible for the actions of other officers.
Personally, I'm appalled.
Let's not get excited.
Will you have a cigar?
No. Thank you.
When I said all officers must work... naturally, I never meant you, the commanding officer.
My orders were only intended for officers below...
None of my officers will do manual labour.
Please! I was about to say:
I've been thinking the matter over and have decided... to put majors and above on administrative duties... leaving only junior officers to lend a hand.
I'm afraid not. The Convention's quite clear on that point.
Do you know what will happen to me if the bridge is not ready in time?
I haven't the foggiest.
I'd have to kill myself.
What would you do if you were me?
I suppose if I were you...
I'd have to kill myself.
Cheers.
I warn you, colonel... if I am to die, others will die before me.
Do you understand that?
- Major Clipton did mention that.
- Well?
That won't solve your problem.
But I'm sure we can arrive at a proper solution.
Please sit down.
Now, tell me, colonel... do you agree that the first job of an officer is command?
- Of course.
- Good.
Now...
Take this bridge of yours.
It's quite an enormous undertaking.
Frankly, I have grave doubts whether your lieutenant... What's his name?
- Miura.
- Miura.
Is capable of tackling a job of such importance.
On the other hand, I have officers,
Reeves and Hughes for instance... who have built bridges all over India.
The men respect them.
It's essential for an officer to have that respect, I'm sure you agree.
If he loses it, he ceases to command.
And what happens then?
Demoralization and chaos.
A pretty poor commander I would be if I allowed that to happen.
Perhaps you are not aware... that the bridge is now under my personal command.
Really? And may I ask, are you satisfied with the work?
- I am not!
- You've proved my point.
I hate the British!
You are defeated but you have no shame.
You are stubborn but have no pride.
You endure but you have no courage.
I hate the British!
Pointless, going on like this.
Stay there!
Stand down. Stand down!
Battalion, attention!
Battalion, stand at ease.
Please...
Do you know what is the date today, colonel?
I'm afraid I've lost count.
It's the anniversary of our great victory...
- Over Russia in 1905.
- Oh, yes.
Throughout East Asia we are celebrating this date.
In honour of this occasion...
I have given your troops a day of rest.
Many thanks.
I am declaring a general amnesty.
You and your officers may return to your quarters.
As part of this amnesty... it will not be necessary for officers to do manual labour.
He's done it!
Somebody deserves a medal, sir.
How many men in your party?
Well, I don't really know, sir.
- You don't know?
- Sir, 12, usually.
But, well, one of the men took sick very suddenly this morning, sir.
It took three or four to help him to the hospital.
And... He took terrible sick, sir.
A corporal should always know how many men he has under him.
Oh, yes, sir.
Have you a nervous affliction?
If not, stop making those faces at once.
It may be funny to you, but it's not military behaviour.
No, sir.
We must put a stop to these demonstrations.
Yes, sir.
- I say, Reeves?
- Yes, sir?
You ever constructed a bridge across a stream like the Kwai?
Yes, sir, half a dozen of them, in Madras, Bengal...
If this were your bridge... how would you get it under way?
Get it under way, sir?
Well, first of all,
I wouldn't build it here.
Oh, why not?
As I was trying to tell you... the Japanese couldn't have picked a worse location. There's no bottom.
You see those piles?
They're sinking.
Our chaps could drive those logs till doomsday and they wouldn't hold.
Where would you build it?
Why, further downstream, sir.
Across those narrows.
Then we'd have solid bedrock on both banks.
Hughes, if this were your bridge, how would you use the men?
Well, sir, not the way they're doing it.
It's utter chaos, as you can see.
It's a lot of uncoordinated activity.
No teamwork.
Some of those parties are actually working against each other.
Yes.
I tell you, gentlemen, we have a problem on our hands.
Thanks to the Japanese, we now command a rabble.
There's no order, no discipline.
- Our task is to rebuild the battalion.
- Yes, sir.
Which isn't going to be easy.
But fortunately, we have the means at hand. The bridge.
- The bridge, sir?
- The bridge.
We'll teach them a lesson in Western efficiency that will put them to shame.
We'll show them what the British soldier is capable of.
Yes. I see your point, sir.
I realise how difficult it's going to be here... where you can't find what you need.
- But there's the challenge.
- I beg your pardon, sir.
You mean, you really want them to build the bridge?
You're not usually so slow on the uptake, Evans.
I know our men.
You've got to keep them occupied.
Fact is, if there weren't any work, we'd invent some, eh, Reeves?
- That we would, sir.
- So we're lucky.
But it's going to be a proper bridge.
Here again I know the men.
It's essential that they take pride in their job.
- Right, gentlemen?
- Yes, sir.
Reeves, you're the key man in this situation, as engineer.
Tell me what you want and we'll organise it. Can we make a go of it?
- We'll do our best, sir.
- Fine.
We must draw up our plans... then arrange a conference with Saito... and set him straight.
Well, I think that takes care of all the procedural matters. Now...
Oh, yes.
The next point is somewhat unpleasant for all concerned, I'm afraid.
Sorry to tell you, we feel the position of the bridge was fixed hastily... and, I have to add, incorrectly.
Incorrectly?
Unfortunately, yes.
Our engineer has made a study of the site... and has concluded that the river bottom there is too soft.
Too soft?
Mud. All the work up to now has been useless.
- Reeves, will you carry on?
- Yes, sir.
Colonel, I've made tests.
Those piles of yours could be hammered below water level before they'd hold.
That bridge would collapse under the first train.
The pressure and soil resistance figures in tons per square inch.
Just a moment, Reeves, before you get too involved.
Colonel, do you suppose we could have a cup of tea?
Then I take it we all agree that if we're to avoid disaster... we build a new bridge, at the site picked by Reeves...
400 yards downstream.
So let's proceed to the next point.
I've decided to alter the daily work quota of our men.
- Alter?
- Yes, I've increased it.
From a yard and a half of earth moved to two.
I was sure it would meet with your approval.
Major Hughes has all the facts.
Hughes, would you take over?
I've done a time study, Colonel Saito, of the entire project.
As you can see, the available forces have been badly distributed.
I would strongly urge we revise the organisation of the working parties.
Just a moment. Colonel, it would save time if we could work during dinner.
Would it be possible to have a meal served here?
Of course.
If we...
- Carry on, Hughes.
- Yes, sir.
If we increase the number of squads and specialise their functions...
I'm certain the total daily output can be increased by 30 percent.
Now, Colonel Saito,
I have one more point...
Now, there's another important decision that can't be postponed.
As most of the British will work on the bridge... only a small number will be available for railway work.
I must ask you to lend us some of your men to reinforce the railway gang... so the final stretch of track can be completed as quickly as possible.
I have already given the order.
We must fix the daily work quota for your men.
I thought of setting it at a yard and a half so as not to overtire them... but isn't it best to be the same as ours?
That would also create a healthy competitive spirit.
I have already given the order.
- We'll try to surpass that, won't we?
- Yes, sir.
I think that completes the agenda for this evening.
Thank you, Colonel Saito, for your kind attention.
And are there any other questions?
One question.
Can you finish the bridge in time?
Frankly, the consensus of opinion is that it's impossible.
But we'll certainly give it a go.
We mustn't forget we wasted a month through an unfortunate disagreement... for which I was not to blame.
Is there anything else?
No.
Thank you. The meeting is closed.
- Good night.
- Good night.
I hope these Japanese appreciate what we're doing for them.
For the moment, I'm not concerned with their appreciation.
- Good night, Clipton.
- Good night, sir.
By the way, I meant to tell you... there are trees in this forest very similar to elm.
And the elm piles of London Bridge lasted 600 years.
- Six hundred years, Reeves?
- Yes, sir.
Six hundred years.
That would be quite something.
Good morning. I'm looking for an
American named Commander Shears.
- Oh, yes, down on the beach.
- Oh, thank you very much.
Kiss!
Too many eyes.
You give me powders, pills, baths, injections, enemas... when all I need is love.
It's true.
All you really need is love.
What makes you so sure you'll get a medical discharge?
Because I'm a civilian at heart, lover.
And I always follow my heart.
Kiss.
How's that, commander?
Don't call me commander.
It's unromantic.
You're an officer yourself.
How would you like it if I called you Lieutenant Lover?
Let's be democratic.
Just call me "sir."
Yes, sir.
Brass ahoy.
He wants to see you. He's all yours.
- I'm going for a swim.
- Don't leave me.
- Commander Shears?
- Yes.
My name's Warden.
- How do you do?
- Sorry to intrude...
That's okay, major.
I'm used to it by now.
Like a martini?
That's very kind, but I think not.
- Mind if I have one?
- No.
How did you get that?
Where there's a hospital, there's alcohol.
Oh, yes, of course. Jolly good.
Well, I'll be as brief as possible.
I belong to a rather rum group called Force 316.
Our headquarters is up in the Botanical Gardens.
- Protecting rare plants from the enemy?
- Not quite.
- Sure you won't have a martini?
- No, thanks.
We have a particular interest in that railway you worked on.
You could give us no end of valuable information.
Well, I'm leaving for the States in a few days... and I've already told your people everything I know.
But you could help us in a rather special sense.
I know it's a terrible imposition... but I wonder if you could possibly come out and see us.
Well, if you want to go over the whole thing again.
Oh, that's very kind.
Lord Louis will be grateful.
- Lord who?
- Mountbatten.
- We're one of his special pigeons.
- Oh, I see.
Shall we say this evening, then?
About 8. I'll send a car for you.
This evening? Out of the question.
Well, tomorrow morning then?
About 10?
- Okay, 10:00.
- Thanks very much.
- Cheerio.
- Cheerio.
Good luck.
Thanks.
I know, you're terribly sorry, but you're going to stand me up tonight.
You couldn't be more wrong.
General salute!
Present arms!
- May I see your pass, sir, please?
- Oh, yes.
Thank you, sir.
Carry on, driver.
Major Warden's bungalow is at the end of the path.
All right, thanks.
Good show, Jenkins. Good show!
Come along, Thomson.
Use your knife, man. Use your knife.
Good! On your feet, chaps.
Away to the debriefing room quickly.
Come on, move yourselves!
Move! Move quickly!
Very clumsy, Joyce, very clumsy.
Always use your knife immediately, Joyce.
You see, he's gained the initiative.
Wait a minute!
I'm terribly sorry, sir.
- You're sorry?
- So am I, sir.
- I thought you were the enemy.
- I'm American, if that's what you mean.
- That'll be all, Joyce.
- Yes, sir. Sorry, sir.
- What can I do for you, sir?
- I was on my way to see Major Warden.
I'll show you the way. He'll finish his lecture any moment now.
- That's the end of his lecture.
- Thunderous ovation.
He believes in keeping our training as close to real life as possible.
- Major Warden, sir?
- Yes?
Very good of you to come.
- I hope they took care of you.
- They certainly have.
Thank you, staff.
Well, come along, then.
Colonel Green is looking forward to meeting you.
- Fascinating place, isn't it?
- Utterly charming.
Didn't realise it was a commando school.
We're trying to discourage the use of that word. Such a melodramatic air.
What do you do here?
Sabotage, demolition, that line of country.
We're using P.E., plastic explosives.
It's wonderful stuff.
That pop was made with a lump half this size.
It's twice as powerful as gelignite and only half the weight. Here.
It's quite harmless until it's detonated.
Thanks for telling me.
It's completely waterproof and actually plastic.
See? You can do what you like with it.
This is my place.
Go ahead.
Oh, I'm dying for a cup of tea.
- Would you care for one?
- No, thanks.
- A drink?
- No, thank you.
- Pot of tea for one, please, Peter.
- Very good, sir.
Do you read this?
Oh, I taught Oriental languages at Cambridge before the war.
I never congratulated you on your escape. It was a good show.
I was lucky. If your sea-rescue plane hadn't spotted me, I wouldn't be here.
No, I suppose not.
Would you like to see where you were?
All right.
Our information's rather scanty.
It's mostly based on your report.
But we think the camp is about here.
Say, do your people have any idea what happened to Colonel Nicholson?
He had guts. They were about to shoot him and he didn't bat an eye.
If you're about to be shot there's not much you can do.
Here is the River Kwai, and here is the village where you were helped.
And here is the railway.
But then you must be fairly familiar with all this area.
Not really, I was out of my head half the time.
The railway starts down here in Singapore. Malaya...
Bangkok, Rangoon. Their idea is to drive on through, into India.
- Where was I picked up?
- Oh, about here.
The Japanese aim to open the Bangkok-
Rangoon section by the middle of May.
Naturally, we'll try to prevent them.
It's too far for bombers to carry an adequate load.
We'll have to go smash it on the ground.
- How will you get there?
- Parachute drop, then march.
With demolition equipment through that jungle?
Our chief problem is lack of firsthand knowledge.
You see, none of us have ever been there.
- I don't want to discourage...
- It should be interesting.
Colonel Green's given me the Kwai bridge.
I'm gonna take a team in and blow it up.
Lucky you.
Sure you won't have tea?
No, thanks. I don't want to be rude, but I've got a luncheon date at 2.
- So if there are any questions...
- Of course, I'm sorry.
Well, there is only one question, actually.
How would you feel about going back?
Come again?
I know, under the circumstances, it's a bit much... but you have a unique knowledge for our purpose.
And we'd love to have you with us.
That's why you brought me here?
To ask me this?
Well, frankly, yes.
Major, I just got out of there.
My escape was a miracle.
Now you want me to go back?
Don't be ridiculous!
This is embarrassing...
I can't go back! I don't belong to you.
I belong to the American Navy.
Actually, Colonel Green has taken the matter up with your people.
- With my people?
- Your Navy's turned you over to us.
A signal arrived yesterday morning from your CINC Pacific... authorising your temporary transfer of duty to Force 316.
- They can't do this to me.
- I'm afraid they have.
It was difficult to know how to break it to you.
But they can't do this to me.
I mean it. My Navy's made a mistake.
Look. I'm not a Navy commander.
I'm not even an officer.
The whole thing's a fake. I'm just an ordinary swab jockey, second class.
When the Houston sunk, I made it ashore with a real commander.
Later on, we ran into a Japanese patrol. He was killed.
I figured it was just a matter of time before I was captured...
So you changed uniforms with a dead man.
I thought officers would get better treatment.
That's very sensible.
But at Saito's camp, the officers worked along with the rest.
Yes, there's always the unexpected, isn't there?
I kind of got used to being a commander... so when I arrived here at the hospital...
I took a look at the enlisted men's ward and then the officer's ward... and I said to myself,
"Let's let it ride along for a while."
There were certain advantages.
I saw one of them on the beach.
Anyway, that's the whole story.
The point is, you can't use me.
You want an officer... an American commander named Shears who doesn't exist.
When the Navy learns the truth, they'll say:
"Ship him home in irons for impersonating an officer."
- Once that happens, I've got it made.
- Got it what?
- Made. I'd like that drink now.
- Of course.
I'll apply for a medical discharge.
I'll tell them
I impersonated an officer... because I went off my rocker in the jungle.
I'm getting worse, you know.
Sometimes I think I'm Admiral Halsey.
It's quite a clever plan.
It's not only clever, it's foolproof.
If my Navy finds out who I am... those temporary orders won't be worth the paper they're written on.
This is your photograph, isn't it?
- Where did you get this?
- It took a bit of doing... because your people couldn't identify you.
Finally your CINC Pacific sent us a copy of your service record.
The photograph, fingerprints.
Would you care to have a look?
No.
You see, we've known about your actual rank for nearly a week.
Your Navy's in an awkward position.
In one sense you're a blasted hero... for making an escape from the jungle.
But at the same time, they can't bring you home... and give you the Navy Cross for impersonating an officer.
I suppose that's why they were so happy to hand you over to us.
You see?
Hot potato.
As far as your present rank is concerned... we're fairly informal about those things in Force 316.
You'd have the simulated rank of major.
Simulated major. That figures.
Well...
As long as I'm hooked,
I might as well volunteer.
Good show!
Oh, Colonel Green, sir.
This is Major Shears. He volunteered to go and help me blow up the bridge.
Really?
Good show!
Jolly good show, major!
Get up to sick bay, Baker.
This foot's infected.
The colonel might think
I'm malingering.
I'm the medical officer, Baker.
Get cracking.
Will someone tell me why the old man wants us to build a proper bridge?
Don't you worry about old Nick.
He knows what he's doing.
Hello, Clipton.
About time you paid us a visit.
Fine job our chaps are doing.
First-rate.
Yes. How's he behaving?
He's been most reasonable since we took over.
- I wonder what he's thinking.
- I haven't the foggiest.
- Thanks, Reeves.
- Right, sir.
What do you think?
Quite a challenge, isn't it?
Sir, are you convinced that building this bridge is a good idea?
- Are you serious?
- Yes, sir.
A good idea? Take another look.
You don't agree morale is high?
Discipline has been restored?
Their condition has been improved?
- Are they a happier lot or aren't they?
- Yes, sir, but...
They feed better and they are no longer abused.
- That's all true.
- Well, then.
Honestly, Clipton, there are times when I don't understand you at all.
I'll try to make myself clear, sir.
The fact is, what we're doing could be construed as... forgive me, sir, collaboration with the enemy.
Perhaps even as treasonable activity.
We're prisoners of war.
We haven't the right to refuse to work.
I understand that, sir.
But must we work so well?
Must we build them a better bridge than they could have themselves?
If you had to operate on Saito, would you do your best or let him die?
Would you prefer we disintegrate in idleness?
Would you have it said that our chaps can't do a proper job?
It's important to show these people they can't break us in body or in spirit.
Take a good look, Clipton.
One day the war will be over.
I hope that the people who use this bridge in years to come... will remember how it was built, and who built it.
Not a gang of slaves, but soldiers.
British soldiers, even in captivity.
- Yes, sir.
- You're a fine doctor... but you've a lot to learn about the army.
Hold him! Hold him!
Use your boot!
Get your boot in there, will you?
Good morning.
What on earth are you people staring at?
Get on with your jobs!
Now get him with your boot!
I'm awfully sorry I'm late, sir.
Four minutes late, to be exact.
You were in need of medical attention?
- Sir?
- I was referring to the nurse.
Oh, yes, very ingenious.
Warden was right.
Sit down.
I asked you here to help us pick the fourth member of your team.
- Ask Mr. Joyce to come in.
- Yes, sir.
Chapman here wants Joyce, but I have my doubts about him.
I think he has too much imagination as distinct from cold calculation.
As I've told you before... in this job, even when it's finished there's always one more thing to do.
He's the best swimmer in the school, sir.
I'm well aware of your evaluation.
The opinion I want is Shears'.
All right, at ease.
These gentlemen are thinking of taking you for a hike into the jungle.
Yes, sir.
You were an accountant in Montreal?
Yes, sir.
Not really an accountant, sir.
That is, I didn't have my charter.
Exactly what did you do?
Well, sir, I just checked columns and columns of figures... which people had checked before me... and then other people checked them after I had checked them.
- Sounds a frightful bore.
- Sir, it was a frightful bore.
How did you happen to wind up here?
In '39 I came over to London to enlist.
About two years later
I volunteered for this work.
- You volunteered!
- Yes, sir. See, the regular army...
Go ahead, you can be frank.
Well, the regular army reminded me of my job in civilian life.
They don't expect you to think.
Think about this.
Are you quite sure you'd be able to use it in cold blood?
I know how to use it, sir.
That's not what I meant.
Could you use it in cold blood?
Could you kill without hesitation?
That's a question I've often asked myself, sir. It's worried me quite a bit.
And what was the answer?
I don't honestly know, sir.
I've tried to imagine myself...
I suppose I find it hard to kid myself that killing isn't a crime.
It's an old army problem.
Well, I think that's all.
Thank you, Joyce.
Am I to go with the team, sir?
We'll let you know.
You see what I mean.
Well, at least he was honest.
None of us ever know the answer to that question until the moment arises.
What's your opinion, Shears?
Well, sir, he's Canadian.
And that's in keeping with the international composition of this outfit.
If he wants to go, he can even take my place.
Well, if you're all agreed on Joyce, he's yours.
I had a report from air reconnaissance on that village.
There's sufficient clearing to make your jump at last light.
- You've had parachute training?
- No, sir.
Blast. This is awkward.
Silly, it never occurred to me.
Well, maybe...
He's right.
Arrange some practice jumps for him.
I'll pop over and check right away.
- All right, Chapman, you can run along.
- Yes, sir.
Well, feel like a sniff of air?
Yes, sir.
You don't realise what a plum you are for us.
Your knowledge of the area, making friends in that village.
It's almost as if your whole escape had been planned with us in mind.
By the way, here's something that'll interest you. The new I pill.
- L pill?
- L for lethal. Instantaneous, painless.
Much better than the old ones.
For capture, of course.
You're telling me not to be taken alive.
I wouldn't recommend it.
If any of you get hurt or wounded the others will have to leave him behind.
The objective comes first in our work.
You want my honest evaluation of this team?
I didn't want to speak out in front of them.
I understand, go ahead.
Well, Chapman will be fine.
Ice water in his veins.
Joyce is... He'll be okay.
- It's Warden I don't get.
- Oh, why not?
Cambridge don and all of that.
It's one thing to play with explosives like a kid with firecrackers...
He's not without experience, you know.
When we lost Singapore, he stayed behind to blow up a couple of bridges.
And many other installations before the Japs caught him.
- Caught him?
- Yes.
- Fascinating story. He...
- Sir, it's most annoying.
In view of time, they don't think practice jumps would be worthwhile.
- No?
- If you make one jump... you've only got 50 percent chance of injury.
Two jumps, 80 percent. Three jumps, you're bound to get your packet.
The consensus is, the most sensible thing for Major Shears to do... is to go ahead and jump and hope for the best.
With or without parachute?
Oh, very good!
With or without!
He's in the trees!
Yai says we can't reach the Kwai by the route you took.
There are too many Japanese patrols.
We'll swing north through heavy jungle.
- Who's gonna lead the way?
- Yai himself.
He hates the Japanese.
They took all his men.
Which means we shall have to use women bearers.
- Women bearers.
- They're very capable, I'm told.
He says it's dangerous to spend the night in the village.
There's an enemy post three miles away so we'll have to sleep in the jungle.
- What about Chapman?
- Yai will bury him and his chute.
Is there something wrong?
I was just thinking.
You speak Yai's language. I don't.
He's gonna lead you back to the river by a route I never took.
Will someone tell me why
I'm so indispensable to this outfit?
I know how you feel, but there's always the unexpected, isn't there?
Tell that to Chapman.
Let's get cracking.
You're lovely.
Lovely.
Be happy in your work.
Yes, sir.
Leeches.
She's telling you to hold still.
She'll take the leeches off your back.
What's a nice girl like you doing in a place like this?
I'll teach you to say that in Siamese.
No, that would spoil it.
Too much talk always spoils it.
What's wrong with that thing?
It's taken an awful beating.
I can't get a strong signal.
I'll tell you what's wrong.
It's wet, mildewed, corroded, rotten.
Like everything else in this jungle.
You might as well dump it!
This is Radio Tokyo signing off.
This is your friendliest enemy reminding you to take it easy... and never volunteer for anything.
If we stay, we'll be up to our necks.
- I've got it all decoded, sir.
- Read it.
Yes, sir. "One, original bridge works reported abandoned."
New construction downstream from first site.
Two, enemy intends to open railway with passage of special train...
Bangkok for Rangoon with troops and V.l.P.
Estimated to arrive target, a.m. 13th.
Three, synchronize demolition with passage this train.
Four, good hunting. Have fun."
That's all, sir.
A train and a bridge!
Yes, sir.
Can we get there in time, sir?
Yai says we're two to three days' march from the Kwai.
If we set a faster pace, we could make it before sundown on the 12th.
It's worth it for the train.
Oh, by all means. Good hunting.
Good show.
Jolly good fun. Jolly, jolly good.
If you hadn't fixed the radio, we wouldn't know about the train.
Well, there's always the unexpected, isn't there?
Heave!
Heave! Heave!
- Half a pint, sir.
- Quinine.
Well, we'll complete this later.
- Clipton, we're facing a crisis.
- Yes, sir?
I spoke with Reeves and Hughes.
We won't finish the bridge on time.
We just haven't the manpower.
I've asked the officers to lend a hand, but even that won't do it.
The officers are going to work?
I explained the situation and they volunteered, but it's not enough.
Why not ask Saito for some of his men?
This is our show. We must make the most of our resources.
That's what I came to talk to you about. The sick list.
There's not a man in this hospital who doesn't belong there.
Don't jump to conclusions.
No reflection on you... but there are always a few malingerers.
Be honest. Keep an open mind is all I ask.
Come along, let's see.
Don't move, don't move.
What's the matter with Haskins?
He's got amoebic dysentery and blackwater fever. Temperature of 104.
Right. I see.
And this man?
Leg ulcers. I may be able to save the leg if I do more cutting tonight.
Really want to send him out to work, sir?
Don't talk rot, Clipton.
- And that man there?
- His arm's infected.
Most of their wounds won't heal properly.
I wonder, in his case, if fresh air and light duties... might do more good than being cooped up.
- Light duties?
- It's not our policy to keep a man...
- Just because he scratched his arm.
- Not our policy?
Well, is it?
A man may not be on top of his form, but he can still make himself useful.
Trimmings and finishing jobs.
Stand easy, Baker.
Tell me, you feel up to doing a little light work on the bridge?
- Anything you say, sir.
- Good show.
What about you? Nothing difficult.
- I'll try, sir.
- Good man.
Now, look here, men. It goes without saying I'm proud of all of you.
But we're facing a crisis.
For those of you who feel up to it... how about lending us a hand?
Fetch and carry, paint here and there?
What do you say?
- Yes, sir.
- Good show. Come on, follow me.
Ten minutes.
Make sure they're all dead.
Come on, Joyce.
Use your knife, man, or we'll be shooting each other.
Go that way, Joyce.
I could have done it. I was ready.
Are you hit, sir?
Let's go.
It's superficial. Maybe a chipped bone, but there's nothing broken.
- It's my fault, sir.
- Oh, shut up, Joyce.
I can walk on it.
That's all that counts.
Yeah, but how far and how fast?
We won't know that till I've tried it, will we?
What are you doing?
I didn't give orders for a halt.
We all need it.
We're still five hours' fast march from the objective.
Maybe six.
Come on.
You keep walking on that foot, you'll bleed to death.
Yeah.
- You're gonna leave me here.
- If you stop, we stop.
You can't study the layout of the bridge after dark.
You've got to get there before sundown.
But, sir, when the job's done, who knows if we can return by this route... or whether we could find you if we did?
If you were me, I wouldn't hesitate to leave you and you know that.
He doesn't know it, but I do.
You'd leave your own mother here if the rules called for it.
You'll go on without me.
That's an order.
You're in command now, Shears.
I won't obey that order.
You make me sick with your heroics.
You carry the stench of death like the plague.
Explosives and I pills go well together.
It's one thing or the other.
Destroy a bridge or destroy yourself.
This is just a game, this war.
You and that Colonel Nicholson, you're crazy with courage. For what?
How to die like a gentleman, how to die by the rules... when the only important thing is how to live like a human being!
I'm not gonna leave you here to die, Warden... because I don't care about your bridge or about your rules.
If we go on, we go on together.
Good old Yai.
I'm all right.
Come on.
Let's get closer.
Still sorry we brought you along?
- Feeling better?
- Yeah.
You're in command again now, you know.
Thank you, major.
I can't understand it.
It's such a solid, well-designed job.
Not like the bridges the enemy usually throws together.
Look.
Those poor devils down there.
Imagine being forced to build that in the condition they must be in.
They've got a British officer working on his knees.
The Japanese seem to be enjoying it too.
If he knew we were here, it might boost his morale a little.
If not for the train, we could set a time fuse and be miles away.
Since we don't know what time it'll cross tomorrow... we'll have to do the job manually.
We'll set the charges against the piles... about three feet under the water,
I should think... and run the main wire downstream to the plunger.
The problem is where to hide it.
Our side of the river is quite obviously used by the Japanese.
They'd spot it at once.
Look. Do you see those fallen tree trunks?
And the grey rock just below them on that little beach?
- Yes, sir, I see them.
- That's our key position.
It's on the wrong side of the river... but it's the only hiding place within feasible distance.
As soon as the bridge goes up... whoever's there will have to swim back.
It's not likely to be a pleasant swim.
Sir, I was the best swimmer in my course.
Yeah.
It looks like your line of country, then.
Thank you, sir.
Shears, pick a spot on our side of the bank where you can cover Joyce.
Yai will be with you so you can occupy the Nips...
- If they make any trouble for Joyce.
- Right.
On the theory that there's always one more thing...
I'll set up the mortar here to create an additional diversion.
Perhaps I might even take a few potshots at the train.
All clear?
Any questions?
Right, we'll start as soon as it's dark.
They're sure to have sentries on the bridge... so you'll have to float the stuff down from upriver... which means building a raft.
Yai.
Yai will take three women to help you build the raft.
One will stay here with me.
All right, now get cracking.
Shears.
You know, if it wasn't for my ankle,
I'd take Joyce's assignment.
I know.
You think he'll be all right?
I think so. Want me to handle it?
I'd let you stay up here with the mortar if I could.
I'm sorry.
When it's over, I hope you get that medical discharge... and not the hard way.
Thanks.
Load.
Beautiful.
Yes, beautiful.
A first-rate job.
I had no idea it would turn out so well.
Yes.
A beautiful creation.
I've been thinking.
Tomorrow it will be 28 years to the day that I've been in the service.
Twenty-eight years in peace and war.
I haven't been at home more than 10 months in all that time.
Still, it's been a good life.
I love India.
I wouldn't have had it any other way.
But there are times... when suddenly you realise you are nearer the end than the beginning.
And you wonder...
You ask yourself... what the sum total of your life represents... what difference your being there at any time made to anything... or if it made any difference at all, really.
Particularly in comparison with other men's careers.
I don't know whether that kind of thinking's healthy... but I must admit I've had some thoughts on those lines... from time to time.
But tonight...
Tonight...
Blast.
I must be off.
The men are preparing some sort of entertainment.
Lovely.
I'm sure I speak for all of us... when I say this has been a most enjoyable evening.
As you know, most of you move on tomorrow... to a new camp and new construction.
It's a pity you won't be here to see the first practical use of this bridge.
However, you'll be glad to know that the completion... of this link in the railway... will enable us to transport the sick and disabled... to the new camp by train.
Colonel Saito has kindly permitted me to stay behind... with Major Clipton and the sick men... and we'll rejoin you in a few days' time.
Now that your work here is finished...
I suppose many of you feel somewhat let down.
That's quite understandable.
It's a very natural reaction.
But one day, in a week, a month, a year... on that day when, God willing, we all return to our homes again... you're going to feel very proud of what you have achieved here... in the face of great adversity.
What you have done should be... and I think will be... an example to all our countrymen, soldier and civilian alike.
You have survived with honour.
That, and more.
Here in the wilderness... you have turned defeat into victory.
I congratulate you.
Well done.
To the king.
And you're in business.
Now, you got everything? Sten, ammunition, pack, canteen, knife.
Yes.
I'll be directly across the river.
The professor says there's always one more thing to do.
I can't think of what it could be.
Except to wish you a long and happy life.
Thank you.
What's happened?
The river's gone down.
You can see the wire.
The charges!
Don't wait for the train.
Do it now!
If Saito is correct, the train should be along in five or 10 minutes.
If you don't mind,
I'll watch from up on the hill.
Why? You'll get a better view from the bridge.
It's hard to explain, sir.
I'd rather not be a part of it.
As you please. Honestly, sometimes
I don't understand you at all.
Well, as you once said, sir,
I've got a lot to learn about the army.
Good morning.
River's gone down in the night.
What's he doing?
Colonel, there's something rather odd going on.
I think we better have a look around before that train comes across.
He's gone mad.
He's leading him right to it.
Our own man!
I was right.
There is something going on.
You've got to do it, boy.
You've got to do it now.
Colonel, have you a knife? I've just realised the bridge has been mined.
Mined?
Good boy!
Officer, sir. British officer.
Here to blow up the bridge.
- Blow up the bridge?
- Yes, sir. British commando orders.
- Blow up the bridge?
- Yes, sir. There's no time!
No, no! Help!
Help!
Kill him! Kill him!
Let me go, sir!
You don't understand, sir!
Kill him! Kill him!
Help!
Kill him, Joyce! Kill him!
You!
What have I done?
Madness.
I had to do it.
I had to do it.
They might have been captured alive.
It was the only thing to do!
Madness.
♪♪ [Overture]
[Bells Pealing]
[Bells Pealing]
[Bell Tolling]
[Sobbing Quietly]
[Bells Pealing]
Mr. Frank.
Mr. Frank?
Kraler?
[Mr. Frank]
Mr. Kraler.
Miep.
My good friends.
Oh, it- it is so good to see you home.
We had heard nothing.
I'm alone.
You must come home with us... and rest now.
You must stay with us.
No, Miep. I can't stay in Amsterdam.
Mr. Frank, this is your home.
Amsterdam is your home.
It has too many memories for me.
Everywhere there's something, Miep.
Everywhere.
Even seeing you and Mr. Kraler.
Forgive me. I shouldn't talk to you like this after all that you did.
We would do it again.
Everything's gone- the book.
They took everything... except some papers.
We saved your letters and papers.
Please burn them.
Burn everything.
I- I... told Anne if I got back here,
I'd find her book.
Anne's diary?
It's where she left it.
"The ninth of July, 1942."
Is it possible, Miep?
Only three years ago.
"Dear Diary, since you and I are going to be great friends,
"I will start by telling you all about myself.
"My name is Anne Frank.
"I am 13 years old.
"I was born in Germany,
"but since my family is Jewish,
"we emigrated to Holland when Hitler came to power.
[Mr. Frank, Anne's Voices
Overlapping]
"Things went well for us...
"until the war came, and the German occupation.
"Then things got very bad for the Jews.
[Anne's Voice Only]
You could not do this, and you could not do that.
We had to wear yellow stars.
I had to turn in my bike.
I couldn't go to a Dutch school anymore.
I couldn't go to the movies or ride in an automobile, or even on a streetcar, and a million other things.
But somehow we children still managed to have fun.
This morning Father woke me at 5:00... and told me to hurry and get dressed.
We were going into hiding.
I was to put on as many clothes as I could.
It would look too suspicious if we walked along carrying suitcases.
We were going to disappear, vanish into thin air.
I'm living a great adventure.
Three other people were coming in with us.
Father knew them, but we had never met them.
[Sighs]
Something's happened.
They have three miles to walk.
Mother-
They've been arrested. I know.
Will you stop that?
Mother! Father!
We're here.
See?
Mr. Van Daan.
Hello, hello.
Mrs. Van Daan. Peter.
[Chuckling]
Mr. Frank.
There were too many of the Green Police on the streets.
We had to take the long way around.
Did you introduce yourself?
My daughter Anne. My wife Edith.
Hello.
Margot.
Mr. and Mrs. Van Daan.
Hello.
Oh, and this is our son Peter.
So, now, please, let us take off some of these clothes.
[Mr. Kraler]
Good morning.
Hello, Mr. Kraler.
Good morning,
Mr. Kraler.
Mr. Frank.
Ah, you're all here.
That is good.
We had hoped to have everything in order.
Please, Mr. Kraler, don't even think of it.
After all, we'll have plenty of leisure to arrange everything ourselves.
I brought some sandwiches for your lunch.
Thank you, Miep.
The canned goods are here, and your stores of dried beans and potatoes.
I'll get you ration books this afternoon.
Ration books?
If they see our names on ration books, they'll know we're here.
Don't worry.
It won't be your names that'll be on them.
[Bells Pealing]
Father!
The Westertoren!
Anne, no!
You must never touch a curtain.
Never.
No one must ever touch a curtain, day or night.
If someone on the streets should look up, or someone in those houses should see, we would be lost.
Please remember, it's not only our lives that are at stake, but also Miep's and Mr. Kraler's.
You have but 13 minutes to get settled.
Thank you.
Miep or I will be up each day to bring you food and news.
Come, Miep. We must go.
Good-bye for now.
How can we thank you?
I never thought
I'd live to see the day... when a man like Mr. Frank would have to go into hiding.
When you think of the-
Good-bye.
Thank you,
Mr. Kraler.
Good-bye, Miep.
Good-bye.
Good-bye.
[Edith] Anne!
It's all right.
I have on three more.
Excuse me,
Mr. Frank.
What did he mean, just 13 minutes?
Before the workmen come.
Now, while the men are in the building below, we must have complete quiet.
Every sound can be heard down there, not only in the offices but in the workrooms too.
The men come at about 8:30, they leave at about 5:30, so to be perfectly safe, from 8:00 in the morning until 6:00 in the evening... we must move about up here only when it is absolutely necessary, and then in stocking feet.
We must not speak above a whisper.
We must not run any water.
We cannot use the sink or even- forgive me- the W.C.
The pipes go down through the workrooms.
No trash must ever be-
[Sirens Approach,
Wailing]
[Tires Screeching]
[Wailing Passes,
Fades]
No trash must ever be thrown out which might reveal that someone is living up here.
Not even a potato peeling.
We must burn everything in this stove at night.
This is the way that we must live until it is over, if we are to survive.
Until it is over.
[Chuckles]
After 6:00 we can move about.
We can talk and laugh, have our supper, read, play games, just as we would at home.
Now I think it would be wise if we all went to our rooms and were settled before 8:00.
Mrs. Van Daan, you and your husband will be upstairs.
I regret that there's no place up there for Peter, but he'll be here, near us.
- And where am I?
- You and Margot will be in there, Annele.
[Mrs. Van Daan]
Excuse me, Mr. Frank.
Yes?
Where do you and Mrs. Frank sleep?
This room is also our bedroom.
Oh, no.
You take the upstairs.
It's not right.
It's your place.
We'll sleep down here.
I've thought this out for weeks.
It's the best arrangement.
The only arrangement.
Uh, Edith?
Hmm?
You must have some rest, dear.
You didn't close your eyes last night.
Please go in the girls' room with Margot.
How about Anne?
I feel fine.
I'm going to help Father.
This way,
Mrs. Van Daan.
Excuse me.
Up here.
[Sighs]
[Shuffling]
[Peter]
Mr. Frank.
- Mr. Frank?
- Peter?
- Do I still have time to get some water for my cat?
- Have you got a cat?
Go ahead, but be quick.
You only have five minutes.
He couldn't live without that cat.
I didn't know you had a cat.
I love cats.
What's its name?
Mouschi.
What is it? Mouschi.
A him or her?
It's a tom, and it doesn't like strangers.
Well, I'll have to stop being a stranger, won't I?
Is he fixed?
No.
Well, you ought to have him fixed to keep him from fighting.
What a nice cat.
Where do you go to school?
Jewish Secondary.
That's where
Margot and I go.
Yeah, I know.
I've never seen you around.
I used to see you sometimes.
You did?
But why didn't you ever come over?
Oh, I don't know.
I'm sort of a lone wolf.
Can't be a lone wolf here.
Wonder what our friends will say when we don't show up today?
I had a date with Sanne.
Do you know
Sanne de Vries?
No.
Sanne's my best friend.
She's thin like me.
They always yell at us,
"Anne and Sanne, the skinny bananas."
You took off your star.
That's right.
You can't do that.
They'll arrest you if you go out without your star.
Who's going out?
[Grunts]
Help me.
I'm helping.
[Groans]
- What are you going to do with it?
- Burn it.
That's funny.
I don't think I could burn mine.
I don't know why.
You couldn't?
Something they make you wear so they can kick you around?
I know.
But, after all, it is the Star of David, isn't it?
Annele?
It's almost 8:00.
Don't you want to come and sit with us, Peter?
It's going to be a long day.
No, thanks.
This is fine.
You won't forget to take off your shoes, will you?
Peter.
It's nice to have you with us.
Yes, Mr. Frank.
See you later.
Do you know he went to the same school that-
[Bells Pealing]
[Bell Tolling 8:00]
[Anne Narrating]
It's comforting to think that
Mr. Kraler and his secretary... are down there below us in the office.
Our protectors, we call them.
[Typing]
I asked Father what would happen to them if anyone found out... they were hiding us.
Father said they would suffer the same fate that we would.
[Machinery Droning]
We are over an old spice factory.
You can smell the spices all through the building.
[Crowd Shouting In Unison]
Sieg heil! Sieg heil!
Sieg heil! Sieg heil!
Sieg heil! Sieg heil!
Sieg heil! Sieg heil!
Sieg heil! Sieg heil!
[Shouting Fades]
[Bell Tolling]
[Bell Continues Tolling]
[Bell Continues Tolling]
[Tolling Stops]
[Footsteps Marching,
Faint]
[Boat Horn Blowing]
I read A Tale of Two Cities through in that first day.
"It is a far, far better thing I do...
"than I have ever done.
"It is a far, far better rest that I go to...
"than I have ever known.
The end."
It was the saddest book
I ever read.
[Footsteps Approaching]
[Knocking]
It is us,
Miep and Kraler.
[Door Opening]
[Mr. Frank]
Good evening, Mr. Kraler.
Good evening, Miep.
[Whispering]
Evening, Annele.
Hello. Hello.
Hello.
Oh, Mr. Frank.
Yes?
This is the box you asked for.
Thank you.
Good evening, Mr. Kraler.
My dear friends, you are so quiet up here.
I thought you'd gone out for a walk.
[Anne]
Can you imagine me?
I didn't talk.
I hardly moved for one whole day. I wish they could hear that at school.
- [Yowling]
- Mouschi! Mouschi!
- Peter!
- [Continues Yowling]
Mouschi!
[Continues Yowling]
Shh!
Shh. Annele.
Annele!
Peter,
I'm warning you.
[Mr. Frank]
Please, quiet.
Margot. Margot!
What are these?
You don't have to whisper.
[Mr. Van Daan Mutters,
Indistinct]
[Meows]
Oh, there you are.
It's such a nice cat.
[Peter]
Thank you.
You're welcome.
Annele.
There's a box there.
Will you open it, please?
You know how I'm going to think of it here?
As a boardinghouse.
A very peculiar boardinghouse.
[Gasps]
Father, my film stars!
I was wondering where they were.
And Queen Wilhelmina.
How wonderful.
There's something more.
Go on.
Look further.
A diary.
I've never had a diary, and I've always wanted one.
Ohh.
[Sighs]
A pencil?
I'm going downstairs to get a pencil.
Anne, no.
But there's nobody down there now.
It doesn't matter.
Don't ever go beyond that door.
Ever?
Never.
I'm sorry, Anne.
It isn't safe.
I see.
It'll be hard.
I know that.
But always remember this,
Anneke: there are no walls, no locks, no bolts that anyone can put on your mind.
As a matter of fact, just between us, Annele, being here has certain advantages for you.
For instance, remember that battle you had with your mother on the subject of overshoes?
You said you'd rather die than wear overshoes.
Remember?
[Chuckling]
Well, what happened?
In the end, you had to wear them.
Now, for as long as we are here you won't have to wear overshoes.
Isn't that good?
And the piano?
You won't have to practice on the piano.
I tell you, this is going to be a fine life for you.
[Chuckling]
[Anne Narrating]
It's an odd idea for someone like me to keep a diary.
Not only because
I have never done so before, but because it seems to me that neither I, nor for that matter anyone else, will be interested in the unbosomings of a 13-year-old schoolgirl.
Still, what does that matter?
I want to write.
But more than that,
I want to bring out all kinds of things... that lie buried deep in my heart.
First of all, I expect
I should be describing... what it's like to go into hiding.
[Birds Calling]
But I don't really know yet myself.
I only know it's funny never to be able to go outdoors, never to breathe fresh air,
[Shouting, Chattering] never to run and shout and jump.
Wednesday, the 23rd of September, 1942.
The news of the war is good.
Stalingrad is still holding out.
The Russian offensive continues in the Moscow area.
It's safe now.
The last workman has left.
Whee!
Anne!
I'm first for the W.C.
It's 6:00, Margot.
School is over.
Where are my shoes?
♪♪ [Humming]
Have you seen my shoes?
- What shoes?
- You're gonna be sorry.
- I am?
- Anne dear.
[Peter]
Wait till I get you.
I'm waiting.
Stop! Peter. Ouch!
Anne! Peter!
[Shoes Land On Floor]
Hey, where are you going?
Going to give Mouschi his dinner.
Peter!
Anne dear, I think you shouldn't play like that with Peter.
It's not dignified.
Who wants to be dignified?
I don't want to be dignified.
You complain that I don't treat you like a grown-up, but when I do you resent it.
I only want some fun.
I don't know what's the matter with that boy.
Give him a little time.
He isn't used to girls.
Time?
Isn't two months time?
[Chuckles]
I could cry.
I wonder where Miep is.
She's usually so prompt.
[Siren Wailing]
[Wailing Passes, Fades]
♪♪ [Humming
"The Blue Danube"]
Margot, come and dance with me, please.
I've got more work to do,
Anne.
You know, we're going to forget how to dance.
When we get out, we won't remember a thing.
♪♪ [Continues Humming]
♪♪ [Joins In]
♪♪ [Mr. Frank Singing
In German]
[Toilet Flushing]
♪♪ [Ends]
Where's Peter?
Where would he be?
With his cat.
He hasn't finished his lessons, has he?
Peter.
- Peter!
- What is it?
Your mother says to come out!
I'm giving Mouschi his dinner.
I'm feeding my cat.
You know what your father says about you wasting all your time with that cat.
I haven't even looked at him since lunch.
I'm only telling you.
I'll feed him.
You stay out of here.
And I mean out.
Is that any way for you to talk to your little girlfriend?
Mother,
I asked you, would you please not say that?
Look, he's blushing.
[Giggling]
He's blushing.
Please. I'm not, but-
Leave me alone, will you.
What did I say?
You act like it's something to be ashamed of.
It's nothing to be ashamed of to have a little girlfriend.
- That's crazy. She's only 13.
- So what? And you're 16. It's just perfect.
[Meowing]
Your father is 10 years older than I am.
Mr. Frank, I warn you, this war lasts much longer, we're gonna be related.
Mazel tov.
I haven't seen my cat since lunch.
I'm giving Mouschi his dinner.
My little Mouschi.
I couldn't live without my precious Mouschi.
You wonderful cat, you!
All right,
Miss Quack-Quack.
What's that?
Miss Quack-Quack!
Heard all about you.
How you talk so much in class, they call you Miss Quack-Quack.
You're the most intolerable, insufferable boy I ever met!
Quack-quack-quack!
I'll give it to you good!
Quack!
- Ooh!
- [Door Slams]
Anne dear, you're hot.
You're warm.
Are you feeling all right?
Mother, please.
You don't have a fever, do you?
No.
You know we can't call a doctor here, ever.
There's only one thing to do: watch carefully.
Prevent an illness before it comes.
Let me see your tongue.
Mother, this is perfectly absurd.
Anne dear, don't be such a baby.
Let me see your tongue.
[Toilet Flushes]
Otto.
Anne.
You hear your mother, don't you?
Come on, open up.
Quack.
[Stomps Foot]
Anne.
Otto.
Anne.
You're all right.
[Siren Wailing]
I think there's nothing the matter with our Anne that a ride on her bike... or a visit with her friend Sanne de Vries wouldn't cure.
Isn't that so, Annele?
[Siren Continues
Wailing]
[Anne Narrating]
I keep wishing that Peter was a girl... instead of a boy.
Then I'd have someone to talk to.
With all the boys in the world, why did I have to get locked up with him?
[Explosions]
Is it someone?
Is it Miep?
It's strange we don't hear.
Maybe she got hurt- the flak.
She'll come.
I wish she'd get here.
I'm going crazy without cigarettes.
Anne, you got an "excellent" in your history paper today... and a "very good" in Latin.
Yes, but how about algebra?
Well, I have a confession to make.
Up until now I managed to stay ahead of you in algebra.
Today you caught up with me.
We'll leave it to Margot to correct.
Isn't algebra vile,
Father?
Vile.
How did I do?
Excellent, of course.
Anne, Anne, please.
Your French composition today was wonderful, just wonderful.
Mrs. Van Daan, may I try it on?
No, Anne.
It's all right.
Really.
But please, be careful with it.
My father gave me this coat the year before he died.
He always bought me the best money could buy.
Mrs. Van Daan, did you have a lot of boyfriends... before you were married?
Anne, that's a personal question.
It's not courteous to ask personal questions.
I don't mind.
Anneke, our house was always swarming with boys.
- When I was a young girl-
- Oh, no. Not again.
Shut up!
[Mrs., Mr. Van Daan]
One summer we had a big house in Hilversum.
[Mr. Van Daan Continues]
The boys-
The boys would come buzzing around like bees around a jam pot.
When I was 17-
Well, we were wearing our skirts very short in those days, and I had such good-looking legs.
I still have. I may not be as pretty as I used to be, but I still have my legs.
How about it,
Mr. Frank?
All right, all right.
We see them.
I'm not asking you.
I'm asking Mr. Frank.
Mother, for heaven's sakes.
Oh, I embarrass you too, do I?
Well, I only hope the girl you marry has as good.
Anneke, my father used to worry about me with all the boys hanging around.
And he used to say to me,
"If any of those boys get fresh,
"you just say to him,
'Remember, Mr. So-and-so, remember, I am a lady."'
Look at you, talking that way in front of her.
Don't you know she puts it all down in that damned diary?
So what if she does?
I'm only telling the truth.
Haven't you finished yet?
No.
Oh. The thinker.
Leave him alone.
All right, all right.
I'm a dunce, a hopeless case.
[Mrs. Van Daan]
You're not hopeless.
It's just that you haven't got anyone to help you like Father helps Anne and me.
Well, if I-
Well, if we could help-
What about it, Peter?
Would you like to study with us?
Shall we make our school coeducational?
Thanks. Yes.
Mr. Frank, you are an angel, an absolute angel.
Why didn't I meet you before I met that one there?
I... think it might be better... if you went into your room,
Peter, to work.
Excuse me.
You listen to Mr. Frank.
Mr. Frank is a highly educated man.
[Mr. Van Daan]
It's after 8:00.
Where are they?
At least one of them should have come.
They'll come. Don't worry.
Don't tell me.
I know something's wrong.
Isn't it bad enough around here without you sprawling all over the place?
If you didn't smoke all the time, you wouldn't be so bad-tempered.
Do you see me smoking?
Oh, you already smoked up all the cigarettes?
One package.
Miep only brought me one package.
It's a filthy habit, and this is a good time to break yourself of it.
- Oh, stop it.
- You're smoking up all our money!
Will you shut up!
And what are you staring at?
I never heard grown-ups quarrel like that before.
I thought only children quarreled.
This isn't a quarrel.
It's a discussion.
- And I never heard children so rude before.
- I, rude?
Yes!
Anne, drink your milk.
The trouble with you is, you've been spoiled.
You need a spanking.
Remember, Mr. So-and-so, that I am a lady.
Mmm, you're the most aggravating-
Why aren't you nice and quiet like your sister Margot?
Why do you have to show off all the time?
Let me give you a little advice, young lady- men don't like that in a girl.
Do you know that?
A man likes a girl who will listen to him once in a while.
A domestic girl who loves to cook and clean-
I'd cut my throat first!
I'd open my veins.
I'm going to be remarkable.
I'm going to Paris to study music and art.
Paris? Yeah, yeah.
I'm going to be an actress, or a writer, or a dancer.
[Mrs. Van Daan Gasps]
Look what you did.
I'm so sorry.
You clumsy little fool!
This is the coat my father gave me!
I'm so sorry.
You ruined it.
What do you care?
Ruined it!
[Sobbing]
I could kill you!
I could just kill you!
Petronella.
Liebchen, Liebchen.
[Continues Sobbing]
Petronella.
[Mr. Van Daan]
It's only a coat.
Anne, you must not behave in that way.
It was an accident.
Anyone can have an accident.
I don't mean that.
I mean the answering back.
You must not answer back.
They're our guests.
You don't hear Margot getting into any arguments with them, do you?
Try to be like Margot.
And have them walk all over me the way they do her? No, thanks.
I don't know what happens to you, Anne.
If I had ever talked to my mother as you talk to me-
Things have changed,
Mother.
People aren't like that anymore.
"Yes, Mother." "No, Mother."
"Anything you say, Mother."
I've got to fight things out for myself.
But-
Make something of myself.
It isn't necessary to fight to do it.
Margot doesn't fight.
Margot!
That's all I hear.
"Why aren't you like Margot?"
Everything she does is right, and everything I do is wrong!
You're all against me, and you worst of all!
[Sighs]
[Door Slams]
I don't know how we can go on living this way.
I can't say a word to Anne, she flies at me.
You know Anne.
In a half hour she'll be out here laughing and joking.
And, uh-
I told your father it wouldn't work- two families.
But no, no, he had to ask them.
[Footsteps, Faint]
Shh.
[Footsteps Approaching,
Growing Louder]
[Footsteps Approaching,
Growing Louder]
[Knocking]
[Sighs]
Every time
I hear that sound, my heart stops.
It's Miep.
Father!
Yes?
It's Miep.
Here's your list.
Is it Miep?
Yes.
At last I'll have some cigarettes.
Miep's here.
I can't tell you how sorry I am about the coat.
Don't worry.
Hello, hello.
Miep.
Mr. Kraler!
When Mr. Kraler comes, the sun begins to shine.
Dirk has had to leave.
Dirk is Miep's fiancé.
He had to go into hiding in the country to escape a labor call-up.
But he has let me have the radio for you.
He shouldn't have.
Oh, it was too dangerous.
Look!
[Gasps]
♪♪ [Radio, Headset:
"The Blue Danube"]
♪♪ [Radio, Speaker:
"Blue Danube" Continues]
[Anne Narrating]
Our blessed radio.
It gives us our eyes and ears out into the world.
We listen to the German station only for good music.
[Radio: Newscaster]
The Axis forces in the Western desert-
And we listen to the BBC for hope.
Ceaseless attacks by our land and air forces... are now in full retreat.
The Eighth Army continues to advance.
[Click Off]
That's good.
All right, Peter, now let's see what they have to say about the Nazis.
[Radio: Tuning]
Berlin.
[Hitler Shouting
In German]
[Crowd, Hitler]
Sieg heil! Sieg heil!
Sieg heil! Sieg heil!
Sieg heil!
Sieg heil! Sieg heil!
Sieg heil! Sieg heil!
[Footsteps Marching
On Street]
Sieg heil! Sieg heil!
[Hitler Continues
In German]
Must we listen?
All right, Peter.
That's enough.
[Door Lock Clicks]
[Lock Rattling
Quietly]
[Clicks Off]
[Rattling]
The Green Police.
They've found us.
Hmm.
[Cabinet Door Rattling]
Hmm.
Ah.
[Grunts]
[Squeak]
Huh.
♪♪ [Humming]
Huh.
Hmm.
[Safe Door Opens]
[Siren Approaching,
Wailing]
[Grunting]
- [Muffled Cough]
- [Siren Wailing, Closer]
[Wailing Passes, Fades]
[Bell Tolling]
[Tolling Continues]
[Explosion In Distance]
[Explosions Continue
In Distance]
[Explosions, Closer]
[Lock Clicks]
[Lock Rattling]
[Explosions Continue]
This way,
Mr. Dussel.
[Siren Droning]
[Siren Winding Down]
[Siren Fades]
[Knocking]
It is Kraler.
Please open.
And Miep.
[Mrs. Van Daan]
Oh, bless them.
They are here.
- [Mr. Frank] Kraler?
- [Kraler]
And Miep, yes. Open, please.
Well, we had a visitor last night.
A visitor last night?
Yes, yes.
A thief.
It was a thief?
Did you hear him?
Yes, we heard him.
He was right under you.
- In the office right under here.
- We did not know.
[Mrs. Van Daan]
We thought it was the Green Police.
Are you sure, Miep?
You were, of course, quiet?
We didn't move.
We hardly breathed all night.
That is good.
It was close.
Too close.
He went through everything.
The desk and the files.
The desk and the files.
And he found the safe, but he could not get it open.
He was looking for our ration card supply from the Underground.
Somebody knows.
They're in that safe.
They'll come back.
Get rid of that safe.
Get it out of here.
Yes. Put a sign on the door:
"Burglars, do not come back.
The safe is gone."
Jokes, yet.
Mr. Frank,
I must talk to you.
Yes, of course.
Maybe it's the radio.
We should get rid of the radio.
Put it in the stove, burn it.
If the Green Police found that radio-
And they'd find her diary.
We'll burn that too.
Not my diary.
My diary goes,
I go with it.
Where is it?
If they find us, they might just as well find the diary, the radio.
What'll be the difference?
What'll be the difference?
Usually, when I come up here,
I try to bring good news.
Yes, I know.
Something has happened.
A man came to me.
He told me that he has a Jewish friend- a dentist.
He begged me, could I find him a hiding place?
So I have come to you.
I know it is a terrible thing to ask, living the way you are, but could you take him in?
Well, of course we will.
His name is Jan Dussel.
Dussel. Wait a minute.
I think I know him.
It's fine to have him.
But, Otto, where are we going to put him? Where?
There's so little food as it is, and to take in another person-
We can stretch the food a little, Mr. Van Daan.
He can have my bed.
No, thank you, Peter.
Margot will move in here with us, and he can have her bed.
- I'll get my things out.
- [Footsteps Descending]
[Bell Tolling]
Mr. Dussel.
[Tolling Continues]
Don't bump your head.
Come in, Mr. Dussel.
This is Mr. Frank.
Mr. Otto Frank?
Yes. Let me have your things, please.
Thank you, Mr. Frank.
I leave you in good hands.
Mr. Dussel?
Hmm?
I must return your coat.
What can I say to thank you?
Mr. Kraler and Miep, they're our lifeline.
Without them, we couldn't live.
Please, you make us seem very heroic.
It isn't that at all.
We simply don't like the Nazis.
We don't like their methods-
I know. I know.
"Nobody's gonna tell us Dutchmen what to do with our damn Jews."
[Chuckles] We will be up tomorrow to see that they are treating you right.
Good-bye.
[Mr. Frank] Good-bye, Mr. Kraler.
Good-bye, Miep.
Welcome, Mr. Dussel.
Thank you.
This is my wife, Edith.
Mr. and Mrs. Van Daan.
Their son, Peter, my daughters Margot and Anne.
Anne.
How do you do.
Margot.
Please, Mr. Dussel, sit down.
Thank you.
I'm dreaming,
I know it.
Mr. Otto Frank, here.
You're not in Switzerland, then?
Someone said that you escaped to Switzerland.
And you've been here all this time?
Ever since July.
Did Mr. Kraler warn you you won't get much to eat here?
You can imagine... three ration cards among the seven of us.
Now you make eight.
Mr. Van Daan, you don't realize what's happening outside... that you should warn me of a thing like that.
You don't realize what's going on right here in Amsterdam.
Every day, hundreds of Jews disappear.
They surround a block, and they search house by house.
Every day children come home from school to find their parents gone.
Hundreds are being deported.
People that you and I know- the Hallensteins, the Wessels.
[Mrs. Van Daan]
Oh, no.
You get your call-up notice- come to the station on such and such a day and hour.
Bring only what you can carry.
If you don't go, they come and drag you from your home... and ship you off to Mauthausen- the death camp.
We didn't know that things had got so much worse.
Forgive me for speaking so.
Do you know the de Vries?
They're gone.
Sanne and I are in the same class.
Sanne is my best- my best friend.
She returned home from school to find her parents gone.
She was alone for two days, and then they came and took her away.
Gone?
With all the others.
Oh, no.
Some people named Meyerberg, they lived near us-
I think we should put this off until later,
Mrs. Van Daan.
I'm sure Mr. Dussel would like to get settled now.
Annele, would you like to take Mr. Dussel to his room?
If you’ll come with me,
Mr. Dussel.
Uh, forgive me if I haven't expressed my gratitude.
This has been such a shock to me.
I always thought of myself as Dutch.
I was born in Holland.
My father was born in Holland, and my grandfather.
And now after all these years-
If you will excuse me.
♪♪ [Marching: Faint]
♪♪ [Continues]
It's so different from what Mr. Kraler tells us.
Mr. Kraler says that things are improving.
I like it better the way Kraler tells it.
♪♪ [Continues]
♪♪ [Continues]
♪♪ [Fades]
Good night, Bubele.
Say good night.
Good night, Mother.
[Mrs. Van Daan]
Good night, Mr. Frank.
Good night.
Good night.
Do you have any children,
Mr. Dussel?
No, I never married.
Have you no family at all?
No one.
How dreadful.
You must be terribly lonely.
Mm. I'm used to it.
I don't think I could ever get used to it.
[Clears Throat]
Didn't you even have a pet? A cat or a dog?
No.
No, no. I have an allergy to fur-bearing animals.
Gives me asthma.
Oh, dear.
What?
Peter has a cat.
He has?
He has it here?
Yes.
[Coughing]
[Continues Coughing]
We hardly ever see it.
He keeps it in his room all the time.
I'm sure it will be all right.
Mm-hmm.
Well, I hope so.
I hope I'm not going to be too much of a bother to you, Mr. Dussel.
No.
I seem to be able to get everyone's back up.
Oh, I always get along very well with young people.
My patients all bring their children to me... because they know
I get along well with them.
So don't you worry about that.
Thank you,
Mr. Dussel.
Good night.
I'll be back.
Good night, Mr. Dussel.
Careful.
[Clattering]
[Clattering]
[Bell Tolling]
[Doorknob Rattling]
[Crowd Shouting]
Sieg heil! Sieg heil!
Sieg heil! Sieg heil!
Sieg heil! Sieg heil!
Sieg heil! Sieg heil!
Sieg heil! Sieg heil!
Sieg heil! Sieg heil!
Sieg heil! Sieg heil!
Sieg heil! Sieg heil!
[Shouting Fades]
[Anne]
Sanne.
Sanne?
Sanne.
[Woman Laughing,
Speaking German]
- [Man]
Halt! [Continues in German]
- [Machine Gun Fire]
[Gunfire Continues]
[Shouting Continues]
[Body Falls In Water]
[Screams]
Save me! Save me!
No, no!
[Screams]
Oh! No, don't take me!
Stop it. Stop it.
[Woman Screams, Laughing]
[Anne] Save me.
[Mrs. Frank]
Hush, darling.
Hush. It's all right.
It's all right.
Please, Mr. Dussel, turn on the light.
It was just a dream.
You're here, safe.
You see?
Something must be done with that child, yelling like that.
Who knows who might be in the street.
She's endangering all our lives.
Mr. Dussel, after all,
Anne is not exactly a trained, frontline soldier.
Please, Mr. Dussel, go back to bed.
She'll be herself in a minute or two.
Won't you, Anne?
Go back to bed.
[Scoffs]
Excuse me. I'm going to the W.C., the one room where there's peace.
[Mr. Frank]
Go back to bed now.
Would you like some water?
Was it a very bad dream?
Perhaps if you told me.
I'd rather not talk about it.
Try to sleep then.
I'll sit right here beside you.
You don't have to.
But I'd like to stay with you very much. Really.
I'd rather you didn't.
Good night-
[Sighs]
You'll be all right?
There's nothing that you want?
Will you please ask Father to come?
Yes, of course,
Anne dear.
She asks for you.
Edith.
Go to her, Otto.
She's still trembling with fear.
[Sobbing]
She wants nothing of me.
She pulled away when
I leaned down to kiss her.
The Green Police broke down a door and grabbed me... and tried to drag me out the way they did Sanne.
[Margot]
It's just a phase.
All girls turn to their fathers at this age.
They give all their love to their fathers.
You weren't like this.
You didn't shut me out.
So... now, do you want me to read to you for a while?
No. Just sit with me for a minute.
Was I awful?
Do you think anyone outside could've heard me?
No. Now lie down quietly.
So, like this.
Now try to sleep.
I'm a terrible coward.
I'm so disappointed in myself.
[Sighs]
I think I'm really grown up, and then something happens and I run to you like a baby.
I love you, Father.
I don't love anyone but you.
Annele. Annele.
It's true.
You're the only one I love.
I've been thinking about it for a long time.
It's fine- It's fine to have you tell me that you love me, but I'd be much happier if you said that you loved your mother as well.
She needs your help so much.
Your love.
We have nothing in common.
She doesn't understand me.
Whenever I try to explain my views on life, she asks me if I'm constipated.
You hurt her very much just now.
She's crying. She's in there crying.
Oh, Father,
I was horrible, wasn't I?
What's the matter with me?
Tell me.
Don't say it's just a phase.
Help me.
There's so little we parents can do to help our children, Anne.
We can only try to set a good example.
Point the way.
The rest you must do yourself.
I'm trying. Really, I am.
Every night I think back over all the things I did that day that were wrong.
Like putting the wet mop in Mrs. Van Daan's bed.
[Giggles]
[Chuckling]
And now this with Mother.
I say to myself,
"That was wrong."
And I make up my mind I'm never going to do that again. Never.
I may do something worse, but I'll never do that again.
[Sighs]
I have a nicer side, Father.
But I'm scared to show it.
I'm afraid people will laugh at me.
So the mean Anne comes to the outside... and the good Anne stays in the inside.
And I keep on trying to switch them around... and have the good Anne outside and the bad Anne inside.
It would be what I'd like to be... and might be... if only-
[Sighs]
She's asleep.
[Anne Narrating]
Thursday, the 29th of October, 1942.
Mr. Dussel and I had a great battle yesterday.
Yes, Mr. Dussel.
According to him, nothing,
I repeat, nothing is right about me.
While he was going on at me,
I thought,
"Someday, I'm going to give you such a smack... that you'll fly right up to the ceiling."
Why is it that every grown-up thinks he knows the way to bring up children?
Particularly the grown-ups that haven't any.
Monday, the ninth of
November, 1942.
Wonderful news.
The Allies have landed in Africa.
Churchill spoke on the BBC from London.
[Radio: Churchill]
Which they have so often meted out to others.
Ah, this is not the end.
No, it is not even the beginning of the end.
But it is, perhaps, the end of the beginning.
[Anne Narrating]
The air raids are getting worse.
The British planes come over day and night on their way to Germany.
[Gunfire]
♪♪ [Radio: Beethoven's
Symphony No. 5]
[Loud Explosion]
[Explosions Continue]
♪♪ [Continues]
It's too much.
Just too much.
[Loud Explosion]
[Gunfire Continues]
Suppose they hit this house?
What will we do?
We can't go out in the street.
What will we do?
If they hit this house, your worries will be over.
That noise- that big explosion- they hit one of the English planes.
It fell right in this block.
Peter!
Peter!
[Gasps]
[Mr. Frank]
It's far away from here.
Don't be nervous.
Look. Just look at them.
Why, Mrs. Van Daan, this should be music to your ears.
Music?
Of course.
The more planes the British send over, the sooner the war will be over, the sooner we'll be out of here and home again.
I don't believe it'll ever be over.
You know what I'd like right now?
A cup of tea.
Oh, yes, please.
You can't have tea then for breakfast.
If you have tea now, you won't have any tomorrow.
I don't care.
- Neither do I. Now, please.
- Me, too, please.
How about you, Mr. Dussel?
Would you like your tea now or tomorrow morning?
Tomorrow morning.
Sure?
- Sure.
- [Screams]
I'll take mine now.
The skylight!
Edith, come!
Peter! Peter!
Peter! Peter!
Peter!
[Gunfire,
Explosions Continue]
[Loud Explosion]
[No Audible Dialogue]
"Praised be Thou,
O Lord our God,
"ruler of the universe who has sanctified us with Thy commandments...
"and bidden us kindle the Hanukkah lights.
"Praise be Thou,
O Lord our God, ruler of the universe...
"who has wrought wondrous deliverances for our fathers in days of old.
"Praise be Thou,
O Lord our God, ruler of the universe...
"that Thou has given us life and sustenance and brought us to this happy season.
Amen."
Amen.
[Anne Narrating]
Monday, the seventh of December, 1942.
The Hanukkah holiday came early this year.
"We kindle this Hanukkah light to celebrate the great and wonderful deeds...
"wrought through the zeal with which God filled the hearts...
"of the heroic Maccabees
2,000 years ago.
"They fought against indifference, against tyranny and oppression...
"and they restored our temple to us.
"May these lights remind us that we should ever look to God,
"whence cometh our help.
Amen."
[All]
Amen.
"I lift up mine eyes unto the mountains from whence cometh my help.
"My help cometh from the Lord who made heaven and Earth.
"He will not suffer thy foot to be moved.
"He that keepeth thee will not slumber.
"He that keepeth Israel doth neither slumber nor sleep.
"The Lord is thy keeper.
The Lord is thy shade upon thy right hand.
"The Lord shall keep thee from all evil.
He shall keep thy soul.
"The Lord shall guard thy going out and thy coming in,
"from this time forth and forevermore.
Amen."
Amen.
Amen.
May I have the hats, please?
Thank you.
Very nice.
Very nice.
That was very moving.
Sit down.
Sit down.
Where are you going?
There's lots more.
Songs and presents.
Presents?
Not this year, unfortunately.
But always on Hanukkah everyone gives presents.
Everyone.
That's right.
Like our
Saint Nicholas day.
Saint Nicholas day.
No, not like
Saint Nicholas day.
What kind of a Jew are you that you don't know Hanukkah?
I remember particularly the candles.
First one, as we have tonight.
Then the second night, you light two candles.
The next night, three.
And so on, until there are eight candles burning.
When there are eight candles, it's truly beautiful.
What I remember best are the presents we used to get.
Eight days of presents, and, well, each day they got better and better.
We're all here... alive.
That's present enough.
- No, it isn't. I've got something.
- What is it?
L'Chaim.
L'Chaim.
Presents.
Real presents?
She made it herself.
Look at that.
Isn't it festive?
Isn't it gay?
Oh, that's beautiful.
For Margot.
Ah.
Read it out loud.
[Clears Throat]
"You have never lost your temper.
[Chuckling]
"You never will,
I fear.
You are so good, but if you should, put all your cross words here."
Aww.
[Chuckles]
Let's see what it is.
It's a new crossword puzzle book.
It's one you've done, but I rubbed it all out... and if you wait a little and forget, you can do it again.
[All Laughing]
Clever, clever.
Thank you.
For Mrs. Van Daan.
Ah-hah.
I feel terrible.
I don't have a thing for anybody.
It's hair shampoo.
I took odds and ends of soap and mixed them with the last of my toilet water.
Oh, thank you,
Anneke.
That was nice.
I wanted to write a poem for all of them, but I didn't have time.
That's all right,
Anne.
Yours, Mr. Van Daan, is really something.
Mmm?
Something you want more than anything.
Hmm.
- Cigarettes!
- Look at that.
Cigarettes.
Two of them.
Father found some old pipe tobacco in the pocket lining of his coat, and we made them- rather, Father did.
[Mrs. Van Daan]
Look at that.
Light it!
Go on and light it!
It's tobacco.
Really, it is.
There's a little fluff in it, but not much.
It works!
[Laughing]
Look at him.
Thank you, Anne.
Thank you.
[Laughing]
Mr. Van Daan!
For Mother.
Hanukkah greeting.
"Here's an I.O.U. that I promise to pay.
"Ten hours of doing...
"whatever you say.
Signed, Anne Frank."
- Ten hours of doing what you're told?
Anything you're told?
- That's right.
You wouldn't want to sell that, Mrs. Frank, would you?
Never. This is the most precious gift I've ever had.
For Father.
Annele, I wasn't supposed to have a present.
Look at that.
It's a muffler.
Oh, I know.
To wear around your neck like an ascot, you know.
I knitted it in the dark each night.
I'm afraid it looks better in the dark.
It's fine.
Thank you, Annele.
Thank you.
Isn't it beautiful.
Lovely, huh?
Thank you, Anne.
- For Mouschi.
- [Mrs. Van Daan]
He'll like it.
And this is for you. Yourself.
From Miss Quack-Quack.
Go on. Open it.
Aren't you going to open it?
[Mrs. Van Daan]
Come on. Show us what it is.
It's a safety razor.
It's not new.
Miep got it for me second-hand.
But you do need a razor now.
What for?
Look at his upper lip.
See?
He wants to get rid of that?
Put some milk on it and let the cat lick it off.
[Chuckles]
You think you're funny, don't you?
Look, he can't wait.
He's going in to try it now.
I'm going to give
Mouschi his present.
[Coughs]
Mouschi, Mouschi, Mouschi.
Enough.
And last, but never least, my roommate, Mr. Dussel.
Something for me?
Capsules.
They're earplugs to put in your ears... so you won't hear me when I thrash around at night.
I made them myself.
Try them. See if you can hear me.
Wait, I'll put- Like that?
Is that what you mean?
Are you ready?
What?
- Are you ready?
- They work.
They went in.
They went in.
[All Chuckling]
He can't get 'em out.
What's the matter with you?
Get 'em out.
Take 'em out.
I got 'em.
- Thank you.
- [Chattering]
And now let's sing the song, Father.
Wait till you hear the Hanukkah song,
Mr. Dussel.
♪ O Hanukkah, O Hanukkah
The sweet celebration ♪
Annele.
Annele, we shouldn't sing the song tonight.
You see, Mr. Dussel, it's a song of jubilation and of rejoicing.
One is apt to become just a little too enthusiastic about it.
Please, let's sing the song, Father.
I promise not to shout.
Very well, but quietly, Anne.
I'll keep my eye on you-
[Coughing] Oh!
Oh! I told you not to come in here with that cat.
Get out of here.
[Coughing, Wheezing]
What's the matter with you?
Haven't you any sense?
Get that cat out of here.
Cat?
You heard me.
Get it out of here!
[Coughing]
I have no cat.
[Laughing]
Mr. Dussel!
It doesn't have to be the cat.
Just the hairs on his clothing from the cat is enough.
When he comes in the room-
Don't worry, you won't be bothered anymore.
We're getting rid of it.
At last, you listen to me.
I'm not doing it for you.
That's all in your mind.
All of it.
I'm doing it because
I'm sick of seeing that cat eat all our food.
That's not true.
I only give him scraps.
Don't tell me.
He gets fatter every day.
Damn cat looks better than any of us.
Out he goes tonight.
No!
Mr. Van Daan, you can't do that.
That's Peter's cat.
Peter loves that cat.
Anne.
- If he goes, I go.
- Go. Go.
He's not going, and the cat's not going.
What's the matter with you?
It's Hanukkah.
It's Hanukkah.
Please, Anne, sing.
♪ O Hanukkah, O Hanukkah
The sweet celebration ♪
♪ Around the feast we gather ♪
Annele.
I think we should first blow out the candles.
Then we'll have something for tomorrow night.
Father, you're supposed to let it burn itself out.
I'm sure that God understands shortages.
Praise be Thou,
O Lord our God, who has sustained us... and permitted us to celebrate this joyous festival.
Amen.
[All]
Amen.
[Door Lock Rattling]
[Rattling Continues]
[Glass Breaking]
[Mutters]
- [Cat Meows]
- [Loud Clattering]
[Footsteps Descending Stairs]
[Sighs]
I think they've gone.
They found us.
If they had, they would be up here by now.
I know it was the Green Police.
They've gone to get help.
It may be the Gestapo, looking for papers.
- Or another thief looking for money.
- [Creaking]
I'm going down.
They may still be there.
Annele, this is Saturday.
We have no way of knowing what has happened down there until Miep and Mr. Kraler come.
We cannot live with this uncertainty.
Now, please. Please.
Get our money.
They say you can buy them off.
So much a head.
- Quick, go upstairs and get the money.
- Keep still.
You wanna be dragged off to a concentration camp?
You gonna stand there until they come up here and get you?
Will you keep still!
Someone go and make Father come back.
Haven't you done enough?
Please, Mr. Van Daan.
Anne!
Shh.
I lift up mine eyes unto the mountains from whence cometh my help.
My help cometh from the Lord who made heaven and Earth.
He that keepeth thee will not slumber.
He that keepeth Israel doth neither slumber nor sleep.
The Lord is thy keeper.
The Lord is thy shade from-
- [Speaking German]
- No.
[German]
I better go and look and make sure.
Ja.
[Together]
Pray that the Lord shall keep thee from all evil.
He shall keep thy soul.
Hear me, O Israel.
The Lord shall guard thy going out and thy coming in.
[Mr. Frank]
He took the typewriter and ran away in such a hurry, he didn't stop to shut the street door- it was swinging wide open.
A watchman was passing.
[Footsteps Ascending Stairs]
Look. Tools.
[German]
[Loud Clattering]
[Meows]
[Continues Meowing]
[German]
Ja.
Meetz-meetz-meetz.
Meetz-meetz-meetz.
Meow, meow.
They had a burglary.
He got out as he heard me coming.
- [German]
- Meetz-meetz.
I will lock the door and report it.
They've gone.
They've locked the door.
[Sighs]
Thank God they've gone.
I'd just as soon they'd take us than to continue with this terrible agony.
I can't stand it.
It's all right, Annele.
The danger has passed.
Who says the danger is passed?
Don't you realize that we're in greater danger than ever?
Please, Mr. Dussel, will you keep still.
Thanks to this clumsy fool, someone now knows we're up here.
- Someone now knows that we're up here hiding.
- It's a thief.
You think the thief is going to go to the Green Police and say,
"I was robbing a place the other night, and I heard a noise above my head"?
You think a thief is going to do that?
Yes, he will.
You're crazy.
I think that someday the thief will be caught.
He'll make a bargain with the Gestapo.
He'll say to the Gestapo,
"If you let me off,
I'll show you where some Jews are hiding."
That's what I think.
Oy!
He's right.
Oh, Mother, let's get out of here.
We can't stay here now.
Please, let's go.
Go? Where?
Yes, where?
Have we lost all faith?
All courage?
A few moments ago, we thought they had come for us, didn't we?
We thought it was the end.
Well, it was not the end.
We are alive. We are safe.
We thank Thee,
O Lord, our God, that in Thy infinite mercy,
Thou hast again seen fit to spare us.
Amen.
Amen.
Annele.
The song, hmm?
How about the song?
[Shaky Voice]
♪ O Hanukkah
O Hanukkah ♪
♪ The sweet celebration ♪
♪ Around the feast we gather ♪
[All Sing]
♪ In complete jubilation ♪
♪ Happiest of seasons now is here ♪
♪ Many are the reasons for good cheer ♪
♪ Together, together ♪
♪ Whatever tomorrow may bring ♪
[Tempo Increases]
♪ So hear us rejoicing and merrily voicing ♪
♪ The Hanukkah song that we sing ♪
♪ O hear us rejoicing and merrily voicing ♪
♪ The Hanukkah song that we sing ♪♪
[All Laughing]
Happy Hanukkah.
[Bells Pealing]
[Bells Pealing]
[Anne Narrating]
Saturday, the first of January, 1944.
Another new year has begun, and we find ourselves still in our hiding place.
We have been here now for one year, five months and 25 days.
One of our family has left us.
Mouschi ran away.
[Coughing]
We're all a little thinner.
The Van Daans' discussions are as violent as ever.
Mother still doesn't understand me, but then
I don't understand her either.
There is one great change, however.
A change in myself.
I read somewhere that girls of my age don't feel quite certain of themselves, that they become quiet within... and begin to think of the miracle that is taking place in their bodies.
I think that what is happening to me is so wonderful.
Not only what can be seen, but what is taking place inside.
Each time it has happened,
I feel I have a sweet secret, and I long for the time when I shall feel that secret within me again.
[Mr. Frank]
Annele. Peter.
A wonderful surprise.
Mr. Kraler and Miep are here.
Oh, thank you.
You shouldn't have come.
You should have at least one day to yourselves.
Don't say that.
It's so wonderful to see them.
What is it?
What is it?
Mr. Kraler.
- Happy New Year, Mr. Dussel.
- Happy New Year.
How are you, Margot?
Feeling any better?
I'm all right.
We filled her full of every kind of pill, so she won't cough and make a noise.
Look what Miep has brought us.
A cake.
[All]
Mmm.
Cake.
Well.
I'll get some plates.
Thank you, Miepia.
You must have used all of your sugar rations for weeks.
It's beautiful, isn't it?
It's ages since
I've even seen a cake.
Not since you brought the one last year, remember?
It had "Peace in 1943" written on-
"Peace in 1944."
- Peace has to come sometime, you know.
- Here you are.
- Peace has to come sometime, you know.
- Here you are.
Now, how many of us are there?
None for me, thank you.
Oh, you must.
Please, Miep.
Good. That leaves one, two, three- seven of us.
Eight. The same as it always is.
I left Margot out.
I take it for granted
Margot won't eat any.
Why wouldn't she?
I think it won't harm her.
All right, all right.
I just didn't want her to start coughing again.
And, please,
Mrs. Frank should cut the cake.
What do you mean?
Well, Mrs. Frank divides things better.
Just what are you trying to say?
Forget it. We're wasting time.
No, no.
Don't I always give everybody exactly the same?
Don't I?
Forget it, Kerli.
No, I want an answer.
Don't I?
Yes. Yes, yes.
Everybody gets exactly the same.
Except Mr. Van Daan gets a little bit more.
That's a lie.
She always cuts the same.
Mr. Van Daan, please.
You see, Miep, what a little sugar cake does to us?
It goes right to our heads.
Here you are,
Mrs. Frank.
Thank you.
You sure you won't have any?
Very sure.
Miep?
No, thank you.
Really.
[Exhales]
Cut the cake.
All right.
Thank you, Peter.
That's yours, Peter.
Maybe Mouschi went back to our house.
[Peter]
Do you ever get over there?
Do you think that you could?
I'm afraid with him gone a week, Peter-
Make up your mind.
Already someone has had a big nice meal from that cat.
[Kraler Chuckles]
Mmm, it's delicious, Miep.
Delicious.
Well, I must run.
There's a party tonight.
How heavenly.
Remember now what everyone's wearing... and what you have to eat and everything so you can tell us tomorrow.
I'll give you a full report.
Good-bye, everyone.
Good-bye.
Good-bye, Miep.
Hey, just a minute.
There's something
I'd like you to do for me.
Putti, where are you going?
Putti, what are you gonna do?
Putti.
No, no, no.
Don't you dare take that coat.
What is wrong?
Father says he's gonna sell her fur coat.
She's crazy about that old fur coat.
It's mine, you hear me?
My father gave me that coat.
I want the coat.
No, you have no right.
Get your hands off it.
Is it possible that anyone can... be silly enough... to worry about a fur coat at a time like this?
It's none of your darn business.
And if you say one more thing-
Peter.
[Footsteps Approaching]
Just a... little discussion on the advisability of selling this coat.
As I have often reminded Mrs. Van Daan, it's selfish of her to keep it when people outside are in such desperate need of clothing.
So if you please to sell it for us.
It should fetch a good price.
And by the way, would you get me cigarettes?
I don't care what kind they are.
Get all you can.
It is very difficult to get them, Mr. Van Daan.
But I will try.
Good-bye.
Good-bye.
Bye, Miep.
Mr. Frank, could I talk to you?
Something's happened, hasn't it, Mr. Kraler?
What's happened?
If it is something that concerns us here, we'd better all hear it.
The children-
What they'd imagine would be worse than any reality.
It is a man in the storeroom.
His name is Karl.
You knew him.
One day he came to the office.
He closed the door and asked me,
"What do you hear from your friend Mr. Frank?"
I told him there was a rumor that you were in Switzerland.
He said he had heard that rumor too, but he thought
I might know something more.
I did not pay much attention.
I- I tried to forget it.
And then yesterday... we were coming out of the storeroom out there.
I had started down to the office.
I looked back.
He was standing, staring at the bookcase.
He said, "I thought
I remember a door up here.
Was not there a door here leading to the loft?"
Then he asked me for more money.
Twenty gilders more a week.
- Blackmail.
- Twenty gilders?
Very modest blackmail.
That's just the beginning.
You know what I think?
He's the thief who was down there that night.
That's how he knows we're here.
How was it left?
What did you tell him?
I told him
I had to think about it.
What shall I do?
Pay him the money?
Take a chance on firing him or what?
I do not know.
For heaven's sakes, don't fire him.
Pay him what he asks.
Keep him here where you can keep your eye on him.
Is it so much that he is asking?
I mean, what are they paying nowadays?
He could get it in a war plant.
Mm-hmm.
But this is not a war plant.
Mind you, I do not know if he knows or not.
Offer him half.
Then we'll soon know if it is blackmail or not.
And if it is, we've gotta pay, haven't we?
[Chuckles]
Whatever he asks, we've gotta pay.
Let us decide that when the time comes.
This may be all my imagination.
You get to a point these days where you suspect everyone and everything.
[Siren Wailing]
[Phone Rings]
[Wailing Continues]
[Ringing Continues]
What does that mean, the telephone ringing on a holiday?
That's my wife.
I told her I had to go over some papers in my office, to call me here when she got out of church.
Good-bye.
Good-bye.
Happy New Year.
[All]
Good-bye.
Good-bye, Mr. Kraler.
[Ringing Continues]
I will offer him half then.
Thank you, Mr. Kraler.
[Ringing Continues]
[Dussel]
You can thank your son for this.
[Ringing Continues]
[Dussel]
You can thank your son for this.
Him and his damn cat.
That night. There.
I tell you, it's-it's-it's- it's just a question of time now.
Sometimes I wish the end would come, whatever it is.
Margot!
Well, then at least we'd know where we were.
You should be ashamed of yourself, talking that way.
Think how lucky we are.
Think of the thousands dying in the war every day.
Think of the people in concentration camps.
What's the good of that?
What's the good of thinking of misery when you're already miserable?
That's stupid.
We're young,
Margot and Peter and I.
You grown-ups have had your chance.
Look at us. If we begin thinking of all the horror in the world, we're lost.
We're trying to hold on to some kind of ideals, when everything- ideals, hope- everything is being destroyed.
It isn't our fault the world is in such a mess.
We weren't around when all this started.
- Now you listen to me.
- So don't try to take it out on us.
[Huffs]
[Mr. Van Daan]
She talks as if we started the war.
Did we start the war?
You left this.
Thanks.
I thought you were fine just now.
You know just how to talk to 'em.
I can never think when I'm mad.
I say too much.
I hurt people's feelings.
I think you're just fine.
Thank you, Peter.
That Dussel, what he said about Mouschi, about somebody eating him, all I could think is
I wanted to hit him.
That's what I used to do in school, but, here a fight starts,
I just duck in my room.
You're lucky having a room to go to.
His Lordship is always in mine.
When they start in on me,
I have to stand and take it.
You gave some of it back to them just now.
I get so mad.
They've formed their opinions.
About everything.
But we're still trying to find out.
We have problems here that no other people our age have ever had.
And just as you think you've solved them, something comes along and, bang, you have to start all over again.
I think your father's fine.
Oh, he is, Peter.
He is.
He's the only one who's ever given me the feeling that I have any sense.
Isn't it funny, you and I?
Here we've been together all this time... and this is the first time we've ever really talked.
It helps a lot to have someone to talk to, doesn't it?
It helps you let off steam.
[Glass Clinks]
Any time that... you want to let off steam, you can come into my room.
I can get up an awful lot of steam.
[Chuckles]
It's all right with me.
Do you mean that?
I said it, didn't I?
Good night.
Good night.
Good night.
Good night.
Good night.
Good night.
May I come in?
No, Mr. Dussel.
I'm not dressed yet.
Oh.
Margot.
Hmm?
Tell me, am I terribly ugly?
Oh, stop fishing.
No. Tell me.
Of course you're not.
You've got nice eyes... and a lot of animation and- and-
- May I come in?
- Come in, Mother.
Mr. Dussel is impatient to get in here.
[Anne]
He takes the room for himself the entire day.
You're not going in again tonight to see Peter, hmm?
That is my intention.
Aren't you afraid you're disturbing him?
Mother, I have some intuition.
Then may I ask you this much, Annie?
Please don't shut the door when you go in.
You sound like
Mrs. Van Daan.
Oh, no. I don't mean to suggest anything wrong.
I only wish you wouldn't expose yourself to criticism.
I'm sorry, Mother.
I'm going to Peter's room.
I'm not going to let
Petronella Van Daan spoil our friendship.
Just a moment, Mr. Dussel.
In my day the boys called on the girls.
[Mrs. Frank] You know how young people are. Peter's room is the only place they can talk.
Talk?
That's not what they called it when I was a girl.
I'm sorry, Margot, that you have to be the one left out.
I feel so guilty about you.
Why?
I mean, every time
I go to Peter- into Peter's room,
I have the feeling that I'm hurting you.
I know if it were me,
I'd be desperately jealous.
I am jealous a little.
Not of you and Peter.
I'm-
I'm only feeling sorry that I haven't anyone... with whom to- to discuss my feelings.
Margot, I won't even-
Listen, you've found a companionship, and I want you to enjoy it.
Only... in my heart I feel that I've got a right to share feelings with someone too.
But I'm sure that Peter- that that boy, he could just never be that person for me.
[Knocking On Door]
Maybe there's nothing to be jealous about.
Maybe I'm just taking the place of his cat.
Will you please let me in my room?
[Anne]
Just a minute, dear, dear Mr. Dussel.
Well, here I go... to run the gauntlet.
Thank you so much.
[Heel Snaps]
Look at her.
A lot of good it did me to have a son.
I never see him.
Just a minute, dear.
I'd like to say a few words to my son.
Do you mind?
Peter, I do not want you staying up till all hours tonight.
You need your sleep.
You are a growing boy.
Anne won't stay late.
She's going to bed promptly at 9:00.
Aren't you, Anne?
Yes, Mother. May we go now?
[Mrs. Frank]
Listen for the chimes, dear.
Aren't they impossible?
Treating us as if we're still in the nursery.
Don't let it bother you.
It- It doesn't bother me.
I suppose you can't really blame them.
They think back to what they were like at our age.
They don't realize how much more advanced we are.
[Explosions]
[Sighs]
Already I know what I want to do.
Don't you?
I want to be a journalist or something.
I love to write.
What do you want to do?
I know what I'd like right now.
I'd like to make it to England, get with the Free Dutch Forces over there.
Peter, you wouldn't try a thing like that.
You'd never make it.
I'd make it.
Only a few of the hundreds that try do.
I know, but... I'd like to get in it and- and hit back.
To just sit here, it's not for me.
You like Margot, don't you?
Right from the start you liked her.
Liked her better than me.
Oh, I don't know.
It's all right.
Everyone feels that way.
Margot's so good.
She's sweet and bright and beautiful, and I'm not.
I wouldn't say that.
Oh, no, I'm not.
I know that.
I know quite well that I'm not a beauty.
I never have been and never shall be.
I don't agree at all.
I think you're pretty.
That's not true.
A-And another thing.
You've changed.
From the first, I mean.
I have?
I used to think that you were awful noisy.
And what do you think now, Peter?
How have I changed?
Well, you-
You're quieter.
I'm glad you don’t just hate me.
I never said that.
I bet when you get out of here, you'll never think of me again.
That's crazy.
When you get back with all your friends, you're going to say,
"Now, what did I ever see in that Miss Quack-Quack?"
I haven't got any friends.
Peter, of course you have.
Everyone has friends.
Not me. I don't want any.
I get along fine without 'em.
Does that mean you can get along without me too?
I think of myself as your friend.
No.
If they were all like you, it'd be different.
[Explosions]
Peter-
Hmm?
Did you ever kiss a girl?
Yes.
Once.
Was she pretty?
The girl you kissed.
I don't know.
I was blindfolded.
It was at a party.
One of those kissing games.
Oh.
I don't suppose that really counts, does it?
It didn't with me.
I've been kissed twice.
Once a man
I'd never seen before kissed me on the cheek... when he picked me up off the ice.
I was crying.
And the other was a friend of Father's who kissed my hand.
You wouldn't say those counted, would you?
[Clears Throat]
I wouldn't say so.
[Explosion]
I know almost for certain...
Margot would never kiss anyone unless she was engaged to them.
And I'm sure too that Mother never touched a man before Father.
But I don't know.
Things are so different now.
What do you think?
Do you think a girl shouldn't kiss anyone... except if she's engaged or something?
It's so hard to try to think what to do, when here we are with the whole world falling around our ears.
And you think, well, you don't know what's going to happen tomorrow.
What do you think?
Well, uh,
I suppose it- it depends on the girl.
With some, n-no matter what they do, it's wrong.
But others, it wouldn't necessarily be wrong with them.
[Bell Tolling]
I always thought that... when two people-
I think I should go now.
[Tolling Continues]
That's right.
Good night.
You won't let 'em stop you from coming?
No.
I might bring my diary.
There are so many things in it I want to talk over with you.
There's a lot about you.
What kind of things?
Well,
I wouldn't want you to see some of it.
I thought you were nothing.
Just the way you thought about me.
Did you change your mind, the way I changed my mind about you?
Well, you'll see.
Good night, Annele.
Good night, angel.
Good night.
[Door Opens, Closes]
Mm-hmm.
[Anne Narrating]
Outside there is a quiet excitement.
Invasion fever is mounting from day to day,
Invasion fever is mounting from day to day, and people talk of nothing else but the hope of liberation.
It had best come soon.
We here have had bad news.
The people from whom
Miep got our ration cards have been arrested.
Mr. Kraler is in the hospital.
It seems he has ulcers.
I'm afraid we are his ulcers.
Miep has to run the business and us too.
How very fortunate we are... when you think of what is happening outside.
[Anne Narrating]
I feel that spring is coming.
I feel it in my whole body and soul.
I'm utterly confused.
I am longing- so longing for everything.
[Birds Twittering]
[Foghorn Blows]
[Foghorn Blows]
Otto! Otto, quick.
He's stealing the food!
Edith, Edith!
Mr. Van Daan, let me see that!
Mr. Van Daan, come-
Let me-
Give me-
What happened?
Mr. Van Daan. Mr.-
Look, the bread!
[Dussel]
You dirty thief.
You good-for-nothing.
[Mr. Frank] Let him go, Mr. Dussel.
Help me, Peter.
Let him go!
Peter, help me!
[All Grunting]
Let him go!
[Foghorn Blows]
Putti, what is it?
He was stealing the bread.
It was you.
And all the time we thought it was the rats.
[Mr. Frank]
Mr. Van Daan, how could you?
I'm hungry.
We're all of us hungry.
I see the children getting thinner and thinner.
Your own son, I've heard him moan in his sleep, he's so hungry.
And you come down in the night and steal food that should go to them, the children.
He needs more food than the rest of us.
He's used to more.
He's a big man.
And you!
[Whimpers]
You're worse than he is.
You're a mother, and yet you sacrifice your son to this man, this-this-
Edith.
Don't think I haven't seen you.
Always saving the choicest bits for him.
I've watched you.
Day after day, and I've held my tongue, but not any longer.
Not after this!
Now I want him to go.
I want him to get out of here!
Edith.
Get out of here?
What do you mean?
Just that.
Take your things and get out.
You're speaking in anger.
You cannot mean what you're saying.
I mean exactly that.
For two long years we have lived here side by side.
[Mr. Frank]
We have respected each other's rights.
We have managed to live in peace.
Are we going to throw it all away?
Mr. Van Daan,
I know this is never going to happen again, is it?
No, no.
Ah, he steals once, he'll steal again.
I want them to leave.
You go now!
[Anne]
Mother.
You're not putting Peter out?
Peter hasn't done anything.
I don't mean Peter.
Peter can stay.
I'll have to go if he goes.
That's my father.
He's no father to you, that man.
He doesn't know what it means to be a father.
I wouldn't feel right.
I couldn't stay.
Very well then.
[Door Closes]
Peter. No.
Mrs. Frank, you would put us out in the street?
You can find another hiding place.
Where would we even find a cellar- a-a closet?
Mr. Frank, you told Putti... you would never forget what he did for you when you first came to Holland.
You said you never would be able to repay him.
If my husband had any obligations to you, he has paid it over and over.
Edith, I don't know you.
I've never seen you like this.
I should have spoken out long ago.
You can't be nice to some people.
There would have been plenty for all of us if you hadn't come in here!
No, no, Mrs. Van Daan.
Please.
[Whimpers]
We don't need the Nazis to destroy us.
We're destroying ourselves.
Mother, please don't send them away.
It's daylight.
[Margot]
And they'll be caught.
[Man On Radio]
Supreme headquarters-
They're not going now.
- They'll stay until Miep finds them a place to hide.
- Mrs. Frank, Mr. Frank, Margot.
Oh, no, no.
We haven't sunk so low that we're gonna fight amongst ourselves over food.
That's Anne.
That's Mrs. Van Daan,
Mr. Van Daan.
You see what he's doing?
You see what he's doing?
"I'm still standing by to bring you further news of the invasion."
Did you hear that?
"For those of you who may not have heard, let me repeat.
The landings began this morning on the coast of Normandy."
It's started. Listen!
[Man]
D-Day has come.
During the night and in the early hours of this morning, an immense armada-
Listen!
4,000 ships and thousands of smaller craft-
[Dussel] Peter, myself.
You're keeping all the big ones for yourself.
No.
Yes, you are.
All the big ones.
[Knocking On Door]
Look at the size of that one.
That's mine.
And look at that one.
That's Mr. Van Daan's.
Well, look at-
Stop it! Stop it!
Stop counting potatoes!
It's Miep. Let me in.
Mr. Frank and Mrs. Frank!
Mr. Dussel, I beg of you, don't let her see a thing like this.
Well, this is-
Mrs. Frank-
The invasion has begun!
[Knocking Continues]
[Miep]
The most wonderful news.
The invasion has begun!
[Man]
Only preliminary reports have come in-
Did you hear?
They have landed!
On the coast of France.
In Normandy.
The British, the Americans.
[Miep]
They're all in it!
Dutch, French, Poles,
Norwegians, everyone.
D-Day they call it.
D-Day.
At last! Oh!
[Knocking On Door]
- [Man] It's me. Kraler.
- It cannot be Mr. Kraler.
- But it is Mr. Kraler.
- [Knocking Continues]
[Radio Continues]
[Door Opens]
[Kraler]
Did you hear?
Isn't it wonderful?
When the nurse told me the news,
I said to myself there’s only one place for me to be- with my friends.
♪ In the name of Orange now open the gates ♪
♪ Our allies have landed ashore ♪
♪ We'll fight and we'll capture our country again ♪
♪ And freedom is ours evermore ♪
♪ And freedom is ours evermore ♪
♪ In the name of Orange now open the gates ♪
♪ Our allies have landed on shore ♪
♪ We'll fight ♪
♪ And we'll capture our country again ♪
[Bell Tolling]
Shh. Shh.
[Whispering]
♪ And freedom is ours evermore ♪
♪ And freedom is ours evermore ♪♪
[Tolling Continues]
Quick.
Before the workmen come.
I'll be up later.
Good-bye, my dear friends.
Good-bye, Mr. Kraler.
Thank you, Miep.
[Mr. Van Daan Sobbing]
[Mrs. Van Daan]
Putti, what is it?
What happened?
[Sobbing]
I am so ashamed!
Oh, for heaven's sake.
[Sobbing Continues]
Putti, don't.
Mr. Van Daan, didn't you hear?
We're going to be liberated.
[Sobbing Continues]
This is a time to celebrate.
To steal bread from children.
Oh, we've all done things that we're ashamed of.
Look at the way
I treated Mother- so mean and horrid to her.
No, Anneke. No.
Oh, I was, Mother.
I was awful.
Not like me.
No one is as bad as me.
[Man On Radio]
Torpedo boats join British warships... and thousands of Allied planes in laying down an earthshaking bombardment.
[Sobbing Continues]
Stop it!
Let's be happy!
[Sobbing Continues]
Edith.
When I think of the terrible things I said.
No, no.
You were right.
That I should speak that way to you, our friends, our guests.
♪♪ [Fanfare On Radio]
Stop it! You're spoiling the whole invasion.
[President Roosevelt]
Almighty God, our sons, pride of our nation, this day have set upon a mighty endeavor-
[Winston Churchill]
Lift up your hearts.
Out of the depths of sorrow... and of sacrifice... will be born again the glory of mankind.
[Hitler Speaking German]
[Voices Overlapping]
[Explosion]
[Anne Narrating]
We are all in much better spirits these days.
There is still excellent news of the invasion.
And the best part about it is that I have a feeling that friends are coming.
Our beloved queen spoke.
She used words like "soon,"
"when I am back,"
"speedy liberation."
Who knows?
I may be back in school by fall.
Wednesday, the second of July, 1944.
[Man On Radio]
Fierce counterattacks by enemy panzer divisions-
The invasion seems temporarily bogged down.
[Squawking]
♪♪ [Beethoven's Symphony No. 5]
[Anne Narrating]
Mr. Kraler is back in the hospital.
He has to have an operation.
It seems D-Day was too much for him.
Thank you.
Here you are.
[Anne Narrating]
Ha ha. The joke is on us.
Miep tells us the warehouseman doesn't know a thing, and we're paying him all that money.
[Bell Tolling]
[Man Speaking German On Radio]
[Tolling Continues]
[Anne Narrating]
Our dear vegetable man is on his way to a concentration camp.
He was picked up today for hiding two Jews in his house.
[Siren Wailing]
[Miep]
There's not much.
It was Mr. Hauk, our greengrocer, they arrested.
And the other news is... the Gestapo have found our typewriter that was stolen.
No.
Uh-huh.
They'll trace it back and back till it gets to us.
You watch, you-
[Phone Ringing]
[Anne Narrating]
Everyone is low.
Even Father can't raise their spirits.
I have often been downcast myself, but never in despair.
I can shake off everything if I write, but- and that is the great question- will I ever be able to write well?
I want to so much.
I want to go on living even after my death.
[Phone Ringing]
[Ringing Continues]
[Ringing Continues]
There it goes again.
[Ringing Continues]
Mr. Frank, do you hear?
Yes, I hear.
This is the third time.
The third time in quick succession.
[Ringing Continues]
It's a signal.
I tell you it's Miep trying to get us.
For some reason she- she can't come to us, and she's trying to warn us of something.
Please, Mr. Dussel.
Please.
You're wasting your breath.
[Ringing Continues]
Something has happened,
Mr. Frank.
[Ringing Stops]
It's been three days now that Miep hasn't been to see us.
And today not a man has come to work.
There hasn't been a sound in the building.
Perhaps it's Sunday.
We may have lost track of the days.
You with the diary there, what day is it?
I don't lose track of the days.
I know exactly what day it is.
It's Friday, the fourth of August.
It's Friday, and-and not a man at work.
[Phone Rings]
I tell you,
Mr. Kraler is dead.
That's the only explanation.
He's dead, and they've closed down the building, and that's what Miep's trying to tell us.
She would never telephone us, Mr. Dussel.
Please, I beg of you,
Mr. Frank, answer the phone.
No.
Just pick it up and listen.
You don't have to speak.
-Just listen and see if it's Miep.
- [Ringing Continues]
For God's sake, answer the telephone!
I've told you, no.
[Ringing Continues]
I'll do nothing that might let anyone know that we are in this building.
Mr. Frank's right.
There's no need to tell us what side you're on.
If we wait here quietly and... patiently,
I believe that help will come.
[Ringing Continues]
[Mr. Frank]
Mr. Dussel-
No, Mr.- Mr. Dussel-
Mr. Dussel!
[Ringing Continues]
Too late.
So we just wait here... until we die.
[Mrs. Van Daan]
I can't stand it.
I'll kill myself.
For heaven's sake, stop it.
I think you would be glad if I did.
You want me to die.
Whose fault is it we're here?
We could have been safe in America or Switzerland.
But no, no.
You wouldn't leave when I wanted to.
You couldn't leave your precious things.
Your furniture.
That's right.
Blame it all on me.
It's all my fault.
[Mr. Van Daan]
Your hats, your shoes, your dishes.
[Mrs. Van Daan]
For your comfort we had anything.
My comfort.
I never had anything
I really wanted.
Everything was for your pleasure!
[Door Slams]
[Door Slams]
[Seagulls Squawking]
Look, Peter.
Look at the sky.
Aren't the clouds beautiful?
A lovely, lovely day.
You know what I do... when I think
I can't stand another minute of being cooped up?
I think myself outside.
I think I'm on a walk in the park where
I used to go with Father, where the crocus and the jonquils and the violets grow along the slopes.
You know... the most wonderful part of thinking yourself outside?
You can have it any way you like.
You can have roses and violets and tulips all blooming in the same season.
Isn't that wonderful?
When I was outside,
I used to take it all for granted.
And now in here I've just gone crazy about nature.
I've just gone crazy.
I think if something doesn't happen soon- if we don't get out of here-
I can't stand much more of this.
I wish you had a religion, Peter.
No, thanks.
Not me.
I don't mean you have to be Orthodox... or believe in heaven and hell and purgatory and things.
I just mean some religion.
It doesn't matter what.
Just to believe in something.
When I think of all that's out there, the trees and flowers... and those seagulls-
When I think of the dearness of you, Peter... and the goodness of the people we know-
Mr. Kraler and Miep, the vegetable man- all of them risking their lives for us every day-
When I think of these good things,
I'm not afraid anymore.
I find myself... in God, and I-
That's-
That's fine, but-
When I begin to think, well,
I get mad.
Look at us.
Hiding out here for two years.
Not able to move.
Caught like-
Waiting for them to come and get us.
We're not the only people that have had to suffer.
There have always been people that have had to.
Sometimes one race, sometimes another, and yet-
That doesn't make me feel any better.
I know it's terrible, trying to have any faith... when people are doing such horrible-
But you know what
I sometimes think?
I think the world may be going through a phase, the way I was with Mother.
It'll pass.
Maybe not for hundreds of years, but someday.
I still believe, in spite of everything, that people are really good at heart.
I want to see something now, not a thousand years from now.
But, Peter, if you’d only look at it as part of a great pattern, that we're just a little minute in life.
[Sighs]
Listen to us, going at each other like a couple of stupid grown-ups.
[Chuckles]
Look at the sky.
Isn't it lovely?
[Siren Wailing In Distance]
Someday, when we get outside again,
I'm going to-
[Wailing Grows Louder]
[Wailing Continues]
[Wailing Continues]
[Wailing Continues]
[Wailing Continues]
[Tires Screech]
[Wailing Stops]
[Men Yelling In German]
[Whistle Blows]
[Doorbell Buzzes]
[Buzzing Continues]
[Whistle Blows]
[Buzzing Continues]
[Buzzes Several Times]
[Man Speaking German]
[Banging On Door]
[Doorknob Rattling]
[Banging Continues]
[Doorbell Buzzes Several Times]
[Banging Continues]
[Men Yelling In German]
[Whistle Blows]
[Doorbell Buzzing]
[Banging On Door]
[Speaking German]
[Alarm Ringing]
[Men Yelling]
[Ringing Continues]
[Banging On Door]
[Ringing Continues]
[Loud Crash]
[Men Speaking German]
[Men Speaking German]
[Objects Thumping]
[Man Speaking German]
[Glass Shatters]
[Men Speaking German]
[Objects Thumping]
[Whistle Blowing]
[Thud]
[Glass Shatters]
[Man Speaking German]
[Crashing, Thumping]
For the past two years we have lived in fear.
Now we can live in hope.
[Men Speaking German]
[Thumping Continues]
[Thuds]
[Crashing, Thumping]
[Anne Narrating]
And so it seems our stay here is over.
They've given us just a moment to get our things.
We can each take a bag... and whatever it will hold of clothing.
Nothing else.
[Seagulls Squawking]
So, dear... Diary, that means
I must leave you behind.
Good-bye for a while.
P.S.
Please, please, anyone, if you should find this diary, will you please keep it safe for me, because someday I hope that-
No more.
I had gone to the country to try to find food.
When I got back, the police were in the building.
We made it our business to learn how they knew.
It was the thief who told them.
We know the thief.
He was-
It seems strange to me now, but we were all so full of hope in the camp here in Holland where they first took us.
The news of the war was good.
The British and Americans were sweeping through France.
We felt sure they would get to us in time to-
But... in September we were shipped to Poland.
The men to one camp, the women to another.
From there... they were sent to Belsen.
I stayed in Auschwitz.
In January we were freed, the few of us who were left.
The war was not yet over, no.
It took us a long time to get home.
Each time the train would stop, we'd... all get out, you know, at a siding or a crossing, and... walk from group to group.
"Where were you?"
"Were you at Belsen?"
"At Buchenwald?"
"At Mauthausen? Where?"
"Is it possible that you ever knew my wife?"
"Did you ever see my husband, my son, my daughter?"
That's how I found out about my wife's death,
Margot's, Van Daans',
Peter, Dussel.
But...
Anne-
I still hoped-
Yesterday I was in Rotterdam.
I met a woman there.
She'd been in Belsen... with Anne.
I know now.
[Seagulls Squawking]
[Anne]
In spite of everything,
I still believe that people are really good at heart.
She puts me to shame.
[Squawking]
"In to this seething troubled territory came John Brown."
"My father."
"He was a man of whom the world knew nothing because he had done nothing."
"The things he was to do will never be forgotten."
Remember.
All men are born free and equal before God.
And He has sent us into
Kansas to do His sacred work.
All Kansas shall be freed.
And every man, woman and child in it.
It shall be free.
Now they are calling him a menace.
How do they get away with printing things like this?
It's got so anything that happens, he gets blamed.
Keep your voice down, Oliver.
This newspaper is no worse than the ones on the other side of the fence.
Personally, I think that the papers on both sides are a little hysterical.
We'll find out what's going on when we get to Kansas.
You Yankees.
What paper you reading?
Who wants to know?
Have you heard of the
Border Ruffians, mister?
Sure.
Professional killers from Missouri.
- Take it easy, Oliver.
We ain't professionals.
Sometimes we kill
Free-Staters for the fun of it.
Get back to your seat and stay there.
Touch that knife and
I'll break your back.
They are Yankees alright.
Wait!
Don't you realise there are children in this car?
Look Lady, you stay out of this.
- I won't stay out of it.
You and your friend are murderers by your own admission.
And if you are a Free-Stater as you claim to be ..
You supposedly believe in the dignity of man.
Is this how you show it?
Brawling in public.
The lady is right, Oliver.
Go on back to your seat.
Mind your own business.
You're finished, mister.
- It's all over.
Try another car.
You heard what he said. Get out of here.
You alright, Miss?
I was trying to prevent violence.
I didn't succeed.
The best way to prevent violence is ..
Not to strike the first blow, Miss.
And a nice one she struck too.
You are right.
Thank you both.
You going to the end of the line?
Farther than that. Lawrence.
So are we.
My name is Elizabeth Clark.
I'm from Illinois.
My name is Brown.
I'm Oliver and you have got Owen's hand.
I am very glad to know you both.
You are not related to John Brown?
Yes, Miss Clark. We are two of his sons.
You will excuse me, please.
I'd better get back to ..
Just a minute ..
- If you don't mind.
Look around and see if anybody is here to meet us.
I'll get our baggage.
I'll help with the baggage.
- Look around.
At least you can let me carry your baggage.
I have to wait too.
Oliver, over here.
How are you, Oliver?
- Just fine. Just wonderful.
Get out of it. Wait. Stop it.
Where is father?
- Take the rear end of this crate.
Father will be along in a second.
Where is Owen?
Busy.
You mean he didn't come?
I mean he is busy.
Where is father?
Oliver.
I'm glad you are here.
Where is Owen?
Looking for a girl.
Help Frederick put that crate on the wagon.
Thank you.
- Miss Clark.
Please, Mr Brown.
- I know why you feel the way you do.
Then perhaps you will stop annoying me.
You can't possibly believe all the things you've heard about my father?
I believe he's a dangerous fanatical man who is doing our cause much more harm.
And I want nothing to do with him or any of his raiders.
Now if you will be good enough to give me my luggage.
You're wrong about him, Elizabeth. Even if you weren't, you are unfair to me.
We only met a little while ago.
Can't we start from there?
Owen.
Frederick.
It's good to see you.
Miss Clark, this is my brother Frederick.
Pleased to meet you, Miss Clark.
Owen, father is over there.
Owen, my son.
- Hello, father.
I trust your mother and Watson are well?
Yes, sir. Fine. They send their love.
- Good.
Miss Clark, may I present my father, John Brown.
I am honored, Miss Clark.
How do you do.
Miss Clark is from Illinois. We ..
We've been discussing your work here.
Not my work, Owen. God's work.
That's what we are doing here.
Have you come to live in Lawrence, Miss Clark?
Yes. My father is a merchant.
That would be William Clark?
A fine man.
Please give him my goodwill.
Owen, we have a considerable distance to go.
I'll see you soon, Elizabeth.
As soon as I can.
It's a pleasure to have met you, Miss Clark.
Come along, Owen.
Elizabeth.
Well ..
How are you?
- Fine.
Fine. I am sorry to be late.
Wasn't that John Brown you were just talking to?
Yes. Do you know him?
Well, I only met him once.
A great man, Elizabeth.
A great man.
I wish I had arrived earlier.
There it is.
Pottawatomie.
Not much in size yet. But growing.
The Lord's justice has many followers.
Looks alright.
Let's get going, father.
Owen and I haven't seen our brothers for a year and a half.
John. Down the road. They're coming.
Jason, Jason.
How is mother and Watson?
Fine. You look great, all of you.
The country agrees with you.
- Father, it is good to be together.
At last I am surrounded by all my grown sons.
I am a proud and happy man.
Oh God, my heart is fixed.
Through God we shall do valiantly.
For He it is that shall tread down our enemies. Amen.
Amen.
Owen, Oliver. Off with those store clothes. There is work to be done.
Oliver. Owen.
George Wilson. Henry Thompson.
Ned Green.
- Glad to know you.
Pleased to meet you.
- Come on, fellahs. We've work to do.
Captain Brown.
Captain Brown, look over there.
What should we do now, Captain?
All of you. Go on with your work.
Frederick. Salmon.
John.
Get your guns.
The rest of you, stand here with me.
You are Brown, aren't you.
I am John Brown. Yes.
My name is Martin White.
You may have heard of me.
I have.
Then you know I am a man of my word.
I have something to tell you, Brown.
I believe I know what you have come to say, Mr White.
I'll say it anyway.
You are not wanted here in Kansas.
We're giving you 48 hours to leave the territory.
I am a homesteader.
So are these other people.
We have every right to be here in
Kansas and here we shall stay, sir.
Is that your last word?
- It is.
You are a dangerous traitor.
I have given you your last opportunity.
Alright.
If it's bloodshed you want you shall have it.
I promise you that.
No blood has been shed here nor will be.
Unless you shed it first.
I suggest that you and your rabble leave this place and stay away.
We have important work to do.
You are doing the work of the devil, John Brown.
And you will pay for your sins.
I am sure of that.
When I sin.
But not you, Martin White.
Does this happen often?
Those slavers really meant to shoot you.
Yes, I believe they did.
They'll be back with more men, won't they. Have you got guns for Owen and me?
They won't come back right away.
They know we are armed and expecting them.
But the answer to your second question is Yes.
There are guns for you and your brother.
And when it comes time for you to use them.
God's hand will be on the trigger with yours.
Now, back to your work.
What's the matter?
Nothing. He is alright.
Why don't you rest awhile, John?
I'd better get back to work.
It's quiet and peaceful here.
Have you been here before?
I asked one of the fellows in the camp where he used to bring his girl.
Used to?
Used to. They got married.
He is a nice fellow too.
You don't approve of marriage?
Only for women.
You've got a nice sense of humor, Elizabeth.
Why?
Because I laughed at your jokes?
- Because you are nice to be with.
It was good day for me the day we met on the train.
Even though the circumstances were unpleasant.
Maybe it was a good day and maybe not.
What do you mean?
I like you, Owen.
And I don't want it to get any more serious than that.
It's more serious than that already with me.
I'm sorry.
Perhaps you would feel differently if my name wasn't Brown?
I might.
My father's fight against slavery is right and good, Elizabeth.
I've never questioned that.
It's his methods.
They are right too. You will see.
You are too sensible to believe the lies that circulate about him.
How do you know they're lies, Owen?
You haven't been in Kansas any longer than I have.
Elizabeth.
Let's not argue.
You are wrong and someday you will realize it.
I hope so.
You know.
I came to Kansas to join a crusade.
I didn't expect to fall in love.
Neither did I.
I won't stop seeing you unless you tell me to.
Are you going to tell me to?
I can't.
Alright.
Alright.
Every one of you knows how important tonight is going to be.
It is our responsibility to see that
Kansas joins The Union as a slave state.
We'll prove to northern politicians that they cannot take away our birthright.
Our right to raise our crops and to care for our negroes and their families ..
As we have done for as long as America has existed.
We reach Lawrence shortly after dark.
Pace your horses so they will be fresh when we arrive.
Any questions?
- Yeah.
Why don't we ride to the Browns and take care of that abolitionist camp first?
We'll get to them soon enough.
Right now they will be expecting us.
But the Free-Staters in Lawrence won't.
We'll teach them a lesson they won't forget.
No.
Father.
Father!
Miss Clark.
Holy Father.
Thou preparest the table before me in the presence of mine enemies.
Thou anointest my head with oil.
My cup runneth over.
Surely, goodness and mercy shall follow me all the days of my life.
And I shall dwell in the house of The Lord forever.
Amen.
Well, that sure smells good.
Let's hope it tastes good.
You did alright, Jay.
It's every bit as good as what mother makes.
If you like it for breakfast.
What's troubling you, John?
You are not eating.
I'm just not hungry, father.
We need our strength, all of us. You must try.
Green.
See who it is.
Who is it?
It's me, Kruger.
I've got to talk to Captain Brown.
Over there, Mr Kruger. By the fire.
- Yeah.
Elizabeth.
What's happened?
My father.
He's dead.
Kruger, what is it?
Lawrence, Captain Brown.
Lawrence is burning. Burning.
They rode up and down the streets, shooting and burning.
Not a building is undamaged.
Is anybody besides the girl's father killed?
Five were killed.
Many others seriously hurt.
The enemy has sacked and burned Lawrence.
The war has begun.
What does he mean, "the war has begun"?
This isn't a war.
Five lives were taken tonight.
Five innocent people have died.
Listen to me now. Everyone.
Here are my instructions.
Be prepared for an attack at any hour.
Salmon, you will be in charge while I am away.
Wilson, have your wife look after Miss Clark.
I want preparations made for our friends who will be coming from Lawrence.
Where are you going, Captain?
Where The Lord sends me, my friend.
I wish my sons to accompany me.
Henry Thompson and you, Mr Kruger.
You will come also.
Bring provisions.
We leave within the hour.
They are the ones I actually saw, Captain.
There were a lot more.
But I can't identify these men.
Martin White.
Martin White, of course.
Doyle and his two sons.
Wilkinson. Sherman.
Langley. Johnson.
I know these men.
We leave at once.
Where are we going, Captain?
Several places.
You all have your guns?
Saddle up at once.
John. Frederick.
You heard what I said.
Who is it? What do you want?
- Inside!
Take him.
What are you doing?
Jason, Frederick.
No, not my boy. Don't take my boy.
Mummy.
Behold, God is mighty in strength and wisdom.
He preserveth not the life of the wicked.
If they obey Him not, they shall perish by the sword.
Thou hast fulfilled the judgement of the wicked.
And the justice of God has taken hold of thee.
Brown.
Brown, please.
Strike.
Strike the blow of The Lord.
[ Gunshot! ]
After him!
[ Gunshots! ]
We got him, Captain.
An eye for an eye, my sons.
Five people perished at Lawrence.
Five of the guilty will perish today.
Those men, father.
How do you know they were guilty of anything?
They were seen at Lawrence.
Wilkinson. Sherman. Their names are next on the list.
Get to your horses.
Quick.
Alright. Time to get started.
Let's move.
What does this mean?
The news of what you did is all over Kansas, father.
There are bound to be reprisals.
We've got a lot of women and children here, Captain Brown.
How can you think of leaving Pottawatomie?
We are struggling to make this place a stronghold of freedom in Kansas.
Will you desert that task now?
This is where the votes will be.
The votes that will set Kansas a free state.
Captain Brown, sir.
Us men are willing to fight.
If only we could find some place where the women and children could be safe.
Where can they be safer than at your back?
We. You and I, have planted the seeds of freedom ..
Here in this place.
And here they will remain and flourish.
With God's help.
Back to your tents.
Alright. Let's get the wagons turned.
And get the tents back up.
Salmon.
They listen to him and obey him.
Even though they know he is a murderer.
Elizabeth.
- He is a murderer.
He has made you one too.
Jason.
John.
Where are you going?
We are turning ourselves over to the Union Army.
Are you insane?
I think John is.
I want to see him get medical treatment.
I don't know any other way to do it.
They will imprison you both.
We are not fighting the
United States Army, father.
Not yet anyway.
I'm going too.
Frederick, listen.
- No.
I've got to get away from him.
After this morning.
Tell him, Owen.
Goodbye, Salmon.
Oliver.
You are not going to the army too are you, Frederick?
No. I will be around here somewhere I guess.
I just want to be alone for a while.
Owen. I'd never have come if I thought he'd make us do the things we did today.
Maybe.
Maybe I wouldn't have come either.
But I did. We all did.
Everybody in Kansas knows we're here.
Three of John Brown's sons have left him and if ..
If the rest of us go, why the whole
Free-State movement might fall apart.
It's falling apart anyway.
People around here are about ready to give up.
No, I don't think so.
Even if they were, father won't give up.
Not if there is any kind of a chance.
We can't let him fight alone.
Make him quit the killing.
Owen, talk to him, will you.
Yes?
Father, I would like to talk to you.
Very well, Owen.
Frederick has gone too.
Is that all you wish to talk to me about?
No, father.
We came here because we believe as you do.
We've even have been willing to fight if we had to.
But what we did this morning ..
That was wrong.
It is I who will decide what is wrong. Not you.
How dare you question my orders.
Father, listen to me.
I am not defying you.
I only think you are beginning to lose sight of something.
You are so caught up in your dream of trying to make all men free ..
That you think it doesn't matter how you accomplish it.
But it does.
You can't assume the power of life and death over people. Nobody can.
Are you finished?
You still don't understand what I am trying to say, do you.
I understand weakness and cowardice.
Even in my own sons.
Good evening.
- Evening.
Just fixing my supper. There is plenty.
Care to join me?
We were wondering if you would care to join us, mister.
John Brown and his sons slaughtered the
Doyle family and 2 others this morning.
We are gathering men who will get justice done to the Browns.
Want to come with us?
No. I'll just stay here.
I don't want to hurt anybody.
I don't want anything to do with killing.
If you are not with us that means you are against us.
Who are you?
What's your name?
My name doesn't matter.
I don't want to go with you.
Stand up and turn around.
Do you hear me?
You are one of Brown's sons.
You know who I am, don't you?
I'm not fighting against you anymore.
I'm not fighting against anybody.
Where did you find him?
A little way downstream from my farm, Captain Brown.
Did you see any of the Ruffians around your place last night?
No .. I didn't see anybody.
Take him away.
Captain Brown!
Look!
Out there, out there!
Send the women and children to the woods.
Every man get a gun.
Take cover behind these wagons. Now.
Hey, come on.
Get my gun.
Over there too.
Hold your fire!
Fire!
Fall back to the woods.
Keep firing.
Hurry, hurry!
Back to the woods.
Father .. look out!
A serious wound, Mr Brown.
What can we do, doctor?
That wound must be kept clean.
He has to stay quiet.
Someone must feed him. No solids.
Just broth. A spoonful at a time.
You'll come back, doctor?
I don't believe so, Mr Brown. It was a risk for me to come here this time.
Doctor, you who will come back.
I have a family.
Goodnight, sir.
I'll drive you back to town.
Oh Lord.
Heed the voice of Thy faithful follower.
And stretch out Thy hand in healing to my son.
That he may once again stand at my right hand in Thy service.
Amen.
Amen.
Amen.
I'll take care of him.
It is kind of you, Miss Clark. But I believe that we can do that ourselves.
I have worked in hospitals Mr Brown.
I will take care of him.
I appreciate your kindness but ..
- Do you?
What do you mean?
I know why you don't want me here. I don't approve of you.
And you don't approve of me.
You're afraid I might influence Owen.
Young lady.
I intend to influence him if it is possible.
And I also intend to nurse him back to health.
Miss Clark, I order you to leave.
I refuse.
You are a sinful and rebellious woman.
And God in his wisdom, will not allow your sins to go unpunished.
I am prepared to take my chances with The Lord, Mr Brown.
And after this, please keep your voice down when you are near the patient.
Captain Brown, it looks like they have finished us.
They have destroyed every single thing we own.
They have not destroyed everything we own.
We still have our souls and we still have our votes.
Have you forgotten what we are here for? To vote and vote we shall.
Now, get back to your work.
I need two more men.
I'll do it.
Owen, you are not strong enough to lift things yet.
Yes, I am.
I'm even strong enough to lift you.
Dinner will get cold.
Where were you all morning?
- Working.
Doing laundry and a few chores while you were napping.
I wasn't asleep.
I was thinking.
What about?
You.
Owen.
I love you.
I've been wanting to tell you for days.
Owen, please don't.
You love me. I know you do.
Yes, I love you.
What is it?
You stand for everything
I've always hated.
Violence.
Bloodshed.
You've killed and I love you.
I have from the first moment I met you.
I can't help it.
Don't cry.
Don't cry.
We'll get married.
Owen.
Well go away far from here.
We'll lead our own lives.
There will be no-one else but us.
Owen.
Do you feel strong enough to travel?
What do you mean?
We're taking you home, Owen.
We've decided to quit.
Salmon and I are going straight to the farm. And we're taking you with us.
I'm staying with father.
Owen.
Listen, you've been lying here for some time.
You don't know what is going on in Kansas.
Rebuilding this place is just so much wasted effort.
The pro-slavers get stronger every day.
- So are we.
They've got enough men now to wipe out this place and everyone in it.
You can't do any good now anyway.
You are too sick.
- He is right, Owen.
I'm staying with him just the same.
Give my love to mother.
And Watson.
Goodbye.
- Goodbye, Owen.
Oliver.
Owen.
You will not leave.
I forbid it.
What do you want, to see us all killed?
Oliver.
- I mean it.
What kind of a father are you?
You have already driven one of your sons insane and gotten another one killed.
How dare you address your father like this.
Can't you see? You have failed.
Why don't you admit it?
Why don't you? Why can't you?
We're outnumbered six to one.
Every man here is going to die because you are so stubborn.
Oliver! Don't .. don't.
I'm sorry, Pa.
Please forgive me.
Goodbye, father.
Goodbye, father.
He should have been back this morning.
The polls closed last night.
I know father.
He won't come back until he is sure his victory is won.
His victory?
You make it sound as if the only reason
Kansas might come in as a free state ..
Is because of John Brown.
How many ballots against slavery do you think would have been cast ..
If father hadn't kept us all right here in Kansas?
Well it's all over now one way or the other, so ..
Let's not argue.
Oh, you are right. Let's not.
Let's get married.
We can't, Owen.
Not until we have decided some very important things.
What could be more important than things like this?
You know what I mean.
If we are going to live the rest of our lives together, it can't be this way.
It won't.
We're finished in Kansas.
The job has been done.
Whether successfully or not, we can't change it.
Maybe not in Kansas.
There are a lot of other places your father can go.
We are going home to Ohio.
Are you sure, Owen?
I'm sure.
I'm a farmer, Elizabeth. A good one.
And I've never really wanted to be anything else.
Alright, Owen.
I would be glad and proud to be a farmer's wife.
There he is.
He'd be riding faster than that if he'd won.
Come on.
Father!
We won!
The election is over and Kansas is free.
Was it worth it, my son?
- It was worth it, father.
Our job is done.
Father.
Elizabeth and I are going to be married.
And then we are going home.
Very well.
My blessings on you both.
Thank you, father.
Thank you, Mr Brown.
I will be with you again in God's time.
Lord, we thank Thee for providing us with warmth and food.
We thank Thee also for returning two of our sons.
For restoring to health our eldest son John.
And for enabling us all to be gathered here together.
Under thine eyes once again.
And we beseech Thee.
To receive under Thy bosom our beloved Frederick.
Whom Thou in Thy divine wisdom has seen fit ..
To remove from our midst.
Blessed be Thy name. Forever, Amen.
Amen.
Here you are, Watson.
You need it.
The baby of the family is still growing.
It sure is wonderful soup, mother.
This is the way it should always be, John.
All of us together like this.
If God wills it, we shall be together like this from time to time.
But it cannot be permanent until our work is finished.
John.
As long as a single human being ..
Is in bondage in this land, we cannot rest.
I ask, father.
Why should we sacrifice our lives?
There are plenty of others.
Because The Lord has appointed us to that task.
Not me, father.
I couldn't live through another sickness.
John, please.
This is the first time we've been together in almost two years.
Can't you least wait until supper is finished?
The subject has been put aside too long as it is, Mary.
So that our sons may know,
I will tell them what must be done.
First we must visit Boston,
Providence, New Bedford.
Perhaps two score cities in all.
And obtain funds from those who believe as we do.
And there are thousands of them.
When we have enough, then we shall strike.
Where will that be, father?
Some place where we cannot fail.
I doubt there is such a place, father.
As you feel that way, I take it you will not follow me?
The army let John and me go on our promise we'd never follow you again.
That eliminates Jason and John.
Salmon?
Not me, father.
Wherever you go, there's got to be more fighting and more killing.
But not for me. I'm through.
That's enough, Salmon.
Oliver?
I'll go with you, father.
Wherever you say.
You believe as I do now? Good.
It's not just that.
I keep thinking of Frederick.
I'm going to make them pay for that and keep paying.
That goes for me too. Every word.
Watson?
No.
Yes.
You are too young.
Father, you can't take him.
No-one is too young to serve God.
Owen.
As always, you are at my right hand.
I have not yet questioned you.
Need I?
You don't have to ask me, father.
I will stay with you.
Elizabeth.
Elizabeth.
I can't help it.
I knew this was going to happen.
You will never leave him until you die.
Or until he dies.
I've never before prayed for a man's death.
But I do now.
The cause is a good one.
I am sure we are all in agreement about that.
But, the question occurs, Mr Brown.
As to exactly what your intentions are to dispose of the funds you ask.
Do you plan an invasion of a slave state perhaps?
I am no adventurer, Mr Thoreau.
You gentlemen all know my work and are acquainted with my history.
You know what I have done in Kansas.
I do not expose my plans.
No-one knows them.
But myself. Except God.
I will not be interrogated.
If you wish to give me anything
I want you to give it freely.
I have no other purpose but to serve the cause of liberty.
And that gentlemen.
Is enough for me.
Mr Brown.
You may have my draft for
$1,000 to do with as you see fit.
Mr Emerson?
And you will also have mine.
Mr Thoreau.
Yes.
Exactly what I meant.
I will need one thousand of them.
A thousand? That's enough for an army.
There is your money.
I want them as soon as they are finished.
Thank you, Mr Smith.
Label the boxes "farm machinery" and put the name Isaac Smith on them.
Where will I send them?
Harpers Ferry, Virginia.
Wilson, Thompson. Over here.
Owen.
Yes?
Owen, I don't mean to nag.
And I know you are busy but ..
- I can't tell you anything.
Not yet.
Darling, I understand how important your father's work is to you.
And I came here with you knowing that.
But this time it is different.
This time you haven't spoken a word to me about it.
Is this secrecy because what your father plans to do is so dangerous and wrong?
It's not wrong.
And it won't be much longer.
Owen.
Owen, I am your wife.
I love you. I've a right to know if you re doing something that may be harmful.
It won't do you any good to find out now. You will find out eventually.
The whole world will.
And at the schoolhouse with all the guns and pikes will be my son Owen.
And Wilson and Green.
I only hope you have enough arms to equip all the slaves ..
Who will be joining us the minute they know what we are doing at Harpers Ferry.
I think we will, father.
We can arm about 1,300 men.
If we can't start a war with that many we might as well forget the whole thing.
Remember.
Three of you must not leave the schoolhouse under any circumstances.
You will be busy enough arming the slaves without worrying about us.
You must stay and wait there until the slaves arrive.
It may take.
24 hours, even longer, for the news to spread to Virginia and The Carolinas.
Can we hold out for 24 hours?
- Of course we can.
We'll get the arsenal and the fire-house and most important of all, the hostages.
They must not be harmed.
We well use them to trade for our terms.
Alright, gentlemen.
It is time.
Our cause is just, Mary.
We will succeed.
Take care, John.
Watson, my baby.
Be careful.
Now you know.
I think I always knew it would end this way.
You are mistaken, Elizabeth.
It is not an end, it is a beginning.
The beginning for the entire human race.
Do you believe that?
- Yes, I believe it.
Then we are finished, Owen.
Elizabeth.
- I mean it.
If you leave me now I won't be here when you come back.
Owen. It is time.
I love you, Elizabeth.
I always will.
Goodbye.
My dear.
I thought I could stop him.
I didn't mean what I said.
He knows that, I'm sure.
[ Train horn. Loud. ]
What are you doing here?
I am here to take possession of the United States arsenal.
If the citizens interfere with me.
I must burn the town and have blood.
Who are you?
My name is John Brown.
I have come from Kansas to free all the slaves in this state.
John Brown.
I don't need to be freed by you.
I've been free eight years.
I'll tell them you're here.
Watson. You and two others wait for the train.
Bring the fireman and engineer to me as planned.
Make no sound and you will not be harmed.
Give me the keys.
Which key?
Are these the only keys to the arsenal?
Colonel Washington has the only other set.
Thompson, take Calley with you and bring
Colonel Washington to the fire-house.
Isn't this a better place to hold up than the fire-house?
Not with that powder inside.
From the fire-house we can control the arsenal.
Now.
Half of you bring guns and ammunition to the fire-house.
The rest of you come with me.
Since you men refuse to give your word not to escape, you will be under guard.
In a few minutes you train-men will be allowed to leave with your train.
When you reach Baltimore you may tell the world what we are doing here.
No-one will know until then.
Because we have destroyed the town's telegraph.
Father, Calley and Thompson.
They got some more prisoners.
Captain Brown.
May I present Colonel Lewis Washington.
Colonel Washington.
Captain John Brown of Kansas.
Brown.
This is treason.
High treason against the government of the United States Of America.
You will be hanged for this.
Perhaps.
If so, it will be a hanging that this country and the world will never forget.
If I die violently, sir.
It will be for the freedom of all men.
You are wrong.
You will hang like any other common traitor.
And I pray to God I live to see it.
Words like that won't make you live any longer.
You are my prisoner, Colonel Washington.
I want your word.
Not to attempt an escape.
You'll get no such promise from me.
Put these men with the other hostages.
Get on.
You train-men can leave now.
Watson, let them out.
Mayor Beckham. Mayor Beckham.
Mayor Beckham.
What is the matter?
Some raiders have captured the arsenal and the fire-station.
They say they came to free the slaves.
- What?
They have already taken hostages.
Hurry up, get your gun.
That's not all, Colonel Lee.
Brown says they came to free the slaves and intend to do it at all hazards.
He says this is the last train that will pass the bridge either east or west.
Telegraph wires are cut on either side of Harpers Ferry.
This is the first station the engineer could send a despatch from.
Eighteen men against the nation?
Alright, Lieutenant.
When you take your positions, keep those windows covered.
Don't fire unless they start something.
They are not going anywhere.
Hud.
Hud.
They are trying to surround us.
In fact they are getting ready to fight.
Watson, Stevens.
I want you to go out on the street with a flag of truce.
Find whoever is in charge.
It is probably the mayor.
Tell him I want no bloodshed.
Tell him I will meet him anywhere.
To discuss the liberation of the slaves in this state ..
In return for the lives of the hostages I hold.
Watson!
I'll take care of him, Captain brown.
Father.
How is he?
Not so good.
Do you think something has happened to the slaves?
They'll be here, my son.
I don't expect them until tomorrow morning.
Get back to your post.
Mr Owen.
I don't believe any colored folks are coming.
Not at all.
Neither do I.
You don't know what you are talking about.
Either of you.
I know, Mr Owen.
They'll come. They've got to.
Well, I am not waiting around to find out.
I am leaving before they find us here.
And if you two have got any sense you will do the same.
Do what you want.
How about you, Green?
I know it is no use.
But I believe I will stay with Mr Owen.
Goodbye, Mr Wilson.
Good luck.
Father must be alright.
Or they would have given up by now.
I wonder how the boys are.
Ollie.
Ollie.
Did you see anything at the schoolhouse?
No, sir .. nothing.
Father.
Frederick.
And now Watson.
Can it be that The Lord has forsaken me?
Brown. You should thank The Lord.
At least your dead sons won't hang.
No, Oliver.
[ Gunshot! ]
[ Gunshot! ]
Lord.
I beseech Thee to take unto Thee.
The young souls of two more of my sons.
Keep them at Thy right hand.
As I have kept them at mine in Thy service.
On the bodies of my dead sons I swear unto Thee: Oh God, I will go on.
Thy will be done.
And all men shall be free.
Forward, march!
What do they look like to you?
- Just what they are, Mr Owen.
Soldiers.
I'm going down to help my father.
- No, Mr Owen.
You can't help him now. Nobody can.
I got to.
- Mr Owen.
The only people we can help now is ourselves.
We got to leave.
Maybe some other time we can ..
Right now it's finished.
Your father is finished.
And so is his dream of freedom.
What do we do, Captain Brown?
They are coming to bargain with us.
Lieutenant Stuart, sir.
I have a communication here for the leader of this party ..
From Lieutenant Colonel Robert E Lee of the United States Army.
I am John Brown, their leader.
You may tell Colonel Lee I am willing to exchange the hostages I hold ..
For the lives of myself and my men.
And the liberation of slaves in this State.
"Colonel Lee, United States Army."
"Sent here by the President of the United States .."
"To suppress the insurrection at this place."
"Demands the surrender of the persons in the fire-station."
"If they will peaceably surrender .."
"They will be kept in safety to await the orders of the President."
Lieutenant.
"Colonel Lee represents to them in all frankness."
"That it is impossible for them to escape."
"If he is compelled to take them by force he can't answer for their safety."
"Signed, Robert E Lee."
You may thank Colonel Lee for his communication.
And deliver these terms to him.
There are no terms, Mr Brown.
Either you surrender or you will be taken.
You have exactly two minutes.
He refuses to surrender, sir.
Now!
Now!
Fight.
Now!
He's dead?
No, sir.
Then he will die on the gallows,
Lieutenant. You can be sure of that.
See that these people are taken to their homes.
Yes, sir.
The charges against the defendant.
Are treason.
Conspiring with slaves and others to rebel.
And murder in the first degree.
If it please the court.
I have just received a telegram from the county seat in Akron Ohio.
It is addressed to me and my colleagues.
And has a vital bearing on my client's case.
It reads.
"John Brown and several of his family have resided in this county for years."
"Insanity is hereditary in the Brown family."
Your Honor.
I look upon this as a miserable artifice and pretext ..
Of those who want to take a different course in regard to me.
Insane persons have but little ability to judge of their own sanity.
If I am insane.
I should think I know more than all the rest of the world but I do not think so.
I am perfectly unconscious of insanity.
And I reject.
So far as I am able.
Any attempt to interfere in my behalf on that score.
Has the prisoner anything to say ..
As to why sentence should not be pronounced upon him?
May it please the court.
I have but these few more words to say.
I believe.
That to have interfered as I have done on behalf of God's despised poor.
I did no wrong.
But right.
Now, if it is deemed necessary.
That I should forfeit my life for the furtherance of the ends of justice.
And mingle my blood with the blood of my children.
And with the blood of millions in this slave country.
Whose rights have been disregarded by ..
Wicked, cruel and unjust enactments.
I say.
Let it be done.
This court hereby pronounces the sentence of death upon John Brown.
To be carried out on Friday.
The second day of December.
In the year of Our Lord.
0ne thousand, eight hundred and fifty-nine.
The prisoner shall be hanged by the neck.
Until dead.
Dead.
Dead.
Nobody knows I was with you at Harpers Ferry.
I'm free to go and do as I please.
Father, this can't fail.
I'll let you know the date and time when we've worked out a plan more carefully.
I contacted every influential leader of the abolitionist movement in the north.
And they are all behind you.
They have even promised me men in arms.
They will never hang you.
No, Owen.
But I am grateful.
That there are so many in this country to whom John Brown is neither lunatic ..
Fanatic, nor murderer.
You won't let us help you?
No.
I am now quite certain that I am worth inconceivably more to hang ..
Than for any other purpose.

On this map, all the territory that you see in green is the Louisiana Purchase, which President Thomas Jefferson bought from Napoleon.
Today, it covers the greater part of 13 states and even a bit of Canada.
An area more than twice the size of the original Thirteen States.
But with this purchase inadvertently came the notorious pirate and buccaneer, Jean Lafitte.
If you will bear with me, ladies and gentlemen, it may increase the enjoyment of the picture you are about to see, to know why Jean Lafitte and his little island stronghold of Barataria, here by the mouth of the Mississippi, were so important to both sides in the War of 1812.
The invading British forces knew that control of New Orleans would give them control of the whole Mississippi River Basin and bring them certain victory.
The British commander had said that to approach New Orleans by the river was absolutely out of the question.
But this network of waterways, that you see here called "bayous", controlled by Jean Lafitte, was the back door to New Orleans, and both British and Americans knew that Lafitte was the key.
And what did this pirate do?
That, ladies and gentlemen, is our story.
Hi there, fella. Here, boy.
Ain't nobody gonna hurt ya.
Reckon you're hungry.
Here, have some of this biscuit.
Come on, fella. It sure is good.
Come on, boy.
That dog makes a sight better sentry than you do, soldier.
This belongs in your hand.
You British?
If I was, you'd be dead.
How long you been in this army?
Since the day 'fore yesterday.
Well, boy, how you feelin'?
Kind of hungry.
You're not hungry till you can wipe your eyes with the slack of your belly.
You hold onto that musket now, hear?
How long you been with Old Hawkface?
I am Old Hawkface.
You? Andy Jackson himself?
Yeah, the thought scares me, too, sometimes.
Now, with a man like you guarding the post,
I expect I can rest easy now, huh?
Are you still patchin' them shoes?
Well, it's better than patchin' my feet!
Andy, you ought to have better sense than to go meanderin' around out here in this chill.
I know, I know.
First thing, you know, you'll get the ague...
Sit back down.
...and your bones'll start rattlin'.
Here, drink some nice hot soup.
Thank you, Mr Peavey.
There's an officer fella inside waitin' to see you.
He done rid all the way down from Washington.
Now, why didn't you tell me that in the first place?
Well, he didn't say it was important.
Just said he was an officer fella.
What's your news?
Now stand easy, Captain.
Captain Wilkes reporting from President Madison, sir.
The British have captured Washington.
They've burned the Capitol and the White House.
Is the President safe?
He escaped, sir.
But for the next few weeks, the government's going to be run from the saddle of the President's horse.
We better pray that horse don't stumble.
The fate of the country is in your hands, General.
The British invasion fleet is headed for New Orleans with 16,000 troops aboard.
Sixteen...
They expect me to stop 'em with a...
I've got 1,200 men here...
Most of those boys don't have shoes, let alone musket flints. How can...
New Orleans, huh?
I declare we got more chickens here than we got troops.
Get down!
Now then, if they control the Mississippi, they'll have this country by the throat.
Well, I expect we could set up defences there, there and...
-Not there.
-Why not?
-That's Barataria.
-What?
Every foot of that swampland is controlled by Lafitte, the pirate.
From New Orleans to the Gulf.
We'll have to deal with him first.
Deal with him? A pirate? Deal with him!
I'll hang him.
They've been tryin' to hang him down there for the last 10 years.
When Andy starts talkin' hangin', you better start lookin' for a rope.
Welcome! Come on in!
You're all welcome to the market of Jean Lafitte!
No duty to pay, no taxes to pay for a war that's lost!
Come on, we gotta clear the decks.
All right now, what have you got here to sell?
Lady, that's real Spanish lace, lady!
How exciting!
It looks like it came from a harem!
Make you feel like a sultan!
Take care of the lady, Rio.
Ladies, ladies, ladies, what's life without a little spice?
Here's the one the King of France asked me to sell for him personal.
Obviously, the King of France had bad taste.
Why, lady, it's all hand-painted!
All it needs is a little polish!
What's the matter?
Don't you like children?
Mawbee! Sugar cane
Lobo.
Mawbee!
Sugar cane...
Hello, General!
When you steal on the sea, you're a buccaneer.
When you steal on land, you're a thief!
Hey!
Sugar cane. Mawbee!
Baby's in the oven
You mustn't be angry.
I just couldn't resist it!
Forgive me, monsieur.
I believe you dropped your purse.
Thank you. I'd hardly expected a pirate...
-I beg your pardon?
-I mean, well...
Thank you.
Good afternoon,
General Dominique You.
Good afternoon, madame.
I... I brought you a little remembrance.
How lovely! Thank you.
For beauty, honour.
It was given to me by the Emperor at Austerlitz.
General, you shouldn't have!
You shouldn't have done it!
Bonnie, gimme that money.
It don't belong to you or your father!
Clear out of here!
You know half of every dollar goes to Lafitte!
Just you try to collect it, you'll get this gaff in your guts!
Look, Bonnie, 50% belongs to the Boss!
Keep your claws out of my father's cargo!
If you wasn't
Captain Brown's daughter, l'd...
-You'd what?
-You wharf rat!
-Who pushed Bonnie?
-I did!
Get out of my way, Dominique.
I'll kill that dirty squid!
-Ladies don't fight with broken bottles!
-I wish I had a cutlass!
Keep out of this!
Go on!
Ladies and gentlemen, that is the end of our little show.
We hope you have enjoyed the entertainment.
May it give you just a glimpse of what we endure to bring you these treasures from the Seven Seas.
We take the risks, you take the bargains!
Thank you, Mr Lafitte. Thank you.
A magnificent performance, as always.
Thank you all, gentlemen.
Thank you very much.
You were wonderful...
-Hey!
-What?
Why don't you learn how to handle a comb as well as you handle a knife?
The Governor's daughter.
What do you suppose she's doing here?
You don't think she's doing her father's shopping?
Miss Claiborne!
Good afternoon, Madame Mercier.
How nice to see you.
Come on, boys, get things movin'.
Now, you can all show your appreciation by opening your purses a bit wider!
Good afternoon.
Mesdames. we are very honoured by your distinguished patronage.
Better not tell your husband where you got that shawl.
Mr Lafitte, I never do!
-You can't really blame her.
-But a pirate!
You'll see why my hands are tied.
Look at this.
"Sale of rare and notable goods."
Signed Jean Lafitte.
How can I collect revenues when half of
New Orleans is dealing with this pirate?
They must be aware they're breaking the law.
We can't arrest the whole city.
The truth of the matter is no one cares.
No one is eager to pay taxes on a war we're losing.
If you feel that way, Mr Phipps, perhaps you should resign your post.
I am a loyal American, sir!
All right, all right.
We'll have Lafitte in irons today.
Annette.
I did not ask to fall in love with you.
After I saw you the first time,
I stayed away at sea for four months knowing you were beyond my reach.
But typhoons and hurricanes could not get you out of my brain.
Then you came here again and what I thought was only a dream, you made a reality.
And now, you say it's finished.
Jean, my father was sent down here by the President to bring some sort of unity to this country.
And here I am in love with the man who is helping to destroy everything my father is trying to build up.
-Who, me?
-Yes, you.
I feel as though I were siding with the enemy.
Half my men are on my neck because I will not let them attack an American ship.
Loving you is costing me a lot of money.
Jean, it's not what you're not doing, it's what you should do.
We're losing the war.
The British just burned Washington.
What has that got to do with us?
New Orleans may be next.
New Orleans has had three different flags the last 15 years.
A fourth won't matter very much.
It matters to me!
Jean, you just don't know what it means to belong to a country.
You want a country? I'll give you one.
You can have Barataria!
Barataria!
Barataria is a kingdom of
1,000 fighting men and ships that sail the Gulf and the Caribbean.
Do you know what they're offering for the King of Barataria?
$500, dead or alive.
They won't collect it.
Jean, a girl has to be proud of her love, not ashamed.
How can I tell people that I'm in love with a man with a price on his head?
You're just not...
I'm not what? Say it.
Respectable.
Respectable.
What you want is a coat of arms, not a man.
I want a man with a sense of honour, and duty and loyalty.
Not a savage!
A savage was good enough for you when you needed a breath of fresh air in your stuffy social life!
My life may be stuffy, but barato is still the word for "cheap"!
I think you'd better return to your carriage.
But I want that dress!
Too late, lady, you just lost a good bargain!
Hans, put your best shots up into those trees!
Beluche, cover the bridge!
Callalou!
We can handle 'em, Boss.
I want no lead, no trouble.
Cariba! Come on!
Whoa!
Now you'll see, Governor.
But I swear to you, sir, Lafitte's men were selling here not an hour ago!
I know, I know.
You look splendid, Governor.
And you, sir, look ridiculous.
Governor, I didn't expect to see you!
Obviously, madam.
Can you explain, ladies and gentlemen, why I find you here in a cypress swamp, your arms full of contraband goods?
-Even my own daughter.
-Excuse me.
Father, l...
Are you searching for bargains too, madam?
Governor, is there anything special you're looking for?
You are what I'm looking for.
-Mr Phipps.
-Yes, sir.
Read my proclamation.
"l offer $500 reward for the capture of Jean Lafitte."
-Five hundred?
-It's an insult.
"William C.C. Claiborne,
Governor of Louisiana."
And Jean Lafitte offers $10,000 for Governor Claiborne's ears!
Lieutenant!
-Take this man prisoner.
-Be careful, Governor.
You're not on your own ground.
Governor, 100 guns are pointing at you right now.
Better not risk it, Governor.
People might get hurt.
Only fear of injury to some of you prevents me from bringing this pirate to justice right now.
Sir, not pirate, "privateer."
You laugh! You laugh!
Don't you realise your country's at war?
Will you still laugh when the British march in and you have no country and no flag?
And you, how will you laugh when General Jackson arrives and blasts you and your cutthroats right out of Barataria?
Others have tried it before.
It will be different with Jackson.
He has sworn there's no room for you under the American flag.
I'm truly sorry to hear that, Governor.
I have always respected the American flag.
Madam, are you coming?
You wanna find trouble?
As long as she's with me, she's a lady!
That trollop a lady?
All right, come on, I'll take you all on!
Come on, you the next?
He don't swim,
I gotta get him out of there.
You yellow-bellies!
I've seen the day when I could flatten
10 of you at a time.
If you weren't so drunk,
I'd take you myself.
All right, all right, all right.
All right, clear the way!
You brawlers down there!
Who are you yellin' at?
You! Now clear out before I set the patrol on you!
Who are you givin' orders to?
All right, I was a ship's master afore you...scrubbed down a head!
Cut loose, Pa!
Come off that deck and I'll flatten you, too!
-Shut up, Pa!
-Bonnie, cut it out, will ya, honey!
-lt was these rats here started it.
-Sure, he wouldn't hurt nobody...
They insulted my lady friend.
You must've gone blind. This...
This crump a lady?
Listen, who you callin' that...
Get out before I cut the tripe out of you!
Mr Brown, are you gonna let her talk to me like that?
Bonnie's right. You are a crump.
Go on, beat it.
Hey, that's no way to talk to a lady!
Come on, Pa.
You should've seen me, Bonnie.
I took on four of 'em.
I still got it in my fists.
Why don't you use 'em on Lafitte instead of wharf rats?
I'm pickin' my own time.
Come on, let's have a drink...
No, you don't! You swilled enough.
-Just one?
-Get back on your ship.
-Take it aboard!
-Stand back, everybody! Heads up!
Heave away on the sail line!
Slack away on the yaw!
All right.
Come on, Pa, before it drops in your mouth.
Hey, come here, come here.
Look at that.
"Never touch an American ship", says Lafitte.
So, what happens, huh?
All the gold in New Orleans slips through his fists in Yankee hulks.
Buy good luck charm!
Buy good luck charm. Live long...
Buy good luck charm!
Corinthian passengers. please board the ship.
Vessel leaving in a few minutes!
Corinthian passengers. please board the ship.
Heads up! Cargo coming aboard!
Stand back for just a minute, please.
-Keep it clear, Mr James.
-Yes, sir.
Watch the railing, please.
Clear the railing!
-Cargo coming aboard!
-Lower away!
Cast off the blocks!
Take it away!
Well, it's all yours, Captain Carruthers.
Just sign here, "Received government shipment of gold."
I'd sooner be carrying a shipload of cobras than that devil's bait.
Enough trouble running the blockade.
Well, maybe the fog'll hold for you.
Mr Miggs!
Can that mutt spare you a few minutes?
Yes, sir.
Very well, then sound the visitors ashore.
All visitors ashore!
All visitors ashore!
I never thought I'd see you nursemaid to a dog.
Good luck, Jim.
I'll need it.
Marie?
Annette, what are you doing here?
I found the note you left to Father.
Now, you're coming home with me this minute.
-Annette, l...
-Excuse me, Annette, but she's coming to Spain with me to get married.
You stay out of this, Antonio.
Annette, run Father's life, but don't run mine!
If she won't listen to reason, Antonio, perhaps you will.
I spoke to your father.
He said we should wait until after the war.
And I'm not waiting!
Will you stop it?
You're only thinking of yourself.
It's no use talking to her, Antonio.
She knows everything about being a lady, but nothing about being a woman.
Perhaps you're right.
Marie...
Annette.
Annette, please, she didn't mean it.
That's very sweet of you, but I don't want...
Annette, I'm sorry.
-You two shouldn't part like this.
-Annette, I'm sorry.
It's all right, baby...
Madam, unless you want to sail with us...
Very well, I'm leaving in a moment.
All right, the two of you,
I'll find some way to tell Father.
You take good care of her.
Look at her, she's got no sense at all.
She's going to catch a chill.
Olsen, man your captain.
And stand by to warp her. Head out!
I wish I were going to be at your wedding.
Close the railgate!
Annette?
Annette, I didn't have time to get a wedding gown, so I borrowed your new dress.
Which one?
Well, the one Madame Dupre made for you.
Are you singled up?
The white crepe one?
Well, I'm sorry!
-And, Annette...
-Yes?
I took... I took mother's locket, too.
Well, did you leave me anything?
Well, yes, Father!
Barataria, ho! Standing in!
All clear!
Well, Rumbo, did you catch that Portuguese galleon you went after?
A British man-of-war got there first!
And you, Flint, what did you catch?
24 pounds of iron in my hull.
Lucky I wasn't sunk.
The Boss doesn't like his captains comin' back empty-handed.
We're calling a Captain's Council.
The Boss may not be boss much longer.
We're here to ask Lafitte some questions.
Be very sure you want the answers.
You may get them.
Trouble in the wind, Pyke.
But why stay here in Barataria?
Listen to me!
Jackson is coming to push us out.
The British blockade has us locked in!
And you won't let us sink
American ships!
I say, send up 100 flatboats, empty the Maspero's storehouse and clear out of New Orleans before Jackson gets there.
-I say he's right!
-Jean, listen to your captains.
We are men of the sea.
Let's get back to it.
Now we're more beachcombers than pirates!
What's to stop us from holin' up here in Barataria and fightin' Jackson off?
Our kids was born here.
That shack on the beach is the only home port that many of us have ever known!
-lf I leave Barataria, I lose Cariba!
-Yeah, and I lose Tina.
A sailor's home is the deck beneath his feet!
Then why do you carry a sack of French dirt around your neck?
This, Mr Pyke, is to remind myself of all the lies they tell about land.
Motherland, fatherland, homeland, when all they mean is the dirt they bury you in when you've spilled your blood defending it!
I say we belong to the sea!
A man belongs where he wants to belong!
I don't like to be pushed.
By Claiborne, Jackson, the British, or by you!
Wait! Wait! I want to say something.
Go ahead, Miguel.
I forgot!
Mr Boss, you permit me to speak?
There's enough wind blowin' around here now.
This is Scipio's home, too. Go on, talk.
By their own law, Mr Boss, they cannot push you out.
Law? What law?
Do you not remember, Mr Boss?
I have told you,
"When the course of human events..."
Here it is!
Rules of American Declaration
"That all men are created equal."
I want to hear the rules! Read, Scipio.
"That they are endowed by their Creator with certain rights."
-Unalienable rights.
-Thank you.
What kind of rights are those?
It means they cannot take them away, sir.
Until someone with more artillery comes along!
-Right, General.
-All right, all right.
All right, General. Go on, Scipio.
"Life, liberty and the pursuit of happiness..."
Hey, that's better than our Brotherhood laws!
We don't guarantee anybody'll be happy!
Anyway, these rules are not for us.
They're for Americans.
-Barataria's American, isn't it?
-Sure!
And as long as we are on this spit of sand, we've got all the rights they say we've got.
And no one has the right to push us off!
-That's right, Boss.
-Hogwash!
All that slop about freedom and rights makes me sick!
He says he wants you to stay here and be Americans.
If he weren't lying, he'd tell you.
That's all the America he cares for!
-She's right!
-Stay out of this, Bonnie.
My father was the best leader you ever had!
While you're all here flappin' your sails, he's out after a cargo of a quarter of a million dollars in gold!
What are you talkin' about?
There hasn't been a treasure ship within
100 miles of here in months.
They've been haulin' gold out of New Orleans under your noses.
The only ship out of that port in the last week was the Corinthian.
-Sailed two nights ago.
-Corinthian!
She's American, Boss!
Nobody's tellin' my father what ships to attack, least of all Lafitte.
My father had his own fleet when you were fightin' alley cats for garbage!
You're not giving orders any more, Lafitte!
From now on, Captain Brown is!
Flint, Bart, Rumbo, get to your ships!
Look, Jean, a quarter of a million is a fat haul to cut.
We'll follow the man who comes back.
All right, then I'll take the Raven and I'll pick a crew off the beach if I have to.
Jean, you are still the Boss, and I am still your second in command.
I hate to miss a good fight.
Just pray that I find your father before he touches that American ship.
There's another ship! Close aboard!
Could be the Vulcan!
What do you make of it, Dominique?
Two ships, all right.
One of them is the Vulcan.
And the other?
Pipe all hands on deck.
This was worth spillin' a little blood for.
-A quarter of a million, Brown says.
-Yeah, we'll see.
Haul away!
Heave away!
All right, look lively!
Get that gear moving!
Come on, come on! Let's hurry it up!
Come on, men, come on!
Is she doused down good, Gramby?
Aye, Captain, she'll go up like a powder keg.
Good.
Is this the loot Brown promised us?
Let's crack it open and see what's inside!
Time enough to count it later.
We gotta haul out of here before we burn with her.
Diego! Haul it aside and keep those sharks away!
All hands back aboard!
All hands back aboard!
Free your grapplings!
Free your grapples!
Put the torch to her, Chigazola!
Gramby!
Stand by to plant two nine-pounders in her guts.
We don't want no floatin' evidence.
Aye, aye, Captain.
Stand by, number one gun crew!
Primed and ready, mate.
Hey, Brown, have you seen Toro aboard?
Get back over here, Mouse, before you fry your hide!
Here, grab this! Toro!
Come on, Mouse, get back on board ship!
Toro! Toro!
Toro, ya bloomin' idiot, where are ya?
Fend her off, afore we catch afire!
Jump! Come on, jump, Mouse!
Fire one!
That'll crack her ribs.
Look, Captain, there's Toro!
Drop that loot and jump, you blasted dummy!
What do ya want?
-What the devil are you waitin' for?
-Jump for it!
Next time you try to kill yourself,
I'll murder ya!
Stand by to fire number two!
You two almost got us fried.
That loot better be worth it.
What are you doin'?
You can't do that!
You know Brown don't recognise no private property.
What are you tryin' to do, get your throat cut?
What do you got in there, clankers?
-We'll hit her again for luck.
-Hey, Sawbones!
-Stand by gun number three, Tiny.
-Aye, aye, Captain.
There's another one for your meat axe.
-Primed and ready, Captain.
-Fire!
-Hans!
-Jawohl!
-Stand by to lower longboats!
-Jawohl. Boss.
Arm for boarding, off her oar.
And stand by...
-Douse all lights!
-Douse all lights!
Gun crews to quarters.
You rumheads, don't slop down too much of that stuff.
-Aye, aye.
-We got sea to cover.
Gimme that!
-What are you fightin' over, a rag?
-But that's silk!
Look, a three-masted fiddle!
-We ain't peddlin' no more junk.
-Hey, Brown!
Here's a charm that brought somebody no luck!
Brown!
Hey, Cap, wouldn't that music break your heart?
He's got no sentiment.
What do ya got here, Yank?
I don't know.
Hey, look! A weddin' dress!
Don't I look beautiful?
A barracuda wouldn't marry you!
-Kiss the bride, Yank.
-What, and get the scurvy!
Come on, Gramby, get it open.
What's the matter, Gramby, don't you trust me?
Nothing like the sight of gold to bring back a man's faith, Captain.
You told us there's a quarter of a million dollars in gold in there!
-We want to see the gold!
-Yeah, that's right!
All right, open it up.
-Hit the lock!
-That's it. Come on, Gramby!
The smell of gold shakin' your hands, Gramby?
Get it open, Gramby!
Gold! Gold!
Just like I told you, huh?
You're right, Captain. It was worth it.
Hey, get your claws out of there!
Get out of here, Yank!
All right, you've seen it, now get back to your stations!
Go on, you heard the Captain.
Get that lid down 'fore these sharks all go crazy.
Lock 'er up.
What you got there, Deacon?
A richer treasure than all your shining baubles of Satan.
-Books.
-A book-readin' pirate!
At least the Boss can raise no cry against this prize.
You're lookin' at the Boss, Deacon!
Bless me, so I am.
-What's the matter with you, Tim?
-I lost my ear in the fight, Captain.
Well, there's not much worth hearin' anyway.
Ain't the ear I mind.
I had a diamond ring in it.
Loss of one hand pays five dixies a month, regular rates,
Brotherhood of the Coast.
Well, Sawbones, what's the butcher's bill?
Four sunk, two sinkin' and eight that'll float.
Cheap enough. Six dead in all.
Seven!
Counting you, Mr Brown.
Because I'm going to hang you!
You ain't gonna hang nobody, Lafitte!
You are losing your friends very fast, Mr Brown.
-Anyone else on his side?
-Jean!
You've always called yourself a fair-dealing man. Give him a chance.
Did he give a chance to the people on the Corinthian?
The lifeboats are still burning on her deck.
He knew my orders.
All hands on a captured ship get off with their lives!
Gramby!
You're the first mate.
Did you have a hand in this?
I take orders from my captain.
Your captain will not be giving any more orders.
Jean, you cannot hang them all.
You cannot hold all this crew responsible for the work of one man!
I am not kind-hearted as the General.
Well, Gramby, will you follow Brown or me?
You.
You what?
You, Boss.
All right, hang him.
Gramby, no!
-Yank, Tiny, Deacon, take hold.
-Not l.
Gramby!
What are you mumbling about, Deacon?
Saying a prayer for a dying ship.
Dominique, set course for Barataria.
Crack on all sails.
Back to your stations!
All right, back to your stations!
Man the yards!
Beluche, signal the Raven to follow us.
Aye, General.
Wait. Look.
Where did he come from?
The Corinthian. My friend Toro, he risked his life to save this sprout.
-Ain't he got the soul of a saint?
-And what saint is going to save us?
It's a boy from the Corinthian.
The sight of him gives me hemp fever.
He's the only witness to all of that.
Too small to throw back.
He could hang us all.
He ain't too small to talk.
If you ask me, he's a walkin' death warrant.
We've had enough killin'.
Better put him with the rest.
Deacon, you'd better say a prayer for us.
All right, everybody get back.
Stand clear!
Come on, now!
All right, up on the beach!
Keep the boats movin'.
Everything goes up the bayou to the Maspero's warehouse!
Come on, now, get those pirogues movin'!
Pyke won't tell me what's the matter.
My tongue cannot speak what my eyes have seen.
Come on, now, get those pirogues movin'!
-Hey, what do ya got there?
-My own gear.
-What happened?
-They hung Brown.
What about Chigazola?
They killed Brown!
-Lobo!
-What's the matter?
What's this?
That's my dear mother, Pyke.
You never had a mother!
Since when are you givin' orders, Pyke?
And why ain't we splittin' it up on the beach like we always done?
Don't start any trouble today or you'll get what Brown got.
Captain Rumbo...
Come on, now!
All right, up on the beach!
Come on, boy, come.
That's sprat off the Corinthian?
Your friend, Brown, left two survivors.
The boy and his dog. Come on, son.
Come on, now, get those pirogues moving.
Well, at least the dog can't talk.
There comes the reason we're not splitting up the loot.
One thrust of the knife'll take care of that.
He seen too much.
He's off the Corinthian. ain't he?
Ya want me to go with you, Boss?
Lafitte, me and the other captains think...
I'm sure glad you're back, Boss.
-Did you hear about Brown?
-Yeah.
Señor Patron, you like some shrimps?
Grab her!
Let her go, Beluche.
-You all right, Boss?
-Yes.
She couldn't hit the side of a ship with an axe.
-You dirty, stinkin' murderer!
-Your father got what he deserved.
The men who sail under me take cargoes, not lives. There!
That is all that is left of the passengers and crew of the Corinthian.
Brown has killed everyone's right to belong under the American flag.
There's only one flag for the likes of us and it's as black as your heart.
You don't give a sinker in hell for your people, just the chance you lost with the Governor's daughter!
Bonnie's right. We ain't as set on becomin' Americans as you are, Lafitte.
All we're after is our cut of that loot.
That whelp is all that stands between us and a quarter of a million in gold.
Look, Lafitte, one tongue is as bad as 20.
Are you sharks still hungry?
It's simple.
Lafitte wants to become an American, we want to share the gold.
Slit the brat's throat.
All right, Gramby, you do it.
Flint?
Rumbo, you?
All right, Bonnie, it's your knife, do it.
There's only one throat here
I'd like to slice.
Come on, boy.
Go to the Boss' house over there.
You'll be safe with him.
All right, move on.
You've already proved how brave you are.
What do you want?
I... I came to find out what you're going to do with me, sir.
I don't know.
Well, what are you standing there for?
If you're coming in, come in!
I'm not supposed to come into the Captain's quarters without permission, sir.
All right, I said come in!
Thank you, sir.
Now you stay there, Mate. You stay.
Everybody would be better off if I fed you to the alligators.
But you wouldn't be much of a mouthful, would you?
Yes, sir. I mean, no, sir.
-Are you hungry?
-No, sir.
Well, not much.
What's your name, boy?
Miggs, sir.
How long have you been a cabin boy?
All my life.
That's a long time.
What can you do?
-I can patch canvas good.
-I mean, in the house.
I never lived in a house.
Well, sit down and eat.
Thank you, sir.
There's nothing special about a house.
It's just a hull in dry dock.
You dream all your life of owning one, and when you get it, it's on the wrong street.
Yes, sir.
Don't keep agreeing with me unless you mean it.
And don't call anybody "Sir" unless he's someone you can respect.
Yes, sir.
What are you staring at, Miggs?
Very pretty lady, sir.
Yes, it's a...
It's a very expensive frame.
Two men-of-war, Jean, heading into Barataria Bay!
Americans?
They show no flag.
They're comin' in with their gun ports open!
They must have found out about the Corinthian!
-Gun crews to the sea wall?
-It's done.
-Load and prime!
-Right!
-Batteries manned?
-Already done.
All right, open gun ports!
Hold your fire!
What do you make of them, Pyke?
Spoilin' for a fight, Boss, cleared for action.
Wait a minute!
They're breakin' out their colours.
They're British!
They're running up a signal.
I can never understand those blasted flags.
General, what do they say?
Asking permission to land a party ashore.
Shall we blow them out of the water, Boss?
Signal them ashore.
Attention!
Gentlemen.
-Are you Mr Lafitte?
-Follow me, please.
Gentlemen, Mr Lafitte.
Gentlemen, what can I do for you?
Mr Lafitte, I am Captain Lockyer of his Britannic Majesty's frigate,
Sophia.
Captain McWilliams, Lieutenant Rogers,
Captain Caldwell.
Captains?
This is General Dominique You.
Formerly the great cannoneer of Napoleon, now second in command to Jean Lafitte.
The Commodore of our fleet, sailing under letters of marque from Cartagena and his Supreme Excellency
Simón Bolívar.
Well...
Two men-of-war are waiting for us in the harbour, Mr Lafitte.
To avoid causing them any concern, we should get on with our business.
We have important letters to put before you.
About what?
The British War Office made a report on the strategic value of Barataria.
You control the back door to New Orleans.
Your key position could unlock the bayous to us.
When do you plan to attack
New Orleans?
We will be in New Orleans within a fortnight, sir.
But your assistance can save us time and a few British lives.
Gentlemen, I never discuss business before eating.
Eric. You will join me, of course.
Thank you.
Would you be good enough to send word to the Sophia we'll be an hour late to avoid interruption?
With pleasure. Mr Pyke.
I must say, Mr Lafitte, you...
You certainly live a great deal better than one might expect.
Well, that is, I mean, you...
Did you expect to find me with a peg leg and a patch over one eye?
We didn't quite know what to expect.
Most attractive portrait you have there.
Copy of a Gainsborough, perhaps?
No, sir, an original.
The only one of its kind.
Would the lady be your wife?
No, she would not.
Captain... No, no, you, sir.
This medal you're wearing, is it for bravery against the Americans?
No, sir, a bit of good fortune against the French.
-I see.
-With Nelson at the Battle of the Nile.
But l...
I don't believe I'm familiar with yours.
Which one? This?
Wagram, Marengo. I forgot which.
You know, we won so many battles in those days.
You do want to be on the winning side in this war, do you not, Mr Lafitte?
Yes, the side I am on will be the winning side.
If you join us in our attack against the Americans, guide us through the treacherous bayous to New Orleans, every condition in these letters will be fulfilled.
Now, how generous is the Crown prepared to be?
We offer substantial land grants for you and your men.
Land? For sailors!
Royal pardons for all of you.
We beg no one's pardon!
Perhaps I've been addressing the wrong man.
I understood Mr Lafitte was the leader at Barataria.
If your offer is good, it'll stand up under fire.
The offer is handsome!
We are authorised by the Crown to pay you $30,000 in gold!
General, would you please pass the salt?
Certainly.
Do you mind?
I... I don't think you quite heard Captain McWilliams.
He said, "$30,000", Mr Lafitte.
Yes, I heard him.
Will you pick up your plate?
Please pick it up.
What is it made of?
By Jove! Solid gold!
There is more than $30,000 of gold right on this table.
We offer one thing that money cannot buy, the rank of captain in the Royal Navy.
Do you realise who you are dealing with?
Why, the ships of Jean Lafitte comb the waters of the world.
A hundred captains obey his commands!
Am I to take that as your answer, Lafitte?
You may have my answer in one week.
When we have landed in New Orleans, it'll be too late.
And if I refuse?
We have 50 warships,
16,000 seasoned troops,
Iand and sea forces fresh from their victories against Napoleon.
England makes a good friend, but a bad enemy.
We need no friends and we fear no enemies!
If you refuse us, Lafitte, my orders are to blow Barataria to pieces and I shall do so.
I will give you my answer in one week.
Gentlemen, you have 10 minutes to catch your tide.
Eric, will you see that our visitors are escorted back to their boats?
Very good, sir. One week.
To think of all the people who would like to send this little angel to heaven.
I hope we're doing the right thing, Boss.
After all,
New Orleans is where the Corinthian...
Come here! Come here!
-I won't say nothin'!
-You had to blast out like a foghorn!
Don't let 'em kill me, Mr Lafitte!
Nobody will hurt you, Miggs.
We're just taking you to Maspero's in New Orleans.
What's that?
Well, that's where we keep all our most valuable cargoes.
Are you gonna leave me there all alone?
Pyke's wife, Tina, she'll look after you.
I... I'd rather be with you, Mr Lafitte.
There's gratitude for you!
There's few men I'd trust alone with my wife.
His wife is not at all like him.
Well, if I go, can I take Mate along?
Who is Mate?
He's a very good watchdog.
He scares me.
You better take him with you.
Thank you, sir.
And then, go along with Pyke to the landing.
I'll join you in a moment.
Come on, lad, and keep a firm hand on that wolf-hound.
By the bye, Scipio, see that you pack the Boss' best rig.
When he faces Governor Claiborne, he should shine like an lrish admiral!
Ten years, Mr Pyke,
I pack clothes for Mr Boss without your assistance.
The trouble with you, Scipio, is you read too much. Come on, lad.
Mr Boss, shall I pack those British letters?
No, Scipio.
I'll need them to find out if those
American rules of yours really work.
Mr Boss make anything work!
Yankee Doodle came to town
To see the Governor's daughter
They listened to his secret plans
And pushed him in the water!
You're in splendid voice, General.
Why, thank you!
Do you think those letters will raise the Corinthian from the bottom of the sea?
Do you think they will open the door
Claiborne slammed in your face?
Why, General, you're drinking.
You're right.
You know, I haven't felt the need of hiding my head in a bottle for 10 years since the night you got me drunk on another kind of wine, the wine of freedom!
You showed me a world that had no boundaries, no rulers, no flags.
General, there comes a time when a man wants to change.
To belong to something, or maybe someone.
Don't you know what they'll do to you, Jean?
A country, a woman, an ideal, they're all false!
I've never had a country.
Why shouldn't I have ideals?
Ideals!
Ideals are used to blind the eyes of fools like you.
All right, like me. I learnt that.
That's why I ran away from France.
When I become an American, you can stop running away.
And you won't need those medals to make you feel like a general.
You've never disappointed me before, Jean.
If I can believe in any man, it is you.
You'll see, Dominique.
I'll bring back a country bigger than that bag of earth you wear around your neck.
These are rather important documents,
Mr Lafitte.
They are the safety of your country, Governor.
You've never shown any concern for our laws, why this sudden concern for our safety?
Well, I was reading some of your American rules.
If they are not just words on paper, they might be worth fighting for.
I have men, ships, guns, all yours for the asking.
We cannot meet the British offer of $30,000.
I didn't come here for the money.
Then what do you want?
A pardon for me and my men, a place for us under the American flag.
Do you think you can walk in here, and lay some papers on my desk and expect me to absolve you of 1,000 crimes?
In one week, the British might make you an outlaw.
Either you let me join you, or you might have to join me.
And with you on our side, you think we could beat off the British attack?
The combination of Claiborne,
Jackson and Lafitte?
We could conquer the world!
I'm not so ambitious, Lafitte.
All I want to do is save the United States.
It's in the palm of your hand.
I almost have an impulse to accept your offer.
All right, Lafitte.
I'll call an emergency meeting of the Defence Council tonight.
I'm sure with my recommendation, they'll accept your offer.
Good.
Father, here's the... Forgive me. I'm...
That's all right, my dear.
I didn't realise you had company, the door was open.
This is Mr Jean Lafitte.
My daughter, Annette.
How do you do? Well, you're both alive!
Yes. Mr Lafitte and I have become as thick as thieves.
Pardon the figure of speech.
What was it you wanted, my dear?
Well, I wanted you to approve the guest list for General Jackson's reception.
We'll have some good news for Jackson.
He won't have to attack Barataria after all.
Mr Lafitte has offered to fight on our side.
I knew...
I just knew help would come, Father!
I'm glad it meets with your approval, mademoiselle.
Now, if you'll excuse me.
Have you a carriage?
No. I told my coachman not to wait.
I didn't know when or if I'd be leaving.
I see. Annette, will you tell Cato to put a carriage at Mr Lafitte's disposal?
Certainly. This way, Mr Lafitte.
I had my eye on him every second.
My pistol was on him all the time!
Whipple, if I'd known you were in there with that,
I'd have been more afraid of you than our pirate friend.
Now put that silly thing away and summon the Defence Council for a meeting here tonight.
If I may be so bold, sir, do you think it's wise to put your trust in a...
Whipple, don't speculate.
Just call the meeting.
Yes, sir.
I'll have the carriage around at the side gate.
Thank you, Cato. I will find my own way.
Jean, don't leave like this.
There's so much I want to say to you.
It seems to me you said a great deal the last time I saw you.
That was just my silly pride.
Now when I know...
When I know what you've done...
I did it only for my men and for myself.
If it makes you feel any better to hurt me, go ahead.
Jean, loving you, it's the most important thing in my life.
Please believe that.
Annette...
-Annette!
-Yes, Father?
-What will people think?
-About what?
You left the Merciers off the guest list.
Father, you know how Mr Mercier always upsets you.
I know, my dear, but people in our position must hide their feelings.
I will try, Father.
Perhaps we should invite our pirate friend.
He should meet General Jackson as soon as possible.
-And announce our engagement.
-I would be delighted.
What's that?
Don't be a coward. Tell him.
I said I would be delighted, Father!
Do we have to shout at each other?
Why are you standing there?
I caught my hand on a thorn.
If we are to come to terms with Lafitte, perhaps we should fly the skull and crossbones over our Capitol!
We are not here to discuss
Jean Lafitte's reputation!
He has offered to help us, and he's waiting for our answer.
Answer him with a cannon.
I would surrender to the British before I would put our country in the hands of riffraff.
Let us at least preserve our dignity!
General Jackson will need men and ammunition.
Lafitte offers us both.
On the field of battle, a general doesn't ask, "Who supplies the bullets?"
I agree with the Governor completely.
If I were in Jackson's boots,
I'd prefer the help of the devil!
In any case, the question we have to decide here is the authenticity of these letters.
That is not the question!
Do you believe them to be forgeries?
No, no, no, they're authentic enough, which only proves that Lafitte was dealing with the British.
He may be an outlaw, but I cannot believe him a traitor.
Would Lafitte give up $30,000 and a commission in the British Navy just to become an American citizen?
And you wouldn't, Mr Mercier?
Gentlemen, I agree with everything that's been said, but we cannot disregard the opinions of our esteemed Governor.
We're wasting time. Give me the orders to blast Lafitte out of Barataria.
-That has my vote.
-And mine!
Let us at least rid ourselves of one enemy!
Gentlemen, gentlemen, let's consider!
Lafitte is one of the best hopes this country has.
Gentlemen, we are in agreement.
Let's put it to a vote.
Hey, you know, Boss,
I'm beginning to feel respectable already!
What do you think, Pyke, are the chances of the men joining up with us?
You just tell me how you want them to vote.
Pyke, we'll have none of that.
From now on, everything has to be democratic.
Well, maybe a little gentle persuasion, but democratic.
Boss...
-The British.
-They didn't wait.
-Pyke, see if you can find anyone.
-Right.
Callalou! Callalou!
Callalou!
You're back like you started, Lafitte, with no one to take your orders but the mosquitoes.
How did the British miss you?
British?
Your American friends paid us a visit.
Why, you lying whelp!
Look. I know an American uniform when I see one.
We would have fired on them, but Dominique stopped us.
He had everyone out to welcome them, cheerin' and singin' Yankee Doodle.
Then the beach blew up in our faces.
Did anyone get away?
Some made it to the swamps.
Some were hauled off in chains to be hung.
Dominique was right.
You cannot trust anybody.
How I've waited for this moment, to see you smashed, beaten.
Now I see it, it hurts.
Don't give me your pity.
I like your hatred better!
Where you goin'?
New Orleans.
I will get my men out of jail if I have to kill Jackson himself.
No, don't. Don't go to New Orleans.
Because if the Americans don't kill you, your own men will.
We can sail south to Cartagena, maybe to Galvez on the Gulf.
Why should you care what happens to me?
Because you're part of everything
I've ever loved and hated!
In this fair town where I was born
There was a lady dwelling
And every youth cried. "Come this way"
Her name was Barbara Allen
So in the lovely month of May
When blossoms they were swelling
Young Jimmy Joe on his deathbed lay
For love of Barbara Allen
When he had died and lay in grave
Her heart was filled with sorrow
Oh. Mother dear
Please make my bed
For I shall die tomorrow
That's a mighty sweet tune,
Miss Claiborne.
Thank you. Thank you, my dears.
That's one of my Rachel's favourites.
You make me feel right at home.
It's the least we can do for a gallant soldier who's come here to defend our city.
Not to mention the pretty ladies who grace it.
Thank you.
I wish to assure you, sir, the hearts and homes of this city are open to you and your men.
I'm most grateful, ma'am.
I wish to assure you that we shall defend your city or perish.
You are charming, General!
But they had told me you are a peasant!
But a Tennessee peasant, ma'am.
That makes all the difference.
Oh, General Jackson, we'd be most honoured if you and your officers would dine with us tomorrow night.
I accept with pleasure, ma'am.
On one condition.
Condition?
That I'm still alive tomorrow night.
You won't be alive tomorrow mornin' unless you drink your milk.
-Not now, Mr Peavey.
-I done put your ague powder in it.
-Mr Peavey...
-You pay him no mind, Miss Claiborne.
He's been embarrassin' me since before you were born.
Here, here, here, here, here.
Commodore Patterson is coming!
Excuse me. General Jackson.
Commodore Patterson.
-Commodore.
-General.
I am pleased to report our mission has been accomplished.
Barataria has been completely demolished.
Father!
Father, how could they?
You promised Mr Lafitte!
What became of Lafitte?
Not among the prisoners.
But, Father, you gave him your word!
Excuse me, Miss Claiborne.
Governor, General.
There is more serious news.
The British fleet has been sighted on Lake Borgne.
The British! They're on Lake Borgne!
Well, that's less than 30 miles away!
General, what can we do?
We can keep our heads, sir.
Peavey, Colonel, Major Reed.
General, do you expect to defend New Orleans with this ill-clad rabble of yours?
My troops are dressed for a fight, sir, not a parade.
But, General Jackson, they lack the cannon, the powder, even the musket flints!
But not the stomach for a fight.
We have our homes, our families to think of!
You seem to have everything to think of except your country.
Brave words!
But you cannot fire words at the enemy!
Our only safety lies in surrender.
Let me make this very clear, gentlemen.
Before I surrender this city,
I will burn it to the ground!
General Jackson, we have the right to decide our own destiny.
You will find that we have a strong civil authority here!
And you will find that you have to take orders from me.
By the Eternal, if I must,
I'll declare martial law here!
We are in the hands of a madman!
Philippe! No.
It's quite clear to me, sir, that you're either a coward or a traitor.
You can count on the militia, sir.
All New Orleans is with you, mon General!
The city is yours to command, sir.
-My son will follow you, General.
-Thank you, madam.
If perhaps the General will at least tell us what his plans are.
Senator, if the hair of my head knew my plans,
I would cut it off.
Colonel, requisition every carriage and wagon in the city.
Yes, sir.
Major, have every company ready to march.
Yes, sir.
When Andy gets coiled up and rattles thataway,
I'd keep out of striking distance if I was you.
What's the matter, Andy?
Is somethin' ailin' you?
I never see so many people so dead set against being defended.
I'm defendin' the United States,
Mr Peavey.
Yeah, well, you got to keep up your strength for that.
Andy, please finish your milk.
Come on, please, Andy, finish your...
Andy, if you do,
I'll cook you up a nice hot mess of turkey gizzards.
Not now, Mr Peavey, just keep those buzzards off my back.
I got a... I got a heap of thinkin' to do.
All right, Andy.
Doggone if you ain't the hardest man to pin down ever I see in all my born days!
All I do is chase you around from post to pillar, tryin' to get you to take your medicine.
Don't move. And don't call your guard.
I'll call my guard when I'm ready.
-Who are you?
-Jean Lafitte.
Well... What do you want?
A signed release to get my men out of jail.
You know I don't much like bein' threatened.
Don't... Don't shoot yet, Mr Peavey.
That's a very old trick, Jackson.
Mr Peavey, this here is Mr Lafitte, the pirate.
How do, Mr Lafitte, glad to know you.
Shall I pull the trigger now, Andy?
Well, you got anything to say before I answer that question?
Yes.
I'd like to make out my will.
For some of that stolen gold you got buried?
No. For a storeroom full of powder and 8,000 flints.
Musket flints?
In exchange for my men.
Where are these flints?
Where the powder is.
Put those pistols on the table, Mr Lafitte.
How much powder?
I don't like to talk with a gun on my back.
Leave us alone, Mr Peavey.
You want I should tie him up before I go?
No, no, no, thank you.
Go on, clear out of here!
Now, what about those flints?
What about my men?
The flints and powder, they in the city?
You'll find out when the last of my men is out of jail.
By the Eternal, I got the British marching up my back.
I can't stand here talkin' all night!
Now I need powder and flints, but you won't get this order of release till I know where they are!
You're looking for a quick way out of life, Jackson!
If you put a bullet in my brain,
I'd still live long enough to kill you.
-What ails that boy?
-I don't know, Andy.
He's talkin' some kind of foreign gibberish.
Talk English to me, son.
I can't understand what you're tryin' to...
Well, don't stand there lookin'.
Can't anybody tell me what this boy's sayin'?
Don't look at me, Andy!
He's trying to tell you that the British army is at his father's plantation.
Where's that?
Come on.
It's eight miles south on the Bayou Catalan.
-Mr Peavey, take care of that boy.
-Yes, I'll give him a drop of whisky.
Here, you know this terrain.
Can't you show me on a map?
There it is.
We'll march at once by the Chalmette Road.
Reed, call the Officer of the Day.
-Have the bugler sound assembly.
-Yes, sir.
Tell Patterson to have those gunboats ready to move.
Yes, sir. Officer of the Day!
-What's this here?
-That's a dry ditch, the Rodriguez Canal.
Butler, we'll form our line here.
With the river on our right, the swamp on our left, that ditch in front of us, we'll have three allies.
Yes, sir. Leeds!
-Shreve?
-Yes, sir!
How many dragoons can you put in the saddle?
-One hundred, sir!
-One hundred. All right, son.
You're going to have to get me some time.
Now, the British have to move through that bottleneck.
You harass 'em, wreck bridges, fell trees, anything you can think of.
Just slow 'em up for me.
-Yes, sir, General Jackson!
-Son...
-Yes, sir!
-Easy does it.
Yes, sir!
When can you get me those flints and powder?
As soon as my men are released from jail.
I don't much like givin' a receipt before the goods are delivered.
Here.
They'll be delivered to you on the battle line.
You know that means a full pardon for any one of your devils who'll fight.
How many can you muster?
I can promise you only one man, myself!
We going to have them pirates fightin' on our side now, Andy?
Mr Peavey, right now I'm in no position to be too particular.
-Colonel Butler!
-Yes, sir.
-Let's get crackin'!
-Yes, sir.
Look here, you didn't even drink your milk here. Andy...
Andy, should we take this with us?
We might as well, Mr Peavey.
We're goin' to fight for it.
Guard!
Hey, what's all the bell ringin'?
They're celebratin' our hangin'!
Yankee Doodle went to town
Ridin' on a pony...
Shut up!
Stuck a feather in his hat
And called it macaroni
Shut up, you scum!
You'll swing quick enough!
Which one is General Dominique You?
My questionable honour, sir.
Sing 'em Yankee Doodle. General, maybe they'll let you go!
Hey, the first to dance the rope!
Out you come.
Get back in there!
All right, get back in there.
Way to remember me to Captain Brown!
Fear not, Dominique.
The last enemy we have to face is death.
Thank you, blowfish.
You'll be the rottenest apples that ever dangled from a gallows tree.
But I've learned to love every worm-eaten one of you.
Because the code of our Brotherhood is better than all the lies of nations.
There is only one thing we can trust in life and that is that it will end in death.
Well, when it comes, spit in its eye!
Well, General,
I was afraid I'd never see you again this side of hell.
Are you so impatient to send me there that you came to tie the rope yourself?
If that's what you really believe,
Dominique, here.
Why did you come here?
Of all the men in the world,
I never wanted to fail you.
Every man I ever believed in has failed me.
Why should you be different?
I promised you a country. Here it is.
Signed by Jackson?
What makes you think you can trust this Jackson?
He trusted me today.
One word from him, and my head would have been blown off.
Instead, he gave me freedom for all of you in exchange for arms and supplies, and a pardon for every man who will join him on the battle lines.
The men will never listen to you, Jean.
I don't have time to convince them.
Here is freedom for you and for them.
Freedom to keep running away, or to belong to a country if you have the guts to fight for it.
Well, Dominique, I've kept my promise.
All right, hurry it up! Look out!
Get 'em on the firing line. Come on.
-All right, get it out of the way.
-This here's my cotton.
-Haul it clear!
-Your men stole my cotton!
Come on!
I'm going to complain to your commandin' officer!
Now, heave that wagon over!
Go tell it to the British!
Kentucky, don't build that too high.
You won't be able to see the British.
I'm makin' it high enough so they can't see me, General!
General, sir! That's all my cotton.
It's baled and ready for shippin'!
Then you won't mind helpin' us defend it.
Mr Peavey, see this gentleman gets a musket.
Yes, General.
Here, and don't shoot yourself.
All right, fall in line, sir.
-You there, Sergeant?
-Get 'em up there!
Get some of your sharpshooters in the branches of those trees.
All right, General.
-Reed!
-Yes, sir.
That 24-pounder in the Number Three
Battery there needs raisin'.
-See to it.
-Yes, sir.
-Howdy, boys. Got any chicory to spare?
-Help yourself.
Mornin', General.
-Well, son, how you feel now?
-Fine, sir.
Yeah, I reckon you'd rather be back in Kentucky this mornin' than be out here with me.
Not by a dang sight!
Come sun-up back home,
I'd be sloppin' the pigs.
Andy, you better drink some of this here chicory.
-lt'll do you good!
-Not now, Mr Peavey.
All right, I'll drink it myself.
That stuff is strong enough to float a horseshoe!
All right, soldier, step lively.
You haven't got all day!
Ain't nobody got flints to spare, Major.
-What's this?
-Well, that's all I could find.
How does Old Hawkface expect to win a war without musket flints?
Why don't you let Old Hawkface worry about that, soldier?
Sorry, sir.
That's all right. I've been called worse names in my time.
Well, as a matter of fact, General, we're gettin' pretty close to the bottom of the barrel.
There'll be plenty more musket flints once Lafitte gets here.
Do you really expect him to show up?
Well, Major, if I didn't, my hair might turn grey.
If you ask me, them pirates is back in New Orleans lootin' the town.
Battalion, halt!
1st Company, halt!
2nd Company, halt!
3rd Company, halt! 4th Company, halt!
Hey, General, think these here toothpicks is going to stop the Redcoats?
Might slow 'em up long enough to draw a bead on 'em.
Draw a bead on 'em without no flint in your musket?
-What's this for?
-One day's service for your country.
I always thought my life was worth more than a dollar.
Your paper, please. Thank you.
Your musket.
Glad to see you, Cato.
This here fog is gettin' thicker than cornmeal mush of a Tuesday.
I hope it stays that way.
They can't shoot what they can't see.
Andy, you better put on your shawl!
I'm fine, Mr Peavey.
I can see you're gettin' cold.
Now you put on your shawl!
Andy Jackson, come here!
Paper, please?
You didn't put down your next of kin.
But I don't have any, sir.
Who shall we notify in case...
-Well, the...
-Just the Claiborne family.
-Thank you, Mr Whipple.
-Your musket.
Here you are.
Your musket.
Well, what good is this?
Well, fire that, and when you run out of powder, use the butt end for a club.
Move along, we'll bring your powder later.
If it gets here.
Well, Governor, how many citizens have you recruited for me?
Over 300 so far, General.
-Begging your pardon, sir.
-That's more than I expected.
This is very urgent.
We have more men than supplies.
The last of the powder's gone.
Yeah, I know, I know.
There's plenty more of that on the way.
I only hope Lafitte keeps his promise better than we kept ours to him.
-What's that?
-The enemy! The enemy!
Excuse me, sir, it's only our patrol returning.
Why did they fire?
A few nervous triggers, I suppose.
Cease fire! Cease fire!
Get back, you fool, get back!
Don't you know an American bugle call when you hear it?
That's our patrol!
Cease fire! Cease fire!
Cease fire!
Redcoats, General!
Thicker than a forest!
Just tell me what happened, son.
-Giants, General! Thousands of them!
-Where?
Clear from the cypress wood to the river.
-Ready to attack?
-They're massing now, sir.
600 yards out front.
Nothing can stop them,
General, nothing.
There's some coffee boilin' down in the gully, might help take away the smell of gunpowder.
-Thank you, General.
-Major Reed?
Get me some couriers up here!
Colonel Butler, looks like things are about ready to bust loose!
By the Eternal, you came here to fight and fight you will!
You think you've turned out here for a Sunday church sociable?
-Sergeant!
-Yes, sir.
Take these civilians back to their place in the line.
-Watch out!
-Get back to your posts!
Them civilians is only going to be in our way when the ruckus starts, General.
I reckon us veterans will have to hold things together, soldier.
-Yeah.
-Hey, there, you on that cannon?
Don't you fumble-fingered rockheads know how to elevate a field-piece properly?
What are you tryin' to do, Andy, break your back?
When you point 'em like this, you won't hit.
Hit nothin' but jackrabbits.
Come here, let me help you, please. Andy.
Stand back, Mr Peavey, till I get this...
Don't waste your strength like this, Andy.
You go back to your place in line or by the Lord God, I'll cut you down!
-Get some water on that, Mr Peavey.
-Yes, sir.
All right, it's nothin' but a rocket.
Its bark's a lot worse than its bite!
-Back to your posts!
-Ready on five?
-Five ready, sir.
-Fire five!
That fog's too tarnal thick to see anything.
General, can't we do something to stop these rockets?
I need my powder too much to waste it on those rockets, Governor.
They're just tryin' to stir us up a little before they move in for the kill.
Tried the same thing at Bladensburg.
General! General!
Lafitte and his men got here, sir.
Thank the Lord for that. Where?
Comin' out of the swamp!
You're a mite late, Mr Lafitte.
We're not accustomed to travelling by land.
Early or late, you're mighty welcome.
It's a nice warm reception you arranged for us.
It'll be warmer if you don't get those flints and powder up to the battle line.
-Colonel Butler!
-Yes, sir.
Station these men at the Number Three Battery.
Yes, sir. Third Battery on the right!
-Keep well.
-I intend to.
Captain, see that these supplies are distributed.
Yes, sir.
Hey, buddy.
I hear tell that's Jean Lafitte.
I ain't never seen a pirate before.
Go give him a kiss if he's got powder with him!
What have we got here, Andy?
Manna from heaven, Mr Peavey.
Sure glad we got them fightin' for us instead of against us.
Go get some of those leather-shirts of yours to lend a hand here.
Yes, sir.
How much powder did you bring us?
Enough to work your cannon for a month!
Now we got somethin' to fight with!
Over here! Give me some of them flints!
-All the flints you can use.
-Pirate flints?
The British will never know the difference!
Where'd all this powder come from?
We stole it. Real special for you!
We thought you blue-bellies would lose this war before we got here.
Yeah, now that you've brought this powder, you can go home!
-Beluche, get aloft in that tree!
-All right, General.
-Pablo, get up that one!
-Sí. General.
-Give me a cross-bearing!
-Aye-aye, General!
What are you shooting at, Mr Lafitte?
There's been no order to fire.
Those rockets are making so much noise, we're going to quiet them down.
-Pablo?
-It's just a waste of iron, Mr Lafitte.
It ain't too thick, General.
I can see where they're comin' out of the fog.
If anyone would be able to see what to fire at, my men would have done it.
We have a cannoneer who doesn't have to see a target to hit it.
What range would you say?
I make about 600 yards.
Well, all right, go ahead, it's your powder.
There's the bearing!
Up she goes! You blew her right out of the water, General!
-Luck of the devil.
-That's my General!
Well, this is not a bad gun, you know.
-Wonderful, General.
-Back to your lines. Back to your lines.
Put out that fire!
Well, somebody's mighty handy with a field-piece.
It was that man there, sir.
Mr Lafitte, my compliments.
You have to compliment the General.
-General?
-General Dominique You.
-He taught Napoleon.
-Jean...
Well, I'm honoured to have you with us, sir.
The honour is mine, General.
Yes.
Mighty fine looking man.
Well, Dominique, there is still a lot of war to fight.
-Beluche?
-Aye, General.
Replace that gun.
Horseface, swab her out!
Battalion, fix bayonets!
Fix bayonets!
Fix bayonets!
Fix bayonets!
That's the loudest quiet
I ever heard, Boss.
Enjoy it while it lasts.
Wonder what time it is.
What do you care?
We ain't goin' no place.
Battalion, port arms!
Port arms!
Port arms!
Port arms!
The battalion will advance in line of attack. Quick march!
Sounds like someone is killin' a pig.
That's music. They're bagpipes.
Are they going to fight or dance?
It sends shivers up and down your spine, General.
Yes, sir, it's meant to.
-All right, fall in!
-Fall in!
Fall in!
Stand fast, boys.
Mr Lafitte?
Best be sure your men don't open fire till they get a good target.
Muskets aren't much use at long range.
Let me see that glass, Mr Peavey.
If it weren't for that blasted fog, my Kentucky long-rifles would cut 'em to pieces
100 yards before they could open fire.
What is the range of your rifles?
Range? These here things can shoot the eye out of a chipmunk at 300 yards.
Then all you need to know is when they are within your range.
The British aren't likely to send up a signal.
The British won't, but I will.
You tired of livin', Mr Lafitte?
I'll go with you, Boss.
-No, you're too big a target. Mouse?
-Aye, Boss.
-You have your powder horn?
-Yes, Boss.
General, could you spare one of your braves?
Good with a bow?
Good enough.
Here, Pyke.
No, Toro, you wait here.
I guess the ruckus is about to begin?
This should be about 300 yards.
Mouse? Powder.
-There it is!
-Lafitte's signal!
-Shall we open fire, sir?
-No, hold your fire.
We'll give 'em a chance to get back.
But the enemy's in range, sir!
So is Lafitte, Colonel.
I'll count 40 seconds before firing.
Every second, the British are closer by two yards, sir!
I'll count 40 seconds, Major!
Commence firing!
Company, halt! Aim. Fire!
It must have come as quite a surprise to you, Governor.
Annette and Captain Lafitte.
Yes, a father is not always the first to learn of his daughter's plans.
Why are you teaching him how to dance, Lizzie?
You just learned yourself!
Why don't you go get another piece of pecan pie? It's awful good.
I'd rather stay here and watch you and Lizzie make eyes at each other.
Look, how many times have I told you, don't call me "Lizzie", Little Miss Nosey!
Come on,
I'll teach you on the dance floor.
Yes, ma'am.
Lizzie has a sweetheart! Lizzie has a...
Why are you hiding there?
I'm not hiding.
I'm looking for a friend of mine.
I'll bet you don't know anybody here.
I do, too. My friend's Mr Lafitte.
Where'd you meet him?
That's a big secret.
You never look at me like that.
You're not Jean Lafitte.
What are you afraid of?
I ain't scared of nothin'. See?
I'll bet that whistle doesn't work.
Does too.
See!
-Let me blow that whistle.
-No.
But, say, if you go and call my friend,
Mr Lafitte,
I'll let you use it just while you're gone, though.
What will I tell him?
Well, just say that Miggs is here and wants to see him right away.
Well...
All right. Hold this while I'm gone and don't eat any of it.
Marjorie! Marjorie. Stop that noise.
Where did you get that?
From my friend, Miggs.
Looks like she's made a conquest.
She inherits her mother's charm.
I can't say that I relish the name of Miggs for a son-in-law.
Miggs?
Miggs? Well, hello, son.
What news of my friend, Captain Tom, of the Corinthian?
I don't know, sir.
Wait a minute.
How did you get back so soon?
I thank you all, most kindly, for these honours.
At any rate, there's another man here who deserves a share in every one of them.
He brought me three things
I badly needed at Chalmette.
Musket flints, dry powder and fightin' men.
Ladies and gentlemen, Mr Lafitte!
Thank you, General.
My personal thanks, sir, once again.
You know, for a man who's spent most of his life on a rollin' deck, you step right lively.
Confidentially, General, dancing always makes me a little seasick.
Well, Miss Claiborne, you...
That was mighty handsome prancin'.
Thank you, General!
You know, if my Rachel were here though, we'd teach you to dance
Possum Up a Gum Tree.
I wish for your sake that she were here, General.
I do, too.
All the happiness you deserve, Annette.
Our heartfelt thanks.
Well, General Dominique.
I see you have an eye for beauty as well as artillery.
General Jackson, I wish to present this lovely lady, Miss Bonnie Brown.
My pleasure, Miss Brown.
It may interest you to know, ma'am, that I've recommended the General here for conspicuous military service.
-Hey!
-Thank you, sir.
Excuse me, Bonnie. May l...
General, I have a confession to make.
You see, I wouldn't want to lie to a general like you.
You see... I was not quite...
As a matter of fact,
I was only a corporal.
Well, in the battle line at Chalmette, you were a general, my friend.
-I am deeply grateful to you.
-Thanks.
Miss Brown.
Somethin' wrong with your arm?
Yes, madam. It needs your beautiful hand. Come, Bonnie.
-It's just like in a fairy tale!
-Yes, isn't it? Isn't it, Jean?
Yes, it is. How much longer do we have to stay here?
Not very much longer.
You're a sly one, Annette.
But it's so romantic.
You must bring your fiancé to dinner with me.
-I'd be delighted.
-You're a lucky man, Lafitte.
-Yes...
-On the contrary, sir, I'm the lucky one!
Well, we'll see you soon. Very soon!
Bye.
Don't you think we've been on display long enough?
Perhaps I have, but you haven't.
I want every woman in the world to be jealous of me!
Annette, may we see your ring?
Yes, of course.
-I can't do it.
-Bonnie.
All you have to say is, "Congratulations."
And smile.
That's enough. Come on.
I'd rather break a bottle over his head.
Jean. Miss Claiborne.
Miss Brown is most eager to congratulate you.
Yes, that's right.
Good luck to you both.
Thank you. That's very kind of you.
He's a hard fish to hook,
Miss Claiborne.
It wasn't easy.
What are you starin' at?
Somethin' wrong with my rig?
Not at all. You look lovely.
You look beautiful. It's a lovely dress.
Do you know Madame Dupre made one just like it for me?
Except my sister sailed off with it on the Corinthian.
Corinthian?
Wouldn't that have been embarrassing, both of us wearing the same dress?
Well, that's a proof that you can never trust dressmakers.
I hear a waltz.
Mademoiselle. I insist upon the honour of this dance.
-Excuse me.
-Certainly.
Jean.
I didn't mean to.
Jean, I'll get out of here.
I'll get rid of this rag of a dress.
I'll burn it.
No one need ever see it again,
I swear it!
Is it going to bring her sister back to life?
Annette doesn't ever have to know.
You could say the Corinthian was sunk in a storm, lost at sea.
-Who'll know?
-I will know.
So what do you want to do?
Tell her.
You're a fool!
She's everything you've ever loved and fought for.
You gave up everything you had, everything you are.
Jean, even I don't want to see you lose her now.
Could you love a man who'd killed your sister?
I could love a man who'd killed my father.
Mr Lafitte?
There's a boy here to see you.
His name is Miggs.
Where is he?
Over there with his dog.
Now, look, tell him to wait for me at the back of the house right away,
-you understand?
-ls he really your friend?
Yes, yes, yes, go right on.
All right.
Look, go to the back gate, wait for me with Miggs.
Jean, I'm frightened.
Go on!
They have got Miggs.
We may have to fight our way out of here, Boss.
-Shall I get the men?
-No!
There'll be no fighting.
Now listen to me, all of you.
Get to the Raven. Make ready to sail.
I will join you if I can.
I'm not going to let you face this without me.
Dominique, this is an order.
If I'm not there in two hours, sail away.
Well, you heard the Boss.
Let's get movin'.
There's something very strange here.
The boy refuses to answer questions.
How do you expect him to answer questions when you're all shouting at him?
Annette is right.
Now look, son.
No one's going to hurt you.
We just want to know how you left the Corinthian.
How did you get back here?
The Corinthian hasn't had time to dock yet.
Well, I don't know. It was night time.
Well, did you sprout wings and fly back here through the air?
Stupid!
You didn't fall overboard, did you?
That's it. Yes, sir. I fell overboard.
Well, how did it happen? Tell us.
Well, there was a storm, and these big waves...
There've been no storms, son.
Yes, there was, and these big waves came...
Was the ship sunk?
What? No. I don't know.
Perhaps a birch rod will help you to tell the truth.
For heaven's sake, Mercier, don't manhandle the boy.
Now look, I have insured a quarter of a million dollars on that ship.
I'm going to find out what happened to it!
Hold on, Mercier.
That ship must have been sunk.
-Was it the British?
-No, sir.
Then was it Lafitte?
Mr Mercier, how dare you?
Look, Mercier, don't stand under my roof and make these wild accusations.
If it was not the British, then who was it?
Mr Lafitte wasn't even there. He was...
-Lafitte was what?
-Mr Lafitte was...
-He was what?
-I can answer that question.
-I was there.
-What?
The Corinthian was sunk.
Were there any survivors?
Every soul but one was lost.
Did you have any part in this, Lafitte?
I was their boss.
He admits it!
You killed my son!
Mr Lafitte!
I just came to say goodbye to you!
I didn't mean to get you in no trouble!
Mr Lafitte! Mr Lafitte!
Jean, Jean, tell them it wasn't you!
Tell them the truth, Jean!
They would never believe it, Annette.
There will be a trial, of course.
Trial! There'll be no trial.
We'll hang him right now.
Mr Lafitte! Mr Lafitte! Tell 'em, tell 'em!
Father, stop them! Stop them, Father!
You want me to defend that murderer?
Father, he didn't do it.
I'd stake my life on it!
What about your sister's life?
Father!
Here's a good, strong cord.
Mr Peavey!
Please get General Jackson.
Tell him what they're doing! Please!
Don't you worry none, honey. I'll get him.
-Hurry, please!
-Excuse me, ladies, excuse me.
The branch up there, use that.
You're not going to hang him here!
She's right, not here. Not here.
We'll hang him in the stable where he belongs!
Wait! No one has a greater grievance against this man than I have.
I lost a daughter.
But you cannot take the law into your own hands!
Lafitte has put himself outside the law!
Yes. I'll be glad to see him hang, but not by mob violence!
Your soft hands have been too much with this pirate!
-Come on, bring him down!
-Mercier!
Let him go, let him go!
Remember that you're men, not animals!
By the Lord God,
I'll kill the next man who moves.
This city is still under martial law!
Does martial law protect a murderer?
He sank a ship with 80 souls aboard!
Silence! Lafitte, did you sink that ship?
I was responsible.
From his own mouth!
I risked a personal fortune on the Corinthian!
What risk did you take on the battle line, Mr Mercier?
Jean offered his help to defend our country, and you answered him by destroying Barataria!
And still he came and helped us.
That is not the point, Miss Claiborne!
That's precisely the point, sir.
I made this man a promise.
A full pardon for every man jack who'd join me in the battle line.
He kept his word.
And, by the Eternal,
I'm goin' to keep mine.
I won't hold you to that, General.
I'll settle for one hour's start.
Turn him loose.
All right, Lafitte, your hour's begun.
Jean!
I'm going with you.
Annette, what life can we have together?
No country, no home, belonging to nothing.
We'd belong to each other.
You're all the world that I want.
Annette, you don't know what it means to spend a life running away.
I only want to live and die with you.
Jean...
I love you too much to take you with me.
All I can take with me is the memory of you.
I cannot return the daughter you lost on the Corinthian. Governor.
I can only give you back what I love most in the world.
Lafitte!
There is not a corner in the world where you will be safe!
At least I am leaving all of you safe in an American New Orleans.
Man the braces!
Man the braces!
Stand by to close haul!
Aye, General.
What flag do we break out?
-We have no flag.
-What course?
Straight out to sea.
-Full and bye on the port tack.
-Full and bye on the port tack.
Where we headed, Dominique?
Where we belong.
When a man loses everything else, he still has the sea.
This deck is the only country we have.
This is all the country I want.
Subtitles downloaded from www.OpenSubtitles.org
- I've lost it, Daddy. I can't find it.
- I've got it.
- Here it is, Daddy.
- Thank you.
Watch it, Christopher.
Four, three, two, one, fire!
Fine, that's good!
Mark it, Mary.
Right, well let's...
Hello, old Doc! I'm sorry.
Have you been here long?
No, I've just come.
What all this going on?
Oh, it's... just a little thing
I'm trying to find out.
Here, can you just hold that for me?
Just over the centre of the tub.
Got it?
Right, we'll make a note of this one.
13 foot 3. That's all right now.
Thank you very much.
- Hello, Doc.
- Hello, darling.
Are you going to look at Elizabeth?
I hope it isn't tonsils.
She looks all right.
Where's your mother?
- ln the house.
- Let's go in, shall we?
- I'll be in in a minute.
Stay for some tea.
- Thanks very much.
Well, now listen. Let's try to get one or two more shots before it's too dark.
Thank you.
Watch out, Mary.
Watch it, Christopher.
I don't think there's anything to worry about here.
The temperature is all right.
Quite a lot of these throats are running around this spring.
- She'll be all right in the morning.
- Good.
Now, along to bed, darling.
I'll bring you up some supper later on.
Oh, but I've got to help Daddy play marbles.
No, it's too late now, dear.
- Good night, Doctor.
- Good night, Elizabeth.
All right, let's try one more.
- Good night.
- Good night, darling.
Three, two, one, fire!
He seems to be having a fine old game out there.
What's it all about?
Just some problem he's trying to solve before tomorrow afternoon.
He's been at it for days now.
He was out there at 5 o'clock this morning in the rain.
Doctor, when I called you this afternoon it wasn't really about Elizabeth.
- It was Barnes.
- You don't think he's well?
He's all right at present, but he won't be for much longer.
He can't be if he goes on like this:
2 and 3 and 4 o'clock night after night.
And after a hard day at his real job at Vickers.
He hardly went to bed at all last night.
He's wearing himself out.
I wish you'd have a talk with him,
I think he might listen to you.
I'll see what I can do, but you know how he is.
- How is Elizabeth?
- Oh, she's all right.
- You don't think it's tonsils?
- No, no, no.
But I'll keep an eye on her, don't you worry.
The tea is stone cold, Barnes.
I called you twice.
Oh, I'm sorry. But you know
I got a lot of very useful stuff here.
It's only a question now of working it out on paper.
- Another late night?
- I don't know, it depends.
In any case, this part is easy compared with what's coming.
- Have a cup of tea, Doc.
- Well, if you're going to...
- I'll make some fresh.
- Don't worry, I'll do it.
No, no, you sit down and take off those wet shoes.
- Better see to the blackout first.
- I'll give you a hand.
Wait a minute.
Come out here and listen.
Hmm, sound like another big one.
Surely they won't be able to stand up to many raids like these.
They wouldn't if we could really get at them, but we don't.
It's like trying to kill a giant by firing at his arms and legs with thousands of peashooters instead of a clean bullet through the heart.
You know what happened when they tried to wipe out London.
Here's your tea, Barnes.
Don't let this get cold.
I'm coming.
Doc, do you remember about that earthquake bomb idea of mine?
Yes, that was the time of Dunkerque.
You told me the idea, but not what you wanted it for.
Come over here.
Do you know how much water it takes the Germans to make a ton of steel?
- Haven't the least idea.
- One hundred tons.
Now just look at this.
The whole of this great arsenal of war factories in the Ruhr depends for its water on three enormous dams:
The Möhne, the Eder and the Sorpe.
They control the level of the canals and supply a lot of hydroelectric power.
When those are full, they hold 400 million tons of water.
Just think of the chaos if we could break those walls down.
Now, this is what I wanted to do.
Drop a 10 ton bomb from 40 thousand feet that would seal itself in the roots of the wall.
The shockwaves would be tremendous, a real earthquake.
But could you hit a target that size from 8 miles up?
I reckon that a near miss, even 50 feet, would do the job.
Is there an airplane that will carry a 10 ton bomb?
- No, but i was going to design one.
- What happened?
Well, a committee was set up and we went into it but I hadn't made sufficient allowance for the cushioning effect of the water.
We should need a 30 ton bomb - too heavy for any aircraft at present.
- Sugar?
- No, thanks.
- Oh, carry on.
- Well, just a little.
Do you know, Barnes?
I still don't see why you need such a special bomb.
This dam is about 1 20 feet thick:
Solid masonry all through.
We've proved that a bomb 20 times the size of the biggest bomb now wouldn't even tickle it.
Besides, we can't float anything down the lake because they've got these two huge booms stretching right across it.
We can't even get it in under the water because these booms support thick steel nets which would stop a flotilla of submarines let alone torpedoes.
I see.
You can't bomb it, you can't float a mine against it and you can't torpedo it.
- Looks impossible.
- Yes, it does, doesn't it?
The other day I thought of a new, a wonderful idea.
- You've found a way to do it?
- I think so.
The committee that's enquiring into my original idea is meeting again tomorrow and I rather expect they'll want to wind the whole thing up.
Well, if they do, I'm done.
Why don't you go ahead with your new idea until you're ready and then get them to form a new committee?
My dear fellow, you talk as if I could pull committees out of a hat.
It took months...well, years almost to get Whitehall to start this one.
Somehow or other I must just keep it alive until I'm ready.
Oh, I'm sorry!
You want to get back to your surgery.
Well, I ought to really.
- Barnes?
- Hmm?
- Will you promise me something?
- If I can...
Would you try to get away for Easter?
You do need a rest, you know.
You think I'm going crazy?
A lot of people do, you know.
No, but you can't go on day and night.
Nobody can.
All right, Doc.
- Hello, Dr Pye.
- Hello, Wallis.
- Would you do something for me?
- I'll try.
You've got a lot of influence over those fellows in there.
Will you try to stop them winding the thing up right away?
- They'd need a very convincing reason.
- I've got a new idea.
It's quite different only...l must have time.
- Can you explain to them what it is?
- That's just the point, I can't.
If I were to try explain it to them now they'd only laugh at me.
- It's difficult without knowing more...
- Yes, I do see that, but...
We'd better go in.
Surely Mr Wallis must realise the false position he's putting us into.
We were appointed to examine a definite proposition.
I don't think we were confined to any definite proposition.
We were appointed to examine every possibility of air attack on these dams.
I know, but Mr Wallis did put forward a theory that was hopelessly wide of the mark.
And on the strength of this, he wants time to explore a completely new theory that's too fantastic even to explain.
I'm only asking for one simple thing:
I want you to give me sufficient time.
To discover how much explosive would be needed to breach these dams if we could explode a bomb directly against the wall.
How do you propose to get the bomb directly against the wall?
That is what I'm working on now.
Yes, but surely you can give us some idea.
I don't think that we can press Mr Wallis to do that.
If I had a partly formed theory,
I certainly shouldn't want to talk about it until I'm sure that it is all clear.
Quite so.
How long would you need to carry out these new experiments?
If Glanville will let me have the model dams at St Harmondsworth again
I would say... a week or ten days.
- How do you feel about that, Glanville?
- We'll be of any help we can.
Right. Then I should like to propose that we formally adjourn for two weeks.
Can I take it that the committee agrees to this?
Splendid!
I'm so glad you could come down.
I think you'll find this very interesting.
Glanville's people have rigged up two charges.
This first one is equivalent to a 10 ton bomb, 50 feet from the wall, as in the earlier experiments.
This second one is only half that charge but fixed to the wall itself.
Both are at a depth equivalent to 30 feet.
- Are we all ready, Collins?
- All ready, Dr Glanville.
- You want to take cover?
- No, I don't think so.
Not for the first one.
If you all stand back over there...
All right, Collins, go ahead!
There. You see?
It isn't even scratched?
A very slight shock is recorded and then it returns to normal.
This is where I was wrong before.
The cushion of water between the explosion and the wall absorbs the shock almost completely.
Shall we have the second one?
- When you're ready.
- This should get our feet wet.
Watch it.
Fire.
- Good heavens! That's wonderful.
- Wonderful.
And that is only half the charge of the first one.
Do you see the difference when it's placed against the wall at the right depth?
The cushion of water acts in our favour sending shockwaves right through the wall.
If we use this as a basis,
Glanville and I have calculated we should one need 6,000 pounds of this new explosive, RD X, to breach the Möhne dam itself.
I can cut the case weight down and make a complete bomb of less than 5 tons.
We shouldn't need a specially constructed aircraft either.
The new four engine Lancaster can carry a 5 ton bomb right through to the Ruhr.
- If you can make the bomb...
- Naturally.
And get it to explode exactly in the right position, hard against the dam wall.
- despite the protecting torpedo nets?
- Of course, that's essential.
But you still don't tell us how.
Well, if you're satisfied with what you've seen and I can have the proper facilities
I think I can do it.
- What facilities do you want?
- A testing tank, a really big one.
The biggest I know is the experimental ship tank at Teddington,
- the National Physical Laboratory's.
- Could I use one of those?
- I'll see what we can do.
- Uh-huh.
- Well, goodbye.
- Goodbye.
- Goodbye.
- Goodbye.
And keep at it.
I think you've got something.
Three, two, one... fire!
Thank you.
That's no good, it's too short.
Try 2 foot 6.
Well gentlemen, when you asked us to let Barnes Wallis use this tank of ours
I didn't expect him to be still here after five months.
I don't think we did either.
We have urgent experiments waiting for this tank.
Any idea how long he's going to be?
It's making things very difficult.
He's exploring something entirely new, you can't hurry this kind of research.
I know and if I thought he was getting anywhere...
But he doesn't seem to be doing so.
At any rate, he doesn't tell me anything.
He spends hours and hours shooting golf balls up and down.
And every now and then, he breaks a window.
Look, couldn't you find him some quiet duck pond in the country where he could shoot things up and down without being a nuisance to other people?
We'd better have a word with him.
Is he there now?
He's always there.
Didn't go home at all last night.
- Why was that?
- I don't know, I think he forgot.
He only has lunch about once a week.
All right. Stand by!
Once again.
Three, two, one... fire!
It's OK, I got that all right.
Splendid! We'll try that again.
Oh, hello.
Hello.
You couldn't have come at a better time.
It's extraordinary how these things happen.
One goes on and on feels as if one's up against a brick wall forever and then suddenly, it's as if a light flashes on and everything slips into place.
And now...
If you come along here...
I've got a camera recording but I think that up by the middle you'll see everything perfectly.
All right.
Er, just about where you are.
Are you all ready?
Once again.
Right.
Three, two, one... fire!
We've been trying for months to find a rule by which we can fix the height of each bounce.
If the bomb is released too soon, it won't reach the dam, if it's released too late, it'll bounce over it and explode directly under the aircraft killing everyone.
But now, we've got it! If you just wait here a moment and I'll do that again.
Right.
Three, two, one..
Fire!
You see? It wasn't a fluke, it works.
Well, that seems to be conclusive.
It's extraordinarily good of you to have been so patient.
Not at all, glad we could help.
There were times when you must have thought I was absolutely cockeyed.
- My dear fellow, that's the last thing...
- I shouldn't blame you if you did.
There's such a very thin dividing line between inspiration and obsession that sometimes is very hard to know which side we're on.
- Will you need the tank anymore?
- If I could have it until the end of the week to check my calculations and complete the report.
That's perfectly all right.
You'll leave on Saturday?
Oh, yes, definitely.
After what you've seen today, you'll put in a satisfactory report.
Certainly. I think this ought to convince the committee.
Splendid!
After that, it's a matter for the Ministry of Aircraft Production.
Under normal conditions, we should go right ahead and give you every facility.
But I'm afraid at the present moment, it's quite impossible.
But why, after that report?
You know how difficult things are,
Mr Wallis.
The shipping losses: half a million tons last month alone, most of it vital war material.
We haven't got an ounce to spare for anything except the highest priority.
Bit surely, I only want to make a few half size dummy prototypes of my bomb.
A new weapon like this would need highly skilled labour, special machine tools, factory space.
Our factories are stretched to the last inch of their capacity.
And you know the acute shortage of skilled labour.
But you're making new weapons all the time.
We're always trying to improve upon weapons of known value.
It's a different matter when we come to revolutionary ideas,
I might almost say fantastic ones, like this.
You mustn't think we're unimaginative or lukewarm.
We all see the possibilities and we'd like to go ahead.
But at present, I'm afraid it's out of the question. Possibly next year.
For goodness sake, let's go as far as we can now even if it doesn't go beyond these half size prototypes.
You could practically make those in a bicycle shop.
Even if we made a few dummy bombs, you say you need a Wellington bomber for test drops.
They're worth their weight in gold.
Do you really think the authorities would lend you one?
What possible argument could
I put forward to get you Wellington?
Well, if you tell them that I designed it, do you think that might help?
Looks a bit choppy down there.
Smooth or choppy, it's all the same with this bomb, Mutt.
- Ready?
- Yes.
How is the speed, Mutt?
Set at 180.
Are we all right for height?
We're all right. Bet you half a crown it doesn't work anyhow.
Look!
It's all right, it works!
Oh!
Well, I imagine with the success of the trials, they'll let me go right ahead with the real thing.
Personally, I'd like to see you go straight ahead, but the position is more difficult today than it was last month.
How so?
We can't even produce enough of existing types of bombs, much less begin to work on something completely new and completely unpredictable.
Surely they must realise if we can burst those dams and flood the Ruhr valley they can save the thousands of bombs that they're dropping on the factories.
I can only pass on to you the decision of the Ministry, Mr Wallis.
It might help if you could get the support of somebody with personal influence.
Whom do you suggest?
Why not go and see
Sir Edward Hughes?
I've seen him twice.
- Or Sir George Burnett?
- I've seen him three times.
Well then of course there's Lord Mansell.
I sat outside his office all yesterday morning.
He was too busy.
Oh... Well, why not see
Sir Geoffrey Haines?
- I sat outside his office all the afternoon.
- I see.
Well, in that case for the present I think you've done everything you possibly can.
- Have you seen Mr Summers?
- I think you'll find him in the testing shed.
Right.
- How did you get on?
- It's hopeless.
- What happened?
- Nothing.
I walked up and down Whitehall, in and out of offices, up and down stairs, sat outside rooms, l...
I felt like a pedlar trying to sell clockwork toys.
I wish there was something
I could do.
- There is, Mutt.
- What?
Let's take the whole thing straight to Bomber Command.
- Harris?
- Yes. You really know him.
If he sees the films and gets interested, well, it'll only need one word from him.
Why not?
There's a bit of a snag there.
You see, he gets so inundated with fantastic inventions...
That's ridiculous! Everything he's using had to be invented.
Look, if you tell him that it's worthwhile he'll listen to you, won't he?
I'll do what I can, but don't blame me if he throws us both out of the window.
Will you come in, please?
Mr Summers and Mr Barnes Wallis, sir.
- Hello, Mutt. Wallis.
- Good morning.
What is it you want?
I've got an idea for destroying the Ruhr dams.
The effect on Germany would be enormous.
I know all that, I read the report.
But you really think you can knock down a dam with that thing?
Yes.
It looks clever enough on paper, but that goes for all these wizzy ideas.
You try to make them work, they fall down flat.
- This one doesn't.
- How do you know?
We've tested it and proved it.
I've got some films here
I'd like you to see.
If you've proved the thing, why hasn't it been taken up?
I don't know. But the films only take five minutes to run.
You could see them and decide for yourself.
Well... all right.
Send the projectionists out of the room.
If this thing is as good as you say, there's no point in letting everybody know.
Thornby can run the film.
- Is that you, Barnes?
- Hello.
It's raining a bit, I shouldn't be surprised if it turns to snow.
Yes, it is cold, isn't it?
How did you get on?
With Harris? Oh, he was all right.
What's he like?
Is he very fierce?
Oh, no. He listened to what I had to say and saw the films.
- Was he interested?
- Yes, I think so.
It doesn't make any difference now anyway because the whole thing is over.
Washed out and done with.
That's impossible.
What happened?
When I got back to Weybridge, they sent for me and told that the people in Whitehall had decided that I was making a nuisance of myself wasting everybody's time, including my own and that the whole thing was dropped.
What did you do?
Well, the only thing I could do:
I resigned.
- Resigned? From Vickers?
- Mm-hm.
Surely this doesn't affect your other work.
Sweetheart, when you believe in a thing as much as I have believed in this there really isn't any other work until you have seen it through.
What will you do?
Oh, I haven't thought about that yet.
It's a new experience to find myself unemployed.
The first thing you'll do is to have a rest.
We'll get away somewhere.
No, I don't think so. It wouldn't be much fun in a farm house in winter or in some dreary wartime hotel.
There's plenty to do here too.
I must see about the tool-house door, see if I can get it to work properly.
I've meaning to repair the chicken run for years.
After that, I can look around for someway of earning a living.
I suppose I can get a job teaching somewhere.
Oh, a secretary rang up just before you got in.
The Ministry of Aircraft Production want to see you in the morning.
I've had enough of the Ministry of Aircraft
Production and all the rest of them.
- But they said it was important.
- Yes, it is to them.
They'd enjoy giving me a lecture on minding my own business.
Personally, I'd prefer to dig the garden.
If it doesn't snow,
I think I'll put in a few broad beans.
- Isn't it a bit too early?
- I don't know. They're very hardy.
One year I planted a row in November and they come up a couple of inches by Christmas.
I think you ought to go, Barnes.
Perhaps you're right.
It would be a good thing if I told them exactly what I think of the whole bunch of them.
Mr Wallis, sir.
Oh, hello, Wallis. I was trying all over the place to get hold of you yesterday.
- You needn't have troubled.
- What do you mean, I needn't have troubled?
They told me the news at Vickers.
If you've got to tell me officially, well...
I suppose you've got to have your say.
Then I'll have mine.
But they know nothing about it yet.
The news only came through in the afternoon.
And actually I wanted you to be the first to know.
- What did they told you?
- That the whole thing was off.
Done with, finished.
I don't know who said that, it didn't come from us.
What I'm telling you now is official.
Orders have just come through from Downing
Street that it's to go ahead right away.
The Prime Minister is enthusiastic about it.
The time is the vital element now.
The dams must be attacked early in May when the water level is at its highest.
After that the level begins to drop.
Naturally, I know that.
I made it clear in my report.
It only leaves a bare two months to train a squadron and prepare the bombs.
Can you do your part in that time?
Well...I'll do my best.
That's how it is. I expect you all want to get back to your groups.
I want a maximum effort tonight.
See if we can get a real knock at Essen.
Right.
Cochrane, don't go for a minute.
What do you think of Wallis' idea of bursting the Ruhr dams?
It sounds a bit far-fetched, but personally I think it can be done.
I hope you're right.
Anyway, I've given it my support and I've had orders to get ready.
- I want you to take it on.
- Right, sir, I'd like to.
It'll mean taking a squadron out of the line for special training.
No, we must form a special squadron for this and man it with experienced crews who've just finished their present 30 trips.
Some of those keen youngsters won't mind doing an extra one.
Have you anyone in mind to command the squadron?
Yes. Gibson.
Rad shutters auto.
Rad shutters auto.
- Brakes off.
- Brakes off.
Nigger, come on, boy!
Come on!
Come on, Nigger!
Come on, old fellow.
You won't have to wait for me for a long time.
No, you won't!
Going on holiday, down to Cornwall.
Rabbits. Rabbits, boy!
Come on, Skipper, you'll miss the bus.
OK! Come on, Nigger.
Come on, boy!
There's a show called "Let's Face it!" at the Hippodrome.
- That's the Cole Porter musical.
- You've seen it?
Yeah, I saw it last fall.
But I'll see it again.
"Full Swing" at the Palace with Jack Halbert.
Can you walk straight in on these shows nowadays or do you have to book?
You can't get into the stalls because of the Americans.
Most nights you can get in somewhere.
There's four of us for London,
Skipper.
We can get the 3:15 tomorrow and see a show before we split up.
- All right, you can count me in.
- We'll have a couple of taxis here at 2:30.
Excuse me, sir. There's a message for you from Group.
The A.O.C. would like to see you at 11 o'clock tomorrow.
Oh...right.
You wait there, old boy.
Stay there.
Wing Commander Gibson, sir.
- Good morning, Gibson.
- Good morning, sir.
Congratulations on the bar to your DSO.
Thank you, sir.
- You finished your third tour last night?
- Yes, sir.
Would you be prepared to take on one more trip?
What kind of trip, sir?
I can't tell you much about it for the present
But it'll be a special one and you'll command the operation.
I'm afraid it would mean putting off your leave.
How do you feel about it?
- All right, sir.
- Good.
It's going to need careful training and the Commander-in-Chief wants a special squadron formed.
It will be best if you form it yourself.
I'm telling all the squadrons they'll have to give up their most experienced crews.
They're not going to like it.
- Is Group Captain Whitworth there?
- He's just arrived, sir.
- Ask him to come in.
- Very good, sir.
What kind of training is it to be, sir?
What sort of target?
I can't tell you the target yet.
But it will be low-flying.
You've got to be able to low-fly at night until it's second nature.
- Hello, Whitworth.
- Good morning, sir.
- You know each other?
- Oh, yes. We're old friends.
- Hello, Gibson.
- Hello, sir.
You'll be forming this squadron at Whitworth's main base at Scampton.
I'm sorry I can't tell you any more, but the immediate job is to get your crews and get them flying.
There's one other thing:
You'll have to watch security.
As far as others are concerned, this is just an ordinary new squadron.
Very good, sir.
Now go off with Group Captain Whitworth and he'll help you to get things going.
You'll find pretty well everyone that matters in here, sir.
- On this board or here, in these albums.
- Right, thank you.
Now then... Oh, thanks.
I'd go for these Australians if I were you:
Les Knight and Mickey Martin.
Martin knows all there is to know about low-flying.
Yes, I met him when he was collecting a DFC.
I know this New Zealander, Les Munro,
I'd like to have him.
- And Joe McCarthy, he's great.
- Oh, the American. The Glorious Blonde.
He used to be a Coney Island beach guard.
We mustn't forget the English.
Here is Bill Astell.
Oh yes, and David Maltby.
No, he's just started another tour.
And Hoppy Hopgood from my old squadron.
I'd like to have Dave Shannon and Burpee from there too.
We shan't be popular with the other squadron commanders if we start squeezing chaps like these from them.
There are two I'd like as flight commanders:
Henry Maudslay and Dinghy Young.
- Do you know them?
- I know Young well.
I told him to fly in the Oxford University Air Squadron.
He was a rowing blue.
Henry Maudslay's a darn good athlete too.
He's a miler, I think.
You couldn't have picked two better chaps.
- What about your own crew?
- They're off on leave this afternoon.
They've had a hard tour and must be sick of the sight of me by now.
I'll leave them alone.
Come on, Nigger.
Hurry up, Skipper, you'll miss the train.
You fellows go ahead,
I shan't be coming.
- Why? What happened?
- Nothing much.
- They've given me another job.
- A staff job?
- No, forming a new squadron.
- What? Not before your leave?
Yeah...
You tell the boys, will you Trevor?
You chaps will have to hurry if you're going to get the 3:15.
You needn't bother about that, Crosby.
- I'm not going.
- Not going, sir?
No, but you needn't unpack everything again because we're moving to Scampton.
- You go and get your dinner.
- Very good, sir.
What are messing about for?
I told you, I'm not going.
Skipper, this new squadron...
Are you going to fly with it?
- Of course I'm going to fly with it.
- Well, you'll need a crew, won't you?
Of course, but I'll get one all right.
Ooh, you mean you've had enough of us.
You want to get rid of us.
I didn't say that.
Well, we've just had a committee meeting.
There's a general opinion that it's not going to be safe to let you fly about with a lot of new people who don't know how crazy you are.
It's the general opinion that you'll need us to look after you.
Well...if that's what you want to do, all right.
I think you're the crazy ones.
The whole bunch of you.
Two more beers, please.
There's eleven DFCs already and three bars.
You can bet your boots it's something big.
They say it's a special squadron to kidnap Hitler.
- Who's that big dark fellow by the table?
- That's Young, Gibson's second in command.
Dinghy Young, they call him, because he always comes down in the sea.
And paddles home in his rubber boat.
Oi! Here's Gibson.
He's done 1 7 3 sorties already.
Stay there, Nigger.
Stay there, boy.
You know most of the chaps,
I think.
All right, carry on, please.
- Hello, sir.
- Hello, Dinghy.
- McCarthy, sir.
- Oh yes, of course. Glad you're with us.
Hello, Maudslay. You two chaps are going to be my flight commanders.
- What's it all about, sir?
- You'll find out, sooner or later.
- You've met Mickey Martin, haven't you?
- Yes, of course. Hello, Mickey.
I wanted you for this.
You're the low-flying expert.
You'll be able to tell us all about it.
Low-flying? Fine.
- Hello, sir.
- Hello, Hoppy. Hello, Shannon.
I found Nigger outside.
Can I stand him a beer?
Don't give him more than a pint.
Right.
Don't drink it too quickly or you'll get hiccups.
Well, sir...when are we going to get something to fly in?
They're sending the first batch of Lancs tomorrow.
That makes the ten they promised us to get started with.
Have them flown and tested tomorrow.
We can begin this afternoon dividing the crews into flights.
The first job will be to fly over every big lake in England and Wales and photograph them.
- Lakes?
- Lakes.
- The crews are in the briefing room, sir.
- All right, I'll come.
Right, you can sit down.
Well...here we are all together for the first time.
You're wondering what it's all about and I can't tell you because I don't know myself.
But I do know it's a big thing.
And if it comes off, it will have results that may do quite a bit to shorten this war.
Discipline is going to be essential.
So is security.
It's unusual for a crowd like you to be formed into a new squadron so you're going to be talked about.
Rumours are flying about already but you have got to keep your mouths shut!
All here will depend on secrecy.
If we can surprise them, then we'll play hell with them.
But if they're ready for us, then the hell is going to come from the other side.
Now I understand that the job, whatever it is, has got to be done at low level.
So the first thing is to practise low-flying day and night until we can do it with our eyes shut.
Come in.
- Hello, Mutt.
- This is Wing Commander Guy Gibson.
Oh, good morning.
I'm glad you've come.
- My name is Barnes Wallis.
- Morning, sir.
Well, I'll leave you to it.
See you later.
- Right. Thanks.
- Thanks a lot, Mutt.
Would you like to put those things down?
Give me that.
Thank you.
I don't smoke but there's sometimes have a cigarette in here...
- Yes, there we are.
- Thank you.
Well, I don't suppose you know very much about all this at present.
I don't know anything about anything yet.
- But you know the target.
- No, not the faintest idea.
My dear boy... Well, I thought they would have told you.
This makes it very awkward.
Isn't that what I'm here for, to be told by you?
Oh no, not the target.
That's dreadfully secret.
I'm afraid I can't tell anybody whose name isn't on this list.
Still, I'll tell you as much as I dare.
Well you see, there are certain objects in the enemy territory that are very big and quite vital to this war effort.
They're so big that ordinary bombs won't hurt them.
But I've got an idea for a special type of bomb only it would have to be dropped at very low level.
Oh, they've told us about low-flying.
Oh, they have?
Oh, well that's something.
Well, I don't know if you're scientifically minded...
In any case, it wouldn't be necessary for you or any of your crews to understand the theory and mathematics of the weapon.
I'd like to try and understand it if I can.
You would?
Oh, splendid.
I'll explain it all to you later on paper.
But first of all,
I'd like you to see some films.
You can leave your things here, it's only in the next room.
Ready?
Right, this way.
- Er, are you ready?
- Yes, sir.
Bring up a couple of chairs.
Right.
Now these are the first dropping tests at Chesil Beach, near Weymouth.
Here comes the Wellington.
Mutt Summers is the pilot and I'm working the release gear.
Now in a moment, you'll see the bomb.
There it goes...
Now watch.
Now we switch to one of the big testing tanks at Teddington.
These pictures were taken much earlier, when I was experimenting with miniatures but they show what the bomb does underwater.
There it goes.
Now that's exactly how a full size bomb would behave.
At 30 feet down, an hydrostatic pistol would automatically explode the charge.
Well, you can see now why this low-flying is so important.
Each aircraft will only be able to carry one bomb and it must be dropped from exactly 150 feet at a speed of 240 miles an hour.
Above or below that height and speed and it just doesn't work.
Take a chair, won't you?
I'm sorry, we're tied so closely, but it's all a question of gravity and mathematics.
I'm afraid I'm asking a great deal of you.
Do you think you can fly it to those limits?
Well, it's hard to say off hand.
The altimeter does no good at that level but they've given me some of the best pilots in the Air Force.
So we'll see what we can do.
Have you tested the full size bomb yet?
No, it's being assembled now.
I hope to try it in a week or ten days.
Do you really mean that a five ton bomb can bounce along the water like a ping-pong ball?
It's been hard to persuade some people that it will but I've every reason to believe it will behave exactly like those miniatures.
How far from the target do we drop the bomb?
Ah, that's the third factor that I'm afraid requires absolute accuracy.
I've got a little more work to do on it but I think it'll be 600 yards.
Did you invent this thing out of your own head?
Well...yes...
I think I may say I invented it.
Well I think it's terrific.
I thought so at one time, but I'm beginning to think that the job of inventing it was small compared with the job of dropping it.
Well, we'll do our best.
I'm talking right in the dark at present.
If only I knew what the target was...
Yes... Well, I've told you as much as I dare.
I hope they'll tell you the rest when you get back.
Well, Gibson, there it is.
That's your main target:
The Möhne dam.
So that's it.
I thought it was going to be the Tirpitz.
If you can blow a hole in this wall, you'll bring the Ruhr steel industry to a standstill and do much other damage besides.
I'm showing you the targets but you'll be the only man in the squadron who knows, so... keep it that way.
Very good, sir.
These are the models of the two other dams:
The Eder and the Sorpe.
- But the Möhne is the most important.
- I see, sir.
Come along and study these as often as you like.
We're having regular reconnaissance to see what they're doing over there and watch the height of the water.
The operation must be carried out when the lakes are full.
When is that likely to be, sir?
About the middle of May.
We'll need a good moon as well, so it looks as though we're tied to a night between the 12th and 17th.
By the time the next full moon comes around the water level will have started to fall again so that's our only chance this year, about five weeks from now.
How's the training going?
Oh, pretty well, sir.
Except for the low-flying.
- I guessed you'd be in trouble over that.
- It's fairly easy by day, but night-flying over water at 150 feet is pretty near impossible.
- You can't trust your altimeter?
- Not at the limits that Mr Wallis wants.
He was very emphatic about flying at 150 feet exactly.
I'd hoped we could get over it by practice but on still nights, when the water is smooth, there's a sort of a no man's land between the dusk and the water.
I've got the Farnborough experts on that.
I hope they'll come along with an idea.
Wallis is going to test the full size bomb at Reculver tomorrow.
I'd like you to go down and watch
- Take your bombing leader with you.
- Right, sir.
Can I see your passes, please?
Thank you.
- Hello, Gibson.
- Hello, sir.
This is Bob Hay, my bombing leader.
I'm sorry to drag you here so early.
We had to catch the high tide.
It goes right out here, so when it's low we can wade in and find the bombs and see how they stand up to the shock of impact.
- Have you started yet?
- Yes, we've dropped two already.
How did they go?
Erm, not too well, I'm afraid the casing broke. We're testing another.
Well, they're due now, any minute.
Here it comes.
It's broken again.
I'm sorry to bring you all the way here to see that.
There's no need to worry,
I'll get it right.
I'm sorry, gentlemen.
I shall have to strengthen the casing.
- I'll begin work at once.
- Well, how long will it take?
A few days.
When the tide's out, we'll collect the fragments and see what happened.
I said all along it wouldn't work.
I'm afraid you must think me rather a fraud.
Not at all, sir.
But you know, things nearly always happen like that first
- when you're trying something new.
- Yes, I'm sure they do.
- How are you getting on with the low-flying?
- It's awfully hard to get accuracy,
I mean, to within a few feet - especially at night over water.
- Still we'll find some way of doing it.
- Yes, yes, it must be very difficult.
Bomb aiming is another headache, sir.
The ordinary bombsight isn't accurate enough at such a low level.
And you want the aircraft to drop that bomb dead at the same spot, one after the other.
Yes, yes, within a few feet.
We'll look after our own headaches and leave you to look after yours.
I'm afraid that's all we can do at present.
Oh, I should get it right within a few days.
- You must try and come down again.
- I'd like to, sir.
- Good luck.
- Good luck to you.
- And to those boys of yours.
- Thanks.
The tide is going out, I must wade in and collect some of the pieces.
- Can we help?
- Oh, no, no. I'm used to it.
I just feel about in the mud with my toes.
Sometimes I get a bit of bomb, sometimes it's cockles.
How are we going to fly at a level of 150 feet in the dark?
That's what I want to know.
Maybe if we left a navigator down on the end of a 150 foot wire:
When he calls out, we'll know we're too low!
No bombsight that works at low level, a bomb that falls to bits, no way of flying at 150 feet and the raid, at all costs, in five weeks.
Otherwise, everything's marvelous.
We've got to go through London so let's have a darn good dinner a bottle of wine, a musical with lots of dazzling girls and... and the night train back.
Sing, soldier as you march along
Sing, sailor sing a shanty song
Let the sound float around everywhere
Soon the pilots will pick up the air
Zum-tarara!
Sing, worker make a cheerful sound...
She's nice, isn't she?
Let it ring, have your fling
Life's a bird in the spring
And sing, everybody sing
Sing, soldier as you should march along
Sing, sailor sing a shanty song
Let the sound float around everywhere
Soon the pilots will pick up the air
Zum-tarara!
Sing, worker make a cheerful sound
Sweet music makes the wheels go round
Let it ring, have your fling...
- Don't you think she's nice?
- What?
- A nice kid.
- Yes, quite.
Up a bit...
A bit more.
Now hold it.
Much too much.
Down...down...
Hold it now.
Fine.
Sir, have a drink to celebrate.
- We've done the trick.
- What trick?
Flying at 150 feet. No need for altimeters, no need for anything else.
- How's that?
- It's simple: a couple of spotlamps.
One in the nose, the other in the belly, trained to shine down and meet together at 150 feet below the aircraft.
Watch through the cockpit blister and keep the two spots plumb together on the ground or the water and there you are, at 150 feet, accurate to an inch.
Yeah, but that would mean carrying lights rights into the attack.
That's better than finishing up on the drink.
That's wonderful!
How did you think of it?
Genius, pure genius! We gave the idea to Farnborough and they did the rest.
We still need a bombsight that works at low level.
When are we getting some real bombs?
It's annoying not knowing a damn thing about anything.
I know...
But the old boy has got new trials on Friday, you ought to go down again.
He's pretty sure it'll work this time.
Oh my God!
- It's a bad business, isn't it?
- Yes, I'm afraid it is.
- What are you going to do?
- I know the trouble, I must work in it again.
Well, here we are, the 22nd of April...
The deadline for the raid is the 19th of May.
- That's barely four weeks.
- Give me a few more days. A week, at most.
If we're going to change the design the factories will never do it in time.
I shan't change the design, I must just strengthen the casing and try a new method of release.
Well, a week from today.
If it doesn't work then, we shall have to call it off.
There's nothing else we can do.
Hello, there.
Hello, Gibson.
I was wondering if you were here.
I was watching from down there.
Why didn't you come and watch it with me here?
I knew how you must be feeling,
I guessed you'd rather be alone.
It's a devil, isn't it?
Yes, it is rather.
It's most disappointing. I shall have to go all out on some modifications.
- I wonder if I could ask you to do something.
- Of course, anything I can.
Well you see, it isn't only the structure of the bomb that's the trouble, it's in the dropping of it - we muss lessen the force of the impact.
I asked you originally if you could fly in over water and drop the bomb at 150 feet.
I wonder if you could do it at 60 feet?
- That's very low...
- Oh, yes. I do realise that.
You'd only have to hiccup to finish in the drink.
Yes, I've got no right to ask you to do a thing like that but I'm afraid it will be our only way.
We've had a bit of luck.
We've found a way of fixing our height with spotlamps.
I'll have them altered for 60 feet and have a crack at it tomorrow.
You will?
That's...that's splendid.
If it's too dangerous, you mustn't hesitate to let me know.
Oh, we'll do it all right.
Down...down...
Down...
Steady...
Up a bit.
Up a bit more.
Steady.
Steady...steady...
Hold it now.
Hold it, hold it.
This is bloodily dangerous!
"Sir, as a poultry farmer doing his best in the food crisis
"l wish to protest against the stupid young men
"who indulge in idiotic joy riding at all hours of the night.
"It may be good fun for them..."
"...it may be good fun for them, but I would point out that
"every time they come over our poultry houses, my hens lay premature eggs
"that drop off the perches and mess up the floor.
"This means a serious loss to both me and the country."
Sir!
You've picked up something here.
You were right about that tree, we did take the top off.
I know where it came from.
I suppose we'd better send it back.
- Well, it's now or never, Mutt.
- Don't you worry, it's going to be all right.
You'd better get a move on.
It's a good half hour's drive to Reculver.
Take a longer run in to be certain of that altitude.
I'll watch it.
- Well, good luck.
- You pray for me, I'll pray for you.
If he doesn't hurry up, it'll be dark.
The poor chap is probably hoping it will be dark.
The time I wasted on this damn thing is driving me crazy.
It will all be over soon one way or another.
Sorry to keep you all waiting. There are so many last minute things to attend to.
Go ahead.
You'd better get a move on.
Hello, Gibson.
We've had an awful day
I never thought we'd do it.
These observer fellows... I felt like a man being driven out for execution.
Don't say another word till you've looked over there and wished.
- What?
- New moon.
Oh!
- Have you wished?
- Oh, yes! And you?
Yep. That's our moon.
It's going to be a lucky one.
I hope so. Oh, I do hope so.
Well, we're all right on altitude if we can fly at 60 feet in the dark.
May dear boy, can you do that?
That's absolutely splendid!
Yes, we've been at it all week.
- Here they come.
- Good luck.
Oh, my dear God!
- Well, I must say, that was wonderful.
- I'm immensely relieved.
- Do you smoke, Wallis?
- No, thanks.
I'll get through to the factories tonight and give them the green light.
Any final instructions for them?
No, they can go ahead on the same specifications they were given last week.
Well, Mr Wallis, it must be a wonderful feeling to achieve a thing like this... to conceive something absolutely unheard of and carry it through with flying colours.
How on Earth did you ever get the idea?
Well... To be quite honest, it isn't really my idea at all. l...
I got it from Nelson.
Nelson, you say?
Yes, he discovered that under certain conditions he could get more destructive results from his cannon balls by making them ricochet off the sea before hitting the enemy ships.
Usually he pitched them about two thirds of the way between his guns and the target.
But there is some evidence to suggest that during the Battle of the Nile he dismissed the French flagship with a yorker.
Wing Commander Gibson, sir.
- Good evening, Gibson.
- Good evening, sir.
I've been looking at the reconnaissance photographs that came in today.
It looks as if the water will be at the level we need in a week's time.
The moon's full next Tuesday, so we're pretty close to deadline.
We're all right on low flying, but there's still the matter of the special bombsight.
Yes, I've had the backroom boys busy on that.
You're going to laugh when you see this.
It looks like a coat hanger from a bazaar.
Do you see the idea? Your bomb aimer keeps his eye to this peephole.
When these two nails are in direct alignment with the towers, then you'll be exactly 600 yards from the wall...and away goes your bomb.
Do you think it's too simple?
No, sir. I'm all in favour of things being simple, but, Good Lord...
There it is. Try it out on the towers at the Derwent Water dam.
Bomb gone.
Bomb gone.
Bomb gone!
Well, the sixpenny bombsight works and the spotlamps work.
We've flown 2,000 hours and dropped more than 2,000 practice bombs.
The specially converted aircraft start arriving tomorrow.
So from now until the word go, practise flying them at you're proper all-up weights.
You can work that out, Dinghy.
Don't forget that some of the armour's been taken out.
And don't exceed 63,000lbs, otherwise we shan't get off.
- Any problems?
- Does the front gunner stay in his turret?
Yes, he'll have to deal with the flak guns.
The trouble is that his feet dangle in front of the bomb-aimer's face.
How about fixing up stirrups to get his feet out of the way and make him more comfortable?
- That's a good plan.
- Have you any idea when we're going, sir?
Probably within a week, but keep it under your hats.
You won't have to put up with being called the armchair squadron much longer.
Two months without an operation - it's getting a stale joke now.
There was nearly a riot when a fellow from 57th Squadron started it again.
Our fellows would feel better if they blew off steam.
All right, the next time anyone start's being funny, have a riot.
All right, that's all.
- Have you seen the squadron orders?
- Yes. Same old stuff.
It's good to have an evening off for once.
Yes, 16 ops last month,
7 in the first two weeks in May.
What are you fellows going to do when you've worn those armchairs out?
It's a joke, you know.
Can't you take it?
We're getting a little tired of it.
Come on chaps.
Come in.
The Group Captain's asking for you, sir.
He's waiting outside.
- Steady!
- Let go!
- Thank you, sir.
- Saved my life.
- Hello, Guy.
- What's going on?
One of the boys from 57th Squadron shot his mouth off once too often.
I've just had word from Group.
Weather reports are good.
If it holds like this, you'll do the job tomorrow night.
Good. What about the bombs?
They’re arriving now.
I'm glad we're going.
There's no harm telling your flight commanders, but keep it to yourselves.
Right.
I'll break up that show in there and get the boys to bed.
Fine.
- I'll see you in the morning. Goodnight.
- Goodnight.
- Would you sit there, sir, please?
- Yes.
Be seated gentlemen, please.
For the past six weeks you've been wondering why this squadron has been formed...
Commander Gibson, carry on.
Well, the training's over.
For obvious reasons, you've had to work without knowing your target or even your weapon.
You've had to put up with a good deal from other people who think you've been having a soft time.
But tonight, you're going to have the chance to hit the enemy harder and more destructively than any small force has ever done before.
You're going to attack the great dams of Western Germany.
Here are your targets.
Here's the Möhne dam.
That's the Eder.
And there's the Sorpe.
All just east of the Ruhr.
Now, we shall attack in 3 formations.
The first will take the Möhne dam as its first target, then carry on to the Eder.
That will be nine aircraft in three waves, taking off ten minutes between each wave.
I'll lead the first with
Hopgood and Martin.
Young leads the second with Maltby and Shannon.
And Maudslay the third, with Knight ans Astell.
The second formation will consist of five aircraft.
Joe McCarthy, Byers, Barlow,
Rice and Munro.
They'll go by this northern route to attack the Sorpe, and also act as a diversion to split up enemy fighters.
The third formation will follow as a mobile reserve to fill in gaps.
That will be five aircraft.
Townsend, Anderson, Brown,
Ottley and Burpee.
There's a full moon tonight, so normal ops are out.
We'll be the only people flying.
And to avoid the fighters, we'll have to keep at zero feet all the way there and back.
Any questions?
- Can I say something about the route, sir?
- Yes, go ahead.
I see you've taken it very near a synthetic rubber factory at Hüls.
There's a great deal of flak around there.
It's a hot spot. We nearly got the chop there about three months ago.
Can I suggest we go a little further north?
Yes, we knew about that when we planned the route.
The trouble is, if we go much further north, we run into another hot spot round here.
Anyway, we can take it up a little.
Now, the gap isn't too wide, so watch it, you navigators.
What about the defences on the dam, sir?
Reconnaissance show's them as being fairly light, you'll see the photos in a minute.
Any balloons, sir?
Up till yesterday, the nearest ones were around a small factory 1 2 miles away.
We don't expect any.
Sorry old boy.
It's secret, you can't go in.
Come on, hop it.
Hello, Nigger, old boy.
What are you doing?
Who are you looking for, eh?
He's not in his office.
You'd better try somewhere else.
Go on, away you go. Go on!
Hello, Nigger.
No, not in here, old boy. Go on.
Hello, Nigger, old boy.
What are you doing around here?
Nigger!
Well, there it is. That's what the bomb does, the rest is for you.
And may I say... good luck to you all.
The Möhne lake looks rather like a big double tooth.
These strips of water are the roots with the dam here in the crown.
Here's the Körbecke bridge where we assemble.
And here's the spit of land which gives us a head on approach for the attack.
Study these models.
Get every detail into your heads until you know them with your eyes shut.
Get these code words off by heart.
"Goner" is the word for the explosion of a bomb in the right place.
"Nigger" is the code word for a breach in the Möhne dam and "Dinghy" for a breach in the Eder.
Do you want me, Crosby?
Er, I'm sorry, sir, it's Nigger... he's been run over. He's dead.
The car didn't even stop.
- Where did it happen?
- Outside the main gate.
He run across the road and the car hit him.
- Where is he?
- Ln the guard room, sir.
I see.
- Bacon and eggs for me, please.
- Are you flying tonight, sir?
Am I flying?! You know perfectly well I'm the person who pays you every fortnight.
Your bread and jam is on the centre table, sir.
No harm in trying.
- We've got the wrong oil.
- It was checked this morning.
No, I don't mean that oil.
It's the bomb release gear.
Wallis is chasing around for the right kind.
- Can he get it?
- I hope so.
- Are you flying tonight, sir?
- That's the general idea.
Can I have you next egg if you don't come back?
OK, I'll have yours if you don't.
We've still got an hour.
Let's put our feet up for a bit before we change.
Not a bad idea. Come on.
- Got anything for me?
- Just one, sir.
- It's only a missed bill!
- I think I'll pay that tomorrow.
Thank you.
It's all right, they had some of the lighter oil in store.
- Oh, good.
- They're changing it now.
- Bit of luck you noticed it.
- It was my fault it wasn't made clear.
- What about some supper?
- Well... I think I'll have some later.
- Does it worry you, having me about?
- No, I'm jolly glad you came!
Was my talk at the briefing all right?
Oh, fine.
You sold them that bomb hands down.
Coffee, sir?
Er, no, thank you.
Go on, have some.
There's plenty of time.
Oh, thank you.
Evening, sir.
- Flight...
- Sir?
Just a minute.
You know that Nigger was killed this afternoon?
Yes, sir. I'm very sorry.
Would you bury him at midnight on the grass verge outside my office?
Very good, sir.
I'd like you to do it at about the time we're going into the job over there.
I'll see it's done, sir.
Hello, Hoppy. Tonight's the night, tomorrow we'll have a party.
Come in.
- Laundry just in, sir.
- Oh, great.
Well...
I think I'll have a clean shirt and a nice clean shave.
What do you want to shave for now?
If we have to bail out, you never know who we might meet.
There's no point in me bothering.
If we come down together and there happens to be two about, I'll get the ugly one!
- All right, sir?
- Yes.
Well, chaps, my watch says time to go.
- How is she, Sergeant?
- Bang on, sir.
- All set?
- Yes, sir.
You've done a fine job with this team.
- I couldn't have asked for a better one.
- Good luck.
Thank you, sir.
Good luck.
Come on, then.
OK, Hutch.
Pitch fully fine.
- Pitch fully fine.
- Check fuel.
- Fuel OK.
- Lamps 25 degrees.
- Lamps 25 degrees.
- Radiator shutters automatic.
Radiator shutters automatic.
Well, I suppose there's nothing much we can do.
Except wait.
The A.O.C. is waiting to take us back to Grantham.
Send a message to Hopgood.
Heay, Sparks?
P-Popsy signalling.
Martin is having a chat with Hopgood.
What's he saying, Hutch?
He says we're going to get speeches tomorrow night.
Sure we are!
Biggest binge of all time.
Carry on.
- Well, Coggie, how is it going?
- All right so far, sir.
The first wave is about 20 miles from the Dutch coast.
Enemy radar has probably picked them up by now.
Cheer up, Wallis. This is your night as well as theirs.
Skipper, ground speed: 203.
We'll be there in one hour and ten minutes.
Will be over the Dutch coast in two minutes.
There it is now.
Stand by, front gunner, we're going over.
The second wave should be coming up to the Dutch coast now.
Enemy coast ahead.
Enemy coast ahead.
We should be on the line of the canal.
OK, I've got it.
Watch out for pylons.
- There they are.
- Pylons.
At the junction, we alter course.
The next thing we see in the Rhein.
This is new.
Hutch, warn the others.
New course, skipper:
165, magnetic.
The northern wave have run into trouble on the coast.
McCarthy is going on the
Sorpe dam by himself.
Gibson's formation should be nearly at the Möhne by now.
There's the lake now.
The main lake and the dam are off to the right.
There it is, boys.
Pretty impressive, aren't they?
Someone's woken them up.
What do you think about it, Bob?
My goodness! It's big, isn't it?
Can we really break that?
How many guns do you think there are,
Trevor?
I say there's about ten guns.
Some in the field and some in the towers.
We've seem to upset them a bit.
P for Popsy, are you there?
OK, leader.
Hello, M-Mother. Are you there?
I'm here, leader.
- Here, leader.
- Here, leader.
- Here, leader.
- Here, leader.
Here, leader.
Hello, all cooler aircraft.
I'm going into attack.
Stand by to come in to your order when I tell.
Hello, M for Mother.
Stand by to take over if anything happens.
OK, leader.
Good luck.
Check height.
Speed control, Pulford.
Gunners ready.
Coming up, Spam.
- This is fine, I can see everything.
- Down a little.
- Steady.
Down a little.
Stand by to pull me under the seat if I get hit.
- Steady...
Steady...
- Hold her steady.
- Hold that.
- That's fine.
- Bomb, gone!
Good shot! Nice work!
- Nice work, Skipper.
- Bang on, Skipper.
It's gone, we've done it.
We haven't. It's still there.
Hello, M for Mother.
Are you there?
Standing by, leader.
Hang on a minute, until the water comes down.
Hutch, send back codeword "Goner".
Goner... from G-George.
That's all.
I'd hoped one bomb might do it.
Hello, M-Mother.
It's your turn, you can go in now.
- Good luck.
- OK, leader. Attacking!
Stand by to go in.
If he doesn't drop his bomb now it'll be too late.
He's dropped it. There it goes.
Oh, they've got him!
It's from right over the top.
Hello, P for Popsy.
- Are you there?
- OK, leader.
You can go right in.
I'll fly across the dam to draw the flak off you.
OK, thanks, leader.
Stand by, everyone.
We're going in.
- Down a bit.
- Down a bit.
- Steady... Up a bit.
It's all yours, Bob.
- Steady.
- Hold her...
- Hold her, steady.
- Hold her.
- That's fine.
Bomb gone!
The wing is hit!
Starboard out was empty, thank God.
- Bomb's gone, leader.
- OK, Popsy.
Let me know when you're out of the flak.
All OK Behind.
Goner from P-Popsy.
That's all.
Hello, A-Apple. Are you ready?
OK, leader.
Let me know when you're in position and I'll draw the flak for you.
P-Popsy, are you hit?
Starboard wing, but we're all right, we can make it.
A-Apple is going to attack.
Come in on his starboard side and help me draw the flak.
OK, leader.
A-Apple making bombing run.
Goner... from A-Apple.
That's all.
Hello, J-Johnny.
Are you ready?
OK, leader.
All right, go ahead.
We'll come in with you.
- Are you there, Dave?
- Ready, leader.
OK. Stand by to attack.
It's gone! Look!
My God;
- Are you there, Dave?
- Ready, leader.
It's all right. Skip it!
All right, boys.
Nice work! You've had your look.
P-Popsy and J-Johnny, set course for home.
The rest of you come along with me.
It's Nigger! It's gone!
- You've done it, Wallis.
- Well done, well done!
Congratulations!
I reckon you should be able to see it by now.
No sign of it.
Do you recognise anything, Spam?
Plenty of water...
No dam yet.
Wait...there it is!
All right, Dave.
You go in first.
There doesn't seem to be any flaks, but it's not going to be easy with all these hills.
- Can you see the castle?
- I've got it, leader.
That's your way in.
Take your time. We've only got three bombs.
OK, leader. Going in now.
Down...down...
Down...down...down...
- We're too high.
- Down...
We're too high, Skipper.
We won't make it.
Steady...hold it there.
It's too late, Skipper.
It's too late.
Sorry, leader.
Made a mess of that.
- I'll try again.
- All right, Dave.
You hang around for a bit.
- Hello, Z-Zebra. Are you there?
- Here, leader. I've got the target.
All right, you can go in now.
There's no flak, but watch those hills.
Take your time and mind the mountain on the other side.
- OK, leader. I'm going in.
- Good luck.
He's left it too late.
Hello, Z-Zebra.
Are you all right?
I think so, leader.
Stand by.
Goner Z-Zebra.
That leaves two more.
Cocoa, sir?
- Sir?
- No.
Are you in touch with the reserve formation?
All except Burpee, sir.
He hasn't answered for some time.
Goner, L-Leather.
OK, Dave.
Bang on but you didn't break it.
Hello, N for Nuts.
Are you ready to make your attack?
- Ready, leader.
Come in down and dive for the point, Les.
Get off the air, Dave. You've got the last bomb, Les, so take your time.
Good luck.
Down...down...
Steady...hold it...
A little bit more...
That's fine, steady...
Steady...bomb gone!
It's Dinghy! They've done it!
They've got the Eder dam as well!
Wallis, when you first came to me with this
I didn't believe a word you said.
Now, you can sell me a pink elephant!
All right boys, home.
They know we're here now so keep your eyes open.
'This is London.
'The Air Ministry have just issued the following communiqué.
'ln early hours of this morning, a force of Lancasters of Bomber Command
'led by Wing Commander G. P. Gibson,
D.S.O., D.F.C.
'attacked with mines the dams of the Möhne and Sorpe reservoirs.
'These controlled two-thirds of the water storage capacity of the Ruhr basin.
'Reconnaissance later established that the Möhne dam
'had been breached over a length of 100 yards
'and that the power station below had been swept away by the resulting floods.
'The Eder dam, which controls the head-waters of the Weser and Fulda valleys
'and operates several power stations, was also attacked and reported as breached.
'Photographs show the river below the dam in full flood.
'The attacks were pressed home from a very low level
'with great determination and coolness in the face of fierce resistance.
'Eight of the Lancasters are missing.'
Is it true?
All those fellows lost?
Only two aircrafts went down in the attacks.
That was Hopgood's over the Möhne and Maudslay's over the Eder.
Astell got it soon after crossing the coast and Dinghy Young was shot down over the sea on his way home.
The rest we don't know about.
They've been calling them since midnight but they haven't answered.
The flak was bad, worse than I expected.
56 men... If I'd known it was going to be like this, I'd never have started it.
You mustn't think that way.
If these fellows had known they wouldn't be coming back they'd have gone just the same.
There isn't a single one of them that would have dropped out.
I knew them all,
I know that's true.
Look, you've had a worse night than any of us
Why don't you go and find a doctor and ask for one of his sleeping pills?
Aren't you going to turn in, Gibby?
No, I... I have to write some letters first.
Best watched using Open Subtitles MKV Player
Gentlemen, to the state of Arizona.
To Arizona.
That's good, Governor.
The state of Arizona.
I kind of like the sound of it.
I'm glad I lived to see this day.
- Mr. Griff?
- No, thank you, Governor.
- Mmm. Choice Havanas.
- I'll smoke this one.
Well, you must have something very special there.
- Very special.
- Are you writing any more books,John?
No. That was just a sideline with me.
I've been working with the Department of Interior all these years.
A friend of mine gave me this cigar.
A celebration for him too.
His 30th wedding anniversary.
Gentlemen,
I'd like to propose a toast... to a real lover of Arizona -- to my friend...
James Addison Reavis.
The man who called himself the Baron of Arizona?
Yes. He will always be a part of the Arizona legend.
Were it not for him, perhaps you gentlemen... would not have formed your senatorial committee on statehood... as fervidly as you did.
Oh, yes.
I remember that cheap swindler.
Swindler? Yes.
But cheap?
Oh, there was nothing cheap aboutJames Reavis.
You only remember what you read in the papers, Mr. Reynolds.
But I don't understand, Mr. Griff.
Uh, he's your friend?
Yes.
I always thought you were bitter enemies.
On the contrary, Governor... it was a challenge to have such a man as an adversary.
He put up a most magnificent fight against the government.
What on earth made him dream up such a fantastic swindle?
Ambition.
Wasn't he a clerk in the Santa Fe land office at one time?
Yes, he was... and it infuriated him that ignorant people inherited land... because the United States recognized Spanish grants.
So he decided to steal Arizona with forged documents.
( Man ) Didn't he spend many years
perfecting his plan?
Yes. Many years.
He studied ancient records and learned to forge them.
He studied languages.
He adopted the manners of a gentleman of culture... knowing all these things were necessary to his scheme.
He created a man called Miguel de Peralta... the first Baron of Arizona.
He was now ready to put his plan in motion.
One rainy night in 1 872...
just outside Phoenix--
( Wind Howling )
( Thunder Rumbling )
- Pepito Alvarez?
- Yes.
There is a girl living here by the name of Sofia?
Yes!
She was left with you when she was one year old.
( Thunderclap )
I am James Reavis from the land office in Santa Fe.
Come in, Mr. Reavis.
Ooh.
Arizona.
- For months it did not rain here.
- ( Chuckles )
Oh, thank you.
You mind? Mmm.
( Thunder Continues )
Mmm.
Uh, would you like a good Havana?
- I do not smoke.
- Oh.
Mr. Alvarez, uh... the government of the United States is a very fair government.
You know that.
It recognizes Spanish titles to land grants.
- Do you know what a land grant is?
- Yes.
Well, it seems that back in 1 7 48... the King of Spain gave to Miguel de Peralta... a grant of land in America.
- Did you ever hear of Peralta?
- No.
He was the first Baron of Arizona.
Baron? In America?
Yes. And according to the laws of this country... his direct descendant is the rightful heir to the Peralta grant.
The heir?
Oh, yes. That means that the person... related to him today... owns all that land.
What has this to do with Sofia?
Her real name is Sofia de Peralta.
-( Thunder Rumbling )
- Here are the papers to prove it.
You, uh --
You make family for Sofia with these papers?
Read it.
I do not read.
Well, according to these papers, she is the last of the Peraltas.
( Girl Humming )
- Sofia?
- She's singing Dolores to sleep.
Who is Dolores?
This is, uh, Estrelita, Dolores's sister.
- Ah.
- I make family for Sofia too.
But not so good for her like these papers.
Ah. Call the lucky little mother.
Sofia!
Sofia.!
( Humming )
( Griff)
To Reavis, this undernourished child... was the basis of his claim to establish an empire.
He knew it would not be difficult to convince her... that she had noble blood.
I suppose it stunned this, uh, Pepito Alvarez.
Yes. But he was happy for the child.
Reavis took them from their adobe shack to his home in Santa Fe...
where he lost no time
in molding her into a baroness.
- Good morning.
- Good morning.
You are Miss Loma Morales, unmarried... a teacher from Las Vegas College.
Eh, Pepito, this is Miss Loma Morales.
- Mr. Alvarez.
- Loma?
What kind of name is that?
Loma means a hill.
I was born in Yucca Loma.
Were the terms in my letter satisfactory?
This is the child, Sofia de Peralta.
She is a baroness.
Do you wish the position
as her governess?
( Griff Narrating )
The child showed promise.
Loma taught her how to walk...
sit, curtsy...
eat and listen.
And while Sofia
learned how to write...
Reavis was writing
in his own fashion--
writing on a stone
the foundation of a false claim...
that would stun a nation.
You all remember
that inscription on the rock.
'I have marked this stone
the heart of my grant...
'awarded to me
by Ferdinand VI, King of Spain...
'on December 20, 1 7 48.
'I, Miguel de Peralta,
Baron of Arizona...
take possession on this day,
August 1 2, 1 750. ''
( Wind Whistling )
Read to me again. Again?
Read to me?
- Where did you get this book, Sofia?
- In your room.
You must never take what is not yours.
Yes, sir.
Sit down here beside me.
Once upon a time... there was a little princess... who had royal blood in her veins.
But no one knew it except a prince... who spent many years in many lands... looking for her.
It is very pretty.
Sofia.
Sofia?
Happy birthday, Baroness.
( Reavis )
The Colorado will be your private Riviera.
Every day will be a holiday.
New Year's in the Painted Desert.
Christmas in the Gila Valley.
And Thanksgiving in the Pine Timber.
And the Grand Canyon -- the Grand Canyon will be your play yard.
That's a real birthday present, Sofia, from the United States.
Over 1 1 3,000 square miles -- as large as Italy-- and it's all yours -- every mile, every foot, every inch.
I promise you this birthright, Sofia.
Are you going away for a long time?
There are many important documents to gather so that you can inherit all this.
Can't you do it here?
I'm afraid it's not that simple.
Then I do not want it!
What did Aristotle say of dignity?
He said, ''Dignity consists... not in possessing honors, but in deserving them.''
- And?
- And I shall try to deserve them.
Good. You and I must never lose our bearings, Sofia... not even for an instant.
- ( Crying )
- You must have dignity. Only peasants cry.
I know, but I want to go with you!
I want to go with you!
I want to go with you!
- I want to go with you!
- You are Sofia de Peralta, Baroness of Arizona.
Say it!
I -- I am Sofia de Peralta...
Baroness of Arizona.
( Griff Narrating ) He then
established evidence of Sofia's birth...
and falsified records...
creating for her an entire family
of noble blood--
the family of one Miguel de Peralta.
And before the ink
certifying them was dry...
he falsified the existence
ofher parents...
and carefully arranged
to have them properly laid to rest.
Having provided Sofia
with the necessary ancestry...
he sailed for Spain
to complete his worldwide forgery.
He had only one more act to perform--
falsification of
the original land grant book...
of Ferdinand VI...
which was in
the well-guarded archives--
the biblioteca
in the monastery of Alcántara.
- The Father Guardian will see you now.
- Oh, thank you, Brother.
- Have you come for a short visit?
- I have come to stay.
Oh, uh, forgive me, Father.
I mean I -- I would like to stay very much.
Hmm. But why have you chosen our order?
Well, I have made careful survey, Father, and from the little I know of your order...
I feel very much attracted to it.
There is much to prove before you can join our order.
After all,you must admit
we know nothing about you.
Charity commands us to accept you on your face value... but for practical purposes, you will have sufficient time to prove yourself.
By the time you are through with your novitiate... we will know more about you.
Oh, Brother Anthony, welcome to the library of Alcántara.
I'm Brother Gregory, the custodian.
May I assist you?
Oh, thank you, Brother Gregory.
This is our scriptorium... where we study and do most of our spiritual work.
It's very interesting.
We have a fine collection of books which you will enjoy.
The scribe room... where our experts copy and illuminate manuscripts.
The illumination is magnificent.
And the calligraphy!
The repair room... where we strengthen and sew bindings.
- Is this for sewing the bindings?
- Yes, that's right.
- And the, uh, press?
- Yes, the press.
Uh, those are cakes of ink.
Yes, we make our own ink... and have not changed the formula in five centuries.
And this is our biblioteca.
This is where we preserve our ancient books... and, uh, priceless records.
Oh.
You are surprised to find them chained?
I can understand.
But to remove a book is strictly forbidden.
- But surely no one would dare.
- Well, who knows?
Once a rare book collector acted rather strangely in this cell... and we were compelled to summon the civil police from Seville... to investigate him.
The Mazarin Bible... the first work of Gutenberg printed in 1 450.
- I thought it was in two volumes.
- You're right, Brother Anthony.
Christopher Columbus's son borrowed the second volume... and, uh, never returned it.
The books and, uh, records are listed.
- You're welcome at all times.
- Thank you, Brother Gregory.
( Griff Narrating ) He lost no time
stealing ammonia from the infirmary...
and milk and meal
from the kitchen.
He mixed a solution
and tried it out.
He had to make sure
he could remove the ink.
He rubbed the surface of the page
with pumice...
to smooth the irritated grain.
That night he gathered his equipment
and hurried to the biblioteca...
to forge the Peralta grant
in the 1 7 48 volume.
This was his first major catastrophe.
But he never admitted defeat.
For months he practiced ancient penmanship.
For months he made attempts to enter the biblioteca... while the others were asleep.
But he failed.
One day, however... he conceived a simple but most effective plan...
of gaining entry into the biblioteca
where he could work.
In his cell, he deliberately left
a sample ofhis penmanship.
( Bell Tolling )
- Brother Anthony, did you write this?
- Yes, Father.
I'm assigning you to the library to assist Brother Gregory.
- I prefer field work.
- You've been here three years.
You're a hard worker, but your talent would be wasted.
- But, Father, I --
- I suggest you go to the library.
Yes, Father.
And this is our biblioteca... where we preserve our ancient books and priceless records.
- To remove one of the books --
- Brother Anthony.
Yes, Father.
The books and documents are listed.
Will you get the land grant records of 1 7 48, please?
Yes, the binding must be repaired.
I wonder what condition the other copy is in.
No, you may keep the keys.
Brother Gregory is ill, but will be well tomorrow.
You are custodian of the library for tonight.
When Brother Paul has finished repairing the binding, be sure to return the book.
Yes, Father Guardian.
Oh, Father Guardian.
Yes?
Is there another copy of such a valuable book?
The 1 7 50 volume.
It was written here.
But the Marqués de Santella has it.
He is secretary to the king.
Are you ill?
No, Father.
I was just thinking of the book.
I understand your concern
for ancient documents... but do not despair.
They're well preserved in his castle near Madrid.
Oh, I came here to the archive... to seek peace within myself, Father.
You are tempted to run away.
I am not for this kind of life, Father.
Others have been tempted too.
Meditate.
We shall talk tomorrow.
You know how it is, Father.
There are so many reports, so many complaints.
But in your case, we came
just as soon as we were notified.
I'm glad you came today. I --
Oh, Brother Anthony.!
Brother Anthony.!
Brother Anthony.!
Brother Anthony!
I did not think he would run away.
Run away? The wagon.
He has taken our horses and wagon.
- We'll bring them back.
- That's not the way.
He would not speak to me for fear I would inspire him to stay.
Yes, he did appear frightened.
As I was telling you, Father... your complaints finally brought official action.
Tomorrow all holes in the mountain roads will be filled... even those beyond the Roman Bridge.
( People Chattering, Laughing )
( Man Laughing )
Some wine, Father.
Your horse is dead, Father, your wagon firewood.
I found you -- me, Rita.
I'm not a monk, Rita.
To escape police,
I had to wear this robe.
Who are you?
A wanderer, like Cain, looking for a woman of my own.
I tell you, she was beautiful... but I told her that a Spanish promise is like a Spanish pepper.
It burns whoever tastes it.
- Here's a hat.
- Oh, thank you, Angie.
- And here's a coat.
- Ah.
- I think this will fit you.
- Ah, thanks.
What's the matter? Aren't you gonna finish the stew I made for you?
- Oh, certainly, Angie. It's excellent.
- It's your horses.
Two years ago in Madrid
I was dining with royalty one night.
One of them said that no amount of washing... could turn a gypsy white.
- I accused him of insulting the gypsies.
- You said that to a nobleman?
I spit in his face and received 20 lashes on my back.
That pig of a nobleman was the Marqués de Santella.
Santella? Secretary to the king?
He's a pig.
He prays every night to the devil.
- He's rich.
- I know, and I have a plan.
In his house is much gold.
I know exactly where it is hidden.
But I need help, and we can all share in that great wealth.
- It's too dangerous.
- She is right.
A thief never takes chances.
We can get that gold.
- Then why do you need us?
- I told you, I have a plan.
As it is, they chase us like dogs from one province to another.
Madrid.!
The marqués would order half of Spain to hunt us down.
Does a girl make decisions for you?
She has a man's shrewdness.
A shrewd woman would know when to trust a man.
Well, why should we trust you?
We don't know who you really are or... where you come from.
Tomorrow you leave our camp!
I told you to leave tomorrow!
Take me with you.
I want to go with you.
I will not be in the way.
I will be good to you.
I will be very friendly.
- Perhaps.
- You will take me?
Yes.
Yes, I can see you in Paris, London, America... everybody bowing to you, treating you like a lady.
But you'll marry one of your own... and have many dirty-faced children.
No, no, no, no, no.
But you can't leave your people, Rita.
They depend on you. They listen to you.
I hate them.
Oh, Rita, you're like a rich curtain before a doorway... of wild, wonderful miracles.
There is no longer a curtain.
Each band is a sin... and I want to confess them all to you.
You make it very hard to refuse.
I've known many women, but with you it's different. With you I'm afraid.
Is it true what you said?
That no washing will turn a gypsy white?
It takes money.
It's all yours. Money I've saved, stolen, hidden from the others.
I hate living in the woods like an animal... people spitting at me and treating me like a mongrel.
- It's not enough for what we both want.
- Then we shall get more.
The Marqués de Santella has much gold.
Enough to dress you in fine gowns and take you far away from here.
Anything! Anything you say!
Only promise you'll take me with you.
I don't understand Rita.
Last night... she said it was too dangerous to go to Madrid.
Today she says we go to Madrid.
Mm-hmm.
I don't like this moving around all the time!
It makes me feel like a vagabond.
( Small Orchestra )
Where is the tall gypsy?
The one with the lovely beard.
Ah, Marquesa,
I see a rich, fat man in your life.
My husband is not a fat man.
The Marqués de Santella is a handsome man.
Oh, yes, Marquesa, he is beautiful.
It was because of me that he permitted this party.
Unless you bring me the tall gypsy at once,
I'll have you driven off.
No, wait. I thought I saw him go into the house.
No. He's in the woods... making a love potion for you.
- I think he's in the house.
- No.
He's waiting for you in the woods.
He told me.
What are you doing here?
The gypsy girl told me that you would be here.
She lied. She's jealous.
And so am I.
Last night you promised you'd spend every moment with me tonight.
We must be cautious.
Your husband.
I love my husband, but I'm bored with him... and his musty, old books.
Only a fool would waste his time on old books... when he has a beautiful, young woman to love.
Please, don't leave with the others.
Stay here in Madrid so we can be together often.
It's too dangerous here.
I'll meet you near the fountain.
I'll go first. You follow.
Promise?
I promise.
I've known many women... but with you, I'm afraid.
( Griff Narrating ) But he never kept
the rendezvous with the Marquesa...
because he had
more important things to do.
He now was ready
to come out into the open.
Sofia was traveling in Europe.
He wrote her to meet him in Paris.
- How do you like Paris?
- Is good, but I like Arizona better.
Aha. And, uh, Sofia?
In there, counting the hours.
- And Loma?
- Helping her with the dresses.
Pepito, the Bonaparte sails from Le Havre next week.
Book a passage and reserve the bridal suite.
We go home!
Bridal? You married? You?
- Not yet.
- Now, you tell me everything.
What you do, where you go, how you live... how you send so much money.
You found a senorita in Spain, huh?
At a bullfight maybe.
- No, I found her outside of Phoenix.
- Huh?
I'm going to marry Sofia.
Mr. Reavis... is good all you do for Sofia, for me -- is good -- but is only right for a man to take a woman as wife when he loves her.
- Don't you believe that I love her?
- I do not mean it that way.
But, uh, she's not a girl now.
She's a woman.
You don't know Sofia as woman.
I know her better than anyone else in the world.
But you cannot put together cake to iron... or a girl to an old man.
- Old man?
- Well, uh --
Well, why not leave the decision up to her?
Yes. She has a good head.
- We leave it to her.
- Uh-huh.
Is she still singing Dolores to sleep?
Call the lucky little mother.
Call her.
Sofia.
Sofia.
Well, aren't you happy to see me?
I cannot see you for the tears.
Are my cheeks flushed?
You can't see in the dark.
I'm so excited.
Did you notice my necklace?
You sent it from Mexico.
- And the comb -- do you remember?
- From Sevilla.
The one I like best is -- is the music box from --
From, uh, Madrid.
Sofia, how does it feel to be a woman of dignity... and -- and beauty?
Why don't you ask how it feels to be lonely?
You too?
All my life, I've known two men: the one who came out of the rain in the long black cape... the other one who is always in my dreams.
Sofia... am I too old for your affections?
Too old?
I am grateful to have learned in all my travels... what so few women ever learn: how to recognize love.
I could never explain why... but... it would fill my heart if you would become my wife.
Oh, I've --
I've wanted it this way... ever since I realized what I wanted.
Oh, Sofia, Sofia.
I have know many, many women... but with you...
I'm afraid.
Hey, that's a pretty fancy carriage.
Well, now we'll see what a baron looks like.
( Knocking )
( Man )
Come in.
- I am the Baron of Arizona.
- Howdy, Baron.
I'm Miller, Surveyor General.
Oh, may I present, Mr. Miller, my wife, the Baroness Sofia de Peralta-Reavis.
How do you do, Baroness? Um --
We wish to claim full recognition of the Peralta land grant.
There's, uh, been quite a lot of excitement
in town since your man told us you were coming.
Royalty is something new in Arizona.
Our agents have collected the necessary copies of all certified documents.
The royal decree signed by Ferdinand VI.
The history of the Peraltas.
The petition.
Are you sure the metes and bounds i-in this location are, uh --
- I am.
- But there must be some mistake.
Why, this grant, uh --
Why, i-it takes in practically the entire territory of Arizona.
It does take in the territory.
It also includes all mineral rights, all rivers...
all grazing ground.
I'd advise you to investigate this claim at once, Mr. Miller... for you are living on our land.
Good day, sir.
( Clicking Continues )
According to your records of 1 7 50... a stone marker would prove a definite location.
And evidence that Peralta actually took possession.
Well, maybe.
This is pretty wild country around here.
There is no stone.
If you say so, Mr. Miller.
Mr. Miller.! Mr. Miller.! Mr. Miller.!
Peralta. Peralta. Peralta!
This man Reavis claims to own everything... from the smallest shack to the capitol in Prescott!
If the land belongs to him, the sooner the people know it, the better.
Why? So they'll be saved court costs?
Mr. Secretary, we're whipped.
Gentlemen... because of the Peralta grant... the New Mexico-Arizona boundary... has just been altered.
Congress has refused the territory of New Mexico... admission as a state to the union... until the Reavis bounds are clarified by us.
Well, Griff, what about the signatures on these documents?
This is a good Havana... but very often a fine wrapper conceals inferior tobacco.
You're the greatest expert in the country.
Are these papers forged?
I think so.
Now, now, now, don't get excited.
Why should a land office clerk finance a child's education... when he could have bought the grant from her for a few dollars... and claimed it for himself?
- Why did he marry her?
- Well, why?
To protect himself.
As long as a true Spaniard inherits the land... he knows the government will not violate the treaty.
Gentlemen, it has the stench of swindle.
The signatures on these papers appear authentic... but they're still only copies.
Well, Griff, what do you suggest?
To examine the original source upon which this claim is founded -- in the monastery of Alcántara in Spain.
- ( Knocking )
- Come in.
- Sir, the president of--
- I am occupied.
Not too occupied to see Gunther of Southern Railroad.
( Door Closes )
Say!
Well!
I've sent word to you more than once to come to my office.
Your manners are as impossible, sir... as your chances to continue operating in Arizona.
Say!
What do you know about that?
You're not going into the railroad business too, are you? Now, see here, Reavis --
- Baron.
- Baron. I want you --
Your lawyer told you that I hold the threat of stopping, by injunction... all railroads trespassing our land.
He advised you to capitulate.
- It's interesting, isn't it?
- Yes.
Since I don't want to impede progress...
- I'm permitting you to advance me $50,000.
- Fifty thousand?
As a first installment for an immediate quitclaim deed.
Just the amount I was going to offer you for my right-of-way.
Well, in that case I shall remove you from the trespassers list.
Thank you, Baron.
Thank you.
Oh, Baron... how about buying an interest in some of your mineral rights?
How much of an interest?
Oh, a hundred thousand as a starter.
That's not a very interesting start.
Uh, Mr. Gunther...
I understand that you own that magnificent mansion outside of Phoenix.
That's right.
Well, now that would be a very interesting down payment... on some of my mineral rights.
Baron, you've got yourself a house.
I'm a landowner.
We all are.
- We want to know where we stand.
- In my private office without an appointment.
Just a moment. Let's not have any violence, at least not till I get my story.
I'm McCleary of the New York World. If you don't mind answering a few questions, Baron.
Is it true you're collecting thousands of dollars in revenues, rents and royalties... even before your claim has been recognized in any court?
Would a railroad advance me a penny... if there were a question regarding the validity of my claim?
Not if I know those railroads.
This is Gunther of Southern Railroad.
Mr. Gunther, are you paying me for right-of-way through my land?
Well, uh, yes.
Why don't you wait till the government recognizes his claim officially, Mr. Gunther?
And be forced to pay him an impossible figure?
That would be poor business foresight.
If I were you, men...
I would settle right now for what he demands.
Why don't all of you gentlemen listen to the railroad man?
That's why he's so rich.
Baron, my publisher, Mr. Pulitzer, wants me to write you up... as the man who changed geography.
- This is only the beginning.
- This is sufficient for me.
Nothing is sufficient for anyone who can change geography.
My dear, I --
I've just bought a private railroad car for us.
We'll go all over our territory sometime next month.
Oh, let's not go anywhere for a long time.
I've so many wonders to get used to.
This is our first real home.
Anything you say, my dear.
Is it unladylike for a baroness to -- to shout to everyone that she loves her husband?
Never mind everyone.
Just shout it to me.
- Well, I did it.
- You sure nobody was home?
- No, nobody was home.
- Tom.
- It's wrong.
- He's just a lot of fancy words.
That little explosion'll scare him right out of town.
Don't worry, Carrie.
We ain't gonna lose our home.
- I oughta turn you in to the sheriff.
- Pa!
He can't take the law into his own hands.
It ain't up to him to scare the baron outta here.
It's up to the government.
Hank, nothing'll stop me from tangling with you if you get in my way.
You just got a room in town, that's all.
You got nothing to lose.
We got everything.
( Door Opens )
- Did you ever read it?
- ( Door Closes )
I thought you might like a copy.
- My name's Griff.
- My library is complete.
How do you do, Mr. Griff?
- Cigar?
- Thank you.
Writing books is a sideline.
I'm with the Department of Interior.
Oh? What exactly is your job, Mr. Griff?
Not a very pleasant one, sir.
I expose falsified wills, ancient manuscripts and, uh...
Spanish land grants.
I can understand the government's reluctance to part with Arizona.
I am prepared for a thorough investigation of all documents.
But I don't appreciate the inference of falsification of papers.
I've never yet met a claimant who appreciated my presence in a case.
Griff. Hmm.
Come to think of it, your name is familiar.
I heard of you when I was a clerk in the land office at Santa Fe.
Frankly, didn't you read my book?
I really don't recall it.
I've just returned from Spain after following your trail from Mexico City to Madrid.
- Surprised?
- On the contrary.
I'm pleased with your energy.
I hope that your investigation proved interesting.
Interesting enough for another book.
Oh. When you write it, send me a copy.
Your penmanship was truly a masterpiece.
A work of art.
This is a good Havana, sir.
But it's a pity your claim is a bad cigar wrapped in a rich Spanish leaf.
Good day.
Oh.
It's autographed.
( Door Opens, Closes )
- How do you do?
- How do you do?
May I present Mr.John Griff of Washington, D.C.
My wife, the Baroness
Sofia de Peralta-Reavis.
How do you do, Mrs. Reavis?
Forgive me.
This is very important.
Mr. Reavis... during the investigation of your wife's parentage... did you go to the Guadalajara cemetery?
Yes, Mr. Griff, I did.
And that is where her father and mother are buried?
Yes, it is.
Mr. Martinez.
Is this the man?
Sí.
Is he the one who told you he was looking for the tombstones of Pedro and Maria de Peralta?
Sí.
Is he the one who paid you to cut words on two unmarked tombstones... in the Guadalajara cemetery?
He pay me to cut flowers and keep the grave nice and beautiful.
Martinez, you know the seriousness of perjury?
What is ''perjury''?
Did you see this man today?
I see him.
Eleven years ago.
He were looking for Peralta family.
- You told me he bribed you.
- What is ''bribe''?
Poor devil. I can understand what happened and why you did it.
It won't do you much good.
Mr. Griff.
You think my husband is a fake?
Mr. Griff,look at me.
Tell me, am I a fake?
I felt a sense of guilt.
Don't let their resentment disturb you, Sofia.
It's wrong.
Something is wrong.
I never want to come here again.
I mean it.
You must accept certain terms,
Sofia.
Perhaps I'm not proud enough to accept such terms.
I forbid you to speak like that.
I remember when you forbade me to eat raw sugar.
- Then remember that you are a baroness.
- ( Knocking )
Now compose yourself.
Sit down, my dear.
( Knocking Continues )
( Door Opens )
- ( Crowd Murmuring, Chattering )
- How do you do, sir?
How do you do, Baron?
May I present Mr. Richardson,
Secretary of the Interior.
My wife, the Baroness
Sofia de Peralta-Reavis.
- An honor, Baroness.
- On our part, Mr. Secretary.
- Won't you sit down, sir?
- Thank you.
Well, sir... we've had our best agent investigating your claim...
for six tedious months.
Well, I have implicit faith in the integrity of our Washington experts.
We can't afford delay, Baron.
It's costing the people too much.
And you leave us no alternative... but to make good on the multitude of land titles we've issued.
Well, I'm certain the government findings will be fair... and I shall abide by their official confirmation or denial.
How much is the barony worth to you?
That's a difficult figure to reach,
Mr. Secretary.
As you are well aware... there are treasures of unmined gold and silver... and, uh, the rich grazing land and --
A most difficult figure to reach.
Well... the United States is prepared to pay you $25 million...
for the purchase
of the territory of Arizona.
I regret that we must decline your offer, sir.
What do you expect?
Recognition of the Peralta grant.
Baroness. Baron.
( Door Opens, Closes )
Do you remember the day you sobbed like a little peasant?
I did not want Arizona.
I wanted to be with you.
But I promised you your birthright, Sofia.
Now it's yours, all of it -- every mile, every foot, every inch.
What is it you really want?
And not only that, but my father was the first white American... to pitch a tent in Phoenix.
Since I was eight years old
I helped him plant and plow...
until we got enough to buy
our own piece ofland from the government.
And then this fella comes along who says he's a -- a baron... whatever that is... and every time I try talking plain horse sense to him... he told me to settle with one of his clerks.
Well, I'm gonna settle with this baron himself.
There's your chance, Lansing.!
There they come.!
Clear the road.
''Clear the road.'' Next we'll have to pay you to breathe this air.
Reavis,you think the government'd sell us
land that doesn't belong to them?
No. And any man who speaks like that is a traitor to his country.
Citizens of Arizona... we don't want your homes or shops or livestock.
Then why are you trying to scare us into paying for what's already ours?
I have terrorized no one.
I don't want to hurt you.
I want to help all of you develop Arizona into the richest barony in the world.
That ain't for America.
That's for Europe.
We ain't slave workers, and you ain't our king.
No.
But I am the Baron... and what goes with the barony must and will be recognized by all of you... just as it was recognized 1 0 minutes ago by the United States government.
We heard you forged them papers.
There will be all kinds of rumors.
Why don't you go to the surveyor general's office right now?
There's a man there who can straighten you out on this matter.
He's from Washington.
- He just offered us $25 million for our land.
- ( Crowd Murmuring )
But I turned him down.
I'm not interested in money.
I'm interested in land and its development.
What if we don't have the money to pay you?
What if we don't have the money?
What'll you do?
I shall evict you.
James!
I feel like Caesar's wife before he was murdered.
You've sacrificed much, but the effort'll be worthless if something happens to you.
I saw the faces of those people today.
They hate us.
They're afraid of us.
Once you were afraid of me.
Remember?
I was never afraid of you.
I loved you the instant you gave me the second piece of candy.
But I'm not happy to be the Baroness.
That's because you still feel a sense of unnecessary guilt.
Why must we have all the land?
It would take me days to cover the acreage around this house alone.
I don't want a dead baron.
I want a live husband.
Oh, I know only peasants cry, but I --
I love you, I love you, I love you, I love you!
You ain't takin' my farm away from me!
You'll have to shoot me also.
'James Addison de Peralta-Reavis...
'and Sofia de Peralta Reavis...
'husband and wife...
versus the United States of America. ''
The plaintiffs ask the government to confirm their title... to the territory of Arizona.
This is the most unusual case
in the history ofland claims.
Every spectator has land at stake and --
I paid the Baron $4,000.
Do I get my money back?
I don't want to be compelled to have you arrested... but this is now a federal court... and while you have the sympathy of the government...
I will tolerate no further disturbance.
Is that clear?
Has the government any legal proof exposing my claim as a forgery?
- No.
- ( Spectators Gasping, Murmuring )
Has the government any evidence
to prove the ancestry...
of the Baroness
Sofia de Peralta-Reavis false?
The government has not.
Have you any proof
to discredit the Peralta claim?
No.
Your Honor, I accuse the government
of casting a cloud of suspicion...
on the integrity of my wife,
the Baroness Sofia de Peralta-Reavis.
I accuse the government of encouraging mobs to violate our privacy...
and to make attempts on our lives.
I accuse the government of costing us the hatred, suspicion and distrust...
of the people living on our land... by the deliberate delay of the recognition of our claim.
I accuse the government of violating the treaty
of Guadalupe Hidalgo and the Gadsen Purchase.
And I demand that the government, according to its own law... legally, officially and permanently confirm the title to the Peralta land grant.
Is the government prepared
to question witnesses?
No, Your Honor.
Don't you even wish to question the plaintiffs?
No, Your Honor.
This sudden move of the United States being on the defense... has come as a complete surprise.
At this moment we are unprepared to establish evidence that will prove... that the original Baron of Arizona,
Miguel de Peralta... was a mythical gentleman created by the fertile brain of Mr. Reavis.
Because the government is the defendant...
it is essential that this proof
be produced as quickly as possible.
It shall be presented as soon as we are ready, Your Honor.
Let the Court point out
that if this proof is not valid... the United States of America... will be compelled to surrender Arizona to the plaintiffs.
We understand the gravity of the situation.
Why, even at this moment we are awaiting reports that will prove the grant... and all the papers colossal forgeries.
We shall prove that the woman known as the Baroness of Arizona... inherited an utterly fictitious and fraudulent title.
We shall prove that her husband,
James Reavis, is a fake...
a forger, a swindler and a thief.
Yes?
Up to now,
I fought my husband all the way.
Poor showing for a wife, isn't it?
I was on your side.
I felt sorry for you.
I did not like the thought of taking away your land, even if it does belong to us.
I tried to erase the barony
and all it represented.
But now I can think of nothing but my husband.
In this room he was publicly accused of being a fake...
a forger and a swindler.
I will not tolerate such charges, not even by the government.
My husband is not a fraud.
He is not a swindler. He is not a forger.
I have nothing to offer him except my love and my faith in him.
And if it's fight you want, it's fight you'll get!
No one calls my husband a thief!.
Well, Your Honor, is the land ours, or isn't it?
We've got a little business to settle, Baron.
And we've made sure nobody would disturb us.
Now, this fella Griff's all right, but we believe he's telling the truth.
We got an idea you're going to outsmart him.
And that's really got us worried.
And if we don't have the proof, it means Arizona's handed over to you like a shot of bourbon.
- You heard what the judge said.
- But we don't wanna see it go that far.
Is this the vanguard of the vigilante committee?
Maybe.
Maybe we don't like your kind scaring people into giving you money... just so they can hang onto land that's already theirs.
That's very interesting.
I'm touched by your public spirit, gentlemen.
What do you propose I do about it?
We ain't like the others who want to lynch you.
That won't help the government much.
You know a lot of fancy words, Baron.
We heard you in court today.
Just write a confession that it was all a mistake about the land grant.
That'll make it easier for everybody.
Start writin:
( Man #1 ) How old was she?
Are you an American citizen?
-( Man #2 ) How old was she?
-( Man #1 ) Are you a good American?
-( Man #2 ) How long you been in this country?
-( Man #1 ) You got your citizenship yet?
- I warned you against such tactics!
- They put words in my mouth!
I do not know what they want!
To me, he's the Baron, she's the Baroness.
Mr. Alvarez... you will forgive the government for annoying you?
Yes. Yes, Mr. Griff.
I'm sorry.
You know how it is.
Right.
( Griff)
Unfortunately, this case is gonna take time.
Reavis knows I know he forged the documents.
He also knows it will be difficult to prove it.
Very difficult.
But what I don't like about this
is the feeling of mob justice.
That means people will be killed.
You remember once before... we walked like this near my little adobe shack, huh?
- ( Chuckles ) Mm-hmm.
- Long time ago.
And you remember that night?
For months it did not rain in Phoenix.
It was so dry, one could not even spit.
And then it rained -- a miracle.
Then you knock on the door-- a great miracle.
The rain brought life to the earth.
You brought life to Sofia.
But it is not your fault... people call you a fake...
'cause that miracle in the rain was one big lie.
What are you talking about?
I, uh -- I know all the time
Sofia is not a Peralta.
- What?
- It is true.
But I checked with everyone.
They said she was abandoned with you.
- They all said she was illegitimate.
- No. She did have her mother and father.
But there was a reason why I could not let anyone know this.
What reason?
She has Indian blood in her.
I promised her people before they die
I tell no one.
So she will be like other girls, you know.
It make it easier for Sofia when she grow up... when she get married.
I promised them
I take good care of Sofia.
She will eat good and learn and be a fine woman.
But I am poor.
And always Sofia, she has nothing but the pigs and the mud.
Nothing.
And then you came... and I made my plan.
- You made a plan?
- Yes.
But I did not think it would mean fights and shootings and lynchings... and taking land from people.
I did not think this.
I think it would mean good chance for Sofia... to have everything
I could not give her.
So I lie!
I do not say you have found the wrong child.
I say nothing.
Ohh. I do not sleep.
I -- I'm sick inside.
But all the time I say to myself...
''Pepito, this is good for Sofia.''
Oh, but now I know it's wrong.
It's wrong.
It is because of me that Mr. Griff say your writing on the paper is false.
It is because of me he say Sofia is not a Peralta.
He is a smart man.
I will go to him and make a stop to all this.
I will make a stop to people getting hurt.
I will tell him it is not you... but me who is the fake.
Well, I'm --
I'm sorry for what I did to you... my friend.
You're leaving, hmm?
( Reavis )
Yes.
Pepito told me about myself.
Did he?
Is that why you're going away?
No.
Then it's because of what I am.
- That's not why I'm leaving.
- Then what is it?
I'm a fake.
Pepito told me you had blamed yourself for his fraud.
- Did he say that?
- Yes.
You don't understand.
He had a reason for lying.
It was for you.
I have no reason.
It's for myself.
Your eyes look sick.
You've been crying.
I don't want you to feel guilty because of me.
Oh, good heavens, Sofia.
I spent years developing your mind, and yet you're unable to -- to grasp what I'm saying.
I tell you, I'm a forger.
The whole scheme is one big fraud.
There never has been a Peralta.
I created the family out of my own mind and faked it with ink in the records.
I married you because it was part of my scheme,
not because I loved you.
Well, I'm ready for your contempt... and your disgust.
Take a good look at me.
Take a good look at your husband.
Now you know why I'm leaving.
I don't want you to go.
Sofia, look, we have over $500,000.
We can go to Europe. They'll never find us.
Let's not have any illusions,James.
We're guilty, both of us.
You may go.
I'll take the money back to the people.
Now you're having illusions.
I am Mrs.James Reavis... and one of us must have the dignity to accept punishment.
One of us must have the dignity to recognize love.
I'll always love you.
Nothing can change that.
You still want me?
I'll want you until the day I die.
It is not death, it is dying that alarms me.
It is not your crime, it's your weakness that alarms me.
Arizona.
Seems so small.
You suddenly seem so great.
Now I know what I was looking for-- a woman who would love me for what I am.
No man can live without that.
No man can ask for more.
- This will make you feel better, dear.
- Thank you.
None for me, Loma.
Mrs. Reavis.
- You sent for me?
- Yes, Mr. Griff.
I, uh --
I have a statement to make.
Strangely enough, I was on my way to see you when Mr. Alvarez came to my office.
Oh.
Mr. Griff, you were right.
My claim is a bad cigar wrapped in a rich Spanish leaf.
I am guilty of the criminal act of forgery... with intent to defraud the government of the United States.
My wife is innocent of any part in the conspiracy.
And Loma Morales and Pepito Alvarez... believed my story of her ancestry.
They are blameless.
That's very interesting, Mr. Reavis.
Excuse me a moment.
Troy.
Your Honor.
Ladies, will you please be seated?
What is this?
The court of private land grant claims is now in session.
- What?
- This is quite an occasion, Mr. Reavis.
One of historical significance.
This federal court has been granted the permission... to sit wherever and whenever it wants... and we've decided to hold court here in your home... to avoid a mob riot in a public hearing.
Mr. Reavis, we have legal proof... that will indict, convict and sentence you to the penitentiary.
Proof?
My forgery is flawless.
Remember this?
The 1 7 48 volume of the Spanish land grants.
( Griff) I must admit this is the finest
example of forgery I've ever seen.
Now, we had the ink on this page analyzed.
It contains the tannin acid of oak.
No, that's impossible.
I made that ink myself.
And the monks haven't changed their formula for over 500 years.
A monk named Brother Paul came to Alcántara from the north of Spain.
He brought his own ink.
Every word on this page was written by him with his own ink... except this account of the grant awarded to Peralta by King Ferdinand of Spain.
This was written with ink which had no oak.
You used the ink made in the south
when you forged this page.
You didn't need my confession, did you?
No, not now.
Will it be a -- a long prison term?
It's according to how much money you return to the landowners.
The lavish manner in which you spent the money... will determine the years of your imprisonment.
There's all the money.
I'm tired.
I need a rest.
Father Guardian told me to meditate.
I should have listened to him that night.
The court cannot guarantee the rest... but you'll have sufficient time to meditate.
Well, I will help you gather up all my records and receipts and papers.
You'll need them.
They're at my office.
Mr. Alvarez,
I'm going to request leniency for you.
Frankly, Your Honor, I don't see criminal intent in his conspiracy... just ignorant devotion and sentiment.
Are you ready?
Loma...
I've never thanked you for all you've done for Sofia... the influence you've had on her.
I'm --
I'm grateful.
-( Gavel Bangs )
-(Judge ) Court is now adjourned.
- Are you ready, Mr. Griff?
- Yes.
By the way, Mr. Reavis... did you read my book?
It was my bible.
The land in Arizona don't belong to no baron!
It belongs to you and me!
We paid for it!
We paid for it with money, and we paid for it with our hard work!
Now, maybe these government men mean all right... but I'm sayin' it takes 'em too long to act!
We gotta do somethin' now!
There's only one thing about this case
I can't understand.
What's that?
After devoting so many years to this scheme, what made you confess?
I fell in love with my wife.
Get that sign down!
The Baron is comin'!
The Baron is comin'!
Joe, I don't like this quiet.
Yeah.
Funny. I never seen this square so empty this time of night.
( Gunshot )
( Crowd Shouting )
( Gunshots )
Quick!
( Gunshot )
This'll learn ya!
You don't take land that don't belong to ya!
- Hoist 'im.!
- ( Groans )
-James!
- Go on and hang me, you stupid idiots!
Hang me, and the land'll never be proven yours.
Go on and hang me.!
What's the matter?
Haven't you got any brains?
Isn't there one man among you with sense enough to realize...
that once I'm dead you'll never be able to prove anything?
Ask the government man.
He'll tell you.
That's why he was with me -- to question me, to save your property.
You know the law.
Tell 'em what'll happen if they hang me.
Tell 'em what'll happen to their land!
- What's lynchin' got to do with provin' the land is ours?
- ( Crowd Shouting )
Hang me, and you hang your ranches and farms and shops and mines.
Hang me, and you'll never give Griff a chance to get at me.
He can't try a dead man. I've got to be alive
if you want to prove that the land is yours.
I've gotta answer questions.
I've gotta identify documents.
I've got to be legally cross-examined by the United States government.
What do I have to do to pound it into your thick skulls?
Hang me, and you hang all your claims with you!
Go on! Hang me!
I thought I told you to leave me.
Get in.
Hello, Mr Kranz.
- I'd like to redeem my...
- I know! The trombone.
I always keep her hanging in the window so when you walk by you can see she is still there.
I keep my eyes on her.
Say, Mr Miller, where'd you got the money this time?
- Working in a gas station.
- And now you've got another band job?
Yep. I'm with Minton at the Sunset
Hotel. Chummy's gonna pick me up.
Your friend Chummy, why don't he hock something?
- He plays the piano.
- I see!
That's all we need! To schlep a piano in and out every once in a while.
That string of pearls, how much did you say that was?
I'd like to give my girl a birthday present.
Isn't it wonderful to be young?
He just got his trombone out of hock and he wants to buy a $100 necklace.
I'd like to give her this. Haven't seen her for a few years.
- You are engaged?
- No, not exactly.
We went around together when we were in college. University of Colorado.
$100. That's a lot of money, isn't it?
For a regular customer,
I make a special price.
- (CAR HORN)
- I guess that's Chummy.
A hundred dollars.
Here's for the horn.
- Thanks. Goodbye.
- Goodbye, Mr Miller.
- Where'd you get this one, Chummy?
- Made a deal on my Briscoe.
She's a beaut. 45 horsepower.
Only four years old.
- 45 horse...
- Come on, hop in. We gotta get goin'.
- Isn't this a darb, kid?
- Yeah, gee whiz!
- You bring my arrangement?
- You're sittin' on it.
But this is the Sunset Hotel, potted palms and marble stairs.
- Minton's band plays sweet.
- I know that.
Don't try to slip in that arrangement of yours tonight.
- We don't wanna lose this job.
- Stop worryin'. This is a classic.
I Dreamt I Dwelt In Marble
Halls, it's a classic!
When Minton hears this arrangement, he'll give us a job for life. Let's go.
Too bad you can't keep the trombone and hock the arrangement.
- You know where there's Venice?
- Italy.
No! Venice here. By the pier, with that big wheel.
- Oh, yeah.
- You boys go out there next Monday.
- This fellow Pollack, he has tryouts.
- Ben Pollack?
Ben Pollack. He gets together a new band.
They go for a long, long trip.
- How do you know?
- A fellow told me this morning.
- You boys go out there.
- Sure. Thanks a lot.
Next Monday?
That gives you a week to get your trombone out.
- You could work in a gas station.
- Not me.
I'm gonna work on arrangements.
For me, I'm glad for your business, Mr Miller, but why don't you give up this arranging and stick with the trombone?
That's a good question.
I wish I knew the answer.
But I have one idea up here in my head.
To me, music is more than just one instrument.
It's a whole orchestra playing together. See?
The only way I can express myself is to work out an arrangement.
See? Thanks for the tip.
Come on.
Great!
- Thanks, Ben.
- You're in. You're in.
- Who's next?
- I am.
I've done some arrangements...
I'm full up on arrangements.
I need more musicians.
I've been working on 'em all week.
They're in your style.
I appreciate that. Lay them on the piano, I'll try 'em some other time.
Uh-huh.
- My name's on the cover.
- Swell.
OK, who's next?
I am. My name's Schwartz.
Wilbur Schwartz.
Clarinet, eh? Sit down at the first chair and blow a little bit.
- What tune do you want me to play?
- Do you read at sight?
- Try me.
- Chummy, get him something to read.
One, two.
Hey, Glenn! Come on back.
Mr Pollack wants to talk to you.
He says your arrangement is a pip! Your arrangement!
I'm playing in the band and working on arrangements.
I got a two-week advance.
You are a regular Rockefeller!
- I want to thank you for everything.
- Don't mention about it.
I'm only glad it worked so good out.
About that string of pearls for my girl's birthday.
You said something about a special price for those.
For you it's $80. You pay me 40 down and $5 a week.
- Good enough.
- Shall I mail it for you?
I better take 'em with me.
I'm not sure of her address.
We're booked into Denver.
She lives right near there.
Ten, 20, 30, 40. There's the 40.
- And here is for the trombone.
- All right.
- Thank you very much.
- Same to you, and good luck.
I hope you stay out of pawnshops for a while.
- So do I! Goodbye.
- Goodbye, Mr Miller.
- Glenn, come on!
- A Pierce-Arrow?
Yeah! I got it for the old car and 100 bucks.
Much heavier. It'll hold the road better on a long trip.
If the band folds up, we can sell it to an undertaker.
Get in the back, I'll give you a ride in style.
Hurry, Glenn. We're due at the
Denver Palace in ten minutes.
- How much, sir?
- Oh, give us five.
Hello. I want Boulder 6-1-7-0.
How many?
I'll get it, Mother.
Hello?
Hello? Helen? How's my girl?
Your girl? Who is this?
Who is this? Is this Helen Burger?
Yes, but there must be some...
- Well, it's Glenn!
- Glenn? Glenn who?
It's Glenn Miller!
Glenn Miller?
Oh, Glenn Miller.
Well, now, honestly. After two years and not a word.
Didn't you get my card?
The one you wrote a year ago last Christmas?
Well, I haven't heard from you either.
I didn't know where you were.
I don't even know where you are now.
I'm down here in Denver. I want to see you. How about tonight?
Oh, I'm sorry. I have a date.
Couldn't you break it? I'm with
Pollack and we're leavin' tomorrow.
Now, honestly, I...
Glenn, come on, hurry it up.
I'll see you later, then. Gee, there's a lot I want to tell you.
- Glenn, wait a minute...
- I'll be out right after I finish work. Bye.
Glenn? Hello?
Well, honestly.
- Hi, Dad.
- Going out, Helen?
This is a new wrinkle, isn't it?
Ed keeping you waiting.
It isn't Ed tonight. It's a man I haven't seen for years.
Not Ed? What's happened?
It must be serious for you to break a date with Ed.
No, Mother. Glenn isn't my type.
I guess I'm just too practical or unromantic or something.
I want a man like Ed who's got a factory or a store or something solid.
I certainly don't want a wandering nomad like Glenn Miller.
What's he do, this Glenn Miller?
I don't really know except he said he was in Denver for overnight.
He's gonna pick me up after work.
He must be a hard worker.
It's nearly 9:00 now.
It is?
Well.
Oh! There's really no excuse for this!
The least he could've done was phone.
- Unless he was in an accident.
- Call him.
How can I? I don't know where he is.
If I'm going hunting in the morning, I've gotta get to bed.
Sam's picking me up at the crack of dawn.
- Doesn't look as if he's coming tonight.
- It certainly doesn't!
Even if he did come,
I wouldn't see him.
Then we can all go to bed?
Well, so much for Mr Glenn Miller.
I'll never see him again.
(GLENN, CALLING SOFTLY) Helen?
Helen?
Helen?
Helen!
Helen! (WHISTLES)
- Oh, there you are.
- Glenn Miller, you go away.
I don't want to go away. I came to see you. We have a date.
- Shh! You'll wake up the neighbourhood.
- How can I talk to you?
You keep quiet. I'll be right down.
Hello, Helen.
What's the matter with you, coming at this hour?
I told you I'd come out after work.
I got here as quick as I could.
- Shh. Be quiet.
- You haven't changed a bit, have you?
Just as feisty as ever, and just as pretty too.
I must be pretty! Wearing this kimono and my hair up in curlers.
Is that what they are?
Come on, sit down.
- It's cold out here.
- Come on. It's a beautiful night.
Gee.
There. I bought you a present for your birthday.
My birthday? That isn't until next November.
This is for your last birthday.
Why, they're beautiful! But I can't accept a present like this.
Why not? They're not real.
I wish they were.
I got 'em out in Los Angeles in a pa... In a, uh... A, uh...
I'll get you some real ones someday.
Honestly.
Two years and not a word and then a present like this.
You know, with some people you don't have to write. You just know.
- I knew you'd be here.
- Oh, you did?
Sure. I knew you'd be just the same.
Just sitting around waiting for you to show up, I suppose?
"How is my girl?" you said.
Well, you happen to be wrong!
I've been engaged to Ed
Healey for nearly a year.
Did it occur to you that I might not care if I ever saw you again?
No, it never did.
Never.
- Never.
- Why can't I ever stay mad at you?
You had me worried there for a minute.
Honestly!
If you were anybody else,
I would never speak to you again.
Look at me. Sitting here in this kimono and my hair all...
- Those curlers.
- Terrible, isn't it?
Helen, now look, I've got an idea.
Come with me to Fort Morgan.
I'm gonna introduce you to my folks.
- Now?
- Right now.
People do sleep between 3am and 6am.
They'll be crazy about you.
- And they'll give us breakfast.
- How do we get there?
- I'll get a taxi.
- A taxi to Fort Morgan?
- Sure.
- That's so extravagant.
- It isn't far.
- Maybe I can get the family car.
Wonderful. Wait a minute.
Let me try these on for size, hm?
There.
Uh-oh.
- Mr Burger, I...
- Take it easy, son.
I'm just going hunting, for jackrabbits.
- Glenn!
- It's Glenn!
Hi, Herb. How are you?
Glad to see you. Hello, Irene.
- What a surprise! I had no idea.
- Hello, Mother.
Glad to see you. Mother, this is...
You don't need to tell me.
You're Helen!
We've been hearing about you for years.
Why, yes. I'm very happy to meet you.
- Daddy'll be down in a minute.
- Dean and Velna?
They're fine! I'll show you a picture of the baby.
- Sure.
- She your girl, Glenn?
That's right, Herb.
Are you and Glenn gonna get married?
Don't ask that! We just take such things for granted.
- How are you, son?
- Fine.
- And you're Helen. Welcome to the family.
- Thank you.
- You gonna get these kids some breakfast?
- I certainly am!
You might've let us know where you are and what your plans are.
We have to ask Helen, eh?
I'll bet he tells you everything.
Oh, no, Mr Miller. I seem to be the last person he tells.
- Yeah.
- Well, come on.
- You like hotcakes, Helen?
- Yes.
Mom makes pretty good ones...
♪ Little brown jug, how I love thee
♪ Ha-ha-ha, you and me
♪ Little brown jug, how I love thee... ♪
Good old Colorado U.
It hasn't changed a bit.
No, it's just as pretty as ever.
We still have time. Let's walk across the campus for old times' sake.
- I'd love to.
- Come on.
- Wish I didn't have to leave so soon.
- I do too.
Listen. It's the Glee
Club rehearsing.
- I love that song.
- What, Little Brown Jug?
That's sort of a tin-eared tune.
Why, that's one of my favourites.
My dad used to sing it to me when I was a little girl. I guess that's why.
- They sing it pretty well.
- Mm-hm.
When something's really wonderful like that, I know it.
I get kind of a funny feeling up the back of my neck.
That's how I can tell. Sort of makes my hair stand on end.
- Is that so?
- Yeah.
Looks pretty normal from here.
It just feels that way!
- Remember that lake?
- Yes, I do.
- Where do you go from here?
- We're heading east.
Chicago, New York. We're booked into the Club Fifty there.
- Ever been to New York?
- No.
Neither have I. I hear it's quite a town.
You're certainly seeing
America, aren't you?
You think I'm kinda rudderless, don't you?
Wandering over the country with the band.
- Yes, I guess I do.
- But I'm not, though.
I know exactly where I'm going.
I know exactly what I want to do.
You do?
I'm not gonna be a sideman all my life, a trombone player.
I'm gonna have a band all of my own.
I'm gonna play my own kind of music.
I... It's hard to explain, but a band...
A band oughta have a sound all of its own, oughta have a personality.
- Sort of like a person.
- Uh-huh.
How do you get this different sound?
You see, the arrangements, the way you score each one of the individual instruments.
Some bands have that sound already, like Pollack, but it's not the right sound, not for me.
- What is?
- I don't know.
I don't know.
I haven't found it yet.
But someday I'm gonna find it and when I do...
You'll find it. I'm sure you will.
- You are?
- Hey, Glenn!
There's Chummy. He found it all right. Goodbye.
It's been wonderful seeing you.
Goodbye. I'm comin'!
You'll be hearing from me.
Wait and see.
- Come on, boy, let's go.
- All right, all right.
Bye.
Honestly.
(♪ MELLOW VERSION OF
GOOD NIGHT LADIES)
How about one more?
One more number?
We can't, kids. We're leaving for Atlantic City.
We'll be back in a couple of months.
Thanks a lot. Swell.
Fellas, listen just a minute before you start packing up.
The bus leaves from the hotel for
Atlantic City tomorrow morning at 10:30.
Everybody be on time.
Don't be late, will ya? OK.
Ben, like I told you,
I guess this is where I get off.
I want to thank you for everything.
- You know what you're doin'?
- Yeah.
I wanna stick around New York for a while. I want to do some studying.
Just when the band's really startin' to take on.
I know all that. I appreciate everything you've done for me and I wish you all the luck in the world.
If there's... Any time you want me to do an arrangement for you, just let me know.
That's an idea. Well, so long, kid. A lotta luck.
- Thanks for everything.
- Goodbye.
- You're really serious about this?
- Yeah.
Still got that crazy idea in your head, that sound?
Hey, Don?
This is Chummy MacGregor.
This is Don Haynes.
- Hi.
- Glad to meet ya. You're the band booker.
Gonna try and get Glenn some work arranging.
- It's an awful lonely town.
- I know.
I wish we could stick together, but
I've been eating for two years now.
It's gotten to be a habit.
I don't think I can break it.
I know.
Well, good luck, kid. Hope you find a friendly pawn shop.
- Yeah, bye, Chummy.
- So long.
- Glenn!
- Hi, Don. How are you?
- What are you doin'?
- Not much.
Listen, Red Nichols is getting together a pit band for a new musical, Girl Crazy.
I know you're still looking for that sound but it's been two years.
- You won't find it on an empty stomach.
- I sure can't.
A lot of your friends are in the band -
Benny Goodman, Babe Russin.
- It's a great chance. It'll run all season.
- I guess I better take it.
I'll call you tomorrow.
I gotta run.
Thanks a lot.
♪ My wife and I live all alone in a little log hut we call our own
♪ She loves gin and I love rum,
I tell you, we have lots of fun
♪ Ha-ha-ha, you and me, little brown jug, don't I love thee?
♪ Ha-ha-ha, you and me, little brown jug, don't I love thee?
If I'd a cow that gave such milk,
I'd clothe her in the finest silk
♪ I'd feed her on the choicest hay and milk her forty times a day
♪ Ha-ha-ha, you and me, little brown jug, don't I love thee?
♪ Ha-ha-ha, you and me, little brown jug, don't I love thee? ♪
Helen, it's for you.
- Who is it?
- Don't forget to turn off the roast.
Who is it?
Hello.
Helen, can you come to
New York right away?
Glenn! I don't know whether I can or not.
But for heaven's sake, why?
So we can get married.
I need you, Helen. I can't wait any longer.
Glenn, I'm engaged!
That's right. It'll be a very short engagement.
No, you don't understand.
I'm engaged to Ed. Ed Healey.
Ed Healey? The fellow you told me about two years ago?
- Yes.
- If you haven't gotten married in two years...
People just don't rush into getting married!
Nonsense, Helen. You come to New York, marry me and get this thing settled.
I can't just walk out on him!
There's a train leaving Denver at 11:30 tomorrow night. Can you get that?
Glenn, you just wait a minute.
We can talk everything over when you get here.
Honestly!
Call me from Denver so I can meet the train. My number is Pennsylvania 6-5000.
Pennsylvania 6-5000.
Pennsylvania 6-5-0-0-0.
And, Helen, bring a warm coat.
It gets kinda chilly here this time of year. Goodbye.
Glenn!
What beats me is how she got
Ed to drive her into Denver.
Helen!
- Hi. You look wonderful.
- I've only come to talk things over.
We can talk it over on the way.
I'm not going to let you rush me into getting married.
Of course not. But there isn't much time.
We have to pick up the licence, then be uptown at the church by 7:00.
- I have to be in the theatre by eight.
- Wait a minute, Glenn.
Gee, I'm so glad you're here.
- Where are we going?
- The theatre.
You're gonna see a wonderful show,
Girl Crazy. I got you a box seat.
- No, I mean, on our honeymoon.
- The Pennsylvania Hotel.
Don's arranged for a big suite.
He's sending up the baggage.
The Pennsylvania Hotel?
Isn't that extravagant?
If we'd been married in Boulder and come to New York on our honeymoon, we'd be staying at a hotel.
- I suppose.
- Of course we would. Here's the ticket.
I'll meet you after the show.
I wanna check if it's...
- What? What are you looking at?
- The man I just married.
The first time I even suspected anything was when I found myself packing.
And then when you met me at the station and kissed me.
It was that kiss that convinced you.
I kinda figured that'd do the trick.
And if you don't mind, I'd like to be convinced all over again.
♪ I'm bidin' my time
♪ Cos that's the kind of guy I'm
♪ Beginnin' on a Monday, right through Sunday
♪ Bidin' my time
♪ Next year
♪ This year
♪ I'm bidin' my time
♪ Cos that's the kind of guy I'm
♪ Stranger, so long
♪ I'll just go 'long
♪ Bidin', bidin'
♪ Bidin' my time ♪
Sixth floor.
I'm sorry about the rice.
It was kinda embarrassing, though.
I had a feeling people were staring at us.
- Nonsense.
- No. Here.
I'm gonna carry you over the threshold.
♪ Here comes the bride
♪ All dressed in white
♪ And there's the groom standing right by her side ♪
Everybody, this is Helen.
Ben! This is the fella that gave me my first job.
This is Helen. You remember
Gene Krupa from the show.
Here's Babe Russin, the tenor saxophone.
You remember Chummy.
There's Polly and Don.
We decided to celebrate.
We're gonna have a party.
- Here?
- No, Harlem. Connie's Inn.
Oh. Well, that's awful nice of you.
Helen just arrived. We've had the wedding and the show
- and Helen's a little tired.
- I'm not.
You've been on the train for three days.
If your friends are nice enough to give us a party, we should go!
- Wonderful!
- We've already got reservations.
♪ Yes, Basin Street
♪ Is the street
♪ Where the folks really meet... ♪
Who's he?
Who? Louis Armstrong!
♪ Yeah, yeah, yeah, really, yeah
♪ Yeah, this is a treat
♪ A-swingin' on Basin
Street, yeah ♪
Hey, Gene! Gene Krupa there!
What'd you say? Come here, man. Gimme some skin.
- How you doin'?
- Won't you join us?
Babe Russin! Don't you wanna swing with the boys?
- Is that gin?
- Yeah.
Glenn, come here, daddy. Beat out one like you did with Ben Pollack.
Be right back.
- Nice goin', Glenn.
- You were wonderful!
It's fun but I don't kid myself.
When I start playing jazz with
Louis Armstrong and Gene Krupa,
I'm lucky if I come in third, isn't that right?
- Where have you been, Mr Miller?
- Dr Schillinger!
- It must be over a year.
- Glad to see you. This is my wife.
- Very pleased to meet you.
- You remember Chummy.
I missed you but I can see you had a very charming distraction.
Yeah, well, glad to see you, Doctor.
- Who's Dr Schillinger? Were you sick?
- No, he's a musician.
He worked out a new method of composition. I studied with him.
- Why did you stop?
- I got busy and it was expensive.
Want something else to eat?
- Maybe we'd better call it a day.
- No, I'm having a...
- No, I really had a wonderful time.
- Yes, dear.
- Bye.
- Good night.
♪ Ooh-ooh, Basin Street
♪ Boo-boo boo-boo-boo ♪
Well, get you!
Here.
Let's try it again.
Helen?
Helen?
- Good morning.
- Honey, what are you doing up at this hour?
This hour? I've been up since seven.
Well, come here.
- Good morning.
- Good morning.
7:00? It must be dark outside.
No, it is not. I've been getting up at this hour all of my life.
But you haven't been staying up until 4:00 in the morning.
Well, no, that's true.
Only when you were around.
That's right. Your father on the porch with his shotgun.
- What have you been doing?
- The ironing.
The ironing? Honey, this is a hotel.
All you have to do is pick up the phone.
They have people to do that.
- But did you see what they charge?
- No.
- It's just terrible.
- Is that so?
I don't think we should waste our money like that.
- Nobody can say I married a spendthrift.
- No, sir.
I'm a penny-pinching miser.
I'm the kind of wife that steals money out of your pockets and puts it in the bank.
- Would you really do that?
- Sure. I've already started.
- Hi, dear.
- Hi.
It's a long movie. We have two hours before the next stage show.
- Have a good time?
- I like the show. But the music!
Well, you know the music.
- That isn't the way you want to play, is it?
- No, but I like pit work.
It pays well. You get to stay in one place.
Glenn, I've been thinking. How much does that Dr Schillinger charge?
He's pretty expensive.
I don't know exactly.
I haven't worked with him for years.
That's just exactly what I mean. Why not?
I don't know. I...
What happened to that dream of yours? What about that sound?
Well, I've been working on that, Helen.
It's an uphill grind. My chance will come one of these days.
To tell you the truth, Glenn,
I've been sort of disappointed.
You mean that?
If I started to study again, we'd have to make all sorts of sacrifices.
I'd have to give up those record dates.
Darling, I don't want to live in a fancy hotel.
We could get an awfully cute little apartment.
I just want you to keep on trying.
I've sort of let you down, haven't I?
A little.
I'm sorry, Helen.
You're right. I should start to study again. I...
Why don't I call Schillinger right now?
See if he'll take me back.
I have his phone number here...
It's Trafalgar 7-5-0-9-8.
- Eight.
Well... Well...
- Helen?
- Yes?
- Where are my glasses?
- Right here! Why don't you put them on?
I'll have to get some glasses to find my glasses.
What were you playing? It's lovely.
A little exercise I'm working out for Schillinger. I hope he likes it.
Does that mean you won't be able to use it?
No, that doesn't make any difference.
It's not that good, though.
I think it is.
- You like it as good as Little Brown Jug?
- No.
But I think you should do something with it.
I suppose you could make a song out of it.
Get somebody to write lyrics.
Have to get a title.
What's a good title?
Well, it should be soft and romantic. Sort of like moonlight.
Moonlight. Young lover under his sweetheart's window.
You wouldn't be thinking of a certain night in Boulder?
There wasn't any moonlight.
Just a shotgun!
I know. And you didn't serenade me either.
I didn't have a chance.
Serenade. There's a title.
- Serenade in the Moonlight.
- How about Moonlight Serenade?
Moonlight Serenade? Not bad.
- It's kinda pretty.
- Moonlight Serenade.
(UP-TEMPO) ♪ I stand at your gate
♪ And the song that I sing is of moonlight
♪ I stand and I wait
♪ For the touch of your hand in the June night
♪ The roses are sighin'
♪ A moonlight serenade
♪ Let us stray till the break of day
♪ In love's valley of dreams
♪ Just you and I
♪ The summer sky
♪ A heavenly breeze kissing the trees
♪ So don't let me wait
♪ Come to me tenderly in the June night
♪ I stand at your gate
♪ And I sing you a song in the moonlight
♪ A love song, my darling
♪ A moonlight serenade ♪
- What have they done to my tune?
- It wasn't very good.
The song is supposed to be a ballad, not a hootchy-kootchy dance!
They made a production number out of it.
And that arrangement, Holy Moses!
Why wouldn't he use yours?
Every band leader wants his own arrangement.
So do you! If you had your own band, this sort of thing wouldn't happen.
- Of course.
- Let's go. We have a lot to do.
We need an instrument truck, and a car.
That's two down payments.
If we use Chummy's car...
Wait till you see what I got now.
Snappiest job on the road.
It's a big Phaeton. Even got a separate windshield for the back seat.
You can always be the first one to arrive in town.
We'll need music stands and a copyist.
We can do the copying. Like the old days, no food but plenty of manuscript paper.
What do you mean, no food?
- We'll need at least 1,800.
- Then we're all set.
Honey, he means we need
$1,800 to start the band.
Yes.
- We don't need anything but good luck.
- What's this?
"The Glenn Miller Band Account"?
Now eat your dinner.
Hey. Did you get all that money out of my pockets?
Mm-hm.
We're late for the job now.
I better go on ahead.
- You fellas get there as quick as you can.
- All right, Glenn.
Practically a new tyre too.
Helen, you don't look very well.
I'm just fine.
I'm just a little tired.
And poor Glenn is up all night working on the arrangements and I have to sort of take care of the bookkeeping.
Has the business manager given you the big financial statement yet?
No, but I will. We left New
York with $42 in the bank.
After six months, we've paid for the truck and the car.
That leaves a balance of 48.
In short, we're making exactly $1 a month.
So in ten years we'll have made $120.
It takes time for a new band to catch on.
It sure does.
I don't know. One night we pack 'em in and they love us.
The next six dates we die.
We don't seem to be getting anywhere, and we don't deserve to!
I just haven't been able to hit the right combination.
I just still haven't got that sound.
Glenn, maybe if you stop playing.
- Touché!
- I'm sorry. I didn't mean...
I know what you mean. Get a baton and start leading. No.
Once you step out in front of the boys, you can never be a sideman again.
I'll stick to my trombone.
I've got some good news for a change.
I talked to Si Schribman. He runs the State Ballroom in Boston.
He's booked you in for the week of the 22nd.
That means six half-hour air spots. That's what counts.
- It sure does!
- Imagine! A whole week in one town.
I could even get the washing and the mending done.
- Let's all drink to Boston!
- I think we should.
Good ol' Boston.
Glenn, why don't you ever use Moonlight Serenade?
Don't we have enough trouble without resurrecting that?
- Well, I liked it.
- So did I.
That's two of us. Now, if we can just find a third.
- How's she look?
- Could be worse. Don't know how.
You need a new axle housing, an axle shaft, ring gear and pinion, differential gear case.
- How long'll it take?
- A few days once I get the parts.
- You don't have 'em here?
- Don't have many calls for ring gears.
Might have to go to Woodstock soon as it stops snowing.
- It could be worse.
- Yeah.
There's Helen. Get a hold of Schribman?
No, I couldn't get Boston.
The telephone lines are down.
Chummy, you and Helen better try and make Boston.
Tell Schribman we'll be there as soon as we can.
He's probably guessed what happened.
- He wouldn't cancel on us.
- No, we'll get there all right.
We can't lose that week in Boston.
Go ahead. Bye, dear.
- Take care.
- Yeah.
- You Mr Miller?
- Yeah.
Man left a message. Your wife's sick.
They got her to the hospital.
- What hospital?
- Boston Memorial.
Mr Miller, she's a very sick girl.
We gave her a transfusion but we're lucky this happened when it did.
A few months further along and we might've lost the mother as well as the child.
I had no idea that she was...
- All right, Doctor.
- Thank you.
Just for a minute.
Helen.
The truck all right?
Five and a quarter, cash on the barrel head. Take it or leave it, boys.
Better than the others.
I guess we'll have to take it.
Kinda leaves us in a spot. It's
$900 to pay the boys in the band.
With my car? How much'll you give us?
- You're not gonna do it.
- I can sell my own car if I want to.
Four hundred. That makes nine and a quarter for all three of 'em.
- This isn't your problem.
- Why isn't it? I wanna get paid off, too.
You got a deal. Just one condition.
I need the car long enough to drive the boys to the station.
Yes, that can be arranged.
Fellas, pile in. I'll drive you to the station.
Thank you, Chummy.
- Hi, dear. How do you feel?
- Fine.
- You look much better.
- Good.
The doctor said if I behave myself, I'll be up in a few days.
Good.
I've made up my mind about something, young lady.
If I ever go on the road again, you're gonna stay in that nice apartment of ours on East 57th Street.
You just listen to me, Glenn Miller.
You enticed a little country girl to run away and marry you and now you're hooked with her.
And I'm not gonna let you go gallivanting around the country without me.
You're hooked with a no-good itinerant musician.
- I'm not complaining.
- I know. You never do.
But I know how you wanted kids.
I want to tell you something else
I've made up my mind about.
We're not gonna have just one child. We're gonna have two!
We're gonna have a boy and a girl.
- Glenn, I can't.
- I know.
The doctor told me, but I mean it.
There'll be two kids meant for us.
Somewhere we're gonna find them.
I hope so.
Who sent these flowers?
- The boys in the band.
- Wasn't that nice?
They're sweet.
What's happened? Any dates?
No. No dates.
There's no band.
We had to sell the cars and pay off the boys.
Chummy had to sell his Phaeton.
Isn't that a shame?
Poor Chummy really loved that car.
Glenn, you had a good band.
It was getting better all the time. It wasn't your fault.
It's my fault all right!
I'm broke, I'm in debt,
I don't even have a job.
I told you before, you've gotten mixed up with a no-good itinerant musician.
- And I love him.
- And I love you.
It's almost worth it.
It's the first time you've told me that since the day we were married.
Come in.
- Mrs Miller?
- Yes.
I thought so. I can come in?
Well, yes, of course.
I brought you some flowers.
Oh. Well, thank you very much.
- They're all right?
- They're lovely.
I'm a bachelor, I got no wife to tell me these things.
- Well, they're very pretty.
- Yeah.
I heard all about the band and how you were sick.
Such a shame. I can sit down a minute?
Yes, please.
"Compliments of the
State Ballroom."
- Is this a joke?
- I shoulda said so right away.
No, that's me. Si Schribman.
Si Schribman! If I'd known who you were...
I know. Don Haynes said you wanted to give me a piece of your mind.
That's why I came here.
Maybe we can exchange pieces of mind.
I'm not really such an ogre.
I didn't like cancelling you out.
But an old widow lady, 75, she owns that ballroom.
If I don't have a band,
I don't pay the rent.
If I don't pay the rent, that old lady don't eat.
It's a bad situation.
If she would only die, God forbid, then I could run it like I like.
- It finished us. You know that.
- Yeah.
- We had to break up the band.
- I know.
I heard the band. It was good.
Not great, mind you, but good, very good.
We were just getting started. Well, now I don't know what we'll do.
Just don't you worry, young lady. Get well, and don't worry about the band.
That's easy to say.
I believe in Glenn and I believe what he's trying to do, so naturally I worry.
I tell you, you send him over, he should see me.
With my own money that don't go to the widow,
- I sometimes invest in bands.
- Do you mean that?
Would I make myself so much trouble if I didn't?
But there's a problem.
I know Glenn.
He's down right now and he won't accept help.
I don't think he'd risk somebody else's money.
I never even met your husband and I like him already.
You just leave it to me.
I'll cook up something.
Thank you very much for coming.
And I'm sorry I was so ungracious.
Who was ungracious? We got along fine exchanging pieces of mind.
- Goodbye.
- Bye.
I know you don't want a band but I'm stuck.
But this Charley Firman sneaks a band right out from under my nose.
- I don't have any men. No money.
- I'll give you the money. Here.
Five hundred. Six hundred.
A thousand.
There. You got the money.
Now, go get the men.
I've tried all sorts of combinations.
I never found out what I was looking for.
If I start again, I've got to have an entirely different kind of a band.
Different tunes. I wanna try something radical.
Fine. Go get radical, but just get going!
I gotta have something in here making a noise the kids can dance to.
OK.
- Let's have the five saxes right in there.
- Five saxes?
And the trombones over there.
And the four trumpets right behind them.
Four trombones and four trumpets!
When they play, what's gonna hold the roof on?
Five saxes and a trumpet lead.
Maybe it's good and maybe it ain't, but it's radical.
Let's try this.
Remember this is a ballad, so take it nice and easy, don't bruise it.
Joe, you stand up so I can get a balance between you and the saxophones.
All right, here we go.
One, two.
What's the matter?
- He cut his lip.
- Let's see.
Oh, no. You really split it open.
You better have it looked at.
- I'm sorry, Glenn.
- Go on, Joe. Take care of it.
Oh, no.
All right, take five, boys.
- Is it bad?
- He'll be out for weeks.
- You get more tough breaks...
- Just when you got a good sound.
It isn't what I want but if we could've worked on it...
- You can't find another trumpet blower?
- Not with Joe's range.
All the arrangements have a trumpet lead?
He had to hurt his lip the day before you open.
What are we gonna do?
Postpone the opening?
- Poor old widow lady.
- We're not gonna postpone anything.
We'll open tomorrow if I have to stay up all night and rewrite the arrangement.
- You can't. It's impossible.
- Wait a minute!
Just a minute. I have an idea.
Willie Schwartz could play those parts on clarinet. Why not?
You see? Clarinet lead. Why not?
Get me lots of manuscript paper.
Can I use your office?
Sure.
Clarinet lead. Why not? And, Don, call Helen, tell her not to worry.
Tell her I'll be here all night.
Clarinet lead.
And I can harmonise it real tight, all in the same octave.
Four saxes and a clarinet.
He better stay up all night.
He looks like he's got it, maybe.
Listen to those kids!
There's no maybe about it.
That's it, that's the sound.
Thank you.
Here's a brand-new number by Jerry Gray.
I hope you like it as much as we do.
I, uh, bought you a present for your birthday.
My birthday? That isn't till next November.
This is for your last birthday.
- Oh, Glenn!
- They're just real.
Here, let me try 'em on for size.
There.
Hm. Not bad.
I forgot to tell you the name of that tune.
We call it String Of Pearls.
- Hi, Mother, Dad!
- Hi, Glenn.
You rested up ready for the big night?
We've had a wonderful time with little Stevie.
- Quite a boy. Big for his age.
- Isn't he?
I can't tell you how much it's meant to us to have him.
- Is everything all set?
- Yes, dear.
- Did you get Helen out of the house?
- Oh, yes.
- Where'd she go?
- I suppose she's shopping.
A girl doesn't have a tenth wedding anniversary every day!
- You sure she doesn't suspect anything?
- Oh, no.
- Is everything all set back here?
- Oh, yes.
I think Helen'll get a big kick out of this.
She certainly will, Glenn.
I've been lookin' about.
Quite a place you got here.
It's beautiful, Glenn.
- Paid for, is it?
- Yes, it's paid for.
- Must be doin' pretty well.
- We hear him every night on that radio!
That's only 15 minutes.
Don't suppose it pays much.
Then there's the records. And he's playing at the Hotel Pennsylvania.
How much do they pay for playing on one of those records?
- We get three cents a record.
- Three cents?
Have to sell a heap of records to make it worthwhile.
But they do, dear!
- Let's go see Stevie.
- No, Helen wants us to wait.
Why? Come on. Sure, we can go on up there.
- Hi. Stevie and I have a surprise for you.
- You do?
- Let's go up to the nursery.
- Come on.
How many copies of a record do they sell, son?
Moonlight Serenade, we sold about 800,000 copies.
- Did you say 800,000?
- That's right.
What's...
Look what just arrived.
This is Stevie's new baby sister.
- Can I pick her up?
- I think so. She's your daughter.
Well, well, well.
So you're Jonnie Dee! Look, she's beautiful! Isn't she?
Look at those red cheeks.
Stevie, look at your baby sister.
Isn't she beautiful?
- You sure surprised him!
- I've been planning it for months.
- I told 'em I just had to have her today.
- How old is she?
- Six weeks today.
- Old lady.
- She's a hungry old woman.
- This is gonna take some expert action.
Her young father's gonna feed her.
Let's have the bottle.
Here, now. Here we go.
All right, Jonnie Dee.
There we are.
How's your appetite?
There! Is this hot enough?
That's a good girl.
The kid's starved.
- Helen, we'll be late for the theatre.
- Coming.
- I'll get the car.
- All right, dear.
Glenn, I've been figuring. 800,000 records at three cents apiece, that's $24,000.
- That's right.
- Just for one record?
Well, you certainly are doing well at that!
All right, boys, right over here.
You all set? All right.
Helen, come on!
I'm coming!
(ALL) Congratulations!
What a surprise!
- Oh, Mother!
- Darling!
Oh, I'm glad to see you!
- Polly, Don. How are you?
- It's a wonderful surprise!
- We sort of surprised each other.
- Yes, we did!
I've got another surprise.
The band has a number, and that's exactly what it is, a number.
This is based on a telephone number that was kind of important to you and me, Helen, about ten years ago.
Here we go. One. Two.
Now, listen to this. Now, watch.
Pennsylvania 6-5000!
- Remember?
- Yes!
Pennsylvania 6-5000!
Would you like to make this a really memorable evening?
- Dance with me.
- In front of all these people?
In all the years we've been married you've never danced with me.
- And I may never get another chance.
- Here we go.
- Now.
- (RINGING)
- Pennsylvania 6-5000!
- Good.
- Hi, Joe.
- Hi, Glenn.
Glad to see ya.
That's good.
Come on, don't stand around.
Come on! Dance it up!
Come on, let's try something.
- That's pretty good. Let's try that again.
- All right.
I think I better go back to the trombone.
You sit down there.
All right, you.
- (RINGING)
- Pennsylvania 6-5-0-0-0!
I'm kinda glad you called me that night.
So am I. All right, let's have something to eat.
Come on. Come on, dear.
- We're cutting a record of that.
- A record?
- Three cents?
- Right.
That's my boy!
You oughta use that number in your picture.
Picture?
Glenn and the boys are gonna do a movie in the fall.
- Are you gonna be a movie star?
- Yes, Mother.
I'm gonna play Tarzan and swing from the trees playing my trombone.
I'd like to propose a toast.
To Glenn and Helen, who serve the best food in town.
Besides, the price is right. We can remember when it wasn't like this.
May you be as happy together always as you are tonight.
Thank you, Chummy.
That was a very nice speech.
It oughta be,
I worked on it all day!
- You did?
- (LAUGHTER)
I thought your special number was gonna be Helen's favourite, Little Brown Jug.
He'd never do that. He hates it.
I knew this would come up sooner or later.
So I have an anniversary present for my good wife and on the card it says,
"Ha-ha-ha, you and me
"We hardly ever disagree
"So here you are, this will be
"The one brown jug you'll get from me."
- Roll 'em for a take.
- M3-45, take one.
Here we go.
One, two, three, four.
All right. Save it.
- Hello, everybody.
- Hi, Helen.
Well, hi, dear.
- I thought you'd like lunch.
- I sure would.
I brought the mail.
Chummy, we still have a little time.
Why don't you go over At Last?
Let's go up to the control booth.
- Anything wrong?
- No, no.
Come on, sit down, honey.
Helen, I wanted to talk to you about...
With this picture deal and the record sales and everything,
- we're pretty well fixed.
- Yes.
And, no matter what happens, you and the kids,
- you're in good shape.
- Yes, I know.
Can you come to Men's
Wardrobe at two?
- Yeah.
- Thank you.
So, I thought that...
What I'm trying to get at...
I've been thinking... Yeah?
On Tuxedo Junction, we'll have a wax right after lunch.
Fine. Thanks very much.
- So...
- Open the letter from the War Department.
- I'm sure it's your commission.
- How do you know?
I've known it for months. I knew it was only a question of time.
I just put in for it two weeks ago. I guess you found out about it before I did.
Go on, open it. I want to know what to call you.
Let's see.
This is it all right.
Captain. Captain Alton G Miller.
Serial number 0-4-5-0-5-2-7-3.
How soon will you be leaving, Captain Miller?
I don't know. It usually takes about a month.
Don wants to go with me, so do some of the boys.
- Are you gonna have your own band?
- I hope so.
You know, all the kids that liked our music are in the service.
- That's the reason I...
- I understand.
I think you'll look very handsome in uniform.
What do you think about it?
Are you upset?
Of course I'm upset.
I don't want you to go but I guess I'd be even more upset if you didn't.
- They sound good.
- Do we have to play this kind of music?
We've marched to this music for a hundred years.
- That's what I mean.
- We're not gonna change now, Captain.
We gotta do better than this for General Arnold.
In all my 27 years in the Army
I have never witnessed a more flagrant breach of military decorum.
- Sorry, Colonel.
- And walking through a reviewing column!
- I had to get to the band, sir.
- Then playing blues!
You made a laughing stock of this entire unit, and in front of General Arnold!
- I had no such intentions.
- What was your intention?
Blasting out right in the General's face!
The men seemed tired, sir.
- The men's condition is my responsibility.
- Yes, sir.
I must warn you that your conduct calls for disciplinary action.
- Yes, sir.
- (KNOCK ON DOOR)
Come in.
Just wanted to say goodbye, we're due in Washington tonight.
General Arnold, it's been a pleasure.
- I'm sorry that...
- Aren't you Captain Glenn Miller?
- Yes, sir.
- I want to congratulate you on your band.
- Thank you, sir.
- Great morale builder.
The effect was astonishing!
Keep up the good work.
- Yes, sir.
- I like your music myself.
Makes me think of home.
My children play your records day and night.
- May I make a suggestion, sir?
- Certainly.
I'd like to suggest that I be given the authority to form my own band.
Play my kind of music.
Most of my men are in the service.
If we can be sent overseas,
I know we can be of value.
As you say, I think we can give the boys a piece of home.
I must say I agree with you, Miller.
- I'll see what I can do.
- Thank you, sir.
Glenn!
Well, gee, I didn't expect this!
General Arnold brought us.
General, thank you. I appreciate everything you've done.
A pleasure. I'll probably get court-martialled but I brought 'em anyway.
- Good luck.
- Thank you.
- Goodbye and thank you.
- I enjoyed it.
- Goodbye, General.
- Goodbye.
Well, Jonnie Dee.
You got a hug for your daddy?
Got a hug for your daddy?
That's a girl!
How about you, young man?
How about you?
- Can I fly in your airplane?
- I'm afraid not.
You have to stay and take care of your mother.
You be good and don't cause him any trouble.
- I'll try not to. You take care of yourself.
- Don't worry.
You show 'em a picture of me every once in a while.
I promise. And I'll read them your letters, if you write.
I'm gonna write.
Gee, I'm gettin' homesick already.
It's funny how you can miss a person even before he's gone.
Hurry it up, Glenn.
Goodbye, dear.
Goodbye, Stevie. Bye.
This is Glenn Miller and the
American Band of the AEF. coming to you from Buzz Bomb Alley through the courtesy of the BBC.
And to all you GI boys and girls a long, long way from home, and to all our British friends as well, we hope to give you a little lift.
That's why we're here.
We'll start right out by seeing if we can put you In The Mood.
Thank you. A little while ago an airplane landed out here and out stepped a singing group that you all know.
They sang with me back in the States.
Let's give 'em a good, warm welcome. The Modernaires!
The Modernaires!
And somebody else stepped out of that same airplane. A big surprise, boys.
Here's a girl you all know.
She's flown across the ocean just to sing for you.
Let's give her a good, big ETO welcome. Frances Langford!
Hi, Frances.
- Thank you, Glenn.
- Thank you.
- That's from Helen.
- Bless your heart.
I'll start out by taking you on a trip south of the Mason-Dixon line.
Let's all get aboard that old Chattanooga Choo Choo.
♪ Hi there, Fran, what you say?
♪ Step aside, partner, it's my day
♪ Lend an ear and listen to my version
♪ Of a really solid
Tennessee excursion
♪ Pardon me, boy, is this the Chattanooga Choo Choo?
♪ Yes, yes
♪ Track 29
♪ Boy, you can give me a shine
♪ I can afford to board the Chattanooga Choo Choo
♪ Yes, yes
♪ I've got my fare
♪ And just a trifle to spare
♪ You leave the Pennsylvania
Station 'bout a quarter to four
♪ Read a magazine and then you're in Baltimore
♪ Dinner in the diner
♪ Nothing could be finer
♪ Than to have your ham and eggs in Carolina
♪ When you hear the whistle blowin' eight to the bar
♪ Then you know that
Tennessee is not very far
♪ Shovel all the coal in
♪ Gotta keep it rollin'
♪ Woo-woo, Chattanooga there you are
♪ There's gonna be
♪ A certain party at the station
♪ Waitin' for me
♪ How very happy we'll be
♪ He's gonna sigh
♪ Until I tell him that I'll never roam
♪ So, Chattanooga Choo Choo, won't you choo-choo me home?
♪ Chattanooga, Chattanooga
♪ All aboard
♪ Chattanooga, Chattanooga
♪ All aboard
♪ Chattanooga, Chattanooga
♪ Chattanooga Choo Choo, won't you choo-choo me home? ♪
- (♪ MUSIC PLAYING ON RADIO)
- Remember that?
Seems a million years since we made that.
I wrote Glenn what you asked.
I want to read you his answer. He says...
"Tell Chummy not to take the job.
"As long as there's a Glenn Miller
Band, he'll be a part of it.
"Don and I have been making plans for after the war.
"I have a lot of ideas for new arrangements,
"so tell Chummy to start looking for a friendly pawn shop."
Friendly pawn shop.
He hasn't changed, has he?
Yes, he has! He's been promoted.
He's Major Glenn Miller now.
Major? That's wonderful.
I wish I could've gone with him.
You'd have made a fine soldier with your heart and ulcers!
I've got two eyes and ten fingers.
That's all you need to play the piano.
They're going to Paris.
I told you that.
And he says, "We're doing a special programme on Christmas Day."
It's gonna be broadcast over here.
"Be sure and listen cos I'm sending you an extra special Christmas present."
And I'll know what it is if
I listen to the programme.
- I wonder what he's gonna do.
- I don't know. But I'm sure gonna listen.
- Morning, Glenn.
- Morning, Colonel.
- I sure appreciate the lift.
- Not at all.
- You coming too?
- No. Tomorrow.
I got some work to do in Paris.
They're gonna let us do some shows at the advance bases.
It's kinda soupy, isn't it?
It's always this way in
December. Shall we hop in?
Don, I don't know where I'll be, so as soon as you land at Orly, get in touch with the dispatcher.
Be sure the band goes over that new arrangement.
- I want to use it.
- Right. See you tomorrow.
Pick up my mail. I'm expecting a letter from Helen. Bye.
All right, hurry it up, you guys.
This is Paris. You wanted to see it. Now's your chance.
I'm Lieutenant Haynes. Did Major Glenn
Miller leave a message here for me?
Nothing here, sir. Did you try Flight Control?
No, he said he'd leave it here. He came with Colonel Baessell on the Norseman.
The flight wasn't logged in.
No Norseman has landed here in two or three days.
Thanks.
- General! I thought you were in Europe.
- Just arrived.
- May I congratulate you on your promotion?
- Thank you.
Five Star final.
Sounds like a late evening paper.
- Have you heard about Glenn Miller?
- Yes, this morning.
Notified his family yet?
We've been ordered to withhold notifications until after Christmas.
His band is broadcasting tomorrow.
We can't let Mrs Miller find out that way.
- Do you mind if I call her personally?
- Of course not.
- Use my telephone.
- Thank you.
It's still a couple of minutes before the broadcast, Helen.
You know, I never realised how wonderful friends could be.
Even General Arnold, he called me himself.
That's why he's where he is, maybe, because he's that kind of a guy.
Last night when I couldn't sleep, I got to thinking.
It come to me about this broadcast.
You know, Helen, this is a test.
A test? How do you mean?
You remember how much we talked, all of us, about how Glenn's band was something different?
Something permanent?
An institution, like!
Yeah, Glenn and I talked about it often.
Don't you see what Si's getting at?
If the band goes on, even if Glenn's not with it, that's the proof.
It means that Glenn's band, Glenn's music, keeps right on going, and the kids'll be dancing to it for years and years.
That's what he wanted.
(ANNOUNCER) 'We take you now to
Paris for a special programme.'
'As some of you might know,
Major Glenn Miller is not with us today.
'But in his absence, we shall do this programme exactly as he had planned it.
'Our first number is a new arrangement
'which Major Miller himself made especially for this performance.
'This tune should be a familiar one,
'especially to the members of Major Miller's family across the ocean who are listening.'

This is the borderland that lies between the countries of Egypt and Israel.
As it is today, so it was 1,000 years before the birth of Jesus of Nazareth.
Even then, these boundaries were kept ablaze with the fires of hatred and conflict.
Each side prided themselves on the efficiency of their spies but kept themselves always on the alert.
Soldiers of David, commanded by his son and heir Adonijah, prince of Israel.
- A chariot moving along the road.
- Stop the fool, whoever he is.
- Prince Solomon.
- Is my brother here?
Prince Adonijah is at the top of the hill.
Follow me.
Solomon! What are you doing here?
On my way to Jerusalem, we got word the Egyptians were on the prowl again.
I thought you might need some help.
You are better suited to singing songs than exploits in battle.
Our father David was a singer of songs, but he's also a mighty warrior.
- Where are the Egyptians?
- They thought to trap me, to rush in on our camp and kill us while we slept, but we're not sleeping.
Give me your orders.
This is not your kind of game, brother.
I never thought of it as a game.
I fight by your side.
- Then the sword of victory, Solomon.
- And the shield of God, Adonijah.
Spread out, and kill them all.
- Now we attack.
- Attack.
Sound the retreat.
Once again, the Pharaoh will have reason to remember the name of Adonijah.
Let him write it in the blood of his dead.
Too long this soil has been bathed in blood.
Have you lost your taste for blood now that the battle is over?
After seeing the glory of victory, the glory of peace makes itself known.
Peace is for women and children.
Let me cleanse my mouth of the stench of the Egyptians.
To a new victory won by the Prince of Israel.
- To the warrior prince, Adonijah.
- To Adonijah.
To your glory, brother.
May it increase the glory of Israel.
There would be greater glory if I were not shackled by command of my father.
Defend but never attack.
When I am king, there will be no privileged sanctuaries for my enemies.
I'll pursue them into their own cities.
- We'll hunt them down like dogs.
- We'll rout them out.
Highness, this one was found among the dead, but he is no Egyptian.
Put him down.
The Pharaoh has mercenaries, but I have never seen one like him.
- From where do you come?
- I have the honor to serve Her Majesty.
- The Queen of Sheba.
- The Queen of Sheba?
We're a long way from the land of Sheba.
800 leagues.
Where goes the Queen of Sheba there go I, a soldier of her guard.
Why does a Sheban fight with Egyptians against Israel?
I fight where my queen commands.
And it pleased my queen to lead her troops against a band of barbarians.
I'll send your hide to this brave queen of yours as a token of my esteem.
No. Grant him the respect one soldier should have for another.
Bind up his wounds.
So spare him.
Out of regard for the tender heart of my dear brother.
This queen amuses herself by leading men across our borders to slay Israelites as she might attend a circus.
I doubt if she found much amusement here.
Hezrai.
What brings the king's chancellor here?
More orders?
No, Highness. If that were so, mine would be a far happier mission.
Your father, King David, lies at the point of death.
He lapsed into a coma and has not regained consciousness.
His physicians could give me no word of hope to bring you.
Josiah, we ride to Jerusalem.
- Hail Adonijah, King of Israel.
- Hail Adonijah. Hail the king.
It is not your right to proclaim the king.
These are the words of the Law:
"He shall be anointed with the waters of Gihon and crowned in the presence of the priest and the elders of the tribes."
Your law may be the Word, Chancellor.
Mine is the sword.
Hail Adonijah.
And why do you remain silent?
Am I not David's rightful heir?
- Your first thought is not for our father?
- Life is for the living.
When I know David is no longer living,
I will be the first to acknowledge you.
I will follow you, Highness.
We could reach Jerusalem by dawn tomorrow.
Let Solomon concern himself with the dead. My thoughts are for the living.
I have business with this Sheban queen.
We must ride fast to overtake her.
Horses!
Hai! Hai!
Hai! Go!
Go! Go!
Halt!
Stand aside.
In Israel, I give the orders.
I regret that we did not meet last night when you visited my encampment.
Who are you?
- The king of Israel.
- He lies.
Whoever he is, he is an impostor.
The king is an old man, weak with the burden of his years.
Is that why you thought it safe to join forces with the Egyptians?
Give me leave, and I will clear them from the road.
You think you could do better now than you did last night?
David lies dead in Jerusalem.
I, Adonijah, am his heir.
- We want no dealings with the Israelites.
- Let him speak, Baltor.
- What favor do you seek of me?
- If we were dealing in flavors,
- I could bring you the heads of your dead.
- Kill him!
- Your own head is not too secure.
- Silence, Haran.
I pursued you not to ask flavors but to grant them.
And what favor could an Israelite grant the Queen of Sheba?
A kingdom twice as large as she now rules.
Renounce your alliance with the Pharaoh.
Let your banners fly beside mine.
When I have overthrown him, I will give you all his lands that border on your own.
And if I refuse your generosity?
Then I will hurl you down into the same dust that will choke the Pharaoh.
Yours is the choice.
Glory with Israel, or disaster with Egypt.
You dog!
My ancestors sat upon the throne of a great country when yours still crawled on their hands and knees, feeding on insects.
- Is that your answer?
- This is my answer.
Haran!
Hail the king of Israel!
- (priest chanting)
- (crowd responding)
Solomon.
- Am I in time, Abishag?
- He still lives.
Your mother and I have been constantly by his side.
- We must have hope.
- My prayers have been answered.
That you are here while your father is able to give you his blessing.
- Mother.
- My son.
My son.
Do not despair.
- Is there hope?
- His heart still beats, but his breath is so quenched that it leaves no mist upon the metal.
My father. My king.
Let my prayers call you back from the shadows.
Solomon, peace of the Lord.
In my dream, your face was ever before me.
Now I am here, Father.
- Where is your brother?
- Adonijah was detained with his troops.
Ever the soldier, before all else.
Send messages with my command that he return.
It will be done.
Now rest until your strength returns.
- Bring me Nathan the prophet.
- I am here, O King.
Summon the elders of the 12 tribes and the council.
I have had a vision from God.
You've been summoned at the king's command. Hear the words of the king.
Has there been no report from the couriers sent to bring Adonijah?
No, sire, none have returned.
Then I must act without him.
40 years I have reigned over you, and I have been your father and you my beloved children.
Excepting the memory of me which will live in your hearts,
I leave but one monument to my name: the unity of Israel.
Symbol of the 12 tribes, once separate, each striving for dominance, but now you, the elders of the tribes, stand before me, banded together, in an indestructible oneness.
You were the last to lead your tribe into the union, Ahab.
And as a pledge of your loyalty, you brought me your only child, Abishag.
I have loved and cherished her as my own daughter, as I have loved and cherished Israel, of which she has become the living symbol.
She has been an honor to my house.
And to the household of David.
My day is almost done.
But the day of Israel has hardly dawned.
It is well that I make room for another to follow after me on this throne.
No, you stay the king.
(crowd) No! No!
- His Highness, Prince Adonijah.
- Adonijah?
Sire, I have driven like a fury to attend this council ever since your command reached me.
Behold the two halves of me.
The soldier.
And the poet.
I have loved you both dearly.
Tell me.
- Is there any jealousy between you?
- No, sire.
Jealousy of what? Have I a desire to distinguish myself as a scholar?
It is Adonijah's destiny to rule, and I will truly serve him.
It is God who decrees the destinies of his creatures, my son.
As I lay close to death, out of the darkness a great voice called to me and said
"I am the Lord thy God, who placed thee upon the throne."
"And this I declare unto you: only in peace can Israel prosper and be made great, not in strife."
And again, the Lord God Jehovah spoke to his servant David:
"Behold, a son has been born unto thee, a man of peace."
"Wherefore, thou hast named him Solomon."
"And I will establish his kingdom for ever."
- The kingdom is mine!
- God wills it otherwise.
You made good use of your time alone with him.
You used his weakness against me.
- I knew nothing of this.
- You lie.
- You were always a weaver of words.
- You accuse him falsely.
After you've chosen him over me?
Theirs should be the choice.
- Let them choose.
- Aye, hear us.
- Adonijah.
- (crowd) Adonijah.
- You, the elders, what say you?
- Accept the will of God.
- The crown is mine. I shall fight for it.
- Adonijah is the rightful heir.
Act not with violence lest the wrath of God fall upon you.
I have never done anything to deprive you.
Words from the mouth of a hypocrite.
Isn't yours the act of a hypocrite in coming to greet your father?
You who proclaimed yourself king even though you knew David lived.
Has Hezrai spoken truly?
I did not know that you had sent him to spy on me.
Could you not wait until the breath left my body?
- I am weary with waiting.
- The king must respect and obey the law.
In proclaiming yourself, you have violated the law of God and man.
I claimed what was mine by right, and I shall never relinquish that right.
How long will it take them to discover his incompetence?
Solomon king? Impossible.
Now it is revealed out of the mouth of Adonijah himself why God hath turned his face from him.
The wisdom of God passeth all understanding.
As it is written, so let it be done.
Bring forth the waters of Gihon and here, as God commands, anoint Solomon king of Israel.
- By the grace of God.
- (elders) By the grace of God.
Yield, Adonijah. Yield and bend the knee in the name of God.
Never! Rather would I bend knee to the Pharaoh than to this brother who has robbed me of my birthright!
Then hold high the tablet of unity before his eyes so that he may ever remember the purpose of his consecration.
Hail Solomon, by the grace of God, king of Israel.
(all) Hail Solomon, by the grace of God, king of Israel.
Turn not against thy brother, Solomon.
His blood is hot, but it will cool.
You have my pledge, sire.
I will never forget that he is my brother.
And you, my child, will you remain in the king's household, or will you return to Gilead with your father Ahab?
When I was brought to the house of David, my people sang songs of gladness, and I came with joy in my heart.
With the same joy, I will remain within the house of Solomon.
One thing remains heavy on my heart.
In my youth, I dreamed that I would build a mighty temple to house the Ark of the Covenant.
But I sinned greatly, and was not fit to erect the habitation of the Lord.
Redeem my vow, my son.
Pledge me that you will build the great temple of which I had dreamed so that God will have his dwelling place among his people.
I promise you it shall be built.
Be strong and of good courage.
Dread not, nor be dismayed.
O Lord, my God, thou hast made thy servant king instead of David, my father, and I am no more than a little child.
Give therefore unto thy servant an understanding heart that I may judge thy people, that I may discern between good and evil, for who is able to judge this, thy so great a people?
Because thou hast asked this thing and hast not asked for thyself long life, nor riches for thyself, nor the life of thine enemies, but hast asked for understanding to discern judgment.
Behold, I have done according to thy words.
I have given unto thee a wise and understanding heart.
And if thou wilt walk in my ways, keeping my statutes and my commandments,
I will give unto thee both riches and honor so there shall not be among the kings of the earth any like unto thee in all thy days.
- Not good enough.
- No?
With you, I am seldom good enough.
Double the wager.
Very well.
I should have killed him when he was chosen king.
Patience, Highness. Wait.
- I am not a patient man.
- I am aware of that.
Leave us, Joab.
Did you not hear His Majesty, Joab?
Obey his command.
For a man whose wisdom is becoming the marvel of the land, you show a surprising lack of it by coming here alone.
I have come to ask a favor of you.
Knowing that this hand of mine must ache to drive this spear through your body?
I know what is in your heart.
All I ask is that you love your country as much as you hate me.
That would make me the greatest patriot in the history of Israel.
David has laid a great burden upon me.
To rule the kingdom and to build the temple, both of which I have undertaken.
But you have elected to remain here in your lodge, depriving the people of your great talent as a soldier and a commander.
To build is not enough.
What has been built must be defended against all the enemies of the nation.
For that task, you are far better suited than I.
Return to Jerusalem, offer your services, not to me, but to your country and your God.
You are offering me command of the army?
Yes.
Even though I might try to use it against you?
Yes.
Well?
I am trying to decide if you are the wisest of the wise, or the fool of fools.
So Solomon walked in the way of his God, and through a long era of peace,
Israel grew and prospered.
With the completion of the temple,
Solomon had fulfilled a most sacred pledge to his father.
Solomon, king over Israel.
Lord God of Israel, there is no god like thee.
Heaven of heavens cannot contain thee, how much less this house that I have builded unto thy name?
Yet hear thy servant and his supplication, and let thy word be verified which thou spakest unto my father David.
And of thy people Israel, when they shall pray towards this place, hear thou in heaven, and when thou hearest, forgive.
For they be thy people as this house is thine, that all the earth may know the Lord is God.
There is none else.
(all) Amen.
Come. Come.
Come...
Come...
Oh, Majesty!
Come and join us, Baltor.
I am teaching my bird to obey.
Takyan disapproves. I need an ally.
That is exactly what the Pharaoh is complaining about.
The Pharaoh is complaining?
We will have to teach him.
Another message has just arrived from Egypt.
- Let it wait.
- But it is a serious matter.
The Pharaoh has called a conference of all the kings.
Sit down, Baltor.
You make Tokki nervous.
A deeper shade, Takyan.
Pomegranate. That is the right color.
Well, Baltor?
What is the problem this time?
Your Majesty, the problem is the Israelites.
They proclaim peace yet strengthen their army, and for what purpose?
They are afraid of the Pharaoh, perhaps.
What have we to fear?
In spite of our eternal hatred, we now have friendly relations with Israel.
True, but our security is threatened.
Almost fanatically they support their great King Solomon.
A dreamer. A man of peace.
But a man of ideas, and there is nothing more dangerous than a man with an idea.
- The threat is real?
- Very real.
Solomon's threat is not only his army, but his god.
His god? We have a hundred gods.
This is one god who teaches that all men are equal and none are slaves.
What a foolish idea.
And yet... if that idea were to take hold of the people, the Queen of Sheba would soon come crashing down from her throne.
As would all other absolute monarchs.
Therefore I strongly advise
Your Majesty to attend this conference.
You see, Baltor?
To catch the bird, first bait the trap.
Perhaps we can help the Pharaoh solve the problem of Solomon, and kill two birds with one stone.
Since Solomon came to the throne of
Israel, I've watched his strength grow until now his power has become a threat to my borders.
And the wealth and trade which once came to us now finds its way to him.
For too long we have delayed plans for his destruction.
- Yes, take up arms against him.
- Raise a great host.
- Trample Israel into the dust.
- King Eglon.
- From Moab, I want 1 ,000 chariots.
- I will send you 2,000.
Kaldu, from Chaldea you will send me 5,000 archers.
- More if they are needed.
- We will attack exactly as I have planned.
From the north, the east and the south, at the same time, by surprise.
They will not know how or where to make a defense.
- We will drive them into the sea.
- And Sheba.
What force will you send against Solomon?
None.
Why? Are you not my ally?
We must put an end to Israel, and with it this dangerous idea of one god.
You talk of war. How can you destroy an idea, a faith, with the point of your spears?
There is only one way it can be done.
What do you suggest? Have you a plan?
I have.
But for every plan, there is a price.
What do you want this time?
The port of Melish on the Red Sea in return for the downfall of Solomon.
- That is impossible.
- Melish is my port.
This time you ask for too much, Sheba.
Tell me, what would be the cost of a war against Israel?
You know very well.
And I offer you a plan almost without cost.
His Majesty hesitates, Baltor.
Perhaps we should return to Sheba rather than to visit Jerusalem.
Wait.
I grant it.
- And how will you destroy Solomon?
- It is said that Solomon is wise.
But no matter how wise a man may be, he is still human, with a human weakness.
I will sit at the feet of Solomon like the wise men who flock to Jerusalem.
And perhaps I will learn from his own lips the way to destroy him.
Truly, the way of a woman is beyond our understanding.
The way of a woman is simple, my lord.
It is always to follow the way of a man.
I shall keep myself informed of your progress in Jerusalem.
Mother! Come! Look! Mother!
Halt!
My compliments. I am Benaiah, sent to escort you into Jerusalem.
Greetings.
Her Majesty the Queen of Sheba.
Your Majesty, the king of Israel wishes me to convey his greetings to you.
Truly, your king has built nobly.
There is no such splendour, even in Egypt.
And all that for a god he cannot even see.
Forward.
Do you think she will be as beautiful as we have heard?
This is something I never thought to see, a pagan welcomed to Israel.
How can a pagan be converted to the true God unless she knows him?
We must never forget she is an ally of Egypt.
Because she is an ally of Egypt, we must show her our unity and our strength.
Let us offer her our friendship in the hope that we have one less enemy.
She is very beautiful, isn't she?
Your Royal Majesty.
Permit me to present my sovereign,
Her Royal Majesty, the Queen of Sheba.
Israel extends a warm welcome to Your Majesty.
I am grateful for your permission to visit your beautiful country.
After so much traveling, you must be pleased to have reached your destination.
If I had traveled ten times the distance it would be forgotten in the face of the marvels I have seen, and in the splendour of your city of Jerusalem.
If it pleases you, we can dispense with ceremony and let you rest.
You are most considerate.
But first, let me offer a token of my appreciation for the kindness you have shown to a stranger within your gates.
- Baltor.
- Haran!
- So many gifts.
- Yes, and brought from so far.
Such riches.
I have no adequate words to express my thanks and the gratitude of my people.
Along with them, I offer my hand in the hope that this day will mark the beginning of a closer friendship between Israel and Sheba.
That would be the most welcome gift of all.
Benaiah, do you suppose the land of the Shebans is always like this?
I would think so, yes.
We must not keep the queen waiting.
Welcome.
A message for your queen.
Her Majesty the Queen.
His Majesty King Solomon sends his greetings and has commanded me - has commanded us - to inform Your Majesty that in response to Your Majesty's request he will be most happy to receive you in private audience.
He is most gracious.
How thoughtful of the king to send so charming an envoy.
He doesn't know I'm here.
I was so anxious to come.
Then I am even more pleased. Come in.
You are the first of His Majesty's court to visit me.
How interesting your encampment is.
Are your people always so carefree and gay?
We enjoy life and pleasure.
- Don't you?
- Yes, we do.
But we are an austere people.
We tend to be more serious.
And your king. Is he also serious?
King Solomon has a great responsibility.
He must maintain the unity of our 12 tribes.
It is very important, this unity?
Oh, yes. Without it, there would be no Israel.
The gods of Sheba.
Mal-Ra, the guardian of destiny.
Kol, god of the sun and stars.
Rama, who sends the rain.
We have many gods.
In Israel, we have one god.
When he fails you, do you blame him for everything?
He never fails us.
You must find it gratifying to be so close to your king.
Are you his sister, perhaps?
Sometimes he calls me that.
We have been very close to each other, ever since I came to live in the house of his father.
Do you stay long in Israel?
That depends upon your king.
You are charming. Innocent.
And you fulfill all my expectations.
For you.
From the land of Sheba.
A gift from its queen.
This Solomon the Almighty...
Almighty what?
20 men surrounding him, and he calls it a private audience.
- He has entertained you royally...
- And those state banquets!
I at one end, he at the other.
And in between us, a lot of sour-faced old men.
Not once have I been with him alone.
Not once.
But we have only been here five days.
This Solomon is more difficult to approach than the Pharaoh of Egypt.
This great king has time for everything, except the time for being a man.
Send him to me, Rha-Gon, god of love.
Make me the most desirable of women.
Make my lips sweet as honey, my skin soft and fragrant like the petals of a flower.
Give him to me.
I want him at my feet.
(Takyan) Your Majesty has a royal visitor.
Her Majesty and I have met before.
My apologies to Your Majesty.
I regret that I was unable to be at the reception to welcome you.
Had you been there, it would have made my welcome complete.
Your Majesty is gracious. Rather different from the occasion of your last visit.
If I remember rightly,
Your Highness was then a king.
Yes. And as a king, I offered you an alliance against the Pharaoh.
And my answer was not too kind.
So I remember.
This time I venture to offer you another alliance.
Do you come as envoy from the king of Israel?
I come as Adonijah, rightful heir to the throne of Israel.
An alliance between us could give us many things we both desire.
Do you want Sheban arms to help you usurp your brother's throne?
Solomon is the usurper.
Once I am on the throne, our lands could encircle Egypt, and all of the kings would be at our mercy.
Why should I want them at my mercy?
I maintain good relations with the kings.
And King Solomon is my friend.
So how could your offer possibly interest me?
Has the screaming eagle been transformed into a cooing dove?
How dull the world would be if people never changed.
I am wiser, Prince Adonijah.
I no longer do battle with a sword.
That's why I find your visit so disturbing.
I find it difficult to believe that you come bearing an olive branch of peace.
What else could I bring to King Solomon, who is a man of peace?
Your Majesty, it is clear that I waste your time as well as mine.
With Your Majesty's permission...
I think I understood you better as the screaming eagle.
He is still a dog.
Let the women in judgment come forward.
Never before has an alien sat beside our king in judgment.
Her presence profanes all Israel.
Who makes complaint?
My Lord King, this woman Leah and I dwell within the same house.
I was delivered of a child.
On the third day after I was delivered, she was delivered also.
There was no one in the house but we two.
In the night, this woman's child died because she lay upon it, wherefore she removed my son from beside me while I slept and laid her dead child against my bosom.
- She lies.
- (Solomon) Silence.
And when I rose in the morning to nurse my child, he was dead.
- Not so, Lord Solomon.
- The truth, Lord King.
For when I looked at the child in my arms,
I knew it was not the son that I did bear.
- It was her own child and none other.
- The living child is mine.
- The dead is yours, the living mine.
- Bring the infant forward.
Josiah.
Place the child on the steps before me and show him to me.
Draw your sword, Josiah.
Divide the child into two parts.
Give half to the one woman, half to the other.
No!
If it must be, give the child to her that it may not be slain.
Divide it.
It should be neither hers nor mine.
Take your son, mother. He is surely yours.
May the Lord God Jehovah praise and bless you.
You would rather have surrendered him to another than to see him harmed.
And take this woman hence and administer to her punishment to fit her perjury.
She lies. She lies.
It's not right. The child is mine.
Mine!
Now, at last, I have seen a judgment of Solomon, and your wisdom amazes me.
Whatever wisdom has been given me, it was for the benefit of my people.
Continue to teach me, I beg of you, so that I may gain a greater insight into the wonder of your understanding.
It will enable me to become a better and wiser ruler over my own people.
Real wisdom lies in the ability to decide between the true and the false.
Can you believe that only four years ago, all this was barren desert?
You have such a joy in all you have accomplished.
It is a joy to make the desert bloom by bringing water from the mountains.
You have made this into a paradise.
The water, the work, the warmth of the sun have done it, not I.
In the last few days,
I have shown you much of Israel.
But you have not told me anything of your own country.
At this moment, my own land seems as distant as the stars.
In my youth, I used to dream of visiting all the faraway kingdoms of the earth.
And now instead, the rulers of those countries come to you.
You rule Sheba alone.
From the beginning of time, only queens have ruled in Sheba.
That is our law.
I would be happy to tell Your Majesty many things concerning my country if I were sure it would be of interest to you.
Why do you say that?
Because after all the times
I have visited you, you have not returned the compliment by visiting my encampment.
And me.
Perhaps I was waiting for an invitation.
You promise to accept?
I promise.
I am so happy that at last you have come to visit me.
My people feel honored.
It is your guest who feels honored.
You are not bored by our primitive pastimes?
No, it interests me to learn what amuses you.
Enough, Takyan.
If I do not prevent it, my people would stay and stare at you.
Fabled Solomon.
The way I stare at you?
This is the hour of Rha-Gon.
Every evening, I make an offering to him.
Rha-Gon, giver of life, god of love, accept this token of my gratitude and devotion.
The Feast of Rha-Gon is the most sacred rite celebrated each year in the land of Sheba.
But tonight let there be no talk of gods.
Not even of wisdom.
And there is Sheban wine to warm the heart.
My offering to you.
Tonight, we are alone in a different world.
My world.
Yes, we are in a different world.
Is not the wine to your taste, my Lord?
It almost made me forget that you are an ally of the Pharaoh.
An enemy of Israel.
Your Majesty, everything is prepared for tonight.
I chose this one.
Mmm. Attar of roses. I love it.
- The king's favorite scent.
- How do you know?
The women of his harem told me.
I don't want to remind him of other women.
What else have you heard?
They complain of Solomon's neglect of them.
There is no reason to be jealous of me as yet.
In spite of the way he left, he must have had difficulty forgetting you.
Tonight, I will make it even more difficult.
Dry me.
He may still come, Majesty.
It is not yet midnight.
Do I need you to tell me the time?
Take it away. Get it out of my sight.
How dare he treat me this way!
What does he think I am?
Just another cat in his royal cage?!
I don't care if he never comes!
Never. Never.
Weren't you supposed to dine with her?
- Yes, I was.
- Then why are you sitting here alone?
I felt in need of being alone.
What is it that weighs so heavily upon your heart?
Has it come to where you can read my thoughts?
Haven't I always shared your thoughts?
Yes.
At times, a man feels drawn toward the dangers that confront him, even at the risk of his own destruction.
Like a moth approaches a flame.
Is there something different about this flame?
I could put it out in one second.
- Wouldn't that be simpler?
- Such a little flame, Abishag.
And yet unrestrained, it could destroy all of Jerusalem.
Simpler, yes, but perhaps without it, there would be darkness.
In light or in darkness, you've only to reach for my hand.
I'll be at your side always.
- Good night.
- Good night.
- His Majesty.
- His Majesty.
Sire.
Her Majesty awaited you until after midnight and then she retired.
- (Solomon) I'm sorry.
- Takyan, admit His Majesty.
I have disturbed your rest.
Could I rest, thinking that perhaps
I had displeased you in some way?
Now you have to be completely truthful with me.
Why did you come to Jerusalem?
Why do you ask me such a question now?
Because I know that behind those lovely eyes is the brain of a very clever woman who would never have traveled
800 leagues without a purpose.
You have found me out.
I will confess to you.
The Pharaoh is paying me a fabulous price to spy on you.
To deliver to him all of your secrets.
I have considered that, but Israel has no real secrets from Egypt.
Pharaoh is aware of our weaknesses and our strength.
How could I hope to deceive you?
I have been trying to entrap you.
With these.
To bind you to me in soft chains so that I may do with you as I will.
Now perhaps we are approaching the truth.
Every woman exacts her price from a man.
You're a queen, but you also demand a price.
I do. So great that I wonder if you will pay it.
I want you to love me wholly, completely, and that love to be the most precious thing in your life.
I hope it is true, but if it is not, then let me remain blind to the truth.
Even when you are not with me,
I find myself trying to recall every moment we have spent together.
The words you have said to me,
I will never forget.
After what has come to pass between us, new words keep singing in my heart.
- Tell them to me.
- Behold, thou art fair, my love.
Thine eyes are as doves, thy lips are as pomegranates.
How much better is thy love than wine.
I have never before known such happiness.
Nor I, and if I have thought I was happy,
I know now that I was deceived.
You look like two birds who have hatched out a nestful of snakes.
You may speak freely.
I have no secrets from Joab.
We have come to take counsel with Your Highness.
About what? I am the commander of the host, not a minister of state.
It concerns the king.
- Then why not consult with him?
- Because he will not listen.
Grave criticism is being brought against him by people.
Who would dare to murmur against the great Solomon?
His association with the Sheban queen has developed into an open scandal.
Worse, he has even brought this pagan woman to live within the palace, daring to install her in an apartment adjoining his own private chambers.
That is his affair, not mine.
We thought perhaps if you were to talk to him privately, reason with him.
Point out that it is a matter of concern not only to the high priest but to the prophet and the council.
I, presume to admonish His Majesty?
You forget, Hezrai, he is the king.
The king can do no wrong.
Well, something must be done.
Not by me. You are his chancellor, Hezrai, and you his high priest, Zadok.
You do something. You reason with him.
We had hoped for the cooperation of Your Highness.
You have it.
My sympathies and my best wishes.
We thank you for receiving us.
Not at all, not at all.
Always at your service.
It could not have served your interests better if you had arranged her visit.
The priesthood is aroused against him.
The council condemns him.
Even the people talk openly of his shame.
Your Highness is reflecting my own thoughts.
I would be a fool to ignore such an opportunity.
You might have to wait forever for another one like this.
I will solve
Hezrai and Zadok's problem for them and at the same time, my own.
Or rather, this is a problem that you, Joab, with a little help, will solve.
I await your command, Highness.
Your Majesty commanded me to attend upon her?
It took you long enough to get here.
I sent Takyan to bring you an hour ago.
Ten minutes ago, if Your Majesty pleases.
Come in. Don't stand there arguing with me.
In what way can I serve Your Majesty?
You can arrange for my safe conduct out of Israel.
Stop looking at me like that!
Do as I tell you!
- But when, Your Majesty?
- Now. Today. This minute.
Your Majesty will pardon me if I seem shocked...
Do I have to consult you first concerning everything I wish to do?
Your Majesty would go without accomplishing her purpose?
Permit me to decide the question of my comings and goings.
Your Majesty will forgive me if I venture to touch upon her personal, private affairs.
Get to the point, Baltor.
I have sensed a change in Your Majesty. A softening.
A desire to evade reality.
You are accusing me of being in love with him? Is that it?
I hope for Your Majesty's own sake that such is not the case.
And if such is the case, do you deny me the right for the first time in my life to be human?
May I remind Your Majesty that you cannot put your personal feelings above the Pharaoh and the good of your country?
Don't lecture me, Baltor.
Your Majesty once told me that you could not afford the luxury of being a woman, that always you were forced to remember that you are a queen, and that your only love, your only thought, must be your duty.
Your Majesty came to Jerusalem in search of a means to destroy an enemy whom you once hated!
Yes, Baltor.
I have been trying to evade reality.
I have found myself trying to forget the purpose for which I came, as one would try to forget an evil dream.
I have been reluctant to make an end of him.
The most merciful way to kill is to thrust quickly and strongly with a knife.
It seems to me that we are no nearer a kill than we were before we came.
You are wrong, Baltor. I have known for days how to destroy Solomon.
Suppose I get his permission to hold the rites of Rha-Gon upon the soil of Israel, to set up a pagan god in the face of the great Jehovah, the one god who commands the Israelites to have no other god before him?
That would cause more than angry murmurings against him.
The priests and the people would rise up against Solomon.
Yes, Baltor.
His own people would accomplish his end.
Are you satisfied now that I am still the Queen of Sheba?
Majesty.
How many times shall I tell you that I love you?
Over and over, until you make me believe it.
I will.
But you have known so many loves.
I will take you by the hand and in the temple, before all Israel,
I'll pledge you my love in marriage.
To shut me away in your harem?
To share your love?
No, to share my throne with you.
You honor me, but I am already a queen.
We will join our lands as we will join our lives.
A dream that can never be.
Too much stands between us.
Nothing must stand between us.
Not even our gods?
I knew this moment would come, for the things we believe in are not the same.
I had hoped that in time you would come to accept Jehovah.
As king of Israel, would you abandon the god of your people for mine?
Still I dared hope.
My love, I must leave Israel.
Why? Why? I cannot let you go.
The time has come for the yearly feast of Rha-Gon.
Can you grant me permission to hold it here in Israel?
It would be a sacrilege.
Then I must go to celebrate it elsewhere.
You see? You cannot banish what stands between us.
No, wait. Listen to me.
There must be a way to...
No!
Help! Help! The king!
Help! Guard! Josiah!
Joab.
Are you safe, sire?
We'll deliver him to the one who sent him.
(guard) Come on!
Thank all the gods you are not harmed.
For the first time in my life,
I... I had no thought for myself.
I feared only for him.
(Josiah) You men, that way.
The rest, follow me.
Are you expecting me to plead for mercy?
I have overlooked your hatred because of your value to Israel.
- I pledged never to turn against you.
- I asked for no pledge.
But tonight you raised your hand against the life of Israel.
You and your Sheban slut have defiled the fair name of Israel.
I sought only to preserve our country from your contamination.
Only because the blood of David flows through your veins as well as mine,
I grant you your life, but I banish you from Israel forever.
I suppose I should be grateful, but you should be concerned with your own life - if it has not already been lost to the poison of Sheba.
- Remove him, Josiah.
- Take him, and him.
I charge you to cleanse yourself of this iniquity you have permitted to spawn.
Abjure this woman of her idolatries. Tear down the abomination she has erected.
I have given her permission to hold the sacred rite of her own religion.
A pagan revel! An orgy!
I have no apology to make for what I have done.
As I have commanded, so shall it be.
You have broken God's covenant and his commandment:
"Thou shalt have no other gods before me."
"Thou shalt not make unto thyself any graven images."
"Thou shalt not kill."
But murder was attempted against me.
If Sheba had not escaped, the assassins would not have spared her.
The permission I have granted is poor compensation for the crime attempted.
It seems that in your lust for this woman, you have lost your reason.
Choose your words carefully, Hezrai.
It is love I have for her.
Out of love,
I offered to share this throne with her.
And out of love, I will attend her ritual.
- Hear me, Solomon.
- I have heard all I want to hear from you.
Then hear the voice of God.
The royal raiment will be stripped from you.
You will cry out your repentance, but the ears and hearts of your people will be closed against you.
And my ears are closed to cackling priests and mumbling old men.
I will show you
I am king in Israel, not you.
- Woe unto you, Solomon.
- (murmuring)
(all) Rha-Gon! Rha-Gon!
Hear us, O Rha-Gon, god of love, giver of life.
Let thy spirit enter into our bodies.
Endow our men with strength and vitality and our women with endless fruitfulness.
My door was closed.
Must you intrude upon my privacy?
Can you shut out your conscience by closing the door?
Say what you must, then please leave me alone.
I come seeking the man I once knew.
The man who was noble, gentle and kind, the man who walked with God.
- Those are mere words, Abishag.
- I entreat you to listen.
When I was a child, you were the world and I adored you.
But time passed, and love changed even as I did.
My love became that of a woman for a man.
But the man became a king, and in his eyes, the woman was still a child.
I know how strongly it calls to you.
Listen to your people. Their love calls to you, as I call in my love.
Listen to them if not to me.
Whether you or my people approve,
I must go.
You cannot go. Do not destroy yourself!
I beg of you!
Lord God, hear the prayer of thy servant.
Mine was not the strength to save my lord Solomon from himself.
But thine is the power.
Let not thy wrath descend upon him.
Look into his heart and pity him.
But if it be thy will to punish him, visit it upon me in his stead.
Oh, no.
Oh, no.
Why?
The sin was mine.
Why did you not strike me?
I warned you, Solomon.
The hand of God is upon you.
Majesty, you must rest.
I cannot rest, Takyan.
I have come to ask your permission to arrange your immediate departure.
Yes.
Let us go - quickly.
There is no reason for us to remain now that I have accomplished my purpose.
Your Majesty should not reproach herself.
It was nothing more than a sudden storm.
It is not the first time lightning has dealt death, nor will it be the last.
Was it nothing more than a coincidence?
Surely Your Majesty cannot believe the Israelites, that it was a sign of the anger and revenge of their god?
- I no longer know what I do believe.
- Majesty, you're overwrought.
Yes, the strain of the last few days has affected us all.
But this is your hour of triumph.
The Pharaoh will rejoice in your victory.
Sheba can be proud of her queen.
I am very proud of myself.
I have earned my reward from Egypt.
We will have our port on the Red Sea.
We will have more gold, more power, more everything.
Because I have betrayed a great man who trusted me, who loved me beyond all else.
The Sheban. The Sheban is coming.
Here comes the Sheban.
- The Sheban.
- Come away.
Your Majesty understands that it is not a request that you attend the council.
It is a command from the elders of the tribes.
I have no wish to evade what they have to say to me.
You should not have taken the risk of coming here.
If I had not come now,
I might have lost the courage to come at all.
Once, you asked me for truth.
And I answered you with truth, but
I made it sound like a lie to deceive you.
For I was a friend of the Pharaoh and an enemy of Israel, and I came here out of hatred to destroy you.
Had I known this the day you arrived in Jerusalem, it would have changed nothing.
Mine is the greater guilt.
For I have known from the first where you would lead, I would follow.
But why did you not just go without explanations?
Because I love you.
What I have done, I cannot undo.
Do with me what you will, but this you must believe.
My love is not a lie.
Think not to appease the wrath of Israel with remorse.
Neither will God's anger be turned aside.
I will speak no words in my defense.
What could you say in view of your transgressions?
Because of you, dissension fills the land.
The unity of the nation is sundered.
Even as this, the symbol of its oneness, is broken into fragments.
The elders of the tribes deny you as their king and depart from you.
The Lord God will smite you into the dust and his people will praise his name.
So be it.
Folly is set on great heights, and that which has been done is that which shall be done.
Who knows what is good for a man in his life, his vain life which he spends as a shadow?
Vanity of vanities, all is vanity.
(voice of God) But if ye turn away and forsake my statutes, then I will pluck them up by the roots out of my land which I have given them, and this house which is high shall be an astonishment to everyone that passeth by it, so that he shall say
"Why hath the Lord done thus unto this land and unto this house?"
And it shall be answered "Because they forsook the Lord God of their fathers which brought them forth out of the land of Egypt and laid hold on other gods and worshiped them and served them."
"Therefore hath he brought all this evil upon them."
The elders have denounced Solomon, and the captains of the host have returned to their own provinces.
This is the time to strike, Majesty.
All Israel is in turmoil, and Solomon stands alone.
It seems that your information is more accurate than mine.
Has not the Queen of Sheba given you a full report on the situation?
I have been wondering, awaiting word from her.
You mean she has told you nothing of what I have reported?
Nothing.
Perhaps in her new love, she has forgotten her obligation to you and finds her alliance with Solomon more to her liking.
You have told me everything I should know, excepting your price for my support of you against your brother.
I want the crown of Israel.
It has always been mine.
And command of the army that you send against Solomon.
I grant it.
But there is one thing I want from you.
You will be the instrument of my punishment of Sheba for her betrayal of me.
On that, Majesty, you can rely.
Hail to the new king of Israel.
Hail to the new king of Israel.
Can your brother equal such strength?
He will be able to gather only a handful of followers.
We will strike quickly.
The victory must be decisive.
How many do they number?
Thousands.
- You saw them cross over the border?
- Yes, Majesty.
A column from horizon to horizon.
It was to be expected eventually.
We'll go out and face the Egyptians.
Give the orders, Josiah.
Gather what forces you can.
Yes, sire.
With these we hope to stem the Egyptian horde?
My father David faced Goliath with a stone and a shepherd's sling.
God was with David.
- Forgive me, sire.
- There is nothing to forgive.
All Israel knows that God has abandoned the son of David.
Majesty, you let him go without a word of farewell.
What could I have said to him?
How could I have told him that I carry his child?
- Halt!
- Halt!
- Highness, the enemy has been sighted.
- At what distance?
Within one hour's march.
Then they have traveled ten leagues since dawn and we have traveled one.
They are spent and exhausted and we are still fresh.
Two hours yet before the sun sets.
- Deploy your men.
- Give the order.
We want every man, horse, chariot, hidden from Solomon's view.
When he rides into the trap, our attack will hit him from every quarter.
Now deploy for attack!
Deploy for attack!
Take your positions. Deploy for attack!
Sire, our men are spent.
Shall we call a rest?
They will rest at the dunes of Saladar.
There we will entrench and await the enemy.
Let the battle be joined as far from Jerusalem as possible.
Sire. Look, men on the hill.
- Halt the column.
- Halt!
Shunammites!
They bear a flag of friendship.
Ahab!
We come to stand with the king.
Why do you offer me your support in this dark hour?
Is your hatred for the Egyptians greater than your hatred for me?
We come in memory of the love my daughter Abishag gave to you.
- Then we will honor that memory.
- God willing.
Fall in behind.
- Josiah.
- Forward at the trot.
Forward!
Start the attack.
Attack! Attack!
Form a circle.
Sire, your brother has joined forces with the Egyptians against you.
Break through. Break through. Faster.
Tell the Egyptians to break through with their horsemen.
- Break the circle.
- Charge!
Sound the retreat.
Joab, find Solomon.
Let's try over there.
Your Highness, we found Solomon's shield but so far not Solomon.
He must have crawled off to hide with his rabble.
In the morning, we will dig them out of their burrows.
I have more important things than to occupy myself with a rabbit hunt.
Keep searching. There'll be gold for the man who brings me the head of Solomon.
I'm impatient to enter Jerusalem. I do not wish to be delayed by a slow army.
You will have no trouble in destroying Solomon's resistance.
When you have vanquished them, follow me into Jerusalem with all speed.
How many men will you need to enter?
Only a small escort.
I will meet with no resistance there.
Your commands will be obeyed.
Colonel Hassin with six officers will go with His Majesty to Jerusalem.
There'll be few of us left to face Adonijah and his Egyptians by tomorrow.
The faint-hearted are deserting us in the darkness.
Can you blame them, Josiah, after they have seen even my own brother turn against me?
I thought I knew the driving passion of his ambitions, but never did I think he would betray his own people.
We only found a few scattered units of our people, almost afraid to show themselves even in the darkness.
In the morning, the Egyptians will march over us into Jerusalem.
No matter how few of us are left, we will fight on.
If I cannot live as a king with honor, at least I can die as a king with honor.
Woe unto us! Our king is defeated!
Majesty.
The outcry is over the news brought by deserters from Solomon's army.
It seems he has been defeated, his men routed.
Is he... among the dead?
No one knows, but all say that by morning, not one Israelite will escape alive.
Now will Your Majesty seek safety?
The Israelites will blame you.
I beg Your Majesty, do not refuse again.
You must save yourself.
- Majesty, where are you going?
- Do not try to stop me, Baltor.
I will not let you take the risk of going into the streets.
Stand aside!
I command you both, do not follow after me.
(man) Solomon is vanquished!
How are the mighty fallen.
(man ""2) Woe unto us.
The Egyptians will be upon us.
(man ""3) The Lord has punished Solomon for his sins.
Who will save us now from Pharaoh?
(man ""4) Our sins have brought this upon us.
Woe unto us. The Egyptians have overthrown our noble Solomon.
Pharaoh will slay us all.
(man ""5) Solomon did not follow the path of God.
God of Israel, thou who art called the all-knowing, the compassionate, look into my heart and hear my prayer.
Forgive my sin against thee and thy people.
Grant me the life of Solomon and preserve him against his enemies.
Do this, and I will return to the land of Sheba and cast down the false gods.
And I will build a tabernacle to the glory of thy name, and there shall be no other gods before thee.
Josiah.
- What has alarmed you, sire?
- Not alarm, but hope.
Hope that comes like a light in the midst of darkness.
It is as though God had come to me and showed me the way.
Yes?
Sire.
- Our men return.
- And there.
And there!
They rally to us, by the hundreds.
Set them to burnishing their shields.
Let them shine like mirrors.
Yes, sire.
I remember you once lectured me, Hezrai, on how a king of Israel is crowned.
Are there any among you who deny my right to sit upon this throne?
Then I need no senseless ritual to attend my elevation.
No anointing with the waters of Gihon.
I take with my own hands what has always been mine.
Hail Adonijah, Lion of Israel.
Hail Adonijah.
Know this, all of you.
I have made an alliance with the Pharaoh.
Under his protection, I will rule Israel, and I'll have no mercy on any who oppose me.
Sire, the Sheban harlot has been found.
She has taken refuge in the temple.
- Halt!
- Halt!
- Again the Israelites.
- Where did they gather so many men?
Last night we could find none, only their dead.
In a few minutes, they will all be dead.
Today there is no darkness into which they can escape.
They face east, and will be blinded by the sun.
- Prepare for a frontal attack.
- Frontal attack.
- They are going to charge us.
- Wait for my signal.
Attack. Strike them down.
Attack!
Charge!
Sire?
- Now!
- Shields forward.
Lord God of Israel, thine is the victory.
Thou art our sword and our shield.
Lord God of hosts.
Thou art the Lord God. What thou hast done was out of love for thy people.
If thou knowest what is in my heart, grant me forgiveness.
Amen.
Ahab. Josiah.
Choose 20 men. Mount them on horses.
Gather up the Egyptians' banners from the dust.
We will ride with them to Jerusalem to proclaim that the City of David is saved.
By now,
Solomon is dead by his own deeds.
An Egyptian sword has rendered judgment upon him.
It is I, Adonijah, who has prevented the hordes from falling upon you and razing this city.
- Hail Adonijah, Saviour of Israel.
- (sparsely) Hail Adonijah.
There in the temple is the cause of all your troubles.
It was she who brought disaster upon Israel.
- What shall be done with her?
- Let the dogs devour her.
- Drag her through the streets.
- Give her to us.
The sanctuary of the temple must not be violated.
In the Israel that I rule, there is no sanctuary for a pagan harlot.
You are her judges. I give her to you.
Let me pass.
Let me pass.
Once before I told you I was king and you called me an impostor.
Now I shall prove to you that I am the king.
I grant you the honor of my first judgment.
Stone her!
- I have spoken. Obey my command.
- Stone her.
Kill the pagan slut.
Solomon! Victory! Victory!
Victory! Victory! Solomon returns.
- Victory!
- Solomon!
Solomon! Once before you robbed me of my birthright, but this time I'll not be denied!
Sheathe your sword.
I will not break my pledge.
I will sheathe it in your heart.
When none in Jerusalem believed that you and Israel could be saved, she came into the temple and before the sanctuary prayed you might be spared.
For thine is the power and the glory.
For ever.
Because thou didst call upon my name in thy dark hour, I have heard thee.
Return therefore until thine own land and keep the covenant thou didst make with me.
Now I can tell you that I am to bear the child of our love.
Now you will be queen over Israel, and our son shall reign after me.
No.
I gave promise to God that I would return to my own land.
For that he granted me your life and his forgiveness.
But how can I let you go?
Your child shall reign in the land of Sheba.
And if God grants us the blessing of a son, then for the first time
Sheba shall have a king, and he shall walk in the way of the Lord God Jehovah.
That we must part is our atonement.
If this be thy will, O God,
I submit to thy judgment.
May thou watch between us while we are apart, one from the other.
I will be with you... always.
Shout unto God, all the earth.
Sing praises unto the glory of his name.
Sing praises unto the Lord, O Israel.
Be gracious unto us, God.
- And bless us.
- And bless us.
For his anger is but for a moment.
But his love is for ever.
Weeping may tarry for a night, but joy cometh in the morning.
SERGEANT: Tanaka.               
                     TANAKA: Ho!
SERGEANT: Fugimoto.             
                   FUGIMOTO: Yo!
SERGEANT: Iuanaga.              
                  IUANAGA: Here.
SERGEANT: Mosashi.              
                  MOSASHI: Here.
SERGEANT: Okamoto.              
                  OKAMOTO: Here.
       [UKULELE PLAYING]        
[CLAPPING, SINGING IN HAWAIIAN] 
           [GRUNTING]           
                  Kanakas.      
           The ones from Hawaii.
         You know what they call
             us mainlanders?    
                    Kotonks.    
          The way they tell it, 
        if you rap on our heads,
                   it's like    
              hitting a coconut.
                 Hollow heads,  
                   you know.    
         Kotonk, kotonk, kotonk.
               Look where you're
                going, will ya? 
Ninety-day wonder.              
Still got the original shine    
       on those bars.           
Lieutenant Grayson to see the adjutant.            
               He's not in, sir.
              The colonel said  
           he'd see you himself.
       Thank you.               
[KNOCKS ON DOOR]                
You can go right in, sir.                  
                  Thank you.    
            Lieutenant Grayson  
          reports for duty, sir.
 At ease, lieutenant.           
Welcome to Camp Shelby.         
               Thank you, sir.  
This your first assignment since
   receiving your commission?   
                Yes, sir.       
Well, lieutenant, it's a rough one.               
The platoon you're taking over is just ready to start training, and, as you may have noticed, our facilities are not all that they might be.         
We're short of officers,        
short of equipment, short of everything             
except trainees, and they're coming in           
   by the carload.              
This is a brand-new outfit.     
   A new kind of outfit.        
No precedent for it except one battalion that was activated in Hawaii and they haven't been           
     tested yet.                
What do you think of the idea, lieutenant?        
             Well, sir, I'd like
              to make a request.
What is it?                     
  I'd like your permission, sir,
     to put in for a transfer   
           to the 36th Division.
                  You see, sir, 
                I'm from Texas--
What has that got to do with it?              
                Nothing, sir,   
            except that the 36th
              is an old Texas   
          National Guard outfit,
        and I've been in it     
   ever since I got in the Army.
               That is,         
      until they sent me to OCS.
         I never would have gone
             if I'd thought--   
 Sir, I just took it for granted
  that I'd go back to the 36th. 
You're sure that's the only reason you have for wanting a transfer?         
                       Yes, sir.
No objection to working with the kind of troops         
   we have here?                
           Because they're Japs?
              Oh, no, sir.      
       Nothing like that at all.
Now, let's get a couple of things straight, lieutenant. 
First, there's not gonna be any transfer.          
You're staying here.            
 Have you got that?             
                  Yes, sir.     
 Second, they're not Japs.      
They're Japanese Americans.     
Nisei or, as they call themselves, buddhaheads.        
All kinds of buddhaheads,       
       lieutenant.              
From Hawaii, Alaska, California,
      New York, Colorado.       
Yes, and even some              
   from Texas.                  
They're all American citizens,  
 and they're all volunteers.    
Remember that.                  
And another thing.              
We officers are referred to     
 as haoles not white men.       
 Any questions?                 
                 No, sir.       
Report to your company commander.              
The sergeant major will show you to his orderly room.   
That'll be all, lieutenant.     
[SINGING IN HAWAIIAN]           
      Sorry to keep you waiting,
              lieutenant.       
Oh, Captain Solari.             
                That's right.   
   That's our regimental slogan.
      "Go for broke"?           
             It's Pidgin English
            for shoot the works.
    Pull up a chair, lieutenant.
                 Thanks.        
I'll be with you                
  in a minute.                  
    [MAN YELLS IN JAPANESE]     
             Tell me, sir,      
      do you use live ammunition
             in the rifle range?
A Jap's a Jap, eh?              
    All I know is they were     
put under armed guard in relocation centers last year.
    Maybe the Army just had     
    some surplus barbed wire    
     they wanted to use up,     
          was that it?          
The Army was facing an emergency
    at the start of the war.    
      A possible invasion       
      by Japanese troops.       
       So all Japanese Americans
               were evacuated   
            from the West Coast.
  There was no loyalty check,   
     no screening, nothing.     
If there were any spies among them,           
I can assure you they're not in the 442.                 
Every man in this outfit        
 has been investigated,         
reinvestigated and re-reinvestigated.          
Now, I suggest you start        
  getting acquainted.           
Your platoon sergeant's over in the supply room.        
     Ohhara.                    
                 O'Hara!        
 That's right. Takashi Ohhara.  
      Hey, wait a minute.       
Come back here.                 
     How long you been          
   in the Army, soldier?        
              Let me see now.   
    Maybe I-- I been inside, uh,
         two, three months.     
              How long you been 
             inside, lieutenant?
Don't you know you're supposed to hold your salute till an officer returns it?     
      Oh, sure. Sometime forget.
     "Sometime forget"          
 to say sir, too, don't ya?     
                Sometime.       
Well, don't forget it anymore.  
                  No, sir.      
That's your own uniform?        
   Sir, that's the smallest size
    he got, the supply sergeant.
                    Sir.        
Well, roll those sleeves down.  
             I hold salute, sir.
Why are you wearing leggings    
  with a class A uniform?       
       To keep my pants up, sir.
                 Long like that.
Well, get 'em cut down.         
               Oh, yes, sir.    
              Payday I'll go see
               the tailor, sir. 
You'd better see somebody today 
    before I see you again.     
       [UKULELE PLAYING]        
   SERGEANT:                    
All right, men.                 
All I wanna see is backbones and elbows.        
            [GRUNTS]            
           [SINGING IN HAWAIIAN]
SOLDIER 1:                      
 Come on.                       
  SOLDIER 2:                    
And he made it.                 
Little Phoebe.                  
Pretty little Phoebe.           
           Watch that stuff,    
                  huh?          
              Get your money    
              down, suckers.    
              It all rides.     
              Go for broke.     
              Gee, break 'em up.
                 Break 'em up.  
         New lieutenant outside.
         Must be the one for us.
                   Oh, boy.     
             Eight feet tall    
         and mean like anything.
Number-one manini kind.         
       Chicken.                 
     Well, the honeymoon's over.
Mix me up. All Nisei outfit.    
How come haole officers?        
         That's just to make us 
        a little more miserable.
            First, they pick out
             the crummiest camp 
           in the United States.
 Why'd you ever enlist?         
That's what I wanna know.       
         Why? Because a wise guy
           college man like you 
            snowed me under     
       with a lot of fancy talk.
                You guys        
        from relocation centers.
              Okay, you probably
             got it better here.
               But me, I was    
           on the outside. Iowa.
        A free man. Knocking off
           500 bucks a month.   
Five hundred buck?              
       No.                      
              Five hundred buck,
                     yeah.      
                   Chick sexing.
                  I can look    
              at a day-old chick
               and tell you if  
             it's a he or a she.
Ha, ha. Now, who'd want to know 
  that except another chick?    
    You pay for the poultry feed
        and you'd wanna know.   
       A he ain't no good at all
           when it grows up.    
         Only the shes.         
How come chicken farmers no can find out themselves?     
      Too bashful?              
            You funny man.      
   Chick sexing is a science.   
   It was developed in Japan,   
       and it's one field       
 where buddhahead gets a break. 
          Mean to say           
     ya never heard of it?      
         I just got as far      
     as the birds and the bees. 
   These college guys are sharp,
           you know that?       
          [CAT MEOWS]           
             Four years at USC  
           and he's a bona fide,
       recognized fruit peddler.
                     Yes, sir.  
           A fruit peddler with 
          an architect's degree.
     I could have got a job as  
  an architect if I kept trying.
      Well, why didn't you?     
       It's just my eyes.       
      Couldn't handle           
    all that close work.        
              Yeah, eye trouble,
             that's what it was.
                All you need    
           is corrective glasses
               to take the slant
               out of your eyes.
[IMITATES CLUCKING CHICKEN]     
            Hey, kotonk.        
         Take it easy, huh?     
           Huh, Chick?          
           Come on, get it down.
              Buck and a half.  
                   SOLDIER:     
             One more, one more.
                   Boy, oh, boy.
           You one lucky kotonk.
             Wish I got         
        packages like that.     
You and me both.                
       You send package?        
Yeah. Hand me those cans,       
        will you?               
           Where you gonna send?
           Brother in the Army  
               in Pacific?      
    Uh-uh.                      
Family in a relocation          
   camp in Arizona.             
 Arizona, U.S.A.                
You think that chow here is bad... Brother.         
          You can even get soap?
      Oh, sure.                 
They've got a canteen           
 loaded with stuff.             
     Anything you want,         
    if you can get there        
  before they're sold out.      
Yes, sir, all the comforts of home.       
   And only one block           
from the barracks to the toilets and showers.     
                       Barracks?
                  Everybody     
            all thrown together?
   Got partitions.              
Separate room for each family.                
My folks are lucky.             
Only five of them               
  since I left.                 
      Treat you like that,      
    hard to figure why a guy    
    volunteer for the Army.     
    We have to do something,    
        so we never get         
    a deal like that again.     
                    We show 'em.
    We show 'em us buddhaheads  
  good soldiers, good Americans.
That's the idea.                
I hope it works.                
             Sure it works.     
     Already a lot of stuff     
  in newspapers about the 442.  
   Yeah, all we need now        
    is casualty lists.          
      Gee, that's a pretty girl.
                  What her name?
                  Terry.        
                          Terry.
                  Nice name.    
                Your wife?      
                        Not yet.
               Why you wait?    
This is a great time to be starting a family, isn't it?    
        You kotonks, funny guys.
 Boy, if I had a girl like that,
      they gotta draft me.      
         No volunteer.          
No, sir, draft me and drag me away.               
SOLDIER 1: Once more, once more.
        SOLDIER 2: Go for broke!
           SOLDIER 1:           
  Once more, that's all I ask.  
          That's all!           
             Seven!             
     Let me see those dice.     
   Attention!                   
          [CAT MEOWS]           
            [MEOWS]             
                  At ease.      
  Men, this is Lieutenant       
Grayson, our platoon leader.    
             Pick up that money.
                     Pick it up.
Yes, sir.                       
  Donation for the company fund,
             sergeant.          
     Give it to Sergeant Ohhara.
Can he do that?                 
It's my money.                  
         I want that man's name,
                sergeant.       
          There's no talking    
      after the command at ease.
               Yes, sir.        
This man, no dog tags, needs haircut, window unwashed, 
  uniforms hanging wrong way.   
        Haircut, shave,         
  bunk out of line, dog tags,   
window, beer can on shelf, dirty floor, dirty boots, haircut, window,                
     bowl of milk on floor.     
     Bowl stolen from mess hall.
   Brought cat into barracks.   
Floor, boots, dog tag, haircut. 
        Dust on rafters, window,
       haircut, dog tags, boots,
            bunk out of line,   
         litter on floor, boots.
      Forget the book, sergeant.
        They're all on the list.
       You men will fall out    
          for a speed hike      
         at 8:00 tonight.       
          Before that           
   I want this hutment GI'd.    
        Get them started        
  on it right away, sergeant.   
Floors scrubbed, rafters dusted,
        windows washed,         
       boots shined, bunks made.
           I want those blankets
             stretched so tight 
    that when you drop a quarter
        on them it'll bounce.   
        I'll be back twice a day
               from now on      
     with a pair of white gloves
            and a quarter.      
        You're a chicken expert.
        What do you make of him?
    ¶ I wanna go back           
To my little grass shack ¶      
¶ Back in Kealakekua            
      Hawaii ¶                  
 ¶ I wanna be with all          
The kanes and wahines ¶         
¶ That I knew long ago ¶        
      ¶ I can hear              
The old guitars playing ¶       
        [UKULELE CLANGS]        
            SOLDIER:            
            Bakatare!           
            SOLDIER:            
            Bakatare!           
What did he say?                
    I didn't hear anything, sir.
     Bakatare.                  
What does that mean?            
               Sorry, sir.      
         I don't speak Japanese.
                 GRAYSON:       
         Boots, dog tag, window,
  dust on rafters, floor, boots.
      GRAYSON:                  
Boots, floor, boots.            
Blankets not tight enough.      
Shirt unbuttoned, boots, window, floor.           
           [THUDDING]           
               All right.       
                Up and over.    
       Go back and try it again.
       I'm gonna wait right here
        till everybody makes it.
 Hey, you guys, beat it, quick. 
  In combat, anything goes.     
   That's why we teach you      
       dirty tactics.           
   I will now demonstrate       
a grip against which there is absolutely no defense. 
The sergeant will now           
  try to get free.              
    Well, sergeant?             
You want me to try, sir?        
    Of course I want you to try.
  Very well, sir.               
     [MILITARY BAND PLAYING]    
                       GRAYSON: 
                     Eyes right!
                     Eyes front!
                     Eyes right!
                     Eyes front!
                     Eyes right!
                     Eyes front!
          Eyes right!           
                     Eyes front!
                     Eyes right!
  That was the kiss of death,   
            brother,            
       the kiss of death.       
  Yeah, the big brass figures   
           were ripe.           
          I can smell           
     that salt air already.     
  Take another sniff, will ya,  
  and see if it's the Pacific.  
Yeah, that's what I'm           
    sweating out.               
             You and me both.   
Nobody wanna go Pacific but me. 
Well, I keep trying.            
Every time they ask             
 for volunteers--               
        Tommy, you have to speak
            perfect Japanese.   
   It's for combat intelligence,
           interpreters.        
      They don't want buddhahead
       riflemen in the Pacific. 
    Why?                        
Look, Tommy, a million guys fighting an enemy
             that looks like us.
             What if a GI sniper
               spots you or me? 
He see uniform.                 
       Yeah, and probably figure
              we're spies.      
Sam, I tell you something.      
I don't like talk about it,     
  but I'm gonna tell you.       
Pearl Harbor day the planes they come.           
You can only read it.           
   I can see it.                
Pretty soon, I go volunteer     
 for the 100th Battalion.       
   Too young.                   
 By the 442 come up,            
  I volunteer again.            
    Too small.                  
Next time, I stand on my toes   
        a little bit.           
  Okay, I'm in.                 
They send us Europe.            
Sure, I go and fight.           
More better do I fight the ones who bomb the islands.  
     It's the same enemy, Tommy.
  Maybe for you.                
Pearl Harbor day, two people visit friends near Honolulu.    
They both been killed.          
My mother, Sam. My father.      
                       OFFICER: 
                      Mail call.
           [SOLDIERS CHATTERING]
              Guchizaki.        
      Here.                     
Hey, this is from my brother in the 100th Battalion.         
             Nawaguchi.         
               Mail call, Tommy.
    You go.                     
No mail for Tommy.              
     [MILITARY BAND PLAYING]    
Come on, close it up,           
    close it up.                
        Here's the list,        
          lieutenant.           
Thanks, captain.                
   Nagashook-- Shooki.          
                       SOLDIER: 
                      William J.
                   Nishigoka.   
           SOLDIER 2: Leonard S.
  Uchigakiuchi.                 
                Uchigakiuchi.   
               SOLDIER 3: Harry.
                   Ikagani.     
                      SOLDIER 4:
                       Joseph T.
                   Kamakura.    
               SOLDIER 5: Sam W.
   Toyotomi.                    
                     Toyotomi.  
            Tomatsu.            
Guchizaki.                      
              Satoshi.          
Shimabukarotenshugi.            
                      Shima--   
 Shimabukarotenshugi.           
                   Shima--      
            SOLDIER 4: George W.
                    Thanks.     
                   Fugimoto.    
            SOLDIER 5: Thomas H.
                  [BELL DINGING]
        Any scuttlebutt on where
         this scow is taking us?
I was just gonna ask you,       
       lieutenant.              
                [KAZ SINGING    
            AND PLAYING UKULELE]
           ¶ Aloha ¶            
      [SINGS IN HAWAIIAN]       
   ¶ I'm sending my thoughts    
       Back home to you ¶       
  Hey, Sam, how you know so sure
      we're going to England?   
            Because that's where
               the line forms   
                for the invasion
                   of France.   
             And it's coming off
                 any day now.   
That's us. Shock troops.        
Just in time.                   
They used up the 100th Battalion at Cassino. 
            But anyway,         
      it won't be the Pacific.  
  How do you know?              
You ever hear of the Panama Canal?            
     Hey, Sam, what you think?  
         Maybe so, huh?         
     Well, if it's the Pacific, 
   we've been sailing three days
         in the wrong direction.
The navigator don't know.       
Nobody knows.                   
Drives you nuts.                
            Oh, I'll get it.    
Thank you, lieutenant.          
            GRAYSON:            
 For 20 years the Italian people
     have been fed on bunk.     
  Their propagandists declared  
     that all of our people     
       look upon Italians       
         with contempt,         
    regarding them as a race    
        of hand organ men       
      and banana peddlers.      
  We know that such statements  
            are lies.           
  Racial prejudice is abhorrent 
     to our American concept    
          of democracy.         
               [UKULELE PLAYING]
            GRAYSON:            
    Naples with its old world   
   history, majestic Vesuvius,  
     the Castle of St. Elmo,    
      the famous churches,      
     the magnificent harbor,    
         second to none         
        in all the world.       
      These and many other      
 historic sights are of interest
         to the soldier.        
         Take advantage         
      of this opportunity.      
     See as much as you can.    
    You've got a great chance   
           to do now,           
      major expenses paid,      
       what would cost you      
     a lot of your own money    
         after the war.         
   You'll want to poke around   
           in quaint,           
      out-of-the way places     
   and the only way to do that  
           is to walk.          
     Be sure to allow plenty    
        of time in Naples       
    so you can take it all in   
    at a nice leisurely pace.   
      Start your promenade      
         at the harbor.         
           [SNORING]            
      The Italian practice      
    is to have a siesta hour    
   sometime between 1 and 4:00  
        in the afternoon.       
 If this custom remains in vogue
   during occupational period,  
  you'll save time and patience 
   by confining your shopping   
         to other hours.        
[SOLDIERS CHATTERING]           
MAN:                            
Mama, Mama.                     
[SPEAKS IN ITALIAN]             
             [SPEAKS IN ITALIAN]
   [SPEAKS IN ITALIAN]          
              Come on, come on. 
              Don't hog it all. 
    [SPEAKS IN ITALIAN]         
                       Let's go.
                 Off your seat  
               and on your feet.
            GRAYSON:            
       Continuing our tour      
      of picturesque Italy,     
  we come to the Via Casilina,  
  which leads directly to Rome. 
    The districts around Rome   
       are full of places       
     of historical interest,    
       and transportation       
          is excellent.         
                      GRAYSON:  
                   Take a break.
Take 10.                        
[VEHICLE APPROACHES]            
       Everybody rides          
     but the buddhaheads.       
       [UKELELE PLAYING,        
     CHANTING INDISTINCTLY]     
     That's the 100th Battalion.
                     [CHEERS]   
            Masami.             
Hey, Masami.                    
        Hi, you paisan.         
     My brother. Him okay?      
           Not even a scratch.  
         He's a few trucks back.
        Hey, haven't got        
 an extra top string, have you? 
       I don't think so.        
        Where you going?        
   Same place as you, paisan.   
       Haven't you heard?       
        We been attached        
          to the 442.           
     One big, happy family.     
          No kidding.           
      Ride on, boy. Here.       
          Top string.           
                     Bakatare!  
        What was that?          
              I said very sorry.
                 Sorry, sir.    
            GRAYSON:            
   Within easy reach of Rome,   
     are the medieval towns     
           of Tuscany,          
     sleepy little villages,    
        scarcely touched        
  by the march of civilization. 
[EXPLOSIONS IN DISTANCE]        
   Take 10.                     
      Hello, Joe.               
     Oh, buon giorno, signorina.
   [SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]        
     ...Americana...            
[CONTINUES SPEAKING IN ITALIAN] 
                   No capisce.  
 Ooh. No capisce Italiana?      
      No, but I'd like to learn.
[SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]           
                The door open?  
 [SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]          
             The door. The door.
It's open, lieutenant.          
    Grazie, signorina.          
    The lady is gonna           
    mend this for me.           
Call me when the word comes down to move out.         
           Yes, sir.            
                     KAZ:       
             ¶ The eyes of Texas
                Are upon you ¶  
      ¶ All the livelong day-- ¶
[SLAMS]                         
You know, I got a hunch we're coming into a bottle of vino.   
                   Maybe.       
Yeah, I just got a feeling      
     the lieutenant's           
[VEHICLE APPROACHES] gonna take care of us.          
[EXPLOSIONS IN DISTANCE]        
           Grazie.              
              Break's over.     
Let's go.                       
        SOLDIER:                
All right. On your feet.        
[ARTILLERY FIRING]              
             Lieutenant Grayson.
            I forgot to tell him
              we're moving out. 
   Holy mackerel.               
             What'll I do?      
                      SOLDIER:  
                    Close it up.
         [ITALIAN MUSIC         
       PLAYING ON RECORD]       
                   [SCRATCHING] 
        [CHUCKLES]              
   [SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]        
       [MUSIC CONTINUES PLAYING]
                 Si, signorina. 
        Per--                   
                     Per favore?
       Bravo.                   
 [SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]          
           Grazie, signorina.   
                 Salute.        
 [SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]          
  [SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]         
         Come again, per favore.
      Amico. Friend.            
           No, I don't know him.
              Your friend, huh? 
        Sì, Smith.              
       John Smith.              
           Capitano, John Smith.
           Glad to meet ya, sir.
  [SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]         
      John Smith.               
     [SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]      
         John Smith.            
     Don't tell me where you got
      that good-conduct ribbon. 
                 Let me guess.  
[SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]           
  How about some more vino, huh?
     [SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]      
                        Darling.
     That's my old outfit.      
Where did you get this?         
Who gave it to you?             
                   John Smith.  
  John Smith, huh?              
Is he still around here?        
When did you see him last?      
           [SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]
     Oh, cosa dice.             
     I gotta find somebody      
     who can talk English.      
      I'll be right back.       
   Joe.                         
Joe.                            
Grayson.                        
Your platoon's dug in           
     over there.                
Come here a minute,             
     will ya?                   
I've got a message for ya       
    from the colonel.           
He was up here inspecting       
     our positions.             
                    The colonel?
    That's right.               
He said to tell you he was      
particularly pleased with the way your platoon       
      was deployed.             
         Thanks for covering up.
And now I'm supposed to say     
     "you're welcome"           
and that's that until the next time, eh?        
                  There won't be
                  any next time.
         Don't worry about that.
I'll tell ya when to leave.     
You're such a stickler on military courtesy for your men. 
From now on, you and I are going
    by the book, understand?    
                   Yes, sir.    
   I don't mind telling you,    
Grayson, if there was any chance of getting a replacement        
        for you,                
I'd have had you court-martialed for this.       
Ever since you joined           
the outfit, you've been the one man in this company who's been out of step. 
You'd better pick it up, lieutenant, and pick it up fast, or you're gonna find yourself   
volunteering for every dirty detail that     
 comes up. Is that clear?       
                     Yes, sir.  
That'll be all.                 
            KAZ:                
¶ It wasn't the moon above ¶    
          Did you do a good job,
                lieutenant?     
¶ That made me fall in love ¶   
¶ It was just those eyes ¶      
        ¶ Those beautiful eyes ¶
             Where's Kamakura?  
      Sam?                      
Out looking for water,          
     lieutenant.                
How do you like that?           
Dying of thirst in the middle of a river.       
             I wanna see him    
        the minute he gets back.
    Yes, sir.                   
        [TINS CLANKING]         
                      MASAMI:   
                   Hiya, paisan.
 Masami.                        
Eddie.                          
             Vino.              
      Fresh off the vine.       
         Salute.                
     Good, eh, paisan?          
           [SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]
  [SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]         
                    Free sample.
   Thanks.                      
                      [GUNSHOTS]
             Eddie.             
             Eddie!             
           You stay here, Tommy.
              Watch us. Come on.
         Keep close to the wall.
           [GUNSHOTS]           
           [GUNSHOTS]           
           Stay here.           
         One at a time.         
      [SHOUTING IN GERMAN]      
  [GUN COCKS]                   
            [SIGHS]             
           [GUNSHOTS]           
           [SCREAMS]            
Anybody home?                   
Keep me covered.                
           You okay, Masami?    
Just a scratch.                 
             [SNORTING, OINKING]
     Jerry intelligence officer.
     They're great at disguises.
           [CHUCKLES]           
         Hiya, paisan.          
[SQUEALING]                     
[EXPLOSIONS IN DISTANCE]        
                      [JINGLING]
       [LOUDER EXPLOSION]       
Shells would be coming in a lot closer if those Jerries were still in that observation post.       
One of them was an officer you say?         
          Oh, yes, colonel, sir.
Well, you certainly earned that.
Take this over to S2, sergeant. 
                   Yes, sir.    
       Too bad about that       
      100th Battalion man.      
        What'd they say         
       at the aid station       
       about the other one      
         who was wounded?       
Million-dollar wound, sir.      
They're sending him             
   back to Rome.                
Good. Well, anytime you're in the neighborhood, drop in.   
   Thank you, sir.              
I mean that.                    
  I wanna keep in close touch   
   with you men on the line.    
     They been treatin' you     
           all right?           
          [IN UNISON]           
           Yes, sir.            
You're sure now, no complaints?                  
         No, sir.               
Well, good luck to you.         
               Sir, could I have
                a word with you?
Well, of course.                
At ease, lieutenant.            
              You remember, sir,
          that I told you I came
         from the 36th Division?
I remember it very well.        
      Well, sir, I just happened
         to hear that the 36th  
      is somewhere in this area.
Was, lieutenant, they're way    
    up ahead of us now.         
                Oh. Oh, well,   
             in that case, sir--
Still like to get back in the Texas Army, eh?          
    Oh, no, sir, I was just, uh,
         hoping I'd get a chance
              to visit them.    
Well, I'll do better than that. 
If we ever meet up              
  with the 36th,                
I'll try and work out           
     a transfer.                
                  Oh, thank you 
                 very much, sir.
Not at all.                     
It'll be a pleasure.            
That'll be all, lieutenant.     
    [EXPLOSIONS IN DISTANCE,    
      CHANDELIER JINGLES]       
                [SQUEALING]     
    It's all right, paisan.     
         Maybe he know          
      we scared too, huh?       
Gives a man a nice feeling knowing you can always          
  go to the old man             
if you're not gettin' a fair shake, huh, lieutenant?  
Sir, I feel bad about forgettin' to call you when we moved out of that town  
       this afternoon.          
    Look, you see the way       
        it happened--           
           Forget it. Forget it.
              I can't.          
        It was all my fault.    
     And they might have had you
          up for desertion.     
   But, it'll never get out.    
The men'll keep it quiet.       
I'll see to that, sir.          
                 Thanks, thanks.
   [SNORTING, SQUEALING]        
           [GUNSHOTS]           
    Squad leaders, up front.    
        Squad leaders, up front.
    Squad leaders, up front.    
Squad leaders, up front.        
        Squad leaders, up front.
Squad leaders, up front.        
                Are you         
       from the 100th Battalion?
    Yeah.                       
         What happens when a man
                gets hit?       
         [MAN SCREAMS]          
Sometimes they yell.            
           [GUNSHOTS]           
Sometimes they don't.           
Squad leaders don't last long.  
            I mean the medics.  
         How do they get to you?
                 Medics! Medics!
           Get on the other side
                of the road.    
                         Hit it.
           [GUNSHOTS]           
Let's go, boy.                  
                  Squad leaders,
                     up front.  
        Squad leaders, up front.
    Squad leaders, up front.    
        Squad leaders, up front.
    Squad leaders, up front.    
        Squad leaders, up front.
Squad leaders, up front.        
SOLDIER:                        
Squad leaders, up front.        
       What are you waiting for,
               sergeant?        
      I forgot.                 
           [GUNSHOTS]           
        [PLANE ZOOMING]         
           [GUNSHOTS]           
  Bakatare!                     
         Hey, you'd better move,
                   Sam.         
           Maybe he gonna shake.
Have a good time, Frank.        
         How can I miss? Rome...
       The greatest architecture
             in the world.      
Twenty-four-hour passes.                         
Big-hearted, ain't they?                     
   I'm gonna see a lot of things
        in the next 24 hours    
              I've dreamed about
                 all my life.   
       The Forum, Saint Peter's,
            the Pantheon...     
Any other outfit,               
I bet they get three-day passes.
Yeah, and not just one man at a time, either.              
       Ah, chick, chick, chick, 
     chick, chick, chick, chick.
          Relax.                
That reminds me, Tommy,         
I hear we having chicken for dinner.             
                        No joke?
Yeah, I was talking to one of the cooks.            
   Fried chicken.               
                      Good, boy.
        That's what I like best.
Not me.                         
You know what I like best?               
Barbecued pork, yes, sir.       
        There's nothing         
      like barbecued pork.      
 Especially the way I make it.  
                   [SQUEALS]    
Mail call.                      
        [EXCITED SHOUTS]        
             Jingu.             
            Hitrai.             
           Gutsizaki.           
            Mishima.            
                Here! Here!     
          Kawaquichi.           
                [CHATTERING]    
           [SQUEALS]            
     [SHOUTING IN ITALIAN]      
 [SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]          
 Signore, signorina,            
  l'amore, l'amore.             
     [SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]      
You like-a vino, Joe?           
                     Ah, no,    
                 he no for sale.
           Tre litre.           
Three bottles, Joe.             
                Not for nothin'.
        Quattro, cinque,        
 sei, sette, otto, Joe.         
                   Waste time.  
                Come on, paisan.
[SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]           
 Fame.                          
                          Fame. 
                Hungry. Hungry. 
       Okay, plenty meat on her.
[SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]           
   No eat. No eat.              
          Oh, no, no.           
      Signore, signorina.       
  [HUMMING FELIX MENDELSSOHN'S  
        "WEDDING MARCH"]        
           Papa. Mama.          
            Bambino.            
 Uno, due, tre, quattro.        
                    Ohh.        
       Paisan, him kind of young
             for papa, no?      
[SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]           
                Sì, sì, sì.     
We wait.                        
                  Tre mesi.     
Three months.                   
         [SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]  
                    Arrivederci.
   [SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]        
Nine bottles, ten.              
              No!               
    No, Papa.                   
[SPEAKING IN ITALIAN]           
          Hey, Tommy.           
    Look what I got.            
    Lookie.                     
Here, help yourself.            
     Paisan too.                
             He no like cookies.
             Maybe bambinos, eh?
Sure, go ahead.                 
Who that from, Sam?             
Your mother?                    
            Terry. Hey, remember
             that town we took? 
      Suvereto? It was on a news
      broadcast, coast to coast,
     and they mentioned the 442.
No kidding?                     
                I'm tellin' you.
     And there've been newspaper
        stories, lots of 'em.   
          The 100th is getting  
       the Presidential Citation
        from General Mark Clark,
           Sassetta, Hill 140.  
Hey. Let me see that.           
       How you like that?       
They gonna let your kid brother 
     leave relocation camp      
      and work on a farm.       
    Next month he gonna pick    
     sugar beets in Idaho.      
     Well, what do ya know.     
   He's been trying to swing    
     that deal for months.      
           Good boy.            
     All okay, nobody sick.     
      Oh, oh, excuse, Sam.      
          That's okay.          
   I'll read the rest to you.   
  "Honestly, Sam, you'd hardly  
  recognize the old homestead.  
   "Maybe it looks the same,    
 the barracks, the barbed wire, 
     "the MPs, but it isn't     
       the same anymore.        
      "Nothing's the same.      
    "Because everybody knows    
     what the 442 is doing.     
   "And what means most to me   
         is the change          
   in the kids in my class."    
  She teaches in camp school.   
  I know, I know. First grade.  
        "They were such sad     
   little people, never laughed,
            "never made a sound.
   "Today, I'm happy to say,    
  I have as noisy a classroom   
  as you'll find in America."   
More better now,                
  eh, kotonk?                   
         Looks that way, Kanaka.
              Plenty better now.
       "I miss you so very much,
              my darling.       
  I can't find words to tell you
 how dear you are to me. How..."
[OINKS, SQUEALS]                
 [SOLDIERS SINGING INDISTINCTLY]
          Arrivederci!          
 How was it?                    
How was Rome?                   
I'll see you tomorrow.          
I gotta go to the C.P.          
 and pick up my pass.           
           SOLDIER 1:           
End of the line. Everybody out. 
          [CHATTERING]          
SOLDIER 2:                      
So long, Bob, see ya later.     
Take it easy now.               
  Just wanted to let you know   
        we're back, sir.        
                       Oh, good.
            You're just in time.
Oh, thanks.                     
Sergeant, have the driver report
   to the motor pool, will ya?  
          Yes, sir.             
He's got a full tank, sir.      
All set to go with the next batch.            
        I was all set to go too.
         Change of orders.      
   We're going back on the line.
That's kind of rough.           
Somebody was telling me your folks came from Rome.      
       A little town near there.
              Oh, well, I'll get
              to see it someday.
Sure you will.                  
Hey, we met up with some of your
   folks while you were gone.   
                Your old outfit.
The 36th!                       
                They passed us  
              on their way back.
            The Texas wonders   
         had all they could take
      so they called in the 442.
Where'd they go?                
                 The word is    
             they're being moved
              to another theatre
                of operations.  
Is that straight?               
 Looks like you're stuck with us
     for the rest of the war.   
    [SIGHS]                     
Guy gets in to fight the Japs and winds up fightin' with 'em. 
It's hot one when you come to think of it.   
               Oh, I don't know.
    A lot of us have parents who
   were born in enemy countries.
              Italian Americans,
              German Americans--
That's different, sir,          
   and you know it.             
                        Why?    
Well, it's just--               
        The shape of their eyes?
              Or is it the color
                of their skin?  
Tell the truth, sir, wouldn't you rather be with some other outfit?         
   If I knew of a better outfit,
            but I don't.        
Will that be all, sir?          
            You don't have to be
                 so formal.     
It was your idea to go by the book.              
       That was a long time ago.
I'll see ya later.              
How was it, lieutenant?         
                 Great.         
    [EXPLOSIONS IN DISTANCE]    
I hope the supply sergeant takes good care of your pig.    
Yep. I sure hope he feeds him good               
so he'll be nice and fat when we get back off the line.  
               Hey, Frank, look.
                 Look at that.  
Must be an old Roman villa.             
Yeah, you can tell it's Roman   
      by those columns.         
      [MACHINE GUN FIRES]       
                  Rubble        
          from another war, huh?
It's hard to believe.           
Over 2000 years old.            
       The battles that must    
   have been fought around here.
  Napoleon, Charlemagne, Caesar,
       Alexander the Great,     
               all the way back 
              to biblical times.
            More better we fight
            like biblical times.
            I read in the Bible.
  Your army pick number one man,
    enemy pick number one man,  
      and by big fight, two men,
         one killed, war over.  
I nominate Lieutenant Grayson for our side.                   
      No. I wouldn't know       
        who to root for.        
      [SHOUTING IN GERMAN]      
It's some kind of headquarters all right, and it looks like they're gettin' ready to pull out.      
      [MACHINE GUN FIRES]       
   Yeah, with all their maps    
          and records.          
     And one machine gun's      
        holding us back.        
  A little more to the right.   
                   Thirty yards.
Got any more?                   
           Be right back.       
      Thirty yards to the right.
           Can you hear me?     
Yeah, officer.                  
                Come on.        
           Let's take a walk.   
          Hey, you over there.  
           Not you.             
 You take over,                 
    Ohhara.                     
      [MACHINE GUN FIRES]       
      [SHOUTING IN GERMAN]      
      [SHOUTING IN GERMAN]      
                 OHHARA:        
        Keep firing that mortar.
                  Keep it going.
            Where's that mortar?
  I don't think these columns'll
     be here for the next war.  
          How about that mortar?
          Right away.           
        I gotta move it.        
      [MACHINE GUN FIRES]       
                OHHARA:         
      Hurry up with that mortar.
       Okay. Okay.              
They moved the gun.             
       Right. Fifty yards right.
              Short. Short.     
       Give it another 50 yards.
           Now over to the left,
               just a little.   
     That's it! Pour it on!     
      [SHOUTING IN GERMAN]      
            [SPEAKING IN GERMAN]
                    OHHARA:     
               Hold it! Hold it!
                  Cease-fire!   
                       Let's go!
           [GUNFIRE]            
      [SHOUTING IN GERMAN]      
           [GUNSHOTS]           
     [SHOUTING INDISTINCTLY     
           IN GERMAN]           
             What kind of troops
             are these? Chinese?
                Japanese.       
        Didn't Hitler tell ya?  
   Japan surrendered and they're
     fighting on our side now.  
              Well,             
        it beats walking.       
     Maybe walking through Italy
            wasn't so bad.      
              Didn't you get    
         the latest latrinogram?
             We're shipping out.
           Shipping out?        
            And so we take leave
               of sunny Italy   
    and sail the seven seas to--
         To where?              
        My guess is the Pacific.
      You really think so,      
          lieutenant?           
           Yeah, but don't worry
                 about it.      
    I haven't guessed right once
    since I've been in the Army.
        Watch that stuff.       
   Sorry.                       
       [UKELELE PLAYING]        
               Tommy.           
      [PIG GRUNTS]              
       Oh, hello, lieutenant.   
I told you to go easy           
    on that leg.                
             Plenty okay now,   
               lieutenant.      
Well, what did you leave        
   the hospital for?            
    I've been still, lieutenant.
    Three weeks. Long time, sir.
       Don't you realize        
    officially you're AWOL?     
I don't know whether to put you in for a Silver Star 
  or have you court-martialed.  
      Gotta leave hospital, sir.
   Big rumor, 442 going Pacific.
           Me plenty sad sack   
         get left behind, huh?  
       Sir, maybe we still      
        gonna fight Japan.      
        You think so, maybe?    
   No, Tommy.                   
It's definitely France.         
                    [PIG GRUNTS]
               [COUGHS]         
              Bad cough.        
      I catch him in a hospital.
      [PIG GRUNTS, TOMMY COUGHS]
  More better now. Sea air good.
      [PIG GRUNTS, TOMMY COUGHS]
      Well, goodbye, lieutenant.
               [GRUNTS, SQUEALS]
                 [COUGHS]       
   Goodbye, Tommy.              
      You are about to play     
         a personal part        
     in pushing the Germans     
         out of France.         
    Just west of the Riviera    
   district in southern France  
  lies the port of Marseilles.  
  You will be fortunate indeed  
      if you are stationed      
    in this fascinating city.   
    However, the chances are    
       you will be located      
        in the provinces.       
     Rooms with private bath    
        are still de luxe       
  in provincial towns, and you  
  won't always have steam heat, 
          but there are         
       many compensations.      
  For instance, your breakfast  
 will be brought to your bedroom
      without extra charge.     
[GRUNTS, SQUEALS]               
        [WHISTLE BLOWS]         
  First class on French trains  
    ranks with our extra-fare   
             trains,            
          second ranks          
       with our parlor car      
         and third class is like
         our ordinary-day coach.
      If French coaches are less
        comfortable than ours,  
     remember that they are also
           less expensive.      
                It all evens up.
                 Who's got      
                 the time?      
     Two-twenty, sir.           
                  Thanks.       
Who do you think that I oughta  
      see about it, sir?        
  S1 personnel.                 
They assign the new replacements, but they're not gonna put two brothers in the same platoon.   
      My kid brother's got a way
            with him, sir,      
            and he's just liable
           to talk them into it.
Bad enough being in the same regiment, but the same platoon...         
     Yeah, I'd hate for my folks
         to get two telegrams   
         from the War Department
             on the same day.   
        [TRAIN RUMBLES]         
                   Where are    
                   you going?   
Think I'll ride with my platoon, sir.           
      You're overdoing the "sir"
         business, lieutenant.  
 I keep forgetting.             
And here I've been an officer for two hours and 20 minutes.   
  How are you doing, Grayson?   
     [TRAIN WHISTLE BLOWS]      
              Hey, Sam,         
        you think Terry okay?   
  Sure. It was just             
    a little cold.              
         I feel more better     
      when the mail catch up.   
   Long time he no get mail.    
I wonder how my brother's       
       making out.              
              Me too.           
         I guess he work        
      on the sugar-beet farm    
     already two, three weeks.  
            Hey, Ohhara,        
         we want the mail.      
    Write your congressman.     
                  Ten-hut.      
    [WHISTLING, CHATTERING]     
             As you were.       
            Carry on, men.      
              SAM:              
     How do you like that?      
   Do they give a commission    
   to one of us buddhaheads?    
No, they give it to the mick.                    
               Ohhara,          
        the fighting Irishman.  
    Faith, and you can          
     say that again.            
     Now, get along             
   with your blarney.           
   I've got something           
      to tell you.              
At ease.                        
At ease.                        
Let's be having a little military courtesy.     
Yes, sir.                       
    I, uh, haven't              
  been assigned yet,            
but it looks like I'll be taking over another platoon.    
I probably won't be seeing      
    much of you guys.           
I just wanted to say, well,     
         so long.               
     He gonna make              
 good platoon leader.           
           Yeah, while he lasts.
      He's welcome to them bars.
Sam, look at those buildings.   
    Seventeenth century.        
                   I'm looking  
                 at that bakery.
              Go ahead, Tommy.  
    I'll keep an eye on the pig.
Stick close to the train,       
        you guys.               
I'm tired of rounding up        
      stragglers.               
                       Bakatare.
             [LAUGHS]           
What'd he say?                  
            Oh, that's Japanese 
          for-- For "thank you."
           They're very polite. 
             WOMEN:             
     ¶ The eyes of Texas ¶      
        ¶ Are upon you ¶        
    ¶ All the livelong day ¶    
      ¶ The eyes of Texas       
         Are upon you ¶         
    ¶ You cannot get away ¶     
     ¶ Do not think you can     
         Escape them ¶          
¶ I tried so early in the morn ¶
      ¶ The eyes of Texas       
        Are upon you-- ¶        
    Pardon me. Pardon me.       
         Pardon me!             
      Hello, baby.              
   When did you learn that song?
          When?                 
             That's right.      
          When did you learn it?
        Learn what?             
           The-- The song. Song.
            ¶ The eyes of Texas 
             Are upon you-- ¶   
       [SPEAKING IN FRENCH]     
              ALL:              
    ¶ All the livelong day ¶    
              No, no, no.       
           When you learn song? 
   Ah, last week.               
      Soldiers.                 
          Thirty-sixth Division?
    I think so.                 
        Big T.                  
            Are they still here?
 No. Parti. Yesterday.          
     [TRAIN WHISTLE BLOWS]      
     Au revoir.                 
      [SPEAKING IN FRENCH]      
          [ALL LAUGH]           
              Well, well.       
      The ambassador from Texas.
Good afternoon, sir.            
 You know, lieutenant, I had you
    down as a determined man,   
      but I didn't think you had
              enough drag       
  to get the whole darned outfit
     transferred to the 36th.   
       Transferred?             
       That's right, lieutenant.
            We've been attached 
           to the 36th Division.
           I guess that makes us
              honorary Texans.  
              Well, fan my brow.
          Keep an eye out       
   for cattle-rustlers, partner.
Well, what do you know about that?                     
I thought you'd be pleased,     
        lieutenant.             
This is the man we've been      
   looking for, major.          
    One of the new combat       
 commissions to replace him.    
          Well, there's one     
    in his platoon, sir. Ohhara.
  Good. He can take over.       
Take over my platoon, sir?                
            We've had a request 
           for a liaison officer
                to work out of  
              36th headquarters.
       Someone who can get along
               with them        
   and knows the 442 thoroughly.
But, sir, I've always been      
       on the line.             
Do you think I have the qualifications for a headquarter's job?        
       I think you'll make good.
    When a man wants anything   
 as badly as you've wanted this.
  But sir, I don't want this.   
      Remember, I told you      
  I just wanted to visit them.  
   I've got a lot of friends    
          in the 36th.          
 None of them at headquarters,  
           I take it.           
  I couldn't arrange to have you
    sent back to your platoon.  
        Colonel Pence--         
      Your orders will be issued
             immediately.       
                  All aboard!   
                 Texas special! 
 Dallas, Forth Worth, Galveston,
  Houston and all points south. 
                Yeah, man!      
    Ya-hoo!                     
              Arrivederci.      
           Oh, no, old boy.     
      SOLDIER 1: So long.       
           SOLDIER 2:           
     So long, Mademoiselle.     
           SOLDIER 3:           
     Don't forget to write.     
How do you like that Texas artillery, strangers?
              Stranger?         
     Man, I'm from Texas myself.
  Well, pull up a chair         
  and have a mint julep.        
       That's mighty neighborly,
                friend,         
          but we're heading back
               towards town.    
            Another posse's     
       gonna spell us for a bit.
          Tommy's sure anxious  
        to get back to that town
           where he left Paisan.
Ain't love wonderful?           
Howdy, stranger.                
                   Aloha.       
There's only one thing I don't like about these buddhaheads.   
They don't dig 'em long enough. 
Hello, my friend.               
He's here, the little Paisan.   
                    He's here.  
                      Paisan.   
                  Hello, Paisan.
          You looking good, boy.
       You're looking wonderful,
                Paisan.         
            Come on, Paisan.    
       You're beautiful, Paisan.
    [SQUEALS]                   
        Nice pig.               
    He miss you much.           
              I miss him too.   
      Oh, thanks for taking care
               of him.          
                 Thanks a lot.  
     Thank you.                 
Y-you are very kind.            
              What's the matter?
               You don't smoke? 
   Yes, I smoke.                
I was hoping maybe something    
  to eat for the children.      
 Chocolate, crackers, anything. 
            They have so little,
              so little to eat. 
   I don't have anything to eat.
           Trade the cigarettes.
                 Two packs.     
You can get a couple of chickens
           for that.            
       Not here.                
No chickens left. Nothing.      
                      All right.
           I'll come back later.
    I hate to ask.              
               It won't be much.
        All we get is K rations.
  It will be a feast            
      for them.                 
              I wish I could get
               something better.
         [OINKS, SQUEALS]       
                     Well, uh,  
                  see you later.
Goodbye, my friend.             
                   [BABY CRYING]
            FARMER:             
           Thank you.           
      Thank you very much.      
How wonderful for the children. 
      [SPEAKING IN FRENCH]      
        [PIG SQUEALING]         
      [INDISTINCT SINGING]      
   Kanakas.                     
The ones from Hawaii.           
Let's stop a minute, huh?       
       I won't be long.         
[UKELELE PLAYING]               
     [SINGING IN HAWAIIAN]      
     Throw those bums out.      
           ALL: Yeah!           
      Go on, get up there.      
No, they're doing fine.         
                     Come on.   
                 Hula-hula, Kaz.
              Kaz.              
            GRAYSON:            
              Hey.              
              ALL:              
             Whoa!              
     [SINGING IN HAWAIIAN]      
                     [LAUGHS]   
Would you like some wine?       
               Ah, merci. Merci.
[SPEAKING IN FRENCH]            
  These men, the little ones,   
   they are really Japanese?    
  Hey, shorty, she wants to know
        if you're Japanese.     
              I guess we can    
          let her in on it, huh?
             They're our new    
              secret weapon.    
              Twilight fighters.
       Twilight fighters?       
 Yeah. The Army gives them shots
  to make them turn yellow, see.
              They send them out
                in the evening, 
   just as the sun's going down.
       The enemy can't see 'em  
    in that light. Get the idea?
                   [LAUGHS]     
 That guy's been                
 looking for trouble all night. 
If he makes one more crack,     
          I'll--                
Tommy! How are you?             
           Lieutenant Grayson!  
  How's the leg?                
       Fit like a fiddle.       
     Hiya, fellas.              
      ALL: Howdy, Grayson.      
      Who's your friend,        
 the one with all the stripes?  
   They don't care who they make
     platoon sergeant anymore.  
How about having a refill?      
        Thanks, Frank.          
I wanna say hello to my old platoon sergeant.     
    I trained under him.        
       Be right back.           
            Culley!             
                  Grayson!      
                   How are you? 
          Lieutenant Grayson.   
           Yeah, how about that?
            How about a drink?  
                   Great. Great.
                 Come on,       
         there's room down here.
That guy would be a buddy       
      of Grayson's.             
Five to one he don't come back  
       for that drink.          
                     Get it up. 
    They tell me you really     
          got it made.          
What is this liaison racket?    
 Oh, it varies, from a soft snap
      to an extra soft snap.    
              Thank you.        
         Tomorrow I'm moving out
                with you.       
         How do you like that?  
      Back with the old platoon.
You mean, I gotta take orders   
          from you?             
         No. I don't mess around
            with you dogfaces.  
               I'll be with     
         the artillery observer.
   You're getting your artillery
           from the 442,        
           and he's never worked
             with them before.  
    They're sending us up       
  without our own artillery?    
        Just the Japs?          
  They're a good outfit, Culley.
           Plenty good.         
Practically winning the war single-handed from what I hear. 
         Japs.                  
           Let's get outta here,
                    huh?        
      Yeah, I could use         
     a little fresh air.        
                 You win, Chick.
Japs in a Texas division.       
      Man, oh, man.             
             Come here a minute.
       Culley, they're not Japs.
          Huh?                  
     They're Japanese Americans.
       Nisei, or, if you prefer,
              buddhaheads.      
                But not Japs.   
             They don't like it 
             and neither do I.  
What are you, a Jap-lover or something?       
        I said they're not Japs.
         I'm warning ya, Culley.
   You're what?                 
                Warning ya.     
Lieutenant, that gold bar looks real sweet on you, but I do believe you're getting a little big for your britches. 
                  I can always  
               take the bar off.
  Any time you say.             
            [GRUNTS]            
[ENGINE REVS]                   
         "Okara."               
Yo!                             
        "Misoka."               
                   Here! Here!  
        "Nishigoka."            
                      Hey!      
                    No letters? 
   Keep your pants on.          
 SOLDIER: Come on, snap it up.  
             "Kiri."            
       Yo-ho!                   
        "Kamakura."             
 Oh, here, here.                
   I take it.                   
           Cookies.             
     Ho-ho!                     
        "Ikagani."              
                           Here!
         One cookie.            
          [ALL LAUGH]           
        Hey, look.              
  How you like that.            
      Two sets.                 
  I go see Masami.              
      Woo-hoo!                  
             Two sets.          
       Sam, Sam.                
       Wiki-wiki.               
           I'm wiki-wikiing     
          as fast as I can.     
     Anything from my brother?  
No, all from relocation center. 
  Sugar report from Terry.      
  "Dear Sam, I hate to start out
        a letter this way,      
    but I think it best to get  
  the bad news over with first."
Her cold, she no get better, huh?         
               No. Terry's okay.
Your mother been get sick?      
       Your father?             
                It's my brother.
He been lose his job            
    on the farm?                
          Yeah, him and a couple
              of his buddies.   
      A gang beat them to a pulp
      and said they'd lynch them
        if they ever came back. 
Why they do that? Why?          
        Why? Because they've got
               slant eyes.      
  That's a crime in some places,
       didn't you know that?    
            How do ya like that?
               We're good enough
to carry rifles, but we're not good enough to pick sugar beets.            
       Take it easy, Sam.       
Sure, sure, take it easy.                   
Take it lying down.             
                 Go on, beat it.
                      Blow.     
Ain't I been telling you?       
Suckers, that's what we are.    
  Chick, chick, chick,          
  chick, chick, chick.          
How would you like a dental appointment?           
     Let's go, boy.             
        Katonk.                 
            OHHARA:             
          Break it up.          
 If you're looking              
    for a scrap,                
  you won't have long           
        to wait.                
We've been alerted.             
Pull your tents down            
   and move out.                
Pull 'em down?                  
We just put 'em up.             
The men Lt. Grayson moved out   
 with have been surrounded.     
            The whole battalion?
 What's left of 'em.            
     Grayson's okay so far.     
   Artillery observer got hit   
       and he took over.        
Just so the lieutenant is safe.                        
                        Him     
                  and his buddy,
                  his dear old  
               platoon sergeant.
What's up with Sam?             
                   He just got  
                  some bad news.
He's not the only one.          
They're gonna send the new replacements up on line 
as soon as they arrive, the batch my kid brother's in.  
Eighteen years old.             
        [ARTILLERY FIRE]        
         Hey, Grayson!          
           SOLDIER 1:           
             Medic!             
       Where's the medic?       
                    SOLDIER 2:  
                   There he is! 
                 Over here, Joe!
             MEDIC:             
      I found a full one.       
                  Thanks, pal.  
   Give me a slug of that,      
          will ya?              
 [ARTILLERY WHIZZING, EXPLODES] 
         Hey, Grayson!          
            GRAYSON:            
           Look out!            
  You okay, Culley?             
                   Where's that 
                 Jap artillery?!
                   Where is it?!
 [ARTILLERY WHIZZING, EXPLODES] 
          Wildcat six.          
      This is Wildcat two.      
      Fire mission. Over.       
      Fire mission point.       
      [ARTILLERY WHIZZING]      
 Fire mission point, Fox-Able-  
    Easy-Baker-Mike-Charlie,    
 and point, King-Sugar-Charlie- 
         Love-Able-How.         
          Wildcat two.          
      This is Wildcat six.      
               Stand by.        
    One round smoke on way.     
    One round smoke on way.     
[INTERPRETER SPEAKING IN GERMAN]
      [SPEAKING IN GERMAN]      
[SPEAKING IN GERMAN]            
      [SPEAKING IN GERMAN]      
Can't get a thing outta this one, sir.            
                  We got enough 
                from the others.
             Send him over      
       to division headquarters.
                   Get anything?
     Yes, sir.                  
Added to what we already know,  
I can give ya a pretty clear picture.         
                        Good.   
It's all dense woods.           
Those roads on the map are just forest trails, and Jerry has roadblocks        
     on all of 'em.             
The men are surrounded          
on three sides by elements of the, uh,         
338th Infantry Division, the 198th Fusilier Battalion    
   and the 202nd                
Mountain Battalion.             
To the northeast--              
             Well, let me see it
            on the map, captain.
   Well, starting here,         
  the Germans are dug in        
on a continuous line all the way around to here.     
     There's a gap here...      
and one here that I know of, but they're covered by machine guns with interlocking fire.    
There's a steep ridge here that dominates this sector.     
It's almost straight up on both sides, and they have a strong force sitting up on top.              
                  PENCE:        
          How far away from here
          is the lost battalion?
Well, I'd say a thousand yards.               
They're just about here.        
       We'll have troops within 
      striking distance tonight.
              All right, Ohhara,
              this is your spot.
                      Good luck.
        Come on, shake a leg,   
               will ya?         
CHICK:                          
This don't make sense.          
Sticking our necks out for guys like that buddy of Grayson's.   
 That sergeant, that's the kind 
 who ganged up on your brother. 
               TOMMY:           
   We get to the lost battalion,
    that sergeant gonna change  
  his mind about us buddhaheads.
Plenty people already we change,
            eh, Sam?            
            Keeps up like Terry 
           been writing letters,
                 by and by      
          we gonna have it good.
              You bet. Yes, sir.
                 Good thing     
            you read me letters,
               or maybe I go get
                  like Chick.   
       It's rough.              
    It's plenty rough.          
But we know what's it all about.            
         You bet.               
More better we go for broke, yes, Sam?         
                That's about it,
                     Tommy.     
                 "More better we
                  go for broke."
      [ARTILLERY WHIZZING]      
          [EXPLOSION]           
        Ohhara. Ohhara!         
            Is it bad?          
           Million-dollar wound.
                   [RASPING]    
              Luck of the Irish.
      [ARTILLERY WHIZZING]      
            Medics.             
            Medics!             
              Medics!           
   MEDIC:                       
 Let's go.                      
  I'm glad you have someone     
         to lean on.            
         I don't seem           
      to recognize you.         
      Have you been back        
   to any of the services?      
                  No, Father.   
               I'm not Catholic.
          You're not?           
       Different kind of rosary.
           I'm Buddhist, Father.
          I'll be here          
        if you want me.         
     [ARTILLERY EXPLODING]      
      [ARTILLERY WHIZZING]      
         We're gonna try        
         to make contact.       
     [AIRPLANE APPROACHING]     
         The Piper Cub's calling
        the shots for artillery.
     [ARTILLERY EXPLODING]      
           They're trying       
    to shoot us in some rations.
 That'll be                     
 a big help.                    
Sukiyaki and rice.              
                   I could use  
                   another man. 
PENCE:                          
Well, the Piper Cub pilot says there's at least a hundred of 'em on this ridge.           
And they'll be shooting right down our throats if we try to come up from either side.               
Our engineers have been cutting through a road on top of the ridge so we can bring up a tank.      
They're about here now.         
                Once that tank  
             gets within range--
When will that be?              
               Hard to say, sir.
        [PHONE BUZZING]         
         It's slow going.       
  Minefields all over the place.
 Tell division headquarters     
I'm on my way back, will you?   
          [SPEAKING IN JAPANESE]
          The Jerries have been 
         tapping the wires, sir.
               Some of them     
          speak perfect English.
[CONTINUES SPEAKING IN JAPANESE]
                  Wildcat three.
                  Wildcat three.
             Sergeant Yasugomoto
                  speaking.     
          [SPEAKING IN JAPANESE]
               Wildcat three,   
           this is Wildcat four.
                     Come in,   
                  Wildcat three.
            [SPEAKING IN GERMAN]
                  Wildcat three.
                  Wildcat three.
             Sergeant Yasugomoto
                  speaking.     
                 Wildcat three. 
                 Wildcat three. 
             Sergeant Yasugomoto
                  speaking.     
          [SPEAKING IN JAPANESE]
Good idea, sergeant.            
                 Thank you, sir.
         It's just that good old
             Yankee know-how.   
[CONTINUES SPEAKING IN JAPANESE]
    [EXPLOSIONS IN DISTANCE]    
           [CHOPPING]           
                Watch out!      
If I was a Jerry on the end of this ridge and a tank got close enough     
   to fire point-blank,         
     I'd take off               
 like a ruptured duck.          
                         Yeah.  
Right over the side             
   of the ridge.                
        There oughta be somebody
         down there to meet 'em.
That's what I was thinking.     
                     Let's go.  
   SOLDIER:                     
Hey, sergeant.                  
 Sergeant.                      
Where's Lieutenant Ohhara's platoon?                        
                    This is it. 
We're your new replacements.               
Ohhara's the name.              
Another suntanned Irishman.     
                     Come on.   
                      Ohhara.   
      [INAUDIBLE DIALOGUE]      
      [ARTILLERY EXPLODING      
          IN DISTANCE]          
   [BIRDS CHIRPING, ARTILLERY   
     EXPLODING IN DISTANCE]     
     [BULLETS RICOCHETING]      
           [GUNFIRE]            
  They're Japs.                 
Hey, knock it off,              
     will ya?                   
        [GUNFIRE STOPS]         
                What's          
            the password?       
Dipsy doodle,                   
 that's it.                     
                    That was it,
                     a week ago.
Let's have that password.                  
    One. Two.                   
               Bakatare.        
  Come on out.                  
                         [SIGHS]
Make 'em give you the right password.             
     You ever hear a Jerry try  
   to pronounce a Japanese word?
               If that's not    
           a buddhahead, I'll...
                    You'll what?
            GRAYSON:            
       Sam, Chick, Tommy.       
A whole battalion's lost,       
 and we gotta find them.        
            CULLEY:             
Man, I never thought I'd be so happy to see a bunch of Japs.
            Pardon me. Japanese.
                 I mean, Nisei. 
              No, that ain't it.
            What is it, Grayson?
          Buddhaheads.          
                     Okay. Okay.
      [MACHINE GUN FIRING]      
Buddhaheads, huh?               
                  That's right. 
He sure is touchy               
   about that.                  
      One time,                 
 he even slugged me.            
               Slugged you, huh?
              Did you hear that,
                    Chick?      
           Where's the rest     
     of your outfit, lieutenant?
Back there about a mile.        
But it took us hours            
    to get here.                
     On our bellies,            
     most of the way.           
               When do we start?
Not enough of us would make it  
     to do 'em any good.        
                  What do we do,
                    lieutenant? 
That's up to you, Sam.          
I'm strictly a liaison officer.              
                   Skirmish line
                    up the hill.
        Skirmish line           
        up the hill.            
             Skirmish line      
              up the hill.      
                 Skirmish line  
                 up the hill.   
                   Skirmish line
                    up the hill.
                      SOLDIER:  
                   Skirmish line
                    up the hill.
Tell me something, Sam.         
What does bakatare mean?        
                    [CHUCKLES]  
        Well, freely translated:
                  You're a heel.
       A stupid jerk and a heel.
That was putting it mildly.     
    Go for broke!               
      [MACHINE GUN FIRING]      
      [ARTILLERY WHIZZING]      
           [GUNFIRE]            
  [SOLDIER SPEAKING IN GERMAN]  
           [GUNFIRE]            
      [ARTILLERY WHIZZING]      
           [SCREAMS]            
  Go for broke!                 
                       Grenade! 
  [SOLDIER SPEAKING IN GERMAN]  
              [GRENADE EXPLODES]
                        SAM:    
                   Go for broke!
       [SOLDIER SCREAMS]        
                      Aah!      
        Look out, Tommy!        
  [SOLDIER SHOUTING IN GERMAN]  
Is that all there were?         
             They went thataway,
                   partner.     
    Go for broke!               
      [INAUDIBLE DIALOGUE]      
       [GRENADE EXPLODES]       
  Yahoo!                        
[SOLDIERS WHOOPING AND CHEERING]
           Any of you guys      
          want a cigarette?     
            SOLDIER:            
     Bye, you buddhaheads.      
           SOLDIER 2:           
            So long.            
           SOLDIER 3:           
       Ride 'em, cowboy.        
           SOLDIER 4:           
    Bye! Thanks a lot, Jack.    
           SOLDIER 5:           
       See you in Berlin.       
           SOLDIER 6:           
Look out for that mademoiselle. 
           SOLDIER 7:           
         Take it easy.          
           SOLDIER 8:           
            So long.            
                         Thanks.
                   Au revoir.   
       Goodbye, you all.        
           SOLDIER 9:           
            So long.            
              I'll be seein' ya.
        Aloha, partner!         
                      [CHUCKLES]
      SOLDIER 10: So long.      
          SOLDIER 11:           
            Attaboy.            
[SOLDIERS SHOUTING INDISTINCTLY]
          SOLDIER 12:           
       See you in Paris.        
            TRUMAN:             
         Battle honors.         
            By order            
    of the secretary of war,    
  in the name of the president  
      of the United States,     
      as public evidence of     
 deserved honor and distinction,
      the 442nd Regimental      
           Combat Team          
    is cited for outstanding    
    accomplishment in combat.   
          The gallantry         
       and esprit de corps      
            displayed           
    by their officers and men   
        in bitter action        
   against a formidable enemy   
 exemplify the finest traditions
       of the Armed Forces      
      of the United States.     

Let's enter, young ladies.
Our show is the act of refinement.
It will astound you and amaze you.
It is also educational, and it costs you only 10 cents.
- Come on, let's go inside.
- But we told the dean w were going to the art institute.
- If they find out we'll get in trouble.
- He said it was educational, didn't he?
- Let's go.
- Come on!
Right this way, young ladies.
Four tickets for the young ladies.
And now ladies and gentlemen...
If you follow me to the outer range of the museum...
As we approach the cage, proceed with extreme cautious.
Because, as I introduced to you Pluto, the wild man who was captured in the wild of Africa, he's just as wild and ferocious today as the day he was captured.
Not too close, ladies, because it was women that made the wild man wild.
If you please, Mr. Schultz.
Stop it! Stop it!
- If you treat him like a beast then he becomes one.
- What do you mean?
Just stop hitting him, that's all.
- Look out! Are you crazy?
- You made him that way! Don't beat him anymore!
Herbie!
Now, if you young ladies and the rest of you folks will just follow up to the next platform
I want to introduce you to the world'd greatest phenomenon:
The Pretzel twins.
They will bend, twist and curve in a...
Now look here, young lady, if you don't leave that man alone you have to leave the place.
- Why? I didn't do anything to him.
- He's dangerous.
Last time he grabbed a girl she disappeared, puff!
Now leave! Leave him alone!
What's the matter with you?
- Hi, Harry.
- Hi, Joan.
Thank you, Mary and Sadie.
And now, ladies and gentlemen, if we all just move over to the next platform,
I want to introduce to you a man who has all the wizardry of modern magic at his fingertips.
Not a man of 1,000 tricks, but a man of 10,000 tricks.
He will not only amaze and astound you, but will confound you with his modern piece of magic.
Ladies and gentlemen, I give you The Great Houdini.
Thank you, Ladies and Gentlemen.
For my first trick, a small miracle.
As you see, I have just an ordinary piece of paper.
I take the paper and form a simple cone.
I bend the end.
If you place your attention to the pitcher of milk on the table,
I take the milk and pour it into the magic cone.
To the doubting comers who don't believe this is milk
I pour it into the glass.
See?
For the young ladies who like sweet milk
I add a little sugar.
I pick the wand, stir it just a little bit...
Watch.
One, two, three!
Evaporated milk.
That magic's gotta go.
It slows up the turnover.
You can see that, can't you?
Yeah, but he won't play the wild man unless I let him do those tired tricks.
Are you the boss, or aren't you, huh?
Don't you see how all the girls go for the wild man?
That boy has got something, and he won't forget a magic.
Now, for my next trick I shall need the assistence of some volunteer from the audience.
Young lady, would you kindly step upon the platform?
Oh, I can't do anything like that.
I don't want to.
- Go, go.
- I don't wanna go in front of the audience!
- Come right up here. Don't be afraid.
- I...
Thank you. Let's give the young lady a nice hand.
- And this is for assisting me.
- Oh, thank you!
What is your name, young lady?
- I don't have the habit to give my name to strangers.
- She has not the habit to give her name to strangers.
Uh, have we met before?
- Certainly not!
- Much to my misfortune.
Now, will you kindly write your name down on this piece of paper. Don't let me see it! Please!
- Fine.
- Thank you.
- Have you written it?
- Yes.
Now, put it in the flame and drop it in the urn.
Now concentrate on your name while it's burning.
- Are you concentrating?
- Yes.
- Is it burning?
- Yes.
Thank you very much.
Now, may I have your hand, please?
Oh, please, it's gonna help the vibrations.
Thank you.
Now, will you close your eyes and concentrate?
- Um, you're not concentrating.
- Oh.
I want you to hold my hand real tight, and concentrate, because I'm going to read your thoughts.
- Oh, my goodness.
- Please, you must concentrate.
- All right.
- Thank you.
Oh, now I'm getting an image.
And it's a good one.
Oh! I take some ashes... watch me carefully...
I rub it on my arm.
Watch!
There! Is that your name? Bess?
- Yes!
- Thanks.
Do you see? The vibrations do help.
- Thank you. Thank you very much.
- And I thank you.
Now, folks, if you step in this direction to the next exhibit.
Oh, I... Don't go. This is for you.
Oh. Thank you.
Don't go.
Let go of my arm.
But if I let you go, I'll never see you again.
I have no intention of seeing you again.
Here!
And now, folks, you could step over in this direction
I will introduce you to the little people
The Mystic Isle of Little People.
Believe me when I announce: their names are Mr. and Mrs. Bigger.
Probably because he is bigger than she is.
He doesn't say anything because like all normal husbands he's not allowed to.
Now, in normal life, just like you and me, she lives in a big home, he lives in a small house.
Don't be afraid!
- I'm not afraid.
- Then come here.
You should better get back in your tent before they whip you.
You wouldn't let them whip me, would you?
- I wish I could help you.
- Well, you can.
- How?
- By having dinner with me tonight.
- Oh, that's the most ridiculous...
- Oh, Bess...
- I just wanted to meet you.
- Well, you failed!
No, no, Bess...
- Excuse me, ma'am.
- Excuse me. Bess...
- The wild man!
- No, ma'am...
- Please, let me explain.
- Get away from me!
- Bess, I've gotta talk to you!
- I don't wanna meet the two of you.
Oh, you could've tears in your eyes for the wild man, but for the great Houdini nothing?
- You're crazy!
- Bess!
Get your junk out of here! You are fired!
- All right!
- Now, wait a minute!
We can't let him go! I told you....
Let him go! He is fired!
What made you wanna come to Coney Island tonight?
Oh, I don't know, I just wanted to go.
Now that we are here, we could skip these things and going somewhere to ride.
All right. Let's go over there.
- Let's go in here instead.
- But you said you wanted a ride.
Oh, we will. Yeah, but later.
Let's go in here first. Please!
Huh, Houdini the Great.
Watch it! Watch it closely, Ladies and Gentlemen.
Will Houdini survive or will he become beheaded on this block?
Watch it, watch it, Ladies and Gentlemen.
This is without a doubt the most dangerous feat ever performed before the public.
- Are the ropes securely tied, gentlemen?
- Oh, yes, sir.
Thank you, thank you very much.
Now, before I start the conveyor...
Ladies and Gentlemen, before I move the switch let's be quiet and make a silent prayer.
Thank you very much.
And now, Houdini, are you ready to defy death?
I'm ready.
Ladies and Gentlemen, watch it closely.
I will demonstrate before your very eyes the murderous power of this saw.
There he goes, Ladies and Gentlemen, on his way to doom.
There's only six feet between him and a horrible death.
This is the most death-defying feat of all time.
Ladies and Gentlemen, 5 feet, 5, feet.
He's in trouble now!
Hurry up, hurry up, Houdini, you haven't much time!
4 feet, Ladies and Gentlemen, just 4, now 3!
3 feet, a scary yard, Ladies and Gentlemen!
I can't stand to look at it any longer!
Oh, no, Ladies and Gentlemen, I can't bear to watch it.
I only hope nothing goes wrong.
You are braver than I, Ladies and Gentlemen.
Stop it! Stop it! Stop that thing!
He made it!
Wasn't that tremendous, Ladies and Gentlemen?
Wasn't that tremendous?
But he might not make it the next time.
Come and bring your friends, Ladies and Gentlemen.
The next show starts in one half hour.
Thank you, thank you very much.
- Is anything wrong?
- No.
Ladies and gentlemen, we have this evening a new attraction for your special edification.
For centuries man has been searching for the fountain of youth.
Professor Allegari has come all the way from Italy to demonstrate his sensational discovery.
Ladies and gentlemen, for your special edification
- I give you Professor Allegari!
- Someone you know? - No!
- Then stop looking at him.
- I can't help it.
Ladies and gentlemen, if there's an elderly gentleman in the house who would like to become young again, please, step right up here, and I wiill rejuvenate him.
Please?
Here's someone that longed in this world.
- Would you be so kind?
- What?
- Would you like to be rejuvenated?
- You didn't have to ask, son. Thank you.
I don't know what the axeman will say about this but I'm sure I'll give it a try.
- Oh, um, pardon me, young Lady.
- It's all right.
Excuse me.
This way, please.
Drink.
That's the same fellow we saw at Coney Island last week.
I know.
Oh, that's why you insisted to come here, isn't it?
- I had no idea he would be here.
- Then why did you pick this of all places to come?
I don't know, Fred.
Do you mind if we go?
- But we just got here!
- I don't know what's the matter. Let's go.
What happened to the party that was here?
I don't know. They just left.
They didn't even order anything.
I looked for you at the museum and looked for you at Coney Island. but you keep running away.
This time I came back.
Why?
I don't know.
I do.
For the same reason I took this job.
I knew you would come here.
But... how could you know?
Well, everything happens to me in threes.
This is the third time we've met.
I know.
I shouldn't even be here.
We're strangers.
We were never strangers.
I thought you said you forgot your gloves.
I didn't wear gloves tonight, Fred.
Come on, Bess, they're waiting.
I'm not going.
- Look, I brought you here and I'm taking you home again.
- I'm not going.
- What is the trouble?
- No trouble at all. We're leaving.
You are leaving.
- Come on. Let's not have any trouble.
- I'm sorry, miss. - It's all right.
But she came with me and she's leaving with me.
Would you like to dance?
I would love to.
I've only got one more show to do.
Then where would you like to go?
Wherever you go.
Is that you, Harry?
Yes, Mama. Good night.
Son, would you like to have a glas of milk?
Uh... Mom, this is Bess.
- Bess.
- Bess, this is Mom.
I'm so glad to know you.
Isn't she wonderful, mother?
Yes, she is very pretty.
Thank you.
Oh, it's... it's a wonderful night tonight. Isn't it?
I never saw a more wonderful night.
Well, now that everything is so wonderful, what are your two wonderful people up to?
Oh, I was gonna show her some of my magic.
At 2 o'clock in the morning?
It is?
Oh, we didn't mean to disturb you.
No, we promise not to make any noise, so you go back to bed, Mom.
- Isn't it a little late for the young lady to be out?
- Oh, no, it's all right. Isn't it, Harry?
Y-Yes. You see, she has no school tomorrow.
- No school?
- No. She stays at a girls' school.
And... And I'm locked out.
- Locked out?
- Uh-huh.
Oh, child, that's nothing to worry about.
You can spend the night with me.
- Oh, no, I wouldn't want to put you through any trouble.
- No trouble at all. We have lots of room.
- But...
- No, Mother, I'll fix the place for her.
- She could take my room.
- She'll do no such thing.
No, Harry. I think it's time we talk about...
On second thought I think it would be better if she did go back to school. They're probably worried about her.
- I... I can't go back now.
- Yes, you can. Good night, Mama.
- Why didn't you tell her?
- Oh, Bess, honey, I couldn't.
We got married so quick and all...
But I'll tell her first thing in the morning.
Honest, I will.
It would be much better if you told her tonight.
It'll be better in the morning. We're leaving anyway.
Harry, I don't like this.
I wish we'd tell her now.
She would just keep us up all night talking about it.
We made it.
- I love you.
- I love you.
Here's a nightgown for you, darling.
I think it will fit.
Uhuh.
Did you think you could fool your mother, Harry?
I just wanted to see how far you would go.
I like her, Harry.
Good night.
Coward.
Harry, what are you doing?
I'm working on a brandnew trick. Come here.
No!
What?
You said you wanted to be in the act.
- Yes, but not now.
- Oh, come on, I need you.
- What do I have to do?
- Get in the box.
- What does that do?
- You'll see later.
- Oh, Harry, I'm not going to lay in there.
- Now get into the box.
- If you say so.
- Now put your feet through here.
- This is ridiculous.
- Put your feet here.
- You wake me up in the middle of the night.
- Now put your head through there. - Through there?
I don't like this at all. I'm scared.
- Watch your fingers.
- What would people say if they could see me here now?
- We won't tell a soul. You're comfortable?
- As comfortable as I could be.
- Good.
- Harry, I'm scared though.
What are you doing down there, huh?
- Fixing this in.
- Oh, don't do that. That's not fair. Don't.
Don't, Harry. I'm nervous.
Where are you? What are you doing?
- I went to get the saw.
- The saw? What are you gonna do with that?
- I'm gonna saw you in half.
- Oh, no, Harry, no, you're not! I won't let you!
- Harry, let me out of here! Harry!
- Sssh!
- Do you wanna wake mother?
- Harry, get me out of here!
- It's not gonna hurt. Close your eyes.
- How do you know that? You're not inside!
Oh, Harry! Harry, I'm scared! Harry, let me out of here!
Harry!
Harry, I'm sacred! Harry!
- Don't worry!
- Aw! Harry! Harry!
It's a great effect, isn't it?
Yes, it's... it's great but will we
- have to do something like this every night?
- Was it so awful?
No, but I expected something different on my wedding night.
♪ Bumm, bumm ♪
♪ Bumm, bumm, bumm ♪
♪ The bell in the bay ♪
♪ On the day ♪
♪ That my love sailed away ♪
♪ And the gold wheeling high ♪
♪ As farewell from the sky ♪
♪ But the bell ♪
♪ In the bay ♪
♪ Said goodbye ♪
I'll shoot them!
Calm down! Put your gun down!
That's the way they show their appreciation.
Appreciation? Baaa! Oh, you...
- Come on, honey, you're next.
- Me? I have to go out there?
- They love magicians in West-Virginia.
- Are you sure?
Oh, yeah, go on. You go around there.
Music, maestro, please.
Thank you. Thank you very much.
Now, if you keep your eye to my charming assistant... then I shall let go the goldfish, dissolved in thin air.
One, two...
Oh, the poor goldfish.
At least give us a chance.
Go learning!
For my next trick...
I will create an effect never permormed on any stage.
I will disappear from this spot right before you eyes.
Well, hurry up and disappear!
I'll help him disappear.
Don't worry, folks, I'm right here.
They like you, son. They like you.
Go get your wife to hear the applause.
Bess, listen to that. Listen to that applause.
I've got them eating right out of my hand.
What's the matter, baby?
What's the matter?
They ruined our performance. I almost my leg on a crushed tomato, and you ask me what's the matter?
We are not in the showbusiness, we're targets in a shooting contest.
We won't always have to play before an audience like that.
- It has been like this in the last two years.
- But it finally gets better.
Here's what's left from the goldfish.
We haven't found the rest yet.
You have to hurry up because the night train to Wheeling is on time.
Thanks. Wheeling. We probably get shot there.
Harry, let's go back to New York.
We can't get bookings in New York.
We could take that job in the safe factory.
Yeah!
With your knowledge of locks and combinations
I'm sure that they pay you well.
Yeah.
Will you try it, Harry?
No!
Why not?
I am a magician, not a locksmith.
You can't pull bread out of your hat.
Well, if you want bread you should've married a baker.
At least a baker makes something that people want.
Nobody seems to want your magic, Harry.
There's nothing new in card tricks.
Going through trapped doors or escape from cabinets.
- What does it all mean?
- I don't know what it means.
I only know what it does to me.
Like tonight when I did that disappearing act.
Tough as they were, you should have seen their faces.
I gave them a thrill, something they take home and talk about.
So you thrill them for a minute, but tomorrow it will be forgotten.
Next time I'll give them a bigger thrill, something they won't forget so soon.
The audience is never satisfied.
They love you for the moment that you please them.
Darling, I love you forever. I'd like to make a home for us, something that last...
- if you just let me.
- Magic is all I know.
- Oh, you could be anything you wanted to be.
- How?
I never went to school.
I started working when I was 9 years old with a magician in a tent show.
If I quit now and take that job in that factory,
I'll be there for the rest of my life.
Oh, Bess,
I didn't marry you to give you that kind of a life.
Oh, honey, darling, don't you understand?
I'm so tired riding milk-trains and living out of suitcases.
I'd be satisfied if we just once could spend two nights in the same place.
Hey, didn't you pack that staff yet?
Come on, let's go! That train only stops for the milk.
We'll be right there.
Well, we got to hurry.
Unhook me, please.
Quick, Harry.
Harry? Oh.
We're gonna miss the train!
Oh, Mr. Brown.
When do you think I'll get a chance to work on the safes?
- What's the matter? Don't you like your job?
- Oh, I like it well enough, but you could train chimpanze for the work I'm doing.
Not a bad idea, son. Drop it in the suggestion box.
I guess you were working on the big safes a long time, haven't you?
- About 40 years.
- Is that sol? - Yeah.
I was wondering, if someone accidentally got locked up in one of them, could they get out by working the tumblers from the inside?
- Not in my safe.
- They couldn't, huh? - No.
Let me try it sometime?
Certainly not. Are you crazy?
- No, I was just asking.
- Well, go back and do your work and leave me alone.
- Sorry, I was just wondering.
- Go on.
What kind of people they get to work around here nowadays?
Hi, Ma.
Hello, honey.
- How you're doing?
- How are you? - Fine.
- How was work today?
- Just great.
I opened 8,642 locks.
Oh, cheer up, Harry.
- They'll let you work on the big safes soon.
- Oh, sure, in about 40 years.
Well, at least we're not dodging tomatoes and you get paid every Saturday night.
Thank you.
- Harry?
- Hm?
You're two and a half dollars short.
- Am I?
- Uhuh.
Uh, you didn't stop anyplace, did you?
As a matter of fact, I did.
I had a chance to pick up a bargain.
Oh, really? Where is it and what is it?
- Uh, they're good ones.
- Oh, I'm sure.
Here, I'll prove it to you. Put them on.
Now make sure they're locked good.
- They're locked. - You're sure? - Uhuh.
- Wouldn't think that I could get out of them, would you?
Now cover them with the towel.
That's right.
That makes 8,643 locks that I have opened today.
That's very nice, Harry.
I better finish washing.
Dinner is just about to be ready.
Just a minute.
We're not eating here.
I'm taking you out for dinner.
- Taking me out? Oh, where are we going?
- Well, that's a surprise but...
- Oh, what do I wear? Oh, Mama, how is the dress?
- It's all finished, except the belt.
Oh! Finished? Oh, thank you!
- The Astor? Can we afford it?
- Nothing but the best for you, my love.
Thank you.
There is, uh, quite a few magicians here tonight, isn't there?
Magic's getting to be quite a hobby.
- It's actually a model of a very old...
- Oh, what's going on up there?
But today we discovered that if we use a machine like this correctly, we can place an object in the hole.
We can pass the blade through the object with absolutely no damage to either the cabbage or the celery down below.
Watch the miracle of magic ready: One... two, three...
Something seems to have gone wrong.
I tell you, I don't have another cabbage and I did want to do this tonight.
Ah, but I did bring a young lady with me. I wonder if you would might helping. Would you, please?
- You're not afraid, are you?
- No.
Fine.
Just kneel down, please, and put your head there.
And just make sure you don't go anyplace for a few minutes. I'll lock you in. Right so.
Is your head-on good and tight?
Yeah.
Alright, ready again then.
At the count of three... watch the blade.
Ready. One, two, three!
You see, Ladies and Gentlemen, the object of this trick is to make it to look as vicious as possible... but not doing any damage to the young lady.
Now, that didn't hurt, did it?
Where's the young lady?
That was very good. Thank you.
And thank you, little lady.
She keeps her head very well.
Ladies and gentlemen, for the finale of this evening's entertainment and, uh... before we have our dinner, we offer a challenge in escape routines that has never been tried before.
I will ask for volunteers.
Bring on the restraints.
- That's right.
- Harry.
Right up.
- But they're just asking.
- Come along.
Now let me see how many have we here.
One, two, three, four...
Oh, come, gentlemen, this is for the grand prize.
We need one more volunteer.
Now, fellas, these are regulated straitjackets wich had bo loaned to us fot this occasion by a hospital.
Uh, no inmate has ever escaped from one of these.
Are you sure there isn't one more brave soul in this gathering?
Please.
Oh, go ahead, and embarrass yourself. Go on.
- Here.
- Ah.
Would you take your coat off? Put it right over there.
Would a couple of you gentlemen help us?
We have your little evening jacket right here.
That's right.
Let's strap it good and tight. Here. Ready?
Now, right on first, then the left, that's it.
That's really good.
Strap him up good and tight there.
- I'll be back here.
- All right. Fine.
Come along, let's line up there.
Hurry up, boys.
That's it. Line up there.
In the line. All clear.
Ah.
As you can see, Ladies and Gentlemen, one has to be a little crazy to put on one of these.
Now, Gentlemen, the stage is yours.
And good luck. Music, please.
Tremendous.
Magnificent, my boy. Magnificent.
And I guess there's no doubt who wins the prize.
There you are, my boy, and good luck to you.
You know, Mr. Houdini, no one has ever escaped from a straitjacket before.
I've been a magician for over 40 years. I've... been in quite a few places, did a quite of few things in my time, but... there was always some explanation, some trick.
Tonight there was none.
There couldn't have been.
Yet, you got out.
I'm sorry to disappoint you, Mr. Malue, but it was a trick.
- Have you done it before?
- No, but it's still a trick.
We must all guard our secrets.
I can't ask you how you did it.
But if you take a little advice from an old man:
Drop it. Give it up.
But why if I made such an impression?
Because it isn't a trick.
You've seen something like this before, haven't you?
Where? Who did it?
Well, it was many years ago in Berlin.
A man named Von Schweger.
There was nothing unusual about his act until the finish.
Then he was sealed inside a giant bottle.
Now, the bottle was not faked, yet, he got out.
How could he get out of a sealed bottle?
The talk was that Von Schweger was able to dematerialize.
Of course, it was only talk.
Von Schweger... Von Schweger...
I've read all the books on the great magicians, but I've never seen his name mentioned.
Just when he could've made a name for himself, he quit the profession.
Why?
No one knows for sure.
But I think he was frightened by what he was able to do.
I'd like to meet him.
Is he still alive?
Last I heard he was, but he never sees anyone.
Oh, we seem to be about the last to leave.
- Good night, Mrs. Houdini. I twas nice to meet you.
- Good night. Thank you.
Good night, sir.
Drop it. Drop it.
It will make you famous, but it will kill you.
You're not happy, are you, Harry?
Why shouldn't I be?
Because I stopped you from doing what you really want to do.
I won't lie to you, Bess.
I'd rather do magic than test locks.
But I'm happy. Believe me, I am.
The audience does something to you, Harry.
Like tonight, when you got out of the straitjacket and everyone applauded, you... you were like a different person.
Which "Me" do you like the most?
I like the both very much.
Hey! We forgot about the prize that you won.
- It's in my coat pocket.
- I'll get it.
Here it is.
What is it?
- It's a boat ticket.
- A boat ticket? - Uh-huh.
To Europe.
Europe?
Oh, Bess, that's where I've always wanted to go.
That's where I really could learn something.
Why, I might even meet Von Schweger.
Well, it's a round-trip passage for one.
We can trade it in for two one-ways, can't we?
Or we could cash it in for a down-payment on a house.
If we don't take this opportunity, we'll never get it again.
It's more important to you than anything, isn't it?
Tonight's Halloween.
Something strange always happens to me on Halloween night.
We can't pass it up.
It's your ticket, Harry, you won it.
I won't stop you if you wanna go.
Well, I won't go alone.
And I won't go with you.
You're just afraid because of what he said tonight.
I'm more than just afraid.
He's an old man. They're always afraid of new things.
We shouldn't be.
Maybe I shouldn't be, but I am.
Well, I can't live without you.
Cash it in.
Oh, Harry.
Harry, darling.
Time's up!
Here's your quarter. Get ready.
Are you sure you can get out?
I'll be out before they know I'm in.
Quick.
What are you doing over there?
- Now you've done it.
- It'a all right.
- He told me to do it. He said he could get out.
- But he can't get out.
Mr. Bown. Mr. Brown. Where is Mr. Brown?
Mr. Brown, there's a man locked up in the safe.
- Well, can't you open this?
- No, the timelock is on.
It's up for 24 hours. It won't open till tomorrow.
- Who is in there?
- Houdini. - Oh, I might've known this.
But we can't let him die in there.
- That'd give the company a bad name.
- Yeah.
- We've got to think of something.
- There's one thing, but it'll ruin the safe.
Well, ruin it. A man's life is at stake.
- Get clear! It's a short fuse.
- Get back!
What you'd blow it up for?
If you'd given me a little more time, I'd gotten out.
You're fired!
I still don't understand what you where doing inside that safe.
I told you a hundred times I was having my lunch.
You did it deliberately.
You wanted to get fired.
Why would I do a crazy thing like that?
So you could go back to be a magician.
What's wrong with magicians?
That's what I was when you married me.
Well, if you love your magic more than you love me, good luck to both of you, because I'm leaving!
Go talk to her, Harry. Don't let her leave.
Look at this soup. It's like water!
Where did she ever learn to cook anyway?
I made the soup!
You can stop packing! I'm the one that's leaving!
- Harry, where are you going?
- Where they don't water the soup!
...being a time in captivity.
Oscar, the human sea serpent.
- Half man, half...
- It's over there. - Thank you.
- Hey, just a minute, lady.
- That is all right.
All right, all right, come in here!
Ladies and gentlemen, my latest invention:
The metamorphosis.
Music, please.
Now, please, examine the trunk and see that there's no means of escape.
Satisfied?
Now, will you pick it up and turn it around and show the audience that it's just an ordinary trunk.
Thank you.
Would you fasten these to my wrist, please?
A bag.
Are they secure?
Now, tie it.
Thank you.
I'm sorry, you won't be able to go this trip. No.
Lock.
Now, tie it with the rope.
Good sailor knots.
Tight?
Ah! You hold the key.
Women.
Ladies and gentlemen, the metamorphosis.
One, two, tree, four... five, six, seven...
All right.
Gentlemen, would you please untie the ropes that you yourself tied?
Now, if you unlock the trunk, make sure there's no change and nothing had been touched.
And the bag.
Untie it, please.
You fake!
Fake!
Did I hear someone yell "Fake"?
I'm Dooley of the London Examiner!
I say all you yank magicians are fakes!
And that's a trick-trunk!
I'd like you'd get out of something real.
I resent your remarks.
I'll offer £ 100 to anyone who can lock me up in anything I can not escape from!
Just a minute! Just a minute!
Mr. Houdini! Mr. Houdini!
Let the gentleman speak!
Mr. Houdini, I challenge you to escape from one of our London jails.
I'd like nothing better than to accept your challenge, Mr. Dooley, but I'm afraid the authorities will not permit it.
I see Inspector Marlick from Scotland Yard is in the audience.
What do you say now, yank?
My offer still stands.
Let's teach the yank a lesson, Inspector.
All that fake is bluff!
- Lock him up! - Sure he can't fool Scotland Yard.
- Oh, no, no, it's hardly done.
Please! Please!
I'll admit that Scotland Yard has the finest police panes in the world, but these old sardine cans you call jails are no challenge for the great Houdini.
Did you hear that, Inspector?
You can't let him get away with it!
Inspector, don't let him get away with that!
You tell him!
I believe we can arrange to accomodate Mr. Houdini.
Thank you very much, Inspector, but it'll have to be in the morning before I have a matinee tomorrow.
Very good.
- There's one condition however.
- Yes, sir.
Unless you can escape you'll remain locked up for 24 hours.
Haha! Bravo!
I have never missed a performances.
Come and see me here tomorrow afternoon.
Uh, that goes to you, too, Mr. Dooley.
- You won't be here!
- I'll be here! Good night, all!
Oh, you really got that audience steamed up tonight.
That means a packed house tomorrow.
Harry?
I'll have to see the manager about better billing, increase the salary...
- Harry.
- What?
What happens if you can't get out tomorrow?
I could open that locks with a button hook.
I hope so.
Yeah?
- Went great, didn't it, yank?
- You should've been an actor.
I wasn't so bad, was I?
Say, how big is the chance that we'll get into the papers?
Look, you just get out of that jail, Mr. Houdini, and I'll guarantee that you make the front page.
I'll get out.
You gonna need a picture.
- Which one?
- Uh, I like this one.
And play it up big.
Ah, now I'd trouble you for that £ 2.
Well, I'll give it to you tomorrow, right after the matinee.
Look, yank, old boy, my end of the bargain was to get you in jail.
You promised me £ 2.
I want it now because tomorrow you might not be here to pay me.
Harry.
Thank you.
Oh, and by the way, I forgot to tell you that in our jails the cells are built different than in the States.
The locks aren't in the doors
Good luck, yank.
I assure, Inspector, my jail is escape-proofed.
Mr. Houdini seems to think otherwise.
We shall see. We shall see.
As you can see, Inspector, you can look too, Mr. Houdini, this is no ordinary cell block.
The lock can only be opened from the outside.
And you can't reach it from inside the cell.
Do you still want to try?
Keys won't help you, Mr. Houdini, but we'll make sure.
I'll take the hat and the coat.
Let's have the belt.
Open your mouth.
The pin, and the tie.
Now let's have the shoes, too.
I have heard about these trick-heels.
Alright, then, left your pockets out.
Turn around.
And just so you'll have something to play with, here's some nice pretty bracelets for ya.
Now, Mr. Houdini, your things will be right outside the door.
In case you make it..
Don't worry, we'll see you in 24 hours.
We won't let you starve.
Tea is twelve to four, and dinner at six.
Good luck, yank.
- Warden.
- Yes, what is it?
Maybe you can use them on someone else.
We'll see who'll the last laugh, Mr. Houdini!
No getting there.
I've tried.
You can't do it.
- Ladies and gentlemen...
- We want Houdini! Come on! We want Houdini!
We want Houdini! We want Houdini!
We want Houdini! We want Houdini! We want Houdini!
Please! Please, ladies and gentlemen.
Due to circumstances beyond our control
Mr. Houdini has been unavoidably detained.
- We know! He's in our jail!
- Right you are!
Please! Please, I...
I know how you feel.
While Mr. Houdini can not appear before you in person, he will not disappoint you.
Well, where is he? Where is he?
Please! Please.
He is sending his alter ego from the spiritual world to take his place, and... we will need complete silence if Mr. Houdini's alter ego is to appear.
It's impossible!
Just a minute! Just a minute!
Mr. Houdini, maybe you got out of our jail, but I've got something you can't get out from.
Wait!
Put out your hands.
Put out your hands!
Ladies and Gentlemen, nobody can get out of these cuffs!
I've made them myself and there ain't no key!
The only way to get them off is saw them off!
Anybody who wants to go out for a bit of fish and chips shall have plenty of time!
Are you willing to stay there for the night?
I say he is.
- Where's me handcuffs?
- Oh, I'm sorry.
Mr. Houdini, let me be the first to congratulate you.
It seems that our escape-proofed jail has a bit of a hole in it.
Mr. Houdini, we've had our operator checked every Von Schweger in the Berlin telephone book, but none of them seem to be the one you're looking for.
Thank you very much.
All these letters that I sent to him come back the same way.
Address unknown, does not live at this address...
Why don't you forget it, Harry?
- I...
- Hm?
I bet you've forgotten what day this is.
But I haven't.
It's my birthday.
Oh, I thought, sure you would forget.
I'd like to.
- Say, have you noticed all the grey hairs?
- Would you like a surprise?
Not particularly.
Well, you're going to get one, wether you like it or not.
Thank you.
My dance, I believe?
That's my girl!
Ladies and gentlemen, may I have your attention, please?
As you know, the gentleman in the middle of the floor is Houdini, the great magician.
Maybe if we try hard enough we can get him to do one of his famous tricks for us.
Shall we try?
Thank you, Ladies and Gentlemen.
I hadn't planned a performance tonight, but maybe I have something that will amuse you.
So, if you get me a couple of brooms,
I'll get my wife and... we will see what we can do.
Thank you.
And now, if you'd bring the music platform, please?
I'll need the aid of a few gentlemen from the audience.
Would you, sir?
And the young officer.
Would you take this broom and hold it at the edge of the platform?
Would you do the same thing?
Now hold them both very securely.
Bess.
- Would you put your arms on the brooms?
- Like this - Yes.
I've to get my cape out of the way.
Make yourself as comfortable as possible.
There.
You look very lovely tonight.
- It's a shame to put you to sleep.
- I don't mind.
- You're ready?
- Yes.
All right. Concentrate on my hand.
Concentrate.
You're getting sleepy.
You're getting sleepy.
- Happy Birthday.
- Sleep! Sleep.
Sleep.
You can take that broom away now.
Relax your arm. Relax. Relax.
Rest your head.
Sleep. Sleep.
Now, if you'd help me lift her?
Up. Up, up, up!
There.
You can let go now.
And I let go.
And would you let go?
Would you pass that broom underneath, please?
And over.
I don't recommend this as an after-dinner-trick.
- Are you Herr Houdini?
- Yes.
You will appear before the tribunal tomorrow at 10 to answer these charges.
What charges?
It seems I've been labeled a fraud by the Kaiser's court.
I might have to go to jail.
You'll get me down before you go, will you?
Go back to sleep.
Oh, would you help me to lower her, please?
Gently.
Easy.
That's it.
There.
When I snap my fingers you will awaken.
When any magician transgresses the bounds of reason and humbugs the people into not only thinking but believing that he is supernatural, then this man becomes a menace to society. and must be restrained from further practice of such deception.
Will the defendant rise?
How do you answer these charges?
I have never claimed to be supernatural.
All my escapes have been effected by purely physical means.
I see only one way to resolve this point.
If both parties will agree we will put it to a test right in this court.
I will submit to any test Your Honor chooses.
The prosecution agrees to a test.
Very well.
The courtroom will recess for 30 minutes.
The combination of this safe is known only to myself and my bailiff.
Now, if Mr. Houdini can open the safe right in this courtroom,
I will dismiss the charges against him.
Uh, just a moment.
Your Honor, I will do better than that.
You can lock me inside the safe, and I'll get out.
Mr. Houdini, I only ask you to open it.
I'll get out.
- Remember the last safe you got into.
- I knew you'd think of that.
Lock it up!
Come on, lock it up. What are you waiting for?
Aren't you worried?
It's pretty hot in there.
Wonderful! Wonderful, Mr. Houdini! Marvelous!
Yes, very good.
Mr. Houdini, congratulations.
But Harry never saw that safe before.
How did he ever do it? What is the trick?
The trick, Mama, was to get the judge to lock him in the safe.
Safes were built to keep people from breaking in, not out.
Hello?
Anybody here?
Hello?
Is anyone here?
Hello?
Hello?
You are too late.
Herr Von Schweger died two days ago.
I'm sorry to hear that.
I was in Switzerland when I got his letter.
I came as quickly as I could.
He was very anxious to talk to you.
I've been trying to see him ever since I came to Europe.
I know.
He made me send your letters back.
So many magicians over the years have tried to see him.
You are the first to whom he gave an appointment.
What made him decide to see me?
Herr Von Schweger had no patience with magicians who could do only tricks.
He made me follow your European tour very closely.
When he was convinced that you are worthy, he finally agreed that he would talk to you.
Do you know what he wanted to tell me?
He had nothing to tell you.
He wanted to ask you if you knew the secret of how to dematerialize.
Me?
But I heard that he had already done it.
It happened before I became his assistant.
I asked him, but he would neither admit it nor deny it.
At one thing I'm sure of:
He was never able to repeat it.
I know because I helped him spend the rest of his life trying.
He intended to give you this.
Well...
Shall we go?
Go?
Go where?
Otto is my name.
Now I am working for you.
- But I'll be leaving for America before long.
- So? You will need me.
Looks like Von Schweger left me more than just a man in a bottle.
Editor of The New York Observer, New York City
Returning from his European Tour,
Houdini requests the pleasure of your company
at his home on Tuesday, September 3rd, at 2 p.m.
I can't understand it.
It's 15:30, and they were invited for 14:00.
Are you sure you send out the invitations, Bess?
I delivered the invitations myself to every newspaper in town.
Then why haven't a reporter showen up?
Maybe they do not know who you are, Harry.
Everybody knows who I am, Mama.
Look at those.
But that was in Europe, Harry. Americans are different. You have to show them.
Mama is right.
No one met us on the boat.
Otto, if the press won't come to me, I shall go to the press.
Get my straitjacket.
Go away!
Remarkable fellow.
I'm going to interview him today.
Do you remember when he worked for us?
You fired him!
- I fired him?
- Shut up!
I know it's not of my business, but does he really like this sort of thing?
Certainly. That's why he's going to jump into the Detroit River tomorrow.
- Do you think you'll need any more, sir?
- No, thank you, that will be enough.
Thank you, sir.
Oh! Get out of that tub!
I've got to get used to it.
Otto, get him out of there!
What are you trying to do?
Do you wanna catch pneumonia?
Here, let me get that wet swimsuit you wear.
I've gotta... I've gotta practice.
You're practicing for nothing.
The Detroit River is completely frozen.
No one will expect you to jump.
But the theater is advertising it for weeks.
I can't back out now!
You have to call it off!
It's below zero outside.
That ice will be a foot thick.
They'll cut a hole in the ice.
Oh! Well, that's crazy.
If you jump, I'm jumping with you!
If I had you with me under that ice,
I bet we could set a new record.
- Do you know what day it is tomorrow?
- Yes, Thursday.
It's Halloween. That's not your day.
To me it's just another Thursday.
The chain broke.
Stand back!
- His wife's coming through, please.
- Excuse me.
Otto, I know he's in trouble.
He should be out by now!
He's never been under that long before!
Grab the hooks.
Let the rope down.
Quickly!
Drob those hooks in.
It's empty! He's not in there!
Take her to the hotel.
Drob those hooks in!
He may be able to see them.
Lower! Lower!
Lower! Lower!
- Nobody could come out of there alive.
- I guess we got a headline. - Yeah.
Get your late Extra!
Extra paper!
Extra! Extra!
Houdini lost in Detroit River!
Extra paper! Get your late Extra!
Houdini disapperaed in Detroit River!
Extra paper!
Harry!
Darling!
Harry!
Oh, Harry!
Darling, you are alive!
Yes, Bess.
I'm all right, Bess.
Don't cry. No. I'm all right.
I didn't think about the river's current.
It carried me downstream.
I thought I'd never find the opening.
Then I heard my mother's voice calling.
I swam towards it's sound and... found the opening in the ice.
Oh, you're safe. Thank god, you're safe.
Do not cry, Bess. I'll never leave you.
I'll never leave you.
Hello?
Yes, he is. Long distant. Just a moment.
Hello?
Yes, this is Harry Houdini.
What time did she die?
Yes, we'll take the first train home.
Mother died the time I heard her calling.
Oh, my darling. My poor, poor darling.
Just a minute, please.
Pardon me.
Hmm. Good subject.
You know, Houdini, don't you, Simms?
I've interviewed him.
Then what's happened to him?
Why should a man at the height of his career go off the site for 2 whole years?
Well, when his mother died, he canceled his tour and went into seclusion.
He didn't see anybody, not even me.
A man like that just couldn't be idle.
He must be up to something.
Find out what it is.
Mr. Houdini.
- Why, it's Mr. Simms from the Observer.
- That's right.
- I wanna speak to you for a moment.
- I'm sorry, but we're just leaving for an appointment.
- If you could just answer a few questions?
- Some other time, we're late.
Look, after all you owe me something.
I was the only reporter who covered your straitjacket escape. Remember?
- Get in.
- Thank you.
I'm doing a feature story on you in our sunday supplement.
I wanna bring the article up to date.
The past two years are blank.
They've been a blank to me, too, Mr. Simms.
How do you mean that?
Do you believe in the hereafter?
I guess so.
Almost everyone believe there's something beyond this life.
I've been trying to make contact.
You mean to try to communicate with someone who's dead?
Exactly that.
With my mother.
That's impossible.
Why?
Because it's never been done?
You just said you believe in something beyond this life.
If there is, there must be some way to reach it.
There is, by dying.
That closes the door.
I wanna open it.
Is that what you've been doing for 2 years?
Yes, with no success.
Tonight we're going to try again.
Would you like to come along?
Me?
- Well, uh, my editor...
- You're not afraid, Mr. Simms?
Certainly not. I...
Come in, spirits.
Come in, spirits.
Yes, spirit?
Hey. Calm down.
Was there a materialization?
It sure was something.
You didn't see it?
When I go into a trance I see or hear nothing.
I must rely on those present if the séance was a success or not.
Well, I heard music.
Sounded like a...
Hungarian waltz.
And there was a woman's image in the garden.
Do these things have any significance?
That waltz was my mother's favorite song.
The image in the garden did have a resemblance to mother.
Then we're indeed fortunate, Mr. Houdini.
Most first séances produce nothing.
It usually takes several before the recepted vibration is established to contact the other side.
As a newspaper reporter, Mr. Simms,
I'd be pleased to know your impression.
Well, in my drinking days I could explain it.
You saw what the others saw.
Yeah, but it had no significance for me.
It wasn't meant to.
But it did mean something to the Houdinis.
I'm quite exhausted.
If you will excuse me.
Don't go yet.
The spell is broken.
We can do no more this evening.
Alright, Otto, you can let him go.
Well, what do you know.
There should be a microphone up...
Now, where is the music?
Well, Otto, it looks like we've drawn another blank.
You mean all mediums are fakes?
No, I'm sure there are those that are sincere and believe in what they are doing.
I just haven't found them.
Shall we go, dear?
Take that thing off!
HOUDINI EXPOSES FRAUDULENT MEDIUMS
HOUDINI OFFERS $ 25,000 FOR PROOF
OF CONTACT WITH SPIRIT WORLD
HOUDINI RETURNS TO MAGIC
Oh, Mrs. Houdini!
- Yes?
- Mr. Houdini is not in the theater.
Well, where is he?
You'll find him over at
Sherman's Ironwoods on 14th Street.
Oh, thank you.
Is this why you kept me in the country all week, huh?
So you and Otto could get this, uh, thing wigged.
You don't have to get so upset.
We just wanted to see if it were workable.
Don't lie to me, Harry.
I've been to the theater.
It's postered all over the front.
I've done water escapes before.
This is nothing different.
Nothing different?
It's an exact copy of Von Schweger's man in the bottle.
It's what killed him. Don't you understand, Harry?
It's what killed him.
I haven't played to an audience in 2 years.
I've got to give them something new!
But why it will have to be this?
It'll be the most spectacular thing I've ever done.
And the most dangerous.
Bess, people aren't gonna stand in line and watch me pull rabbits out of a hat.
Why...
Why must every act you do be flirting with death?
Because it's the only act that'll hold an audience spellbound.
People fall asleep at the opera, but they stay wide awake at the bullfights because there's one man defying death down in that arena.
You take this out of my act and I'm nothing!
You keep it in and we're both nothing!
Otto, have this send down to the theater.
We'll test it for tomorrow's performance.
What are you standing there for?
What are you doing here?
I didn't want you to be without an audience.
- Cut it out!
- Why?
It's what you lived for, isn't it?
What do you want me to do?
The house is sold out for tomorrow night.
Wherever you go the house will be sold out.
You make it sound like something terrible.
It is.
People paying a dollar to see a man in love with death.
That's crazy talk!
I wish it was another woman that took you from me, Harry! That I could fight!
This I can't.
Bess, wait!
- Bess, you've got to listen to me!
- If I listen, I'll get angry.
- What are you trying to do to me?
- I'm trying not to lose you.
- How? By walking out on me?
- Yes! Maybe without me you won't go on.
Without you I wouldn't wanna go on.
- Alright, Bess, I won't do it.
- Oh, Harry.
- I'll cut it out of the act.
- Okay.
- It still hurts you there, doesn't it?
- It's alright.
You should've taken care of that a long time ago.
It's nothing. It comes and goes.
I think it's your appendix.
Since when have you been practicing medicine, Otto?
Ah, you don't have to be a doctor to know that something's wrong.
- All right.
- I'll have it looked as soon as we finish the tour.
And now, ladies and gentlemen, as you read in the newspapers this morning
Houdini has been challenged to liberate himself from a sealed straightjacket.
That's it.
Will the gentleman who has the straightjacket please walk up on the stage?
Thank you.
Come forward, gentlemen.
Gentlemen, have you ever met Houdini or myself before?
No, never.
I understand that you made this conception yourself.
- Yes, in our shop. We have every confidence in it.
- And we don't think he can get out of it.
Oh!
So, if you do not think he can get out of it, and you made it yourself, perhaps you'd better put him into it.
Well, here goes the coat again.
Put your arms in here.
Thank you.
Now, if you'd turn around, please.
Turn around again.
Now you put your wrists right in... like that.
That's right.
Looks as if you got me pretty well locked up.
- It'll hold you all right.
- My Cape, please!
- Would you hold this in front of me?
- Oh, yes, surely.
Ah,
- it's a little too high.
- Oh, sorry. - Thank you.
- How long did it take you to make this?
- Uh, about a month. - Uh-huh.
- Did you use good steel?
- Oh, yes, the very best.
- Well, some steels are better than others, you know.
- Oh, yes, that's true. - Excuse me.
I think you got a bad piece, but better luck next time.
You're really a wonderful audience.
And I do wanna thank you for this heart warming welcome you've given me on my return to the stage.
I do hope I pleased you and that you'll be coming back to see me again and again.
And each time you do come back
I promise you bigger and better thrills.
Good night and thank you very much.
What about the Torture Cell?
Why don't you do what you promised?
Why don't you do that trick you promised us?
The Torture Cell!
You are exhausted. Come.
We want to see the Torture Cell!
They are never satisfied. Ignore them.
- I can't.
- Ha! Close your ears.
You have given them enough.
What about the Torture Cell?
Houdini, what are you going to do?
It's like a madhouse out there.
They demand another trick.
- Tell them Houdini is sick. Come on.
- Get the Torture Cell ready.
Harry, you can't! Remember your promise!
More! More! More!
More! More!
The Torture Cell!
More!
Now, will the two gentlemen who helped us before care to assist us again?
Come up on the stage.
Gentlemen, I have one lock for you, and one for you.
You come over to this side, sir.
You there.
Lock him up securely.
Ladies and Gentlemen,
Houdini is now prepared to enter the Pagoda Torture Cell.
This particular form of escape has never been attempted by anyone, anywhere!
For your information, this cell contains 2 tons of water.
Come up, gentlemen, and get ready to close the locks.
Fix the locks as soon as Houdini has been brought into the water.
Are you ready, Houdini?
Go!
First the lid.
5 seconds!
10 seconds!
15 seconds!
20 seconds!
25 seconds!
Half a minute!
Out of the way!
It's a desaster!
Darling.
Harry.
- Harry, it's Bess.
- Bess? - Yes.
I'll come back, Bess.
If there's any way,
I'll come back.
I'll come back.
'This is a story of the Battle of the Atlantic.
'A story of an ocean, two ships and a handful of men.
'The men are the heroes.
'The heroines are the ships.
'The only villain is the sea, the cruel sea,
'that man has made more cruel.
'When the war came in 1939,
'the Navy took me out of the Merchant Service, where I belong,
'and put me in command of one of the new convoy escort vessels
'that were being built on the Clyde.
'She was a Flower-class Corvette.
'Her name was Compass Rose.
'It was all very strange at first.
'But it wasn't the ship herself
I was worrying about,
'so much as the men who were going to sail in her.
'Most of them had never been to sea before.
'As for the officers, I was the only professional seaman among them.
'The rest were amateurs.'
Reporting for Compass Rose, sir.
- Which are you?
- Lockhart, sir.
- So you're Ferraby?
- Yes, sir.
First ship?
Yes, sir.
We've come up from King Alfred.
- How long were you training there?
- Five weeks, sir.
Five weeks? Oh.
- What was your job in peace time?
- Freelance journalist, sir.
Well, what's the connection?
I've done a bit of sailing, sir.
What about you?
I was working in a bank, sir.
Ever been to sea?
Only across to France, sir.
- Either of you married?
- Yes. I am, sir.
Oh.
Well, you'd better have a look around the ship to begin with.
The main crew hasn't joined yet, but there'll be plenty for you to do.
- Where's all your gear?
- At the station, sir.
You can pick that up later.
By the way, don't salute me indoors when I haven't got a cap on.
I can't return it. You take your cap off when you come in.
Sorry, sir.
It's all right. It's not vital, but you may as well get it right.
When you've had a look around, report to the first lieutenant.
Coxswain! Coxswain!
- Sir.
- This man is smoking during working.
- We're not working a routine yet.
- Who says not?
I was going to leave it till we had full ship's company aboard.
No smoking except during stand-easy.
Understood?
Aye-aye, sir.
I say, it's going to be pretty crowded here.
You and I share a cabin, I suppose?
Hello?
- Hello there!
- Yes?
- What are you hiding down there for?
- I'm not hiding.
- Weren't you told to report to me?
- After looking round the ship, yes.
- Sir!
- Sir.
Well, come up here! And double up!
It's your job to find out where I am.
Names?
- Lockhart.
- Ferraby.
So you've been round the ship?
How many fire-hose points are there?
Very smart.
What sort of gun have we got?
- Four inch.
- Four inch what?
Breech-loading, quick-firing, mark IV, mark VI, fixed ammunition?
Four inch...
- I-I don't know.
- Find out!
I'll ask you the next time I see you.
Get to the dock office, and start mustering the confidential books!
Yes... sir.
I've the first lieutenant around here.
And don't you forget it!
Bosun's mate!
We're going to get on beautifully
How did you know about the fire points?
I didn't, but I guessed he didn't know either.
Well, never mind.
We volunteered for it.
I didn't expect the Navy to be that chap.
Perhaps the Navy didn't expect it either.
March to attention!
Left, right, left, right, left, right, left.
Ship's company!
Halt!
Left turn!
- What's this?
- Cor blimey! This is lovely, this is!
Talk about the Black Hole of Calcutta!
Wrong shop, mate.
This is the seamen's mess.
No, it ain't.
We're all together in this gash boat.
Seamen and stokers messing together?
The stokers don't like it any more than you do!
And there's no canteen!
Oh, this is gonna be lovely.
I'd sooner be in the cooler.
Why don't you ask the skipper?
He'll fix it for you!
Here! That corner's mine!
Compass Rose, 'shun!
Pipe the still!
Hands to stations for leaving harbour!
Special sea-duty men close up!
Bridge, depth charge, can you hear me?
Ferraby! Why aren't you aft where you belong?
I-I was just going aft, sir.
Just going.
Now, listen.
I've been watching you, sub.
You've been marking time since I stopped you sleeping ashore when your wife was up here.
Well, from now on you're going to jump!
And don't you forget it!
- If I ever catch you skulking about...
- 'Bridge? '
- 'Bridge, sir.'
- Is the first lieutenant there?
- 'Yes, sir.'
- Ask him to come down to my cabin.
- Engine's ready, sir.
- Very good, Chief.
- About the revs, sir.
- Yes.
The builders say slow ahead, 35, half a head, 100.
- Try that to start with.
- Aye-aye, sir.
If I ring "full astern" twice, it means only you can save me.
I'll remember that, sir.
I wonder if we'll ever see action in her.
My paper says it'll be all over by Easter.
- You wanted me, sir?
- Yes.
- Are we ready to move, Number One?
- Yes, sir. Any time you like.
It's your job to come and tell me.
I can't guess at it.
- Are all the hands aboard?
- Er... I think so, sir.
Well, are they or aren't they?
I'll detail Ferraby to check up.
You won't detail anyone. Unless you want to change jobs with them.
Report to me on the bridge when ready for sea.
Aye-aye, sir.
Let go, aft!
Let go!
K49, hoist!
All clear, aft!
- Slow ahead.
- Slow ahead.
Slow ahead, sir.
Good luck to you, Compass Rose!
'At Greenock, we ammunitioned and stored.
'Compass Rose passed her sea trials,
'and I took her over from the builders.
'Then we went north for our working-up exercises.
'The three weeks of training, which had to be enough
'to turn a raw collection of men into an effective fighting unit.'
Anti-submarine detector.
Asdic for short.
A device under the ship here sends a series of sound impulses out through the water like this...
Ping! Ping!
Right? Now, if there's nothing within range, there's no echo.
But if there is something...
...you hear the impulses echoing back from it like this...
Ping-ah! Ping-ah! Ping-ah!
"Ah," you say.
"We've found a U-boat."
"Oh, have you?"
That echo may also be a submerged wreck, a shoal of fish, or the empties the wardroom steward has chucked over board.
How do you tell the difference?
Well, it's just a matter of practice.
Lots and lots of lovely practice.
Now, once again:
Pingah! Pingah!
Stop that laughing!
- Bearing drawing left, sir.
- Bearing still drawing left, sir.
Steer 340.
Range 400. Bearing steady.
No, it isn't. Watch it.
Right cut off. Green 40, sir.
Sorry. Bearing drawing right.
Green 40.
That's better.
Stand by, throwers!
Drop a grenade. We'll get her exact position this time.
Stand by!
Instantaneous echo, sir.
Fire one grenade!
Submarine smoke candle, sir.
One submarine, sir.
"You're getting too good.
Go away, and try it on the... Germans!"
Yes. You won't find them nearly so obliging.
Snorkers! Good-oh!
- Here's the wardroom, sir.
- Thank you.
What's this? Visitors?
My name's Morell, sir.
I'm joining the ship.
Ah, a new sub at last, eh?
Extra for watch-keeping duties.
You should've been here weeks ago.
Been taking your time.
I only left King Alfred on Tuesday.
I've been travelling ever since... sir.
Another one still wet behind the ears, eh? That's fine.
- What were you in Civvy Street?
- I was a barrister.
A lawyer, eh? That's all we need.
You better sit down and have some snorkers before they're cold.
Carslake! By the way, this is Lockhart. This is Ferraby.
- How do you do.
- Sir?
- Another officer for lunch.
- Aye-aye, sir.
And I'm the first lieutenant.
- Officer of the day wanted, sir.
- OK.
I do all the work around here!
Very glad to see you.
Hang your coat up out there.
I expect you'd like a drink, wouldn't you?
- Oh, I'll get it. Gin?
- Beer, please.
- Welcome to Compass Rose.
- Thank you.
He sounds a very experienced officer, the first lieutenant.
Very. Until four months ago, he was a second-hand car salesman.
Ah, I see.
We were hoping you'd get here for the exercises.
Thank you. I shall have to try and catch up. What was it like?
Three weeks of purgatory.
We don't know.
We haven't come out of the ether yet.
The skipper's ashore with the admiral now.
- What about your gear?
- It's outside.
Tell me, do we often have these sausages?
Frequently. The first lieutenant's very fond of them.
"Snorkers! Good-oh!"
I see.
Now, whether this war is long or short, it's going to seem long, don't you think?
Cheers.
"From commander-in-chief
Western Approaches to Compass Rose.
"Being in all respects ready for sea, you will sail to join convoy AK14,
"leaving Liverpool Bar Light Vessel at 1200A, 6th February, 1940."
Acknowledge.
This is more like it, eh?
Signal from Viperous, sir.
Organisation of convoy as follows.
'And so we went to war.
'The Atlantic is a very big ocean,
'and in winter weather, the finest hiding place in the world.
'The U-boats were there, all right, but not many of them.
'And at that stage they were mostly depending on luck for a kill.
'Before the fall of France,
'convoy after convoy sailed without meeting one.
'But U-boats weren't the only enemy we had to contend with.'
- Getting tired of it?
- A bit, sir.
If only she'd keep still for a minute or so.
We'd know all about it if we'd have to turn round and steam into it.
Yes, sir.
Message from Viperous, sir!
"Round up number 86,
"who still appears to be straggling astern of the convoy."
Very good. I spoke to soon.
Pass the word!
We're going to turn beam on.
- Who is it?
- Coxswain, sir.
Come up to see the fun?
For a bit of air, sir. I've brought you some tea. It's got rum in it.
Thanks, coxswain. I appreciate that.
- What is it like below?
- Oh, proper pot mess, sir.
Some of the lads are wishing they'd joined the Army instead!
Keep her up, helmsman.
You're 12 degrees off course!
'Aye-aye, sir.'
We're due for a spot of leave soon, aren't we, sir?
'Here is the news.
'German motorised units yesterday continued their push
'in the vicinity of Le Cateau and St Quentin.
'In air combats near Dunkirk,
'the RAF destroyed at least
22 enemy aircraft without...'
Hello there. Anyone in?
Hello, sir.
My wife's busy on her war job during the day, so there's nobody at home.
I thought I'd look in and have a drink with you.
- Gin, sir?
- Thanks. Plain.
Well, how's everything going?
All right, sir. We'll be finished boiler-cleaning by Friday.
One of the radio location boys turned up.
- So when do we get it?
- Not a hope yet, I'm afraid.
Everybody's after it.
RAF, Army, the lot.
With corvettes at the end of the queue, I suppose.
Thanks. I expect you're finding it pretty boring here, aren't you?
I had nowhere particular to go on leave.
What, no ties with the shore?
None that have stood the test of time.
Oh. Well, it'll be your turn next, anyway.
What are you reading? Oh, yes.
I've applied for a sick berth attendant.
Not that we'll get one yet, but there's no harm in trying.
It looks as though things are warming up.
A couple of years ago, you'd never have thought this could happen.
A couple of years ago, sir, my only sea experience was mucking about in the Solent.
Quite a pretty boat she was.
- How big a crew?
- She was quite pretty, too.
What's the food been like with the cooks on leave?
Greatly improved, sir!
Well, in that case,
I think I'll stay till lunch.
I say, John, there's a picture of your wife here.
Is there?
Oh, yes.
Doris and I saw the show the night before last.
You should have let me know.
I'd have got you some free seats.
Oh, we didn't want to bother you on leave.
It must give you a funny feeling to see your wife's picture all over the place.
All I can ever see in the papers these days is Dunkirk. Did you read...?
Well, well, well!
Good little boys all back from leave at the proper time.
How did you manage to drag yourselves away, huh?
Matey lot of so-and-sos, aren't you?
- What's been happening?
- Nothing at all.
I suppose you were slipping ashore the whole time.
And as for you married men, you had a wonderful time. Don't tell me!
- Well, yes. It was very nice.
- I bet it was!
I bet you left a bun in the oven, both of you!
Why doesn't the captain get rid of him?
It's not so easy in wartime.
- Well, can we get rid of him?
- Nobody can.
- Are you sure?
- He didn't like that last convoy.
- Who did?
- But I think he's the worrying type.
Might even get a duodenal ulcer.
That's the classical complaint.
The Navy takes them very seriously.
Why?
In case something blows up while you're at sea.
Well, one of us had better tell him.
Well, I wouldn't want him to be in any doubt as to how to go about it, just for the want of a friendly word of advice.
I saw some newsreel stuff of Dunkirk the other night.
There was an old V and W destroyer simply packed with troops.
Yes.
You could see someone was trying to make them smile at the camera.
They didn't look as if they wanted to much.
Well, at least there are...
- That hurt.
- Well, what's the matter?
A terrible pain...
Well, you better go and lie down.
Take it easy for a bit.
- It's agony.
- Perhaps you have a bun in the oven.
Yes. Perhaps I better had lie down for a bit, sir.
Maybe it'll pass off.
Well, bad luck.
Most moving. I imagine there's nothing we can do to help him?
What are you all grinning at?
Sorry, sir.
I was thinking of something.
When the first lieutenant's in pain,
I shouldn't have thought you'd be able to laugh at anything else.
From then on, they'll proceed independently.
You will pick up the homeward-bound convoy R20, at a rendezvous off Iceland, which will be signalled later.
- All clear?
- Yes, sir.
And I must tell you that according to Intelligence, the Germans have captured the port of Brest more or less intact.
That will greatly increase the number of U-boats operating, as well as their range.
From now on you have to expect enemy activity...
- Come in.
- You wanted me, sir?
Yes. I just had a signal from the PMO at the Naval Hospital.
The first lieutenant won't be back for some time.
He's got a suspected duodenal ulcer.
Oh! Oh.
Exactly. We sail this afternoon.
We'll have to go without him.
We haven't a chance of getting a relief by then either.
You'll have to take over at first lieutenant.
- Yes, sir.
- I'll help you as much as I can.
You should be able to carry on until a relief arrives.
- I can carry on, anyway, sir.
- Do you think so?
Yes, sir.
Well, I'll see.
Now, as we're short-handed, I suggest we reorganise the watches like this.
- What's it like below tonight?
- Warm enough, sir.
- The bulkheads are sweating a bit.
- Yes, I expect...
Ship on fire! Bearing red 20, sir.
Coxswain at the wheel, sir.
Course 160. Watch that telegraph now.
Right.
- 'Gun crew closed up, sir.
- 'Action steaming stations.'
- Full ahead.
- Full ahead, sir.
- 'Starboard 15.'
- Starboard 15, sir.
Sweep from green 050 to green 120.
Sweep from green 050 to green 120, sir.
Closed up, sir!
Clear away charges, and set one pattern, B for Baker!
Must've been ammunition.
Didn't know much about it anyhow.
It's the best way to die if you've got to.
Midships.
- 'Wheel at midships, sir? '
- Starboard 20.
'Starboard 20, sir.'
- Bridge, depth charge!
- Ferraby, sir!
'We're going to drop a boat sub.
Who's your leading hand? '
Tonbridge, sir!
Tell him to take four men from the pom-pom, and pull towards that ship.
Tell him to stay clear until she goes under. Then pick up survivors.
'We'll come back for him after we've had a look for the U-boat.'
- 'Sir! '
- Quick as you can!
Aye-aye, sir!
Tonbridge! Boat's crew! Four men!
- She's going.
- Oars!
Give way together.
What's that filthy stink?
The oil fuel, chum.
Quiet there!
Easy, all.
Oars. Hold water starboard.
Grab hold of the oar, mate.
Bear a hand! Get a rope around him!
It's all right, mate. We've got you.
It's all right, mate.
Reckon so, sir.
It's the oil in his lungs.
This one's got a bad gash.
Should be sewn up.
Yes.
It's all right, old chap.
Get me a sterile needle.
- Good morning, sir.
- Morning, Number One.
You look as though you've been busy.
What's the score down there?
Two dead. One more to go, I think.
11 others, they'll be all right.
How about things up here?
We lost another ship over on the other side of the convoy.
Quite a night. Do you want to turn in, sir? I can finish this watch.
No, no. You get some sleep.
I'll wait for Ferraby and Morell.
- Tonbridge did well.
- Yes.
So did you, Number One.
No, it was pretty rough most of it.
I must find out more about dressing wounds.
It's going to come in handy if this goes on.
I don't see why it shouldn't.
No reason at all, as far as I can see.
'We sailed on 11 convoys that year.
'And all the time the enemy grew stronger.
'It was like a stain spreading over the sea,
'poisoning it mile by mile.
'For us, the Battle of the Atlantic was becoming a private war.
'If you were in it, you knew all about it.
'You knew how to keep watch on filthy nights,
'and how to go without sleep, how to bury the dead,
'and how to die without wasting anyone's time.'
'You learned, as well, how to look forward
'to the occasional blessing of a refit.'
Bob! How long have you got?
Weekend?
Not this time. Spot of real leave.
Refitting in our home port!
What a bit of luck!
I'm sorry. Brought a friend, Glad.
This is Chief ERA Watts.
Same ship. Jim, my sister.
Pleased to meet you.
Have you had your tea?
When I can get your cooking by crossing the river? Not likely!
Get on with you! The kitchen's not fit to be seen. Come on in the front.
I don't hardly use it now because of the black out.
I can't be bothered to fix up the curtains!
- Sit you down, sit you down.
- Come on, Jim.
What's this about a refit, Bob?
I thought you had to be there.
No, this is different.
Some radio gadget they're putting on.
Radio? But you don't need a refit for that, do you?
You should see the gear those professors have got.
It's very hush-hush, Miss Tallow.
Bob, you haven't introduced us properly.
Oh, I'm sorry.
It's Mrs Arthur Bell, Jim.
Only poor old Arthur's dead, so I'd call her Glad, the same as I do.
He's a widower, Jim is. Always talking about settling down again.
That's enough of that, Bob!
Doesn't care what he says, Mr Watts.
Always cheeky!
How was the trip?
- Enough said.
- I expect you could do with a rest.
We could do with a pint.
Anything in the larder?
You know where to find it.
Close all watertight doors, and prepare to take in tow!
What about submarines?
I reckon we're the submarines most of the time, Mrs Bell.
Never seem to get our heads above water for days on end.
Go on with you, Mr Watts!
You're as bad as Bob!
Here we are! All ripe and lovely!
Oh! There's nothing hush-hush about you, is there?
Well, I think, if you don't mind,
I'll join you.
'The summer came again.
'The summer of 1941.
'Lockhart was confirmed as my number one,
'and another officer, Baker, joined the ship to bring us up to strength.
'It was then that we went on the Gibraltar run.'
- That one's Viperous, isn't it?
- Should be, sir.
If she changes station, let the bridge know.
Aye-aye, sir.
They used to charge a guinea a day for this before the war.
Gibraltar and back £11 all in.
Yeah, but only an inside cabin for that price.
I wish it wasn't so clear. This sort of weather's no good to our side.
'Masthead, bridge.
Sound of aircraft to port, sir.'
Action stations.
- Coxswain at the wheel, sir.
- There it is!
'Depth charge crew closed up!
Looks like a Focke-Wulf reconnaissance!
- On target.
- Out of range. It's circling.
Signal from Viperous, sir!
"To all escorts, close up!"
- Full ahead.
- 'Full ahead, sir.'
It's too easy.
All he's got to do is to fly round in circles just out of range, sending out our position and changes of course.
And every U-boat within 100 miles steers straight for us.
No echo, sir.
Bridge, sir. No contact.
Port ten.
Signal from Admiralty.
Immediate, sir.
"There are indications of five U-boats in your area
"with others joining."
It's nice of 'em to let us know!
Another one going, sir.
- Be all right for swimming, eh?
- Sure.
But you won't be doing any more swimming on this trip.
You're dead right there.
If anything happens to this lot, we're snug in our coffin already.
Make to Viperous.
"Have 68 survivors aboard,
"including additions from Fort James, Eriskay,
"and Bulstrode Manor sunk last night.
"An amended..."
What is it, Baker?
Another immediate from Admiralty, sir.
"There are now estimated to be nine U-boats in your area."
- We must be popular.
- Yes, sir.
We can't stop. They'd see us ten miles away in this light.
Stop engine!
Stop!
Stand by to get those survivors in board.
We won't lower a boat.
Scrambling net.
- They can see us easily enough.
- Aye-aye, sir.
We don't want to waste any time,
Number One.
If we don't buy it now, Jerry doesn't deserve to win the war.
Come on! Come on!
Bless you for stopping!
Full ahead!
- Will you have one?
- Non, merci.
- Morning.
- Morning.
News?
From the Admiralty.
"There are now estimated to be 11 U-boats in your area.
"Destroyers Lancelot and Liberal will join escort at approximately 0600."
I say, two L-class destroyers!
That's grand! They're terrific ships!
They'd better be terrific.
11 U-boats works out at one to each ship left in the convoy.
I very much doubt whether their lordships intended such a nice balance of forces.
Getting rattled, John?
Whatever we do, those U-boats seem to get through every time.
We've lost almost half our convoy and an escort, and we're still two days away from Gibraltar.
It's an odd thing to think that even if nothing else happens, this is probably the worse convoy in the history of sea warfare.
- Something to tell grandchildren.
- Yes, indeed.
If you can guarantee
I will have grandchildren,
I shall recover my spirits immediately.
How can he guarantee you have grandchildren?
If they're as stupid as you are,
I hope I don't have any!
Oh, I say!
Destroyer reinforcements, sir.
Liberal and Lancelot.
Proper show-off!
All very well for them to dash about like grand new bints on Chatham High Street, but they haven't had the last week along of this lot.
- Starboard 20. Full ahead.
- 'Starboard 20, sir.'
- Sweep from 220 to 280.
- Sweep from 220 to 280, sir.
- Midships?
- 'Midships, sir.'
- Steer 190.
- 'Steer 190, sir.'
Echo. Bearing 225, sir.
- 'Echo. Bearing 225...'
- Starboard ten!
Starboard ten, sir.
- Steer 220.
- 'Steer 220, sir.'
- Cut left! Cut left!
- Cut left, sir!
That's it!
Target moving left fast, sir.
- Bearing 200, sir.
- Bearing 200. Range 800.
Port ten.
What's it look like, Number One?
Submarine, sir.
Can't be anything else.
'Bearing 195. Range 600.'
- Steer 190.
- 'Steer 190, sir.'
Course 190, sir.
- What's it look like now?
- Clear and solid, sir.
Slight doppler. Must be a U-boat.
- Still moving left?
- 'Yes.'
There are some men in the water just about there.
'Bearing 193.
Range 400.'
- What's it look like now?
- 'Just the same.
'It's the firmest contact we've ever had.'
There are some chaps in the water.
Well, that's a U-boat just underneath them.
'Bearing 191. Range 300.'
- Attacking! Stand by!
- Stand by!
Range 200.
Range 100.
Instantaneous echo, sir.
Fire one!
Bloody murderer!
Starboard 20. Slow ahead.
- 'Lost contact, sir.'
- Carry out lost-contact procedure.
Come in.
- Who...?
- Good evening, Captain.
We came back to thank you for our lives.
Oh. I didn't recognise you.
Ashore we bought clothes.
Captain Richer. Captain Joslevsky.
- I am Mathieson. Norwegian.
- Oh...
Well, come in and have a drink.
- Thank you, no.
- Thank you, yes!
I wish to drink with this brave man who stopped his ship and gave me my life.
And me. Me, I have the same wish.
Much stronger.
And for my wife, too.
And my three children.
Oh. That's fine.
We know that you have much to think about.
Yes. I have been thinking.
Are you sad?
Yes, I am pretty sad.
The men in the water?
- Yes.
- The men you had to kill?
The men I had to kill.
It was necessary to do it.
Yes, it is war.
There is no blame.
There may be thoughts.
There will be thoughts.
And for thoughts there is gin.
- Skol.
- Skol.
Are you all right, sir?
No. I don't mind telling you.
I'm not.
You've got to forget all about it.
There's no good worrying about it.
You can't change anything.
There was a submarine there.
And I'm sure of it.
It's where a submarine making an attack would have been.
And if it was a submarine, how many more men and ships would it have killed?
I had to do it.
Anyway, it's all in the report.
It was my fault.
I identified it as a submarine.
If anyone murdered those men, I did.
No one murdered them.
It's the war.
The whole bloody war.
We've just got to do these things.
And say our prayers at the end.
Have you been drinking,
Number One?
Yes, sir. Yes, I have.
And so have I.
First time out of home port since we commissioned.
Good night.
Good night, sir.
Sir, you... You'd better get to bed.
You've just about had it, haven't you?
Well, I can't get you to bed, my dear and revered captain, but I can at least snug you down for the night.
You're going to have quite a hangover when you wake up.
Bless your heart!
There we are.
Get your legs out straight.
That's the best I can do for you.
I wish it could be more.
Good night.
I didn't think Gib was such a bad place.
Do you know what a chap there said to me?
- What?
- I said we'd been escorting AG93.
He said anyone sailed in that convoy ought to be dead or round the bend.
- Well, he could see you weren't dead.
- I'm not round the bend!
Aren't you supposed to be doing casualty drill on the two pounder?
Oh, yes, sir, but... Aye-aye, sir.
- Captain, sir?
- Well, Chief, what is it?
I've got a coupling breaking loose down aft.
Broken bolt by the look of it.
I'd like to stop and secure it, sir.
You mean you want me to slow down?
If we keep the shaft turning at all, it's liable to crack up.
I can't take the coupling out to replace it unless we stop engines.
It's one of those awkward corners.
The after-coupling right up inside the gland space.
- All right. Be as quick as you can.
- I'll be that, sir.
- Stop engines.
- Stop engines.
I wonder if the hole is damaged.
- Suck it and see.
- Cut that out!
Get a spanner, a flogging hammer and a blowlamp.
I'm going up to report to the captain.
Viperous is coming back, sir.
Calling!
"What is the state of repairs?"
Make, "Trouble located,
"but estimate repairs will take several hours yet."
- We'd better darken ship now.
- Aye-aye, sir.
Have the boat slung out ready for lowering.
- Raft lashings cast off too, sir?
- Yes.
Reply, sir. "I'm afraid I cannot spare you an escort for the night."
Make, "That's quite all right.
We'll sleep ourselves."
Number One, impress on everybody, we mustn't have any noise.
No banging about. It could be heard miles away on a night like this.
- Aye-aye, sir.
- We may as well darken caps, too.
Yes, sir.
Reply, sir. "I must leave you to your virtuous couch.
"Good night, fair maiden.
"Best of luck."
If anyone else makes a noise,
I'll have his guts for a necktie.
Look, go down and see what's...
Tell him to stop the hammering, or muffle it somehow.
- Tell him a torpedo will hit him first!
- Sir.
Come to see the fun, sir?
It won't be long now.
Fine, Chief. But the captain's a little worried about the noise.
Could you do anything to tone it down a bit?
Pretty well finished now, sir.
We're flogging up the knots.
- Did you hear the hammering up top?
- Hear it?
There were U-boats popping up miles around complaining about the racket!
- Any sign of a submarines, sir?
- Nothing so far.
If they don't get us now, they never will.
Is that a promise, Chief?
- Ready to move, sir.
- Well done, Chief.
Wheelhouse, ring stand by main engine.
'Stand by main engine, sir.'
Bridge, sir.
- Yes?
- 'We have the convoy on the radar.'
Oh, good. How long before we're in visual touch?
- 'About three hours, sir.'
- Right. Let me know.
- Radar. Bridge.
- 'Bridge.'
'I'm getting a small echo astern of the convoy, sir.
'Can you see it on the bridge repeater? '
I've got it. What do you make of it?
'It's hard to tell, sir.'
It's small, but it's there all the time, keeping pace with the convoy.
Could it be a back-echo off one of the ships?
I don't think so, sir.
The angle's wrong for a start.
- Well, a straggler, then.
- 'It's a bit small for a ship, sir.
'Do you see the ship right out to starboard?
'Probably one of the escorts.
That's a lot bigger.'
Keep your eye on it.
Bridge, sir. Bridge, sir!
Yes?
Bearing 330.
That makes it about ten miles astern of the convoy, sir.
- Nothing wrong with the set?
- No. The set's on the top line.
- Ever had an echo like this before?
- Not exactly, sir.
It's about the size you get from a small boat at that range.
- A trawler?
- Smaller than that, sir.
Sound action stations!
Full ahead!
Report your target.
Bearing 345. Range 9,000, sir.
- Morell!
- Sir!
There's a U-boat on the surface, dead ahead!
- Stand to!
- She's out of range at the moment.
But I want to get in shots before she dives, if we can get near enough.
I can see it, sir.
Should we send a sighting report?
Yes. Take this down.
"To Admiralty, repeated Viperous.
"Submarine on surface.
Ten miles astern. Convoy TG 104.
"Course 345. Speed five knots.
"I'm engaging."
Crank it on, engine room!
There's a U-boat on the surface!
- Number One, there is a U-boat...
- I heard, sir.
Too far away for me at the moment.
Oh. So we shall need that box of tricks of yours.
Stand by for the quickest crash dive in history when they see us!
Range 8,500.
He's behaving according to the book.
Trailing with convoy, waiting for darkness.
Range 8,000.
He must see us in a moment.
- I think I could reach him now!
- Four-inch gun, bridge!
- Yes?
- 'I could reach him now.'
Shoot!
Fire!
Home! Out!
Fire!
Home! Out!
She's venting her tanks.
She's diving, Morell!
- Sweep from red 20 to zero.
- Sweep from red 20 to zero, sir.
She's down, Number One.
- Echo, sir.
- In contact, sir.
- Target moving quickly right, sir.
- Target moving quickly right.
- Watch it now.
- Aye-aye, sir.
- Starboard 15.
- 'Starboard 15, sir.'
Come down to 80 revolutions.
Setting B for Baker. Stand by.
Baker set.
You're losing her! Keep on her!
Range 300.
Midships.
Range 200.
Range 100.
Instantaneous echo, sir.
Fire one!
- Hard a' port. Slow ahead.
- 'Hard a' port, sir.
'Wheels hard a' port, sir.'
- We must have got her!
- We haven't finished yet!
Sweep 60 degrees across the stern.
Sweep 60 degrees across.
- There she is, sir!
- In contact, sir!
Half ahead.
- In.
- Lower.
- Midships.
- 'Midships, sir.'
Target stationary.
- Stand by.
- 'Stand by.'
Target still stationary, sir.
Instantaneous echo, sir.
Any minute now.
Oil. Oil, sir!
Yeoman... immediate to Admiralty, repeated Viperous.
Oh, well, thank goodness that's over.
I thought they were going to stay to tea, as well.
- Any coffee left?
- Here we are, sir.
We have to have a wardroom party to complete the celebrations.
Captain Dee says the admiral's very keen on parties.
- Tomorrow night, sir?
- Oh, no. Day after, I should think.
You'd better draw up a list of invitations, Morell.
Phone call for you, sir.
Mrs Ericson.
Oh, right. Thank you.
My wife will be here by then.
Put her down.
- What about yours?
- I'm afraid she's in a show.
Then I must cast an eye around.
I've got to go to the signal's office.
I'll do that today, sub.
I want some fresh air.
In Liverpool?
Did you know about the commissioned lovely in Ops?
- The commissioned who?
- Commissioned lovely.
That Wren officer. She's got everyone in the ops room in knots!
I don't think it's a Wren who is responsible for that.
What were you doing in ops room?
The signal section's miles away.
- Just keeping in touch, sir.
- Hm.
Well, as it happens,
I shall be seeing your prize Wren.
I'm going to ops room to find out who's winning the war.
You can cough as much as you like.
I've got leeway to make up.
Yes... Yes.
I see. Send it to me, please.
Goodbye.
Yes?
If it's not illegal,
I wanted to have a look at the plot to see what's been going on in Western Approaches.
I can't let you do that. There's a security ban on the whole thing.
I know, but we've been on the Gibraltar run.
I wanted to catch up on our old beat.
- What ship are you?
- Compass Rose.
Oh, yes. You've just got a U-boat.
Does that increase my chances of seeing the plot?
I think it guarantees it.
I'll take you along.
- Date's all right for the admiral?
- Oh, yes, sir.
We seem to know an awful lot of people.
- Who's Second Officer Hallam?
- A glamour pants from Ops.
- A what?
- A Wren from operations, sir.
The first lieutenant asked her.
- Pretty?
- A smasher, sir.
I hope you're not weakening,
Number One.
Not a bit, sir. We ought to have as many people as possible from base.
They've been very good to us.
- Is Hallam in that category?
- She hasn't been good to me!
- Look, here!
- I thought you'd be glad to know!
Oh, Keith!
Keith, I-I want you to meet my wife.
- Darling, this is Keith Lockhart.
- How do you do, Mrs Ferraby.
I've been looking forward to meeting you.
Gordon's told me all about you.
He and I are pretty well the oldest inhabitants now!
I must look after the admiral.
- Oh, yes, of course.
- See you later.
I was on an American destroyer, and there was only Coca-Cola!
Thanks, Lockhart. Good party!
Excuse me.
Sorry I'm late. One of our
Liberty men fell in the drink.
- What will you have?
- Anything.
I say, who's that incredibly good-looking girl over there?
- I'll get you a glass.
- That's all right. I'll help myself.
Excuse me.
I'm sorry. Thank you.
As your escort,
I haven't done terribly well, have I?
You've been doing your job as a good first lieutenant.
- But I'm afraid I must go now.
- Oh. Can't I see you home?
I say, Number One, the admiral hasn't got a drink.
Oh. Right, sir.
Rather looks as if you'll be seeing the admiral home!
Yes, it does. Will you have dinner with me tomorrow?
Yes, all right.
Give me a ring at the office.
Thank you for the party.
Excuse me, please.
- All right, Jim. There's your tot.
- Oh, well.
560 cans of old Mother Jamieson's farmhouse sausages.
If they give us any more, I'll throw it over the side before their eyes!
I reckon I get spoiled on old Glad's cooking.
Yeah. It's wonderful what she does with the rations.
Mm. Well, only two more days.
I told her to have a hotpot ready for us.
- Bob...
- Mm-hm?
- I've got something to say.
- What's that?
Well... No beating about the bush.
You see, she and I...
Well, that is...
I'm thinking of getting fixed up after the war.
With Glad? That's fine, Jim!
The best thing that could happen for her, and for you, too!
You've asked her, eh?
Well, sort of.
We have an understanding, like.
- There's only one thing.
- What?
She's worried about you. She's been housekeeping for a long time.
Oh, forget it! I might get married myself one of these days!
Now, you go ahead, Jim.
Just name the day, and I'll dance at your wedding!
What's it like, sir?
Not too good. It looks as if they've been raided several times.
- Number One...
- Sir?
They'll be a lot of applications for special leave.
Cancel ordinary leave and give it to ratings with homes or relatives ashore.
Aye-aye, sir.
Any news, Bob?
No. I tried to phone the pub.
The line's out of order.
I'm going ashore to see.
- I'd like to come with you.
- Yes, Jim. Of course. Come along.
Look out, lads! The Navy's here!
Just in time for a cup of tea!
Always glad to see the Navy!
Name of Tallow.
29, Dock Road. What happened?
Mr Tallow, yes.
That was your house, wasn't it?
A direct hit. I'm very sorry.
Very sorry, indeed.
I reported it to the Town Hall, of course.
Tallow.
Yes, here we are.
There was only one casualty.
Mrs Bell.
Didn't they notify you?
We've been at sea.
Was she dead?
Yes, I'm afraid so.
If there's any help we can give...
- When was the funeral?
- Two days ago.
There was 21 altogether.
All from Dock Road.
It was a bad night, you see.
The mayor and cooperation attended.
Everything was properly done.
She can't have known anything,
Mr Tallow.
It was all over in a second.
She can't have suffered at all.
No. I see that.
It's a sort of... comfort.
Yes. Thank you.
I'll come back in a day or two.
Well, that's that.
- Got everything?
- Think so.
I can't pretend I've made a good job of it as you would've done.
Nonsense, darling! That's a fallacy.
Men can pack just as well as women, if you're anything to go by.
Mm, lovely!
There's no one can mix a Martini like you do!
- Let me shake you another.
- Not for me. I'm late already.
What are you going to do till it's time for your train?
Oh, get something to eat,
I suppose.
Try that place in Clarges Street.
They're open on Sundays.
Can't you put this chap off? If you told him it was my last evening...
Darling, you know I would if I could, but this is business.
He's a top producer, and considering me for a part in his new show.
Well, couldn't he consider you over lunch on a weekday?
Oh, John, really. Must you try to spoil the end of your leave for me?
- Sorry, darling...
- I'm going to be terribly late.
- I'll phone for a taxi.
- There's a hire car waiting for me.
Goodbye, darling.
- Bye, darling.
- Have a nice trip.
Heavens, I look a sight!
Let me know when you're on leave again.
- Yes, I...
- Bye, darling!
I will.
'Elaine. Haven't you got rid of that clot of a husband yet?
'We're all waiting to go off to dinner.
'Hello? Hello, Elaine?
'I say, turn that damn thing off!
I can't hear a word!
'Oh, that's better. Hello? Hello! '
You know, I'm the man who always thought that in war it was better to be on your own than have nothing to lose.
You still do think it a bit, don't you?
A bit.
Next time I'm back, let's get away into the country.
Forget about the war.
- Darling, I have some bad news.
- What?
I'm being moved away.
- Where to?
- I don't know.
It may be quite a time before we can see each other again.
Yes.
- Can't be helped.
- No.
In fact, I suppose it's just as well, really.
What do you mean?
I would have ended up by asking you to marry me, or something foolish like that.
What's so foolish about marriage?
It's a mistake to start thinking about permanent things in wartime.
I don't know.
Do you think so?
Yes. Yes, I do.
It's time I was in.
Hands to station for leaving harbour!
Special sea-duty men close up!
How are we doing, Number One?
About 15 miles astern of the convoy, sir.
Oh. Well, I'd like to catch up before midnight if we can.
- So keep her cracking on.
- Aye-aye, sir.
We always seem to be getting these diversion jobs nowadays.
- Sort of compliment, I suppose.
- Pretty cold one. Cold night, too.
Cocoa's just coming up, sir.
- Yeoman!
- Sir!
Call Viperous on RT. Plain language.
Say, "Torpedoed
15 miles astern of you."
Clear away boats and rafts!
But wait for the word!
'Help! Somebody help me! '
It's no good! The RT's smashed, sir!
She's going down!
- Engine room?
- Sir?
Leave it and come up!
Up you go, lads! We're finished here!
- Is he going down?
- Not with me on board. Jump to it.
My life belt! I left my life belt!
Heave, heave, heave!
It's no good, sir!
She's fast! It's the list!
The raft, then. Clear out the rafts!
Come on!
Who's that?
Wainwright, sir.
I'm ditching the primers.
Oh, yes, of course.
Don't want to take this lot down with us all alive.
- Ditch the confidential books?
- Yes, throw them over!
- Coxswain!
- Sir!
Pipe "abandon ship"!
Aye-aye, sir! Abandon ship!
Abandon ship!
- It's the skipper!
- What's the chances, sir?
Abandon ship!
Time to go, lads.
Good luck to you all.
I'm off!
Come on! Jump!
Come on! This way!
Raft here! Come on!
Come on, mate! This way!
Go on! Jump!
The rafts! The rafts!
Make for the rafts, boys!
She's going!
Oh, God! Don't let me go!
Let me get hold!
Let me get hold!
I haven't got a life belt!
You ought to have your life belt.
Don't you know your standing orders?
Here!
Bloody coxswain!
Can't he ever give us a break?
Coxswain! Coxswain!
It's all right, sir!
I'll make for the other raft!
"Our Father, which art in heaven, hallowed be thy name.
"Thy kingdom come,
"thy will be done on earth as it is in heaven.
"Give us this day our daily bread.
"Forgive us our trespasses,
"as we forgive them that trespass against us."
Sir.
Signal from convoy PK20.
One of the escorts has been sunk in her diversion position,
15 miles astern of the convoy.
- What ship?
- Compass Rose.
Pity. She was a good one.
- Have they any chance?
- If they can stay alive.
Viperous won't leave the convoy to look for them before daylight.
Do you know somebody in her?
Yes.
Yes, I do.
Oh. Bad luck.
Yes?
'Bob! How long have you got?
Have you had your tea? '
'With Glad?
That's fine, Jim!
'Just name the day, and I'll dance at your wedding! '
'Hello, Elaine, darling.
'Haven't you got rid of that clot of a husband yet?
'We're all waiting to go out...'
Shortie, what's the matter with you?
Shortie!
Oh, stop it, will you?
Can't you see he's finished?
I've just been talking to him.
- That was an hour ago.
- Wilson's dead, sir.
- Sure?
- Yes, sir. Stone-cold.
Put him over, then.
- Who's going up next?
- There's only you and Rose, sir.
Rose? Rose!
All right.
Ferraby! Wake up!
Wake up, damn you!
I'm tired, Number One!
You're not going to sleep!
And that goes for the rest of you!
Nobody's going to sleep!
Come on, you lazy bastards!
Wake up!
Wake up!
That's if you want to live!
Come on! I'll make you move about!
- Turn it up!
- Go and drown yourself!
I'll drown the lot of you, if you don't wake your ideas up!
Now, come on! Sing!
Under the spreading chestnut tree
When I take you on my knee
Oh, how happy I shall be
Under the spreading chestnut tree
Come on, Gracey! Lend a hand!
If we go to sleep, we've had it!
If we can stay awake till morning, we've got a chance!
Come on! Sing!
Under the spreading chestnut tree
When I take you on my knee
Oh, how happy I shall be
Under the spreading chestnut tree
And again.
No going to sleep there!
Come on!
Let's go and look at the other lot!
The sun'll be out soon!
That's right. Now, paddle.
Gordon! Gordon, buck up!
I'll be all right, Keith.
If only Number One would let me have my wife up to Glasgow.
He turned it down, you know.
We can't get rid of him!
We can't! We can't!
Carry on, lads.
All right. Next question.
What's a bar shoe?
Anyone know?
Come on! Wake up!
A thing for towing paravanes from.
Right. All applaud.
Clap! Clap! Harder!
Do you hear that?
They're awake, anyway.
Hello, Number One.
Hello, sir.
- Hi! Waiter!
- Yes, sir.
- Hi! Waiter!
- Yes, at once.
Oh, just a moment.
I'm afraid that water's a bit dusty.
I'll have it changed immediately, sir.
I'm so sorry.
It's the war, I'm afraid.
Oh, dear. In that case,
I don't want to make too much of it.
No, sir. Thank you, sir.
- Bring me another large pink gin.
- Yes. Certainly, sir.
- Sorry I'm late.
- Sir, congratulations.
Oh. Thanks.
May I take this? Thank you.
I've ordered you a large pink gin.
Well, that'll do for a start. Thanks.
- Did you see Ferraby?
- Yes.
I'm afraid he'll be in hospital a very long time.
I talked to the MO.
It's a complete break down all right.
Oh.
Did you go and see Morell's wife?
- I've just come from her flat.
- How was she?
She was in bed.
Oh. Was she taking it badly?
I think she was taking it very well.
I wasn't the only visitor.
Damn the war.
Yes.
- I was at the Admiralty yesterday...
- There, sir.
- Water, sir?
- Yes.
Right.
- Thanks.
- Thank you, sir.
- Cheers.
- Cheers.
Now, then. They are giving me a Castle-class Frigate.
That's the very latest type of escort.
They've also given me this, and put me in charge of an escort group.
And they're giving you a half stripe.
Good heavens!
Lieutenant commander!
What will they do next?
But there is a snag.
I shall be senior officer of the group.
So they've agreed I can have a lieutenant commander as Number One.
They said I could have you.
I said I didn't know.
You'd better be clear about this.
You could have your own command now, if you wanted it.
A corvette.
But if you stay with me, you may miss getting your own ship.
I'd like to have you, of course.
But you'll have to make up your own mind.
That's... up to you.
Tell me about our new ship, sir.
Waiter!
Saltash. I can't say I've ever heard of a castle of that name.
Neither have I.
I couldn't even find it on the map.
Well, it's on the map now.
Like a block of flats, isn't she?
- I wonder what that thing is there.
- Goodness knows.
We ought to get a set of plans and go over the layout.
There's a set in the dock office.
Shall I get them?
Oh, yes. Do that, will you?
'Yeoman! Get Viperous on RT.
'Say,
"Torpedoed 15 miles astern of you!"'
'Aye-aye, sir! '
'Clear away boats and rafts but wait for the word! '
'She's going down! '
'Abandon ship!
Abandon ship! Abandon ship! '
- Here we are, sir.
- Oh, right, Number One.
Well, let's get on with it.
We've a lot of work to do.
You must be very fond of Ericson.
I feel I want to finish the war with him and with no one else.
David and Jonathan.
- Does it sound silly?
- No.
But women don't often have that relationship.
If they do, it's not usually about something important.
Like running a ship or fighting a war.
It's about the only personal relationship war allows you.
- You've got very thin.
- That was Compass Rose mostly.
You know, when you lose a ship, it's like losing a bit of yourself.
And the funny thing is you don't realise it at once.
At first, it's just a bad dream.
When I was in London on leave,
I went to one of these concerts at the National Gallery.
Suddenly I found that I was crying.
Couldn't stop.
People began to look at me and I...
And I had to go out.
Then after a while,
I... I felt better, and I found that I could think of Compass Rose, and the men who died in her.
And the sadness and the waste of it.
And not want to cry any more.
Secrets of a first lieutenant, or why I went home to mum.
You don't have to apologise for being a human being.
Somebody had to cry for Compass Rose.
Why shouldn't it have been you?
We'll be off again in no time at all now.
Julie, Julie, am I wrong?
Is it better to have something to lose?
It's better still to have something to live for.
Yes. I seem to have got things a little muddled, don't I?
A little.
- Take care of yourself, won't you?
- Great care. I always do.
I mean it.
You see, I know where you're going.
'And so we went to war again.
'And to the bitterest sector of it.
The convoy routes to north Russia.'
'Homeward bound from Murmansk,
'we had bad weather,
'and as long as that lasted, we were safe from attack.'
'Then the weather moderated.'
'In contact, sir.'
Altering course to bearing. Port ten.
- Instantaneous echo, sir.
- Fire!
Fire!
- Lost contact, sir.
- Lost contact, sir.
Oil, sir!
Well, that's settled that one's hash!
No wreckage, no woodwork. Just oil.
She could have released that oil on purpose.
Yeoman, make to Petal,
"Continue search in your area."
Number One, carry out lost contact procedure.
I am going on with the attack.
End of sweep, sir.
Nothing on the recorder.
Very well. Carry on.
Sweep from red 80 to green 80 by echo.
Transmission interval, 2, 500 yards.
2,500 yards, sir.
No contact, sir.
Carry on.
- Carry on the sweep.
- Carry on the sweep, sir.
She could have been sunk.
I wish to heaven you'd mind your business and get on with your job!
Number One.
- Sir?
- Sorry I said that.
That's all right, sir.
I don't think she was sunk.
Not enough evidence for it.
No, sir.
- Steer 060.
- 'Steer 060, sir.'
It's getting to be a different kind of war, Number One.
And the people in it have got different, too.
In what way do you mean, sir?
Oh, at the beginning there was time for all sorts of things.
Understanding people.
Making allowances for them.
Wondering whether they were happy.
Even whether they liked you or not.
Now, the war doesn't seem to be a matter of feelings any more.
All that finished with Compass Rose.
Now it's just a matter of killing the enemy.
I suppose you think that's all wrong.
And that a man would never allow himself to be dehumanised by war.
Yes, sir.
I thought you were made of sterner stuff.
No ties with the shore and all that sort of thing.
So did I.
But it's a difficult question, isn't it, sir?
Yes.
After the war, I'll be as sweet as you like to everybody.
Including you.
Right now, I'm going back on the square search again.
We'll keep at action stations,
Number One.
Aye-aye, sir.
Normal sweep.
We're doing a box search again.
Normal sweep, sir.
- Don't make that filthy noise!
- Hollow tooth, sir.
Get on with your work!
We better have another brew of cocoa.
- Aye-aye, sir.
- Right.
Nothing on the recorder, sir.
- What about it?
- Nothing, sir. A routine report.
- It's the end of another sweep.
- What do you mean "another sweep"?
- Sorry, sir.
- Now, look here, Number...!
All right. Carry on.
Time you had some sleep, sir.
Yes, I know, doc.
But I've got to stay on that bridge.
Can you fix me up with something?
- Is it necessary?
- Don't you start!
There's a U-boat here.
I know damn well there is, and I'm going to get her.
I want something to keep me awake while I'm doing it.
I'll give you a couple of pills.
You'll feel like a spring lamb for about 24 hours.
After that, you'll go out like a light, and wake up with a hangover.
Is that all?
H m, probably.
But it isn't a thing to play with.
I wasn't intending to make a habit of it.
This is a special occasion.
'Bridge, sir.'
- Yes?
- 'Petal's got a contact.'
Thanks, doc!
In theory, you ought to lie down for ten minutes!
- What revs are we doing?
- 120, sir.
- Starboard 15.
- Starboard 15.
- Attacking. Full ahead.
- Full ahead.
'Full ahead, sir.'
- Midships?
- 'Midships, sir.'
In contact, sir. Bearing 190.
- 400 yards.
- Echo high.
- Steer 190.
- 'Steer 190, sir.'
100 yards.
- Instantaneous echo, sir.
- Fire!
- Port 20. Slow ahead.
- Port 20. Slow ahead.
'Port 20. Slow ahead, sir.'
Hard a' port.
Open fire!
Cease firing!
Check!
Midships!
Stand by scrambling nets.
Depth charge crew, stand by scrambling nets.
- Well, no mistake about that.
- No.
Sorry, sir.
Oh, that's all right, Number One.
I was beginning to get doubtful myself.
The only thing I'm sorry about is the doctor talked me into taking some damn pill!
- Stop engine.
- Stop engine.
Number One, this is quite a moment.
We've never seen the enemy before.
They don't look very different from us, do they?
All right, mate. All right.
I gotcha. All right.
'When you are very tired, even the moment of triumph
'seems no more than part of the same bad dream.
'That was the last U-boat we sank.
'But it wasn't the last U-boat we saw.'
Stop operating.
Switch off the set and fall out.
'This was 1945.
'The U-boats had had their battle.
'Though for all the good it had done them,
'they might have saved themselves the trouble,
'and spared many fine ships and good men.'
I wonder how far we've steamed.
I added it up for Compass Rose.
98,000 miles.
I never did for this ship.
Seemed unlucky.
I wish some of the others could have seen this. Morell, Ferraby.
Yes, they deserved it.
Tallow, Watts, Wells... Young Baker.
- Who was Wells?
- The yeoman in Compass Rose.
Oh, yes.
Now, is the time you miss them.
You didn't get any medals,
Number One.
I did do my best for you.
I can bear it.
No, you deserve something.
I've got something to look forward to.
Coming onto the bearing now, sir.
- Stop engine.
- 'Stop engine, sir.'
'Telegraph at stop, sir.'
Remember we had that drink in London, and you said you wanted to stay with me in Saltash?
Yes. That was one of my better decisions.
One of your best, as far as I'm concerned.
- Stand by, sir.
- Stand by!
- Stand by.
- On, sir.
- Let go!
- Let go!
- Slow astern.
- 'Slow astern, sir.'
'Telegraph at slow astern, sir.'
And we only sank two U-boats.
- Stop engine.
- 'Stop engine, sir.'
Two in five years.
- It seemed a lot at the time.
- Yes.
Got a cable, sir.
Finished with main engine.
'Finished with main engine, sir.'
WIRELESS: Mr Churchill, in his speech in the House of Commons this afternoon, said,
''For now, nearly two years,
Malta has stood against the enemy.
What a thorn it has been in their side.
What a toll it has taken of their convoys.
For the last six weeks, over 450 German first-line aircraft and perhaps 200 Italian have been venting their fury on Malta.''
Can't be far now.
No.
How long do we wait in Malta, just a few minutes or till morning?
Depends what's happening when we get there.
I expect you'll refuel and go straight on.
Pity.
I want to get to Cairo as quickly as possible, but I would like to see
Malta in daylight.
I believe there are some very interesting megalithic remains.
There are certainly some very interesting remains on Malta, nowadays.
- Megalithic and otherwise.
The runway looks clear.
If there's a doctor in the house, will he please come to the stage door?
- OK. That's us.
- Home, James.
You chaps don't like being driven by someone else, do you?
Not onto an airfield in the middle of a raid.
- You been stationed here long?
- Since it started.
Anti-aircraft?
Security.
- Watch out. Big crater, 100 yards on the left. - OK.
Right. Right.
Crater dead ahead!
Well, we're down in one piece, anyway.
- Get 'em out. Quick.
- Right.
Right. Everyone out, please, quick as you can.
Come on.
- Is it always like this?
- Usually.
Colourful, isn't it?
I think I can manage without seeing it in daylight.
They'll refuel when they can and get you off.
Sorry.
Cancel my last remark.
That's our bomber squadron.
Hello, Red Gauntlet. This is Lucky.
Angels 2-0, Angels 2-0, report damage. Over.
Epsom 2-1 to Lucky. OK. Bandits destroyed.
Out.
Steady! You mustn't just knock them down like that.
Most improbable. You must search and find them and then knock them off.
Sorry, old boy.
This phantom squadron of yours seems to be doing a great execution, Ramsey.
Thank you, sir.
Two Jerries just knocked each other down.
What'd happen to them if we were really up there, I can't think.
Frank, get rid of this lot, I've got two submarines outside the harbour waiting to come in.
- Willy...
Put some proper trousers on or you'll catch cold.
You'll catch something worse than that if we don't get those subs in.
It's your ruddy petrol they've got.
- You shall have a drop for your lighter, Willy.
Hello, Eden. Are you all right?
Yes, sir. Just.
They got the Hudson on the ground.
Yes, I know, dammit. Anyone hurt?
No, we were all out in time, but we now have a lodger.
- A lodger?
- A photographic reconnaissance pilot. Ross.
He was going through to Cairo on the Hudson, so he's stranded.
Shall I keep him with me or will your people look after him?
A PR pilot, eh?
I wonder if he's any good.
I don't know.
Rather an odd fish. We talked on the plane.
He got into the PR racket because he'd done some aerial photography on his job.
He's an archaeologist.
Oh, crikey! That sounds menacing.
Is he...all right?
Yes.
He's not a born military type, but...I'd back him.
Hm.
Well, come and tell me how you got on in Whitehall.
Yes, sir?
Flight Lieutenant Ross.
I'm looking for Wing Commander Bartlett.
Very good, sir.
You'll find him in the Operations Room.
- Up the tunnel, the fourth door on the right, sir. - Thank you.
- Morning, chum.
- Good morning.
Miss Rivers, there doesn't seem to be a plot on picture two.
- Get one right away, will you?
- Yes, sir.
Get another radar report on number two photographic reconnaissance, please.
It should be a matter of ordinary routine by now.
- Where's the Sicily plane?
- Just crossing the coast.
See you tonight at eight.
- Mind you keep onto him.
- Yes, sir.
Wing Commander Bartlett?
- Who are you? - Flight Lieutenant
Ross, sir. In transit for Cairo.
Thank you, Miss Rivers.
Oh, yes. Cairo.
I'm afraid the old man would like to have a word with you first.
Oh?
Well done, Hobley. That's four to the
Fleet Air Arm this month. There you are.
I don't know what Nelson would have said about your flying under RAF command.
The only thing Nelson ever minded about was scuppering the enemy.
Thank you, sir, but...with respect...
If the prize is half a bottle for sinking a 5,000-ton ship and a whole bottle for sinking a 10,000-ton ship, then surely an 8,000-tonner...
And fully loaded, sir.
And amongst eight, all naval.
Oh, all right. I'll stretch a point.
I always had a soft spot for the Navy.
You'll be flying again tonight, so see your boys go easy on that.
Aye aye, sir.
I don't quite understand why he should want to see me.
Well, I'm in charge of the photographic unit and you're a PR pilot.
You can't go on to Cairo because your Hudson's had it. See?
- No.
- You will.
The old man's good at making things crystal clear.
Hello, Frank. Save some of that for me, will you?
You go and sink your own ships, you candid cameraman.
- Come in.
- Flight Lieutenant Ross, sir.
- Ah, yes. Glad to see you, Ross.
Our manna from heaven.
- This is Admiral Banks.
- How do you do, sir?
I sent a signal to the Commander In Chief
Middle East about you, saying that we'd...Iost a PR pilot and would he mind if we hung onto you instead.
I've just got his reply.
He doesn't.
Well?
Thank you, sir.
Unorthodox, eh?
Well, this is a rather unorthodox place.
We have to make up our words and music as we go along, eh, Bartlett?
Yes, sir.
Come and look at this and you'll understand.
The Germans and Italians, all along here.
In Sicily, he's only 58 miles from our coast.
To the south, here,
Rommel.
Here he is now, doing everything he can to get through to Egypt and, after that, the Suez Canal.
You know what that means, don't you?
All the oil in the Middle East and the route to India.
Right. But, if he's going to succeed, he's got to be supplied with guns, men, ammunition and fuel.
Along here...
..or here...
..or down this way.
You see why Malta's got to be held?
So that men like you can go and find Rommel's supply ships and men like Hobley can go and sink them.
Or, if we haven't the means, pass the job on to Middle East Command.
You're what we call
''the eyes of the fleet''.
In this case, the eyes of Malta, and we're as short of them as everything else.
- Do you see why I grabbed you?
- Yes, I do, sir.
Right. Bartlett's your CO.
He'll fill in the lurid details.
Off you go and get on with it.
- Oh, and Ross.
- Sir?
- Thanks for coming to help us.
- It was the least I could do, sir.
Straight from Gibraltar.
What, in your submarines?
It's a mighty good job they got here all right... or we should have been in a jam for petrol. - Yes.
I've got a bit of tough news for you, Frank.
I'm afraid this is their last trip for a time.
The bases were bombed again last night and one of the subs was hit.
The others are leaving this afternoon.
For good?
Well, until the raids slacken off a bit.
Pity.
They were the last naval ships in Malta.
Except for a few MTBs.
Yes, it's getting a bit lonely.
I'm damned sorry. You know, if I could,
I'd swim and get the bloody stuff for you.
I know you would, Willy.
But you haven't got any water wings.
8,000 tons.
Fully loaded.
All you have to do is to get me some more like it.
Of course, you realise Frank's Fleet Air Arm boys can only deal with very easy targets, ships that are sinking practically of their own accord and so on.
If anything has to be really seriously attacked, then it's a job for me.
I'm afraid I don't know much about recce over the sea.
My speciality is marshalling yards.
- Hm?
I beg your pardon?
''Marshalling yards.'' You know, trains.
I see.
Of course, the only thing that limits a marshalling-yard specialist here is the er..
Iack of marshalling yards.
- Pity.
I was just developing a rather interesting technique with marshalling yards.
Still, even if you can't have your puff-puffs, you still have your little camera.
Views of great interest abound.
I went on a train once.
That was many years ago.
I seem to remember it ran on shiny things called ''rails''.
No, that may not have been a train.
That may have been a tram, bouncing along the Embankment at night, with the river on one side and the road on the other, going,
''rrrr-yang-yang yang-yong ying-yang-yong yong ying-ying.''
That was a Chinese tram, but you get the idea.
Never mind about the trams.
I've got a job for you right away.
I'd have liked you to have been able to stooge around a bit more and get the feel of things, but this is urgent.
Fly to Brindisi, get the pictures of the docks and fly straight back here. Got it?
I still take the same photographs even if the convoy's not there?
Yes.
You've got long-range tanks, but go easy on the juice. There's a mighty shortage on the island.
And remember what I told you about radio silence.
If you talk while you're up in the air, the enemy fighters will jump on you like a pile of bricks.
Never talk to the ground here, OK?
Right.
- Good luck, sir.
- Thank you.
Picture One airborne.
Your initiative?
Who the devil do you think you are, messing about taking blasted pictures 90 miles off your course?
Hasn't it got through to that alleged mind of yours that we're short of petrol?
Don't you realise that men and ships are being lost every month trying to bring the stuff to us?
For what?
So that you can joyride about the sky looking for ruddy railway stations?
We've got no time for line-shooting amateurs in this setup, Ross.
Get the transport to Valletta.
The AOC wants to see you at nine.
- Nine?
- Oh, lose yourself.
- Gharry, sir?
- What?
Gharry. You like ride in my gharry?
Not now.
- You know this place?
- Been here all my life.
Well, can you tell me where I can get a decent meal?
- Meal?
- Mangiare.
Mangiare? (Laughs)
I'm so sorry.
Maria!
It's not safe to go outside.
- But I'm late, Father.
- They will understand.
I'll go.
Flight Lieutenant Ross, sir.
- Ross, you disobeyed orders.
- Yes, sir.
Why?
- I'm sorry, sir.
- Answer my question. Why?
Well, the freight on that train looked interesting, sir.
I wondered where it came from, and if there was any more waiting at the junction further north.
- There was, sir.
- I see.
So you flew 90 miles off course to prove it?
This isn't the desert or the Russian front or even England.
We can't get extra supplies of petrol just by lifting the phone and asking for them.
- Is that clear?
- Yes, sir.
And we can't waste valuable time court-martialling flight lieutenants.
From now on, you will fly strictly to orders.
- Understand?
- Yes, sir.
Right. At first light tomorrow, you will find those trucks of yours again and you will go on photographing them until someone tells you to stop.
Well, any questions?
No, sir.
No, unless those trucks...
Precisely. Those trucks.
Come here, Ross, Bartlett.
You see those crates?
They've got gliders inside them.
And they're moving south.
There's only one place where they could be going, Sicily, and once they're assembled there, there's only one purpose they could be used for.
An airborne invasion of this island.
You will photograph those trucks wherever they go, Ross.
By the time they've unloaded their freight, you'll never want to see one of them again.
Yes, sir.
- You see that he does it.
- I will, sir.
- All right, Ross.
- Thank you, sir.
- Bartlett.
- Sir?
All this is top-secret, understand?
Make sure Ross realises it.
Very good, sir.
- When are we getting more Spitfires, sir?
- They're supposed to be on their way.
But if this lot arrives before they do...
Malta...
Yes, sir.
MAN:..are all your guns OK?
Hello.
Hello.
So you weren't killed.
No.
- I hardly ever am.
- You deserve to be.
I was late for my watch here.
- Do you make that journey every evening?
- Of course. I have to come and go home.
I don't think you should do it by yourself.
Perhaps... Perhaps I might have the pleasure of seeing you home safely.
That would be very kind.
If you were to bring an umbrella...
What for?
To keep the bombs off.
What time do you get away?
Ten o'clock.
All right.
I'll wait for you.
A liaison with the plotters, eh?
Well, it's not a bad thing, up to a point.
I'm only seeing her home.
She's very reckless.
All right, all right. Are you married?
- Certainly not.
- Good.
- Like to try a Maltese beer?
- Thanks.
I'll have you back by ten.
I've got something doing here myself then.
Thank you, sinjur.
I gave him four shillings. Is that about right?
Three would have been enough, really.
- Do you see where you are?
- More or less.
This must have been very beautiful once.
This is our house.
It is rather a funny little place, I'm afraid.
My father used to build houses.
He built this for us when we lost our home.
He was killed last year.
In a raid.
It's awfully well done.
Please...
Would you like to come in?
Thank you. Yes.
Mother, this is Flight Lieutenant Ross.
- Welcome to our home, Mr Ross.
- Thank you, Mrs Gonzar.
Forgive me if I go on doing this.
It is powdered milk for my grandson Ninu.
This is his father, my son, Paolo, and his wife Carmela.
- How do you do?
- How do you do?
Are you a fighter pilot?
No, I just take photographs.
You take photographs of enemy targets for our bombers, Mr Ross?
- Yes.
- Ah, yes. I'm anti-aircraft.
- Oh, really?
- I have a battery on the coast.
I'm on a few hours' leave, the first for many months.
- Chocolate!
- (Whispers) Say thank you.
Thank you.
There we go again.
Well, Mr Ross, are we going to be invaded?
Mother, I tell you, you know nothing about it.
She will listen to Rome Radio.
It is sometimes very funny, this propaganda.
Paolo is, of course, our military expert, but I also read.
I use my eyes...
..and my ears.
And still she knows nothing. Nothing.
You must all know more about it than I do.
I've only just come here.
And the first thing you meet is
Maria and all the silly Gonzars.
That is bad luck for you, Mr Ross.
- Not at all. On the contrary.
Take no notice of Mother, Mr Ross. It is well known one must take no notice of her.
These are, of course, only my silly children.
I have also a clever son, Giuseppe.
Who is so clever, the Italians caught him.
Really?
- A prisoner?
- No.
He was studying in Italy when the Italians declared war.
So now he is interned.
But he's safe?
Oh, yes.
Sometimes, I have letters from him.
Of course, they are censored, but we know he is safe.
- Safer than we are, by the sound of it.
Giuseppe would be here, if he could.
You hear?
It is getting much heavier than it was a few weeks ago.
They say so here.
Of course, they cannot tell us everything, but what they do tell us is true.
It is building up for something, Mr Ross.
RAF?
Yes.
- Here we are.
- Right.
Goodbye.
BARTLETT: Bye-bye.
ALL: Goodbye!
Bye.
- What a good bunch they are.
- Yes.
Joan...
I think there's an order coming out about
Englishwomen who can leaving the island.
Splendid. Even less competition.
I dare say, but I think you ought to get out of here.
Sir, do you realise just what would happen to that Operations Room without me?
Here I am, practically defending the island single-handed, and you have the cheek to...
No, but quite seriously, I think it's much wiser.
One can't just go around being wise, darling.
Gosh, it's lovely to be out of it all for a few hours.
Well, well, well. This is a new development.
See what I mean about getting out of here?
Nonsense. I shouldn't think of leaving if they act in that rude way.
- My God, John, the bus!
Well...that's jolly, isn't it?
The Intelligence people are regretful but definite.
- Have we got any bombers to have a go at 'em? - Not after last night.
Matthews hasn't a serviceable plane left.
- You couldn't use fighters?
- 15 serviceable.
If we lose those, there'll be no air defence at all.
- Did you see the crates?
- They're being loaded onto barges.
I should think some of them are in Sicily already.
If they're on their way to
Sicily, that settles it.
If only we'd got a couple of squadrons of bombers, instead of this mess.
You'd better go and get rested up.
Probably do with it.
A nice long sleep.
Hello, Peter.
I wanted to apologise for not having come in. I've been busy.
- I know. I have been watching you.
- Watching me?
Oh, yes. I always forget that you come on these expeditions.
I'll remember in future.
Anyhow, I've got 12 hours off and
I thought we might go out somewhere.
What you need is sleep, not going out.
You go and sleep first, Peter, then we'll see.
Go along.
You're quite right.
Sir?
See, it's just a mess, sir.
Can't do anything with it.
No, that's jamming all right again.
When did you say it started?
Well, there it is, gentlemen.
Massed raids on the airfields, low-level attacks on the civilian population.
And I've just had a report they're jamming on radar.
It all adds up to an invasion.
And soon.
- When are the Spitfires actually due?
- Any time now.
Depends when the carrier can get them off.
I can't do anything much until they show up.
I have nothing to do it with.
I'm sure that both of you have done everything possible.
I can't help thinking that while I must keep the defences manned, the most important thing is to keep the airfields serviceable,
- in case your Spitfires do get here in time. - Agreed.
We'd better go on using as many of my fellows as we can on the airfields, even if it leaves us a bit light elsewhere.
Thank you, General.
Not at all. I'm sure everybody will be charmed.
It's a fine day off we're having.
Perce, if it takes 30 tons to fill one hole and we filled 14 this morning, how many tons is that?
Far too many. And a lot of good it'll do too.
The buzz is there's 50 Spitfires coming.
There's been 50 Spitfires coming ever since I've been here
- and all that's come is about 500 Jerries.
Another 30 tons, Perce.
- Ah, what did I tell you?
60 tons.
- Hey, there's Millie out in the middle of it. - Millie!
Millie!
Millie!
SERGEANT: Fall in, No.2 Section.
Come on. Move it sharpish. Come on.
Fall in, No.2 Section. Come on, come on.
You're not a bunch of ballet dancers.
- Right turn. Quick march.
- Where to now, sarge?
We're going to that field to dig some big holes and put long straight poles in, so the Germans can't land their aircraft.
That's what's called air strategy.
You roll the ruddy runway so people can land, then you stick poles up in it so they can't.
That's good, that is.
All runways serviceable now, sir.
Good.
Yes, 47 Spitfires on their way now.
You'll take 27. 10 each to go to Hal Far and Ta' Qali.
OK. Good luck.
All three airfields ready to receive Spitfires, sir.
Fine. If the Germans let us get away with it.
Right. Let's have them on the table.
They're flying the Spits in from the American carrier Wasp.
It's a long haul, but they'll just about make it.
Then, if only the Germans will give us time to get them refuelled.
CONTROLLER: Table clear of enemy raid, sir.
Let's hope it stays clear.
But as late as this...
.. I'm afraid they'll just catch it.
100-plus bandits approaching the coast.
Fire!
Eight more Spits to come in, sir.
Runway being heavily bombed, sir.
You must not go outside, Mother.
It is a very heavy raid.
It is not here, it is on the airfield.
It will be the new Spitfires they're after.
Do not be afraid, Carmela.
If they hit us, it will be a mistake.
For once they have something better to do than to try and kill Ninu.
Very disappointing.
- You know how many Spits we lost last night? - I heard it was 15.
20. 20 out of 47 and they weren't even airborne.
Of course, turning up then they just caught the dusk raids.
Have you seen this, sir?
I thought it might cheer you up a bit.
GOVERNOR: We who have been thought worthy of this high honour and distinction must see that we live worthy of it, and, in this critical time, that we do not shrink from giving all we have.
Malta has shown the world that she can endure and the world knows that she will never weaken.
But not until the inevitable day of victory can the whole story of Malta GC be told.
The safety of this fortress rests under God, on four supports - the three fighting services and the civilian population.
Each one of these is essential to the others and to the whole.
As we are co-recipients of the great honour bestowed by His Majesty the King,
Iet us also be sure that we are really co-operative, and making this co-operation ever more complete and effective, go forward together in our united strength and faith.
But it is for two... and a child.
That's right. It's for two and a child.
It's been cut again, you know.
It is for your mousetrap.
It is a mouse's portion.
You have been a long time.
There are now no buses.
Yes, yes. You shall have it. Now, sit down.
But where is yours?
I have eaten mine. I was hungry.
- Are you sure?
- Of course.
You can see that that is not the ration for three.
Carmela!
No, I myself am not hungry.
It is absurd to say always you are not hungry.
You will eat yours or I shall be very cross.
And you are not to give it to the little pig who is already fat.
Carmela! Mother!
- Two ships are in.
- Food ships?
Yes. Big ones, or fairly big, and more coming tonight. Come and see.
What about it now, then, Harry?
Won't never get through, eh?
I thought there were 17 of them.
That was the yarn.
- What's happened to the rest of them?
- They've been fighting for four days.
You can't expect 'em all to arrive in a heap.
- So, the rest's coming, eh?
- Yeah.
Aye. Aye, it's just a bit of a delay.
I'll bet they'll be in tonight, most of 'em, anyway.
Here...come on, misery.
- Celebration, see?
- Ta.
GOVERNOR: I must now break to you what the arrival of only two ships means to us.
This is a siege.
We shall be called upon this summer to bear all the privations of soldiers and citizens in a besieged city.
We are short of food, water, clothes and fuel.
But let us remember that the most glorious sieges in history have always meant hardships...
.. and without hardships there would be little glory.
It is perhaps not glory that we lack.
They' ll get more through next time.
This is the only one that's been properly excavated.
The Temple of Mnajdra has hardly been touched.
MARIA: No.
Ah.
- Oh, do you see that that's been worked?
- Mm-hm.
Oh, it really is heartbreaking to be spending one's time taking photographs of ports...
..when there's all this...waiting.
- Peter.
- Yes?
- Do you think they will come?
- Who, the Germans? I shouldn't think so.
Why not? They have many more planes.
- There's nothing much to stop it.
- I don't think things happen like that.
I mean, not just by counting up.
There are other things that decide.
You mean God?
More that sort of thing.
You have faith, as we are told to have?
Oh, I wouldn't say that.
Anyhow, does it matter very much?
- What do you mean, does it matter?
- It matters now, that's what we're doing, seeing that they don't take Malta, that's the job in hand. I meant that a temporary loss of civilisation probably doesn't matter much in the long run.
After all, people have been fighting their wars around this place for 5,000 years or more. It's still here.
Phoenicians, Greeks, Turks - they've all come...and gone.
I don't know what you mean.
I don't care about the Phoenicians and Turks. I only care about us.
You realise, if they did come and capture
Malta, we should be separated.
Doesn't that matter to you?
Yes, that does matter.
Because we must be together, mustn't we?
And when there is no war, come here and talk.
If it must happen, it will happen.
We'll come here and talk.
And they won't take Malta.
You do believe that too, don't you?
Yes, Peter.
Yes, I do.
I am quite sure.
When we took the place first, the garden was just a jungle.
I just got the lawn going. Cost me a packet with grass seed the price it is, and now I get a letter from Margaret saying everybody's digging for victory, so she's digging it up and planting cabbages.
Cabbages...in my lawn.
- How big is the lawn?
- Oh, it's only about 20 yards square.
Quite a small garden, but very nice.
Particularly in the spring - lots of bulbs.
- Margaret says the daffodils are good this year. (Knock at door)
Will you have your bread now, sir, or save it for lunch?
Oh, lunch.
I'm tired of kitchen soap and cold water.
- Cypher, sir.
- Oh, give it to the admiral, will you?
If that's another query of our morale,
I'll cut my throat.
Well, what is it?
How many Spitfires would you like, Frank?
Oh, think of a number and double it.
60 any good?
Read it, please, Willy.
60 Spitfires will be flown in to Malta from the American carrier Wasp in three days from now, timed to land in daylight.
On the next day, the unescorted minelayer Welshman will arrive
Grand Harbour with a cargo of petrol, oil, aircraft spares, food and powdered milk.
Powdered milk's good.
They think of everything, don't they?
Three days.
Well, if Jerry gives us that long.
Though I don't much see why he should.
(Reads) In addition to which...
What?
Vice Admiral Payne will arrive in the Welshman to take up duties as Vice Admiral Malta.
Vice Admiral Banks will take passage in Welshman to Gibraltar.
Oh, no, Willy.
Well, I was expecting it.
I've been here six months longer than I should anyway.
Payne's a good chap. You'll like him.
I'm glad the Spitfires will arrive before I go, though.
Yes...Iong as nothing else arrives first.
Well, if they get here in time, and in daylight, Jerry may burn his fingers.
Star-Spangled Banner
Now, every Spitfire will have its own number.
As each machine lands and taxies off the runway, it'll be met by one of you on a motorcycle.
Your machine will have the same number written on a board and mounted above the back wheel.
You will lead the aircraft to the pen allotted to it, where it will be refuelled and rearmed straightaway.
- Sergeant Vella?
- Sir?
No ammunition restriction for the next eight hours.
Very good, sir.
OK, Peter, is that clear? I'll bring
Blue Section into Ta' Qali and you bring Red Section over the harbour into Luqa.
If we get this lot in OK, perhaps they'll think twice about their gliders.
Yeah.
Raid's dispersed, sir.
The table's clear of enemy aircraft.
- Any sign of the Spitfires yet?
- No, sir.
Hello? Hello?
Yes. Fine.
Here we are, sir. Guests approaching coast.
We've made it, Frank.
It looks like it.
What was it the Duke of Wellington said after Waterloo? 'A darn close-run thing.'
Well, now, if our German friends will give us half an hour, we'll be delighted to see them.
Don't open fire. Friendly aircraft approaching from the northwest.
Cease firing. Friendly aircraft approaching from the northwest.
Hello, Red Guests. This is Red Host.
Follow me, please. Over.
Number 17, number 6.
Number 3.
TANNOY: Number 47.
Follow number 3.
Follow number 17.
TANNOY: Number 22.
Number 15.
Number 5.
Number 38.
Number 12.
Number 16.
Number 22.
Man your guns. Stand by for enemy attack.
All right, sir.
TANNOY: Number 41.
Number 27.
Number 11.
Number 19.
- Aircraft due north, sir.
- Can't be the Spits.
No, it's not Spitfires.
Sir, 40-plus bandits approaching.
- How many Spits have we got there?
- 31 rearmed and refuelled, sir.
- Get 'em up.
- Scramble.
Come on, Willy. Your farewell party.
We can't miss this.
CONTROLLER: Fighter Squadron, scramble.
Fighter Squadron, scramble.
TANNOY: Number 52.
Then, of course, as soon as any food does come, I go - ha!
- Ah, well. Goodbye, Payne. I wish you luck.
- Goodbye.
Keep this fellow Frank in his place.
Don't think because he hasn't got as loud a voice as mine you can boss him. He's tough.
I'm used to tough admirals.
Don't forget us, Willy.
''Malta, my dear sir, is in my thoughts, sleeping or waking.''
- You know who said that?
- No, I'm afraid not.
Horatio Nelson.
You're very ignorant, Frank.
I'll read him up between raids.
- And, Frank?
- Yes?
Keep your chin up. The convoy will be through to you in a few days.
Keep hitting 'em, my boys.
JOAN: My mother always used to say you shouldn't bathe after a heavy meal.
At least that's one thing we don't have to worry about.
Look, Peter, don't wait for us.
I shall be hours yet.
- You and Maria go. We'll see you later.
- Oh, OK. We'll move on.
What did you do that for?
Darling, have a heart.
They want to be by themselves.
Peter...it is known one must take no notice of Mother.
That's what you all say.
If she says no, I cannot marry you, then I will marry you all the same.
Do you think she will say no?
Perhaps not.
But she will put her head so and say... but and but and but.
One must take no notice, you see.
Because we know, don't we, that nothing will happen.
I dare say they are a pretty pair, but I'm not sure it's a good thing.
He's talking about marrying her.
Came and asked my permission yesterday.
- What did you say? - I said to think it over when he cooled off a bit.
I can't stop him, but if he goes on,
I shall tell him what I think.
- Which is?
- You have to travel light in war.
Now, look, darling, I don't mean us.
We've had all this out before.
John, do you still want to marry me?
Yes, Joan. Yes, of course I do.
But I want to marry you in England, where we belong.
I want our families to be there and I want our friends...
The bride, who was given away by her father, wore a Renaissance-style gown of ivory satin. - And why not?
Isn't that a better way to make a start than... out here in the middle of a permanent air raid?
Never knowing which one of us is going to be killed next.
Maybe. I never was much of a girl for the trimmings myself.
Trimmings?
I don't give a darn about the wedding breakfast.
At least I don't want my wife to be starved.
WIRELESS: You're short of food.
The ships that were to have brought food for your children are at the bottom of the Mediterranean.
Please help us, but above all, help yourselves, by surrendering now.
That's the end of our afternoon talk to Malta.
The orchestra will now play the Maltilla.
- Good afternoon, Mr Ross.
WIRELESS: Maltilla
Good afternoon, Mrs Gonzar.
- Give me this.
- Thank you.
You may know why
I've come here this afternoon.
I may.
I want to marry Maria.
I wanted to ask your permission.
I am glad you should ask, but there is no need.
Maria is a woman now and knows her own mind.
Yes, but I wanted to talk to you.
You are a good man.
It is not because of you that...
Yes?
Maria has never been outside this island.
Your home is a thousand miles away.
When the war is ended, will you take her there?
Of course.
And if it does not end... if Malta is taken by the enemy?
You shouldn't listen to that.
It's just propaganda.
When they said they would drop
7,000 tons of bombs on us in a month, it was called propaganda.
But it was true, Mr Ross.
Wherever I went I would take Maria with me.
You would like to take her, Mr Ross...
..but war destroys many hopes...many plans.
But, Mrs Gonzar, don't you see, one can't live like that.
You might as well say that a man shouldn't get married because he may be run over by a bus the next day or struck by lightning.
Ah, yes, when you are young you feel the lightning cannot harm you.
It's very rare to be struck by lightning.
And if it does strike... one's done one's best by not being afraid.
You may be right, Mr Ross.
And if you are not, you should be.
But I am older than you and perhaps no longer brave.
We have all said that Malta will never surrender, and that is true, Mr Ross.
But we must not say these brave things without facing what they mean.
It may mean to starve to death...
..to see loved ones die...as I have done.
Don't you hate us?
Hate you?
The British...for being here.
For bringing all this on you.
I do not hate anybody.
I am Maltese.
We Maltese do not like war, but it has always been our fate and our destiny.
If there is to be war and we must be on a side, yours is the side we would choose.
Mr Ross...I cannot stop you from marrying Maria.
I wouldn't if I could.
But I ask you to wait for just a little while.
But if we wait...
Yes?
You're quite right, of course.
It would be better for Maria to wait.
He was picked up down at the foot of the cliff by some of our British ackack boys.
He spun a yarn about being a Maltese who'd escaped from Sicily.
They found his radio transmitter and arrested him.
He'd obviously been put ashore from a submarine.
He speaks perfect Maltese, yet he says now that he's an Italian named Ricardi.
I have my doubts about that.
I think he probably is Maltese.
- Have you any idea what he's after?
- No, sir. I haven't talked to him much yet.
This'll tell you.
(Reads) Essential that full-scale attacks are resumed against convoys.
I rely on you to provide maximum effort.
Well, sir, that'd be very nice of them, if they'd give us something to do it with.
Well, don't worry, this time they have.
This convoy left Gib for Malta at 21.00 hours last night.
It's the biggest yet.
With two aircraft carriers and every available escort vessel.
14 merchant ships and, what matters most, a large oil tanker - the Ohio.
If it gets through, then we shall go a long way towards scuppering Rommel.
If it doesn't...
I don't know what your pal with the radio set thought he could do from here, but I do know they'll do everything on earth to stop that convoy.
Why were you sent here?
Look, I've plenty of time.
You'll tell me in the end.
Why not save us both the trouble and tell me now?
Why were you sent here?
Engage!
Engage!
Why were you sent here?
You know as well as I do.
The whole island knows.
Anyway, you're not an Italian, are you?
And your name isn't Ricardi, is it?
You're a Maltese.
And your name?
Look, darling,
I just wanted to say there's a big job on.
- Yes.
- You know?
Yes. The whole island is praying.
It is the novena to Our Lady from now to the 15th.
Well, the 15th is just about the time they'll get here...if they get here.
I just want to say that I'll be a bit tied up until then... and won't see much of you.
All right, Peter.
I shall be watching you.
Take care of yourself.
You say your son's letters come fairly regularly, Mrs Gonzar?
Fairly.
The last was about...six weeks ago.
Does he ever express any opinions about the war?
Oh, no.
The letters are censored, of course.
Just ordinary letters asking about the family.
Mm-hm.
Mrs Gonzar...
..is that your son?
Oh, yes.
Yes.
That is Giuseppe.
Something...something has happened to him.
Yes.
Is he...dead?
No.
I hate to have to tell you this, Mrs Gonzar, but your son is in the prison here.
He was found on the shore.
He had a wireless transmitter with him and he was put ashore from an Italian submarine.
You mean he was...
.. he was spying?
Giuseppe?
Yes.
What will they do to him?
I... I don't know.
You mean they will shoot him as a spy?
Oh, no.
A traitor is hanged.
I must go to him.
They will not stop me.
Say they will not stop me.
I must go to him.
- Giuseppe. - I can't promise that.
It's not in my hands.
But if I can get permission for you to see him... I will.
Your mother had to know, because otherwise
I couldn't be sure who you were.
There's no reason why any of the rest of your family should ever be told, or anybody else...
..if you help me.
Thank you.
It is of some importance.
- Go on. What do you want to know?
- Why you were sent here.
You know about the convoy.
Mm.
There must be an oil tanker.
In fact, there is bound to be one.
Yes.
If she got through...
I had to find the positions of the fuel dumps after she had been unloaded...
..and signal them back so that they could be bombed.
I'm not a traitor. I'm not a traitor!
This is my country, not yours!
You've no right here.
You were the only one?
They wanted someone who spoke Maltese.
(Reads) Cruisers Manchester and Cairo,
Destroyer Foresight and five merchant ships.
That's eight of the convoy and four of the escort gone...
..including one of the aircraft carriers.
Well, nobody can say they're not doing their damnedest to help us.
No.
Jim Hill's boy is in the Manchester.
I hope he got away with it.
- Nice boy, I remember him at Dartmouth...
- Oh, to hell with Jim Hill's boy!
- I beg your pardon, Payne.
- That's all right.
I never knew a job in which one just... waited around so much. What was it... you told me Willy Banks used to say
- ''I'll go and swim for the stuff''?
Yes.
Well, by tomorrow what's left of them ought to be within range of our Beaufighters.
After that the Spits can follow up.
Six hours to first light.
Then we can go, thank God.
They should be over the convoy in half an hour, sir.
You mean...they should be over what's left of it.
Get my car out, Pearse.
And if Admiral Payne rings here...
I've gone back to the Operations Room.
Very good, sir.
CONTROLLER:
Pedestal now ten miles ahead of you. Out.
The fighters should sight Pedestal Convoy at any minute now, sir.
OPERATOR:
Yes, we must keep one runway open.
Sir, another 25-plus bandits approaching Pedestal from the north.
CONTROLLER: Hello, Epsom Leader, 25-plus bandits approaching Pedestal from the north.
Engage!
- Engage!
Hello, Epsom Leader. Vector 2-9-0.
Buster. Buster. Over.
Tally-ho. Bandits ahead and below.
Green Section break away. Take high-level bombers. Blue Section up sun.
PILOT: Got him. That's a beauty.
Close in, number two.
Get up, you clot! Green three, watch your tail!
- He's on fire. Got him!
Hello, Pedestal, this is Epsom Leader.
I think they've had it now.
Am taking up umbrella cover. Over.
This is Pedestal.
Thank you, Epsom. Nice work.
We're very glad to see you.
Not nearly so glad as we are to see you, chum.
Four, eh?
Well, that's more than last time, anyway.
And full of lovely grub.
Aye, but not a ruddy tanker among the lot of them.
What do you think we're going to fly the planes on - dried milk?
What the hell's happened to the Ohio, eh?
She was hit six times, sir.
After she'd been abandoned, parties of volunteers got back on board...twice.
Each time she was hit again.
She was still afloat the last time we saw her, but on fire aft.
I should like to say, sir, that everyone realised the importance of getting her in.
They did their best.
It's all right, Whittaker. We know that.
What are you going to do now, sir?
Well, that's our headache, my boy.
You go and get some rest.
Thank you, sir.
Well, as a matter of interest, what are we going to do now?
They may hang me... but that doesn't make me a traitor.
Malta is my country...
..and what I wanted to do was to save her from any more of this suffering and misery.
You and...you and Paolo and Maria... all of you, you're good people.
But you don't understand these things.
From where I was, I could see it all.
The British are finished. They cannot win.
Why should Malta go on being crucified when a few bold strokes would save us all?
You do see, Mother?
You do know that what I was trying to do was the best for Malta and for all of you?
You chose your side...as we have all had to do.
Yes, but my side was the right side - the sensible side that would bring peace.
You chose as you thought right, my son.
We have done the same.
The choices were different, that is all.
Ah...well.
At least you will not be pointed at in Malta.
I have arranged that.
- How's Paolo?
- Well.
And Maria?
She is well too.
It is best that they should not know about this.
Not for my sake, you understand, but for theirs.
You will tell them that you have had a letter to say that I have died in Italy.
Oh...
Oh, you know I would have wished to stay and help you.
Giuseppe.
Is it permitted that I give my son this?
It is only a crucifix.
No, madam, I'm sorry.
But I'll give it to the priest for him.
I'll make sure he gets it.
You see...
.. I am dead now.
You cannot touch me or give me anything.
Except your blessing.
They will not mind that.
I loved you all...
..but I am dead now.
Give me your blessing, Mother...
(Tearfully)..and go.
Frank...your tanker's coming in.
They've managed to put out the fire. To stop her sinking she's lashed to a destroyer.
Thank God for the Navy.
- Sound the alert.
- But she's not a ship of war, sir.
Isn't she?
- Sound the alert.
- Bugler, sound the alert.
FRANK: Rommel is here.
And here, at a place called El Alamein, is the 8th Army.
If the Germans manage to advance now,
Rommel will be able to pierce our main defence line before the 8th Army's had time to consolidate.
In other words, he'll grab the initiative before they're ready to hit back.
Right. Ourjob's simple. To slow down and stop Rommel by cutting off his supplies.
That's why you gentlemen with Wellingtons and Beauforts have been sent to us from the Middle
East. If his convoys come this way, they' ll run into the Middle East
Air Force and the Fleet, so they'll almost certainly come straight down here.
Well, as you can see, Malta is an ideal position as a base for attack.
We've begun well.
Two ships sunk out of a convoy of four.
But that is only a beginning.
From now until the Afrika Korps is bogged down, you're going to keep at it day and night.
This is an all-out offensive operation.
The restrictions on the use of petrol and ammunition are off, and so is the ban on talking to base from the air.
These convoys have got to be found, and if you run into trouble with enemy fighters through talking to base in finding them, then you'll just have to run into it and get out of it the best way you can.
Now a lot of you have been used to taking it.
We're now going to dish it out.
We're going to crack Rommel on the nose, even if we bark our knuckles a bit doing it.
Have you anything to add to that, Admiral?
Only that now we've got submarines based at Malta again, we'll play in this band too.
Big show this time, Peter. Big tanker, two supply ships and five escorts.
- Right, I'll watch them.
- I could sleep for a week.
Stand by.
Fire one.
One fired, sir.
- Where to, skipper?
- The Eyetie battle fleet.
Peter Ross spotted them this morning, between Sicily and Sardinia.
(Low whistle) What do we get for a battleship? A case of Scotch?
I'm afraid I'll be a bit out of touch after all this... but I think I can get a readership in archaeology.
I was practically promised it just before the war began.
Then we could go and live in Cambridge.
Cambridge?
- What is it like, Cambridge?
- Very beautiful.
Much more beautiful than Oxford.
You'd have to give tea parties.
- Why?
- One does in Cambridge.
Oh.
Perhaps we'd both hate it.
I'd rather do field work really.
Could you bear it?
Living in Mesopotamia or
Jutland or Palestine...
..or wherever my work took me.
It'll be a free world.
We'll see a lot of it.
That's all I can offer you, really.
To see our world and explore its past.
And children, of course.
Our children? Or just children?
Our children.
How many shall we have?
I would like six. But one must, of course, wait and see what God sends.
Six?
I'm not sure that we shall be able to afford six.
Not unless I get a chair.
A chair?
- Being made professor is called getting a chair. - Oh.
Professor.
Professor. Professor Ross.
No contact, sir.
- We've lost them. - Probably doubled back in the night. - The biggest convoy... they've tried. Everything set up and we have to have this filthy weather.
I don't think it's any good stooging around in this, Peter. Just a waste of petrol.
If they doubled back, they might be anywhere in the Mediterranean.
Hm. Does that mean that I can reckon to be free for an hour?
No. You'd better stand by in case it clears.
You can see her this evening.
All right.
Let me know the moment it's at all possible.
The weather can change pretty quickly in these parts.
- The Met report says we should have sunshine. - I dare say, but that's three hours wasted.
If we don't find them today, we won't find them until tomorrow.
And after that it'll be the very devil to get at them.
I'm going down to the airfield to have a look.
Afternoon, Bartlett. Afternoon, Matthews.
Afternoon, sir. I think it'll clear up a bit, sir.
- You've got someone standing by?
- Yes, sir. Peter Ross.
He might get off. It's still a bit thick but...
- Go and find him, will you?
I'd like a word. - Yes, sir.
We've got to get you on to these people before dark.
- So make sure you're absolutely ready to go. - Very good, sir.
- Afternoon, Ross.
- Afternoon, sir.
You've seen this convoy. It's the biggest yet and it's got to be found.
Go and find it.
- And ifyou can't see it, find it by smell.
- Yes, sir.
It's still pretty thick here, but it may be better further out.
We shall only just get on to them before dusk anyway, so if you pick them up you will radio their position.
Don't talk until you've found them.
And when you do, give it to us at once.
Does that apply to wherever they are, sir? - It applies wherever they are.
Do you understand, Ross?
Yes, sir.
Then get going and quick.
MAN: I'll send a report as soon as we get anything.
Yes. Something might be coming up.
No, no activity over this side.
He's got long-range tanks on, but even so, he's got about one more hour before he'll have to pack it in.
- Nothing from Ross yet?
- No, sir.
Where is he? Is he still on the plot?
Well, I don't see why he's messing about down there.
They're almost certain to be steering due east now.
Hello, Striker. Hello, Striker.
This is Picture One.
- Here he is, sir.
- Put him on the speaker.
PETER:
Enemy destroyer travelling at full speed.
May have made a depth-charge attack and now regaining convoy.
Am shadowing. Bright sunshine here.
Out.
He' ll have to be mighty quick if he's going to find them, sir.
He's blown the gaff about his position.
They'll be on to him in a few minutes.
- They've probably got fighters in the air now. - Mm.
PETER: Tally-ho.
Convoy sighted about ten miles ahead.
Can't quite see yet, but I make it one big tanker...
..three other big ships... and four destroyers.
Sir, six enemy aircraft approaching.
Damn, that was quick work.
Tip him off about this.
Tell him to get his picture and get out.
Give the bombers a position and get 'em off.
Hello, Picture One. Hello, Picture One.
This is Striker. Six bandits at 20,000 feet.
Get your picture and then vamoose pronto. Over.
Righto. Going in for picture now.
Yes.
One tanker, three biggish chaps, four destroyers.
A lot of flak coming up.
I think one of the destroyers is one of those new special jobs.
No sign of your bandits yet.
They're up sun to him now, sir.
Tell him to break away and get out quick.
Hello, Picture One. Break off contact and return base. Watch them out of the sun.
Message received, understood and welcomed.
I'm breaking away now.
Your little friends are with me.
Ah, this is where it gets tricky.
Rather uncomf...
Hello, Picture One. Hello, Picture One.
Are you receiving? Over.
It may only be his transmitter, sir.
- Are the bombers off yet?
- Taking off now, sir.
Good.
They'll just make it before dark.
Hello, Picture One.
Are you receiving? Over.
- The Wimpeys are over them now, sir.
- Good.
Extra!
Extra! Extra!
GOVERNOR: We have seen hardship and we have seen triumph.
We shall see more of both.
If history remembers us, let it say that we stood fast in faith, giving freely what little we had and what little we were.
Never doubting that we spent ourselves for the general good.
Subtitles by:
Boris J.
I, Hamar, lord high priest of Egypt... 
... am preparing a chronicle of the reign of Khufu... 
... ruler of Egypt. 
Word has come that again... 
... he has been victorious in the war against our enemies. 
And now Egypt has taken its place as the greatest of all nations in the world. 
Today, Pharaoh and his army return. 
This was Pharaoh... 
... direct descendant of our deity Amun... 
... god of the sun, who rules the heavens... 
... as Pharaoh rules the Earth. 
Again, he brought treasure... 
... gold and precious jewels taken from our enemies. 
For to Pharaoh, riches were power. 
And power was to be desired. 
And also again, he brought many captives... 
... for is it not by slaves that one becomes even richer... 
... and then has more power?
Greetings, my lord priest.
Sire, the gods rejoice at your safe return.
Thank you, my lord priest.
Your Majesty.
My lord, it is good to have you back.
It is good to be back.
I'm afraid to touch you because of the dirt of travel.
Perhaps my lord would care to remove the dirt.
An excellent idea.
Then I will come to my lord.
When I am ready, I will send you word.
I rejoice at your safe return, my lord.
Thank you.
- Your name is?
- Mayva, my lord. oh, yes, I remember.
Has the bird learned to speak yet? oh, yes, my lord, but only in private.
Well, perhaps it's better that way.
Hamar, dear friend, it's good to see you again. I've missed you.
I've missed you too, sire.
It's been three long months.
We've much to talk about.
But first, I must bathe.
The sand seems to get in every pore of one's body.
Why can't we do away with the desert, Hamar?
I'm only a priest, not a god, sire. outside of a discomfort, the desert hasn't been too much...
...of an obstacle to you in the past or this time.
No, the Egyptian soldier fights well in the desert.
- I've done well, Hamar. very well.
- So I have heard.
Four hundred men loaded with treasure.
Wait till you see it.
That feels much better.
Tell the queen I've finished.
Well, have I changed?
Not very much.
You're one war older, that's all.
I hope to age by many more before my time is come.
More wars, more treasure.
Still not enough?
You know I can't resist gold.
Yes, I know.
The first fight we had as children, remember?
We fought for a little gold ring that had been a gift to me.
You won the fight and you took the ring.
And you tricked me into some wager and got it back before nightfall, remember?
And you've been fighting for gold ever since.
And I mean to keep it forever.
Hamar...
I see that you have cleansed yourself of the desert, my lord.
You are beautiful.
Even more beautiful than my memories of you.
Three months in the desert is a long time.
- Perhaps that's why...
- No, to any man at any time.
Isn't that so, Hamar?
Hamar...
He's gone.
You've always said he's the wisest man in the kingdom.
And by his going, he proved it.
Each morning and each night...
...I prayed to the gods for your safe and speedy return.
Let me look at you.
Am I a fool to leave you here and roam the world seeking for treasure?
No, my lord, if treasure's what you want.
I want treasure, yes.
But there's something else I want too.
And that is?
I've been thinking, Egypt is a great country.
When I am gone, who will rule?
I want an heir. A son.
I know, my lord.
You have fought five wars in the six years of our marriage.
This has not been your home, only a place to leave to another war.
I know that.
Supposing I say I'll stay at home and not go to war?
I will not ask that of you. only stay with me for a little while...
...and if the gods will it, I will give you a son.
- I'm looking for a prisoner called vashtar.
- I'm he.
I've brought you food and wine and various supplies.
You can put it in the tent over there.
- You mean you brought this for me?
- Yes.
- What about the others?
- Food and wine is yours.
- Do with it as you please.
- Thank you. We'll use it.
Mikka, take charge of the food.
Give it to those who need it most.
- Yes, sir. I'll take charge of the wine too.
- Mikka, the wine's for the sick.
- Yes, sir. I'll see to it.
- Senta, go with Mikka.
Senta, don't you understand?
They've brought us food.
Egyptian food?
Senta!
You have to excuse my son, captain.
He's too young to accept captivity.
It doesn't matter. I bring another message for you.
This afternoon, we bury some of our people who were killed in battle.
Perhaps you'd like to attend the ceremony.
- You're free to do so.
- Free?
- Aren't you afraid I might try to escape?
- And leave your people?
- No, I don't think you'll escape.
- Perhaps you're right.
Yes, I should like to see the ceremony.
- I'll come for you when it is time.
- Thank you, captain.
People of Egypt...
...we meet here today to pay homage to our heroic dead.
Let their stilled hearts hear no sound of lamentation...
...only of rejoicing...
...that their destiny has been fulfilled.
Their earthly lives they have given...
...so that they and you may enjoy both the present and the second life.
Let them hear now the manner in which they will live.
Let the gods of Egypt speak.
In the name of the gods, listen.
Hear the voice of Osiris, the judge of the dead. 
The goddess, Isis, commands you to listen. 
Give heed to the god Anubia... 
... the conductor of the dead from this life to the next. 
Give heed in the name of the god Horus. 
Let Pharaoh now, the living god of Egypt, speak.
And in the name of the gods, listen.
This is my decree.
The bodies of those who died well and bravely by my side...
...shall be delivered to the City of the Dead.
Fine linen and armor shall be their burial garments.
They shall rest in tombs of stone.
And for their comfort in the second life, they shall have ample treasure.
To each man, three measures of gold and nine measures of silver. one vessel each of onyx and alabaster.
Food and wine in plenty.
All this and all honor shall each man enjoy in the second life.
There we shall meet again...
...to stand side by side and serve.
Till then, farewell.
The gods of Egypt have spoken.
Listen to them, vashtar.
This is a funeral but they're not sad.
They almost seem as if they're happy.
I believe they are happy.
The life they hope for in the future seems to mean more than their present life.
I wonder if any of them ever saw or spoke to somebody living in the future.
I don't think so, Mikka.
I'd rather enjoy this life.
Mind you, the wine in the grave sounds a good idea.
But how do I know I'd be thirsty? officer, what is this? Another ceremony?
Yes, if you could call it that.
The singing is different.
This time they're not happy.
This is for those who were cowards in battle.
Those who deserted or failed in their duty.
They will not be buried and will therefore have no second life.
That is why their people mourn.
Strange religion to deny the future to one who fails in the present.
Look, vashtar.
Look what they're doing.
Hamar, look.
This is the portion of the spoils that I've chosen to be mine.
Look at this. Feel it.
I love the feel of gold.
There's no other metal like it.
Add this to what I have already, and it'll be the greatest treasure in the world.
No man will ever have had so much.
That is true, sire.
Now all that remains is to build a tomb to receive it and my body.
A tomb that no man can violate, where I can rest in peace...
...and enjoy all this in my second life.
- You've got my instructions?
- I did, sire.
Builders have been at work day and night since the message came.
Their plans are ready for you to see.
Do you think their work is good?
It is your treasure, sire, and your tomb. You must be the judge.
That means you don't like them?
You must decide, sire.
And what is this?
A labyrinth to hide the passage to the tomb?
Here is the beginning, my lord.
And here is the maze that hides the secret.
It will make the tomb secure so...
Secure as the last tomb in which a labyrinth was used?
My ancestor Serati was protected by such a labyrinth.
Perhaps you heard what happened to him. And this?
This is different, my lord.
- It begins here...
- Different in what way?
I just brought treasure back to Egypt that was stolen from a tomb like this...
...three nights after the crypt was sealed.
And look what we have here. Hamar, it's like meeting an old friend.
A false tunnel and a false crypt to hide the real one.
It would scarcely keep out the wind.
Are they all like these?
What reason is there to build a pyramid to hold a tomb...
...if the tomb may be violated?
It is better to lay the treasure on the sand...
...so that the thieves will not disturb my body.
You may go, all of you.
Go home and consider yourselves lucky...
...that you've escaped the lash or the dungeon.
Go on. Get out of here!
- I was afraid of this, Hamar.
- I'm sorry, sire.
These plans have been used for a royal tomb...
...and not one has escaped the grave robbers.
There are many thieves and very few Pharaohs.
I'm waiting to hear your solution, sire.
Why do you presume I have one?
You were curiously gentle with the builders.
Does anyone have a secret from you?
What is your plan, sire?
Do you know what happened in the last battle for that Cushite city? only the outcome.
Yes, the outcome was very nearly disastrous for us.
There were three passes that led into the city.
Two of them were narrow, rock-filled nightmares...
...where a legion could be held by half as many.
The third was almost a highway.
There seemed to be no possible defense.
That highway was one of the most cunning traps...
...that has ever been constructed.
When we were well into it...
...parts of the road dropped, creating pitfalls. other parts suddenly rose as if by magic...
...giving shelter to the defenders.
Luckily, I had sent small divisions through the other passes.
They fought their way through and fell upon the defenders from behind.
The man who constructed those defenses...
...was the finest builder who has ever worked with stone.
When the city was taken...
...I gave a gold sword to the soldier who brought him to me alive.
- Is his name vashtar?
- What?
When I heard of a special treatment, the tent and the food you ordered...
...for one of the captives,
I made some inquiries.
I had him brought here.
He's waiting outside.
Bring him here.
Is the captive vashtar here yet?
- Yes, my lord.
- Bring him in.
I should have known better than try to keep a secret from you, my friend.
You are vashtar?
The man who prepared the defenses of your city?
I am the architect who drew the plans.
You cost me many lives. I congratulate you on your work.
Each of us must fight with weapons as he has.
Yes, I know that because I'm a soldier.
I do not intend to punish you, architect, but to reward your skill.
You shall build for me.
Do you understand what these are?
Yes, Pharaoh. They're designs for a royal tomb within a pyramid.
But I do not understand what you want of me.
All the world knows that in the building of pyramids...
...Egypt is unsurpassed.
- True enough.
But where we have failed is making the tomb secure against violation.
Can it be done? Can you do it?
Perhaps. But I have a better plan.
Load your treasure onto boats.
Float them to the deepest part of the ocean and sink them there.
Then you need not fear that anyone will rob you of what you've stolen.
Men don't talk to me like that.
I could make you wish those words had not been spoken.
But unfortunately, you have need of my talent.
As I thought, you're a shrewd man. What's your price?
- My price?
- What do you want?
Nothing you would give me.
Even what little I know of Egyptian customs tells me if I build it...
...I sign my own death warrant. Is that not so?
While you build my tomb, you can build your own as well.
Let it be done as richly as you please.
Every honor shall be given to you and yours.
Fair prospect and a good offer.
Provided one believes in the second life. I do not.
Look elsewhere for your architect.
- I told you before...
- one moment, sire.
With your permission, perhaps I can convince this man to do as you ask.
I fear not. There is no reason why I should serve you.
There are many reasons.
I'll show you.
Follow me.
- Do you know what lies behind that wall?
- I do.
Your people are not far from there.
And only your talent stands between them and the wall.
You were right when you said there were many reasons.
If I serve you, will you spare my people?
- All of them.
- Will you set them free?
If your plan pleases me, they shall be freed as soon as the work is done. All of them.
Except for yourself.
When I have conceived a plan, I will send you word.
Good. Hamar, see that he has all he needs.
Work swiftly, architect.
That I may die the sooner?
No, that your people may live.
Well, architect, you sent word you had a plan.
I believe I have. one minute. Both of you, go.
Well, what is it?
It's to use the best labyrinth designed by your builders.
- A labyrinth?
- You know these labyrinths were rejected.
- That was...
- I know that, but hear me out.
After your body is placed in the tomb...
...the labyrinth will be sealed. Every passage...
...every foot of the way from the burial chamber...
...to the door of the pyramid, sealed with solid stones.
Solid stones? But that would take years and in that time...
No, Pharaoh, not years.
- It can be done in a few minutes.
- You are a fool.
What power could move stones in that time?
A power that Egypt possesses in abundance.
I will show you. Follow me.
What is this?
It is with stones such as this, and others, that the passages will be sealed.
- I asked you before, with what power?
- Sand.
- With what?
- With sand.
Wait, Pharaoh. If the boy can lower that stone...
...precisely into place using only one hand, will you believe me?
I did believe in you once, architect.
If this is a joke, you and your people will regret it.
Senta, lower the stone.
It will be the same with a larger stone.
They'll be lowered in every foot of the labyrinth.
And others on top of them.
Until the whole tomb is surrounded by solid stone.
To enter, you'll have tear the pyramid apart.
Do you believe me now?
Tomorrow I shall give orders to start the work.
You have served me well, architect.
Take this as a token of my gratitude.
You promised that when the work was completed, you would set my people free.
- I will keep that promise.
- The work will take many years.
A long time for a people to remain in slavery.
I must ask you this.
Set free a certain number every year while the work is in progress.
If you do this, I will serve you.
I will not bargain with you, architect.
But my pleasure in your work grants your wish.
Let it be done as he asks.
Come, we have much to do.
This day, I have sent couriers to every part of our country...
...to every city and village.
They carry this decree.
That I have set a task for Egypt... 
... which in any other land would be impossible. 
On the desert sands, you will raise a pyramid. 
A structure greater than any other in the world. 
This pyramid shall be my resting place for the second life. 
Each man has a covenant with me. 
To work as man has not yet worked in all time. 
And as the living god of Egypt...
...I promise you that each man, by his labor...
...shall secure for himself a place in the life to come.
What say you?
As with one heart... 
... the people responded to the call of their Pharaoh. 
They came from the farms and the groves... 
... from the valleys and the hill countries. 
They gave up their accustomed lives and marched to their holy labor. 
They sang... 
... songs of their faith... 
... and of their joy. 
Three million of such stones would be needed... 
... before the work was done. 
Three million stones of an average weight of 5000 Ibs. 
Every stone cut precisely to fit into its destined place... 
... in the great pyramid. 
From the quarries, they pulled the stones across the desert... 
... to the banks of the Nile. 
Never in the history of the world has so great a task been performed. 
Their faith gave them strength. 
Their joy gave them song. 
Look out!
In a little more than a year, the hallowed ground had been prepared... 
... and the first courses of stone had been raised. 
And still they sang. 
What is that stone, father?
That's the sarcophagus of the Pharaoh.
The stone will withhold his body after death.
- Is that thing hollow then, master?
- Yes.
The top part can be lifted to receive the body.
Where does it go to?
Into a great chamber in the pyramid.
But where that is you must not know.
There's already the first three courses of the stones.
When it's finished, there'll be more than 200 of them.
With all those men, the work will be finished quickly, won't it, father?
No, Senta. No, it will take a long time.
They'll work for many years.
And some will grow old and some will die.
And the stones of the pyramid will be cemented with blood and tears.
And the years passed. 
And in those years, the joy in the hearts of the people was stilled. 
And in place of the song came the drum. 
And with the drum, the whip. 
And the spirit and the faith were gone. 
And the work became labor. 
Remember, Senta, how they sang when they hauled the stones?
They stopped singing 15 years ago.
I thought it would be done so quickly.
And you were only a boy then.
I was a slave then, and I'm still a slave.
Yes, Egypt has changed. 
Changed because of the pyramid. 
To build a tomb to house one man in his second life... 
... thousands are finding misery in this life. 
Pharaoh has changed too. 
He has riches, power... 
... even the son he desired. 
But he is like a man obsessed. 
I never came here before.
The guards would not let me, Father.
Why do you keep it locked up?
Gold is desired by every man, my son.
There are many who would rob me of this...
...take from me what I have accumulated for my second life.
But all this is mine and will stay mine.
And when my tomb is finished and sealed...
...it will be mine while the earth stands, till the end of time.
You're hurting me, father.
I'm sorry.
My lord, forgive me for disturbing you, but it is time for the boy to go to bed.
I was my fault. I forgot the time.
Come on, Xenon.
Thank you, father.
You call yourselves builders.
I want no more excuses.
No more old women's tales of why this won't be done or can't be done.
It will be done. or you'll go to the quarries yourselves, all of you.
I'll teach you the meaning of work.
In the next month, one complete level of the stones will be raised.
- It cannot be done.
- You are near the top.
- There are fewer stones on each level.
- But the stones must be raised higher.
And because the nearby quarries are almost exhausted...
...the stones must be brought a greater distance.
- Always some reason...
- The man is right, sire.
You too, Hamar?
Are you telling me that what
I ask for cannot be done? only with more workers, sire.
I'll get more.
We don't have supplies to feed a new army of labor, sire.
If you have sufficient, will there be any more excuses?
None, sire.
- And you?
- None, sire.
I'll get men. And I'll get food.
Ambassador of the land of the Amorites.
Mighty Pharaoh, 700 head of cattle have been brought to you by our people.
The decree is not yet fulfilled.
Two thousand measures of grain were also called for.
Why have you not brought the rest?
In lieu of the grain, of which we have none...
...my ruler sends you 500 weights of silver.
I am content. Note that the decree is fulfilled.
The next.
Ambassador of the tributary province of Cyprus.
Ambassador of the tributary province of Cyprus.
What is this? Who answers for Cyprus?
I do.
Who are you?
I am Nellifer, Princess of Cyprus.
Why did you not answer when you were called?
This is the first time I have served as an ambassador.
The duties are new and strange to me.
You are young for such a role, princess.
Perhaps my lord would prefer it if I were old.
We are only interested in the tribute that you bring.
What tax was decreed for the province of Cyprus?
Two thousand measures of grain, a thousand of oil...
...and of cattle, 800 head.
What have you brought?
Nothing, my lord. I came in place of the tribute.
You came in its place?
Yes, my lord.
- Why?
- My country is poor.
To pay the tribute, some of us must starve.
Starving?
You do not have the appearance of starving.
If I do not please you, you may send me back.
It will be a great burden to my country, but your tribute will be paid.
- If that is what you wish.
- I could have both.
No, my lord, not both.
You may choose between me and the tribute from my father.
I said I could have both.
And I said not both, but you may choose.
You have much to learn, princess.
And we will start your education now.
See that she is securely locked up...
...and her father notified that payment is demanded.
I do not allow brawling in my court.
Take them both away. Lash the slave to teach him manners. one moment, my lord.
Would you punish a slave for merely obeying?
I told him to act.
See that they are both lashed.
And give her her cloak, that she may hide her starved appearance.
You took it from me.
It is mine no longer.
Now the next.
The ambassador of Al-Hasa.
Bring the girl Nellifer to my room.
In the presence of Pharaoh, you kneel.
All right, you can go.
Education is sometimes painful, isn't it?
Drink this.
Do I stay, or do you want the tribute?
Both.
Don't ever do that again.
I'll offer you wine just once more.
And I will only take it when you have chosen.
It's the only way, my lord.
In the succeeding weeks, she became the favorite of the Pharaoh. 
They were married and she became his second wife. 
Sit here, my lady.
I have provided sport for your amusement.
What form of sport, my lord?
A test of strength between myself and another living god of Egypt.
You shall see.
I have heard many stories, my lord, of the treasure you have gathered.
They probably lie, because no man could have as much as they say.
They do not lie.
But they only guess, because none have seen it.
And I may not see it?
Yes. Yes, you shall judge whether the stories are true.
You shall see for yourself.
Well?
You were right, my lord.
Those that speak of the treasure do not lie.
But their stories do not do it justice.
You wish to know how they were won or where they came from?
No. only to see it and to feel it.
Just like a woman.
- Would you change me, sire?
- No, no, never.
Feels almost soft, like something to be caressed. only gold feels that way.
Words from my own mouth. We are much alike.
If you like it, take it. Take what you want.
I will thank you when I have chosen.
It's all so beautiful.
What lies beyond that door?
That is my own domain. I alone go there.
I have taken my son, my priest, no others.
And I may not enter?
Yes, yes, you may.
Captain, bring a torch, that she may see the better.
I want you to see what I've chosen.
It's unbelievable.
It's even more beautiful than that outside.
For this, I fought hard and long.
I shed my blood and the blood of those who followed me.
What I have chosen here represent...
Take off those jewels.
- What?
- Take them off.
- But I would have this, sire.
- No.
But my lord told me to choose.
Not of this. of that outside.
You may choose what you like of that.
But all this must stay as it is.
Until the time when it's removed to the pyramid, to my tomb.
All? Surely not all for one man.
All. The contents of this room are the symbols of my life to come.
They are not for this life.
Not to adorn my body or yours or any living thing.
Take off those jewels.
Yes, my lord.
Well, what is it?
Sire, certain of your guests are departing.
- The high priest suggests that you return...
- All right, I am coming.
May I stay a little, sir. that I may see better all that is yours?
Yes, come when you've finished.
- See that all is secure.
- Yes, sire.
What is your name, captain?
Treneh, my lady.
And your duties, captain?
I'm charged by Pharaoh with the security of his treasures, my lady.
Guarding all the Pharaoh's treasures is a great responsibility, captain.
Yes, my lady.
What if I were to take this?
You heard the Pharaoh's orders.
Then you must take it from me.
Remember your duty, captain.
I wish it were mine to give.
Unfortunately, it is not.
Now also the quarries are becoming exhausted. 
Great holes have been cut in the earth. 
It is well that the work is nearly completed... 
... as each day the gathering of the stone becomes more difficult. 
Now too, the finer stone for the outer covering of the pyramid... 
... is being brought from remote quarries on the upper Nile. 
Good evening, my lady.
Good evening, captain.
You may go, Mabuna.
You sent for me, my lady.
That is right, captain.
May I ask why?
Need there be a reason?
No, I presume not.
Would you have some wine, captain?
No, thank you.
You seem nervous and afraid.
Why?
Perhaps because you are Queen of Egypt.
Even a queen may be lonely.
Perhaps that's why I asked you to come.
That would make a difference.
Then you are no longer afraid?
No.
- Well, Senta?
- I'd like to talk to you, sir.
I was just stopping anyhow.
- You've finished your work?
- Until tomorrow.
The planning for the inner part of the pyramid?
Not yet. I wish it were.
There is a lot to be done yet.
- Is that what you wanted to talk about?
- No, sir.
Found this old scarab today.
Perhaps you can tell me what the inscription means.
I'm sorry. I'm afraid I can't.
That's strange.
You yourself gave it to me years ago and told me its history.
I must have forgotten all about it.
You do not work nights anymore. Why?
Don't hide things from me, sir. You just can't see.
I've been noticing it for months.
- Is it all that apparent?
- only to one who knows you.
I'm an old man now, Senta.
Faculties begin to go.
It's all right in the daytime.
But at night, by torchlight,
I can't see things close to.
The light in the pyramid comes from torches.
How will you work? Read your own figures, do what you have to do?
- I shall find a way.
- You start your actual work soon.
How is that to be done?
I go to the palace tonight to receive my instructions from Pharaoh.
Whatever those may be, you will need help.
You are offering to give it to me? No, Senta.
No one need know what you tell me.
Don't you realize what would happen if anyone suspected you knew?
- I do.
- Well?
You need help. Your work depends on it. our people's freedom depends on you.
The boy's right, vashtar.
Are you asking me to choose between my son and our people?
What happens to our people and your son if you fail to fulfill your part of the bargain?
I don't know.
It's settled, then.
I'll only accept your help if
I can think of no other way.
A man thinks best on a full stomach.
Greetings, Pharaoh.
Architect, I understand that you're ready to start work on the inner labyrinth...
...the secret part of my tomb.
That is true, my lord.
I've given considerable thought as to the method of doing this work...
...so that the secret will remain ours.
Yes, my lord.
These men are your assistants.
They are priests, and they may be trusted completely.
They have been well schooled to work in stone.
You will obey the orders of the architect as though they were mine. Understood?
Their tongues have been cut out...
...so that even in their sleep they will not betray the secret.
- They will die when we die.
- So many?
And they are volunteers, so spare me any humane speeches.
You trust no vows, not even those of your own faith?
No. I have not gone as far as this, done what I have done...
...to risk betrayal by any man, not even my own flesh and blood.
I see.
Now, as to the workers, the men who do the actual labor...
...they will be blindfolded and led into the pyramid by these men. on their way out, their eyes will again be covered.
So they won't know where they've been or where in the pyramid they've worked.
That at least sounds logical.
Have you any suggestions?
You seem to have thought of everything, my lord.
Then the work will begin tomorrow. oh, and, Hamar, see that these men have the best of food and wine...
...slaves and pleasure when their daily work is done.
Your goodness and charity have pleased them, my lord.
Well, see that your work pleases me as well.
No man must loosen his blindfold.
The penalty for knowing the way to the inner chamber is death.
This man's working with me.
Make sure your blindfolds are tight.
- Why are we stopping?
- Never mind.
Slip your blindfold a minute, Senta. Go carefully.
This is a further test to determine if the workers can see.
- They think of everything, don't they?
- There are many traps like this.
You'll need to remember them.
No. No, that stone goes in later, when you finish both sides.
Do you understand?
I'll come back.
Carefully. There are three steps here.
Lift your blindfold a minute.
This is the beginning of the labyrinth.
Most of these passages are only to deceive.
We go on this way.
You may remove your blindfold now.
But do not leave under any circumstances without putting it on.
This room is the exact center of the pyramid...
...and will be the key to the device for sealing the tomb.
When the trigger is released in the burial chamber...
The stone will slide down that ramp into this room...
...and set in motion forces that will spread throughout the pyramid.
Now, you'll begin the construction on that wall there...
...according to these plans here, as you see.
All ready down here. Start it up slowly.
Up slowly.
- Senta.
- Yes, sir.
What is this figure and this angle?
The figure is six. The angle is three divisions.
Thank you. I am going to the upper chamber.
I should be back in about an hour.
We have plenty to do.
You'd better get up there, both of you.
See that the stone is securely fastened.
- Where is the architect vashtar?
- He left through that passage, sire.
- Where does that lead to?
- We are not told, sire.
Get this off my leg.
Roll out.
Help me up.
You have a bad cut. I'll stop the bleeding.
Get some help.
There isn't any help. The mute priests are finished.
It will be an hour before some of the others get back.
Tell me if I get it too tight.
It'll stop the bleeding for a while.
You'll have to get out of here.
Can you walk if I help you?
It's no use. We can't get out of the labyrinth.
- I don't remember the way.
- I do.
You?
See if you can walk.
Who are you that know the secret of my tomb?
I am a son of vashtar.
Then you are also aware...
Yes, I know the penalty of knowing the secret.
Enough of this. Stop fussing about nothing.
It's only a wound. This isn't the first time it's ever happened.
Do something useful. Get me a stick so that I can walk.
Young man, today you saved my life.
And I am not fool enough to think it was done because of loyalty to me...
...but rather because of your loyalty to vashtar the architect.
For when I die, he dies too. Is that the reason?
That was the only reason.
And you learned the secret of the labyrinth from him.
- I know it, that should be sufficient.
- No, it is not.
I believe that vashtar's sight is failing, sire.
- Undoubtedly, they've shared the secret.
- Is this true?
Come now, if his sight is going, it will be easy to find out.
- His eyes are failing.
- Young man...
...I am asking you these questions...
...to justify myself in allowing you to live while I live.
And to allow you to assist vashtar until the work is done.
- I take it that's what you want.
- That's true, sir.
Well, it merely means that one more will die when I die.
However, I must feel that the secret is safe with you.
To be sure that you know the fate of your people...
...if that secret is revealed.
- I know only too well.
- I believe you do.
And I believe I can take that risk.
Thus, since you saved my life, while I live, you shall live well.
- A palace, slaves, gold, anything...
- I live with my people.
I prefer to continue that way. vashtar raised you, that's obvious.
Ask any reward and you shall have it instantly.
Anything within my power to grant.
- Except one thing.
- There's nothing that...
Clumsy fool! Look what you've done.
I am sorry, my lord.
This bottle contained a perfume which you yourself gave me.
This stupid slave has broken it. I was angry...
I did not break it.
You see? She is also insolent and slow to obey.
I'm not a slave of yours or anyone.
Silence. She will learn manners and to obey orders.
I am not a slave. I will not obey.
If she does not, see that she is whipped until she does.
- Take her away.
- My lord, give me this slave.
You told me that what I wanted would be given me.
The girl is mine, my lord.
You passed judgment. Let it be fulfilled.
"Ask any reward and you shall have it instantly. "
Those were your words, sire. I ask for the girl.
Take her.
What manner of judgment is this?
- You give me a slave and then you take it...
- Be still. I've given my word.
You have slaves enough for your amusement, mistress.
Judgment here is mine...
...to be decreed as I see fit and altered as I see fit.
Is that understood?
Yes, my lord.
Take the girl, Senta, and go. She's yours.
Thank you, sire.
Don't you understand?
Had that man not saved the Pharaoh...
...had he died today or if he were to die tomorrow...
...what would I be?
- You are his wife.
- No. only his second wife.
Today, he made a fool of me before the real wife and the whole court.
And if he were to die, I would be nothing, have nothing...
...unless I were queen.
What are you trying to tell me?
That Queen Nailla must die.
No, no. No, Nellifer.
- Look at me, Treneh.
- I'm afraid to.
Afraid of what I see in your face.
You want me, don't you?
Wouldn't you like to share with me what would be mine?
Not like that. We dare not.
Look at me. You say you love me.
Then you must choose for us both. or for yourself, while you are afraid to see what you see in my face.
Look at me and choose.
Either I am yours and you help me...
...or I go on without you.
Which is it to be?
I'm glad it will be this way.
Now we must plan.
Tomorrow I shall start by making a friend of the queen.
Whatever we do, it will be dangerous with the Pharaoh here.
Then you must see that he goes away while it is being done.
There's no use you just sitting there saying nothing.
What's your name, anyway?
Kyra.
What part of our country do you come from?
- Mekio.
- Young lady, by any chance, can you cook?
- of course I can cook.
- Well...
But I won't.
Senta, you say Pharaoh offered you a palace and fine food and wines.
And you refused him, and took her instead.
You drive a shrewd bargain.
Look, why don't you stop sulking?
Don't you realize they were gonna whip you?
- Then I'm not your slave?
- No.
Whoever heard of a slave having a slave?
- Is this what you have been eating?
- Every day.
- Have you any black pepper?
- Yes.
- And a little garlic.
- Yes.
- And bay leaves?
- Yes.
And some rice, and mint, and sugar for cakes?
Yes, but if we haven't, I'll soon get it.
Maybe you didn't do so badly after all.
- Greetings, my lord priest.
- Greetings, captain.
Well, captain?
My lord, I thought this might interest you.
How did you come by this, captain?
Came from one of the workmen on the pyramid. one of the new arrivals.
- A slave with such treasure?
- Yes, sire.
He came to me because he was very ill.
He hopes to buy his freedom with that.
Where did he get this?
He said it came from his native land of Tiba.
Then he told me of a tomb.
A tomb which was found under the sand in a valley, near the village of Byblos.
He said the tomb contained a vast treasure which this is only a small thing.
- Has any of this been reported?
- No, sire
Where is the man now?
Unfortunately, he died during the night, sire.
I cannot vouch for him, this statue is the only proof.
- Where is the rest of the treasure?
- According to the slave it's still in the tomb.
A small force could reach Byblos in five days.
Sooner the better. Slave could have told others.
Possibly. That's why I came to you immediately.
My lord, the wound in your leg has not yet completely healed.
The exercise will do it good. I'll go tomorrow.
- You've done well, captain.
- Thank you, sire.
May I come in?
- Good evening, Nellifer.
- Good evening, Your Majesty.
- Good evening, Xenon.
- Good evening, Lady Nellifer.
I've brought a present for Xenon.
- Do you hear that, Xenon?
- What did you bring me?
- Is it a flute?
- Not just a flute, a magic flute.
And when you learn to play it, it will do amazing things.
- Will you show me how?
- You sit down and I'll show you now.
Now, watch carefully.
It is very pretty.
If I learn to play it, what magic will it bring?
When you learn then you shall see. Now, I'll do it again.
The cobra will always come to the sound of the flute.
You've done well.
Bring the snake in a strong basket.
Be careful that no one sees you.
Xenon, it is time for you to go to bed.
- Just a little while, please?
- very well, but just for a few minutes.
It's very nice, Xenon. Just keep on playing.
Don't stop. Just keep on playing.
You better go, quickly.
And don't come back tonight.
Such a cruel way to die.
She was so gentle, so kind.
- What a terrible accident.
- And the young prince was not harmed? oh, no, my lord. The queen's body protected him.
Can you account for what happened?
The serpent must have been drawn to the music of the flute.
We all encouraged him to learn to play it.
Even the queen herself, after
Lady Nellifer gave it to him.
You say Lady Nellifer gave it to him?
Yes, she seemed very fond of him.
Who could have foreseen that this would happen?
- You may go now.
- Yes, my lord.
My lady.
My lady.
- I told you not to come back here tonight.
- It was necessary.
- Hamar sent a messenger to Pharaoh.
- I'm not surprised, it's his duty to do so.
Also, Your Majesty, he has sent men to every city in the kingdom.
To question any man who deals with serpents.
Every fakir, every handler of snakes.
- He suspects, then.
- Why else should he do it?
That is dangerous.
We must be rid of the man who gave us the snake.
Mabuna will silence him.
- Mabuna...
- No, wait, I have a better plan.
Where will Hamar's messenger find the Pharaoh?
At the oasis of Solaar. But what good will that do you to go?
- If Hamar finds...
- I will not go, Mabuna will go.
- What?
- Why not?
With Pharaoh dead, let
Hamar learn what he can.
- Because then I shall rule in Egypt.
- But...
Mabuna will not fail. Will you, Mabuna?
No, my lady.
Do you agree?
- Yes.
- Then tell him the way.
The oasis is near the border of Tiba. on the road to Byblos.
The queen is dead.
It's hard to believe.
I should not have left.
- You're sure my son was not harmed?
- only badly frightened, sire.
We leave for Luxor at dawn.
See that the men rest and the camels are ready to start then.
- Yes, sire.
- Leave me, all of you.
Guard!
Guard!
Who are you? Why did you?
You're Nellifer's slave.
Who told you to do this? Speak.
Who told you? Was it her doing?
Did she order it? Did she?
This slave tried to kill me. I want to know why.
Well, just don't stand there. Make him talk.
He's got to talk.
The man is dead, sire. only a few knew where I was. She was one of them.
- Be careful, sire, the wound is not serious...
- I know that.
- But you must not...
- Bandage it well.
You, prepare the fastest camels. I ride for Luxor tonight.
- But sire, your wound...
- I'm the best judge of that.
Do as you're ordered, at once.
Do you remember?
You said to me once, "If it were mine to give... "
It is not yet mine to give. But you wanted it.
I wanted it for a long time.
- Now it is yours.
- Yes.
Soon, all will be mine.
- Mabuna should be back tonight.
- Before morning.
Unless he fails.
- What's the matter?
- Nothing.
I suddenly felt cold as if...
As though...
What is the old saying?
As though someone walked on your grave.
Hold me. Tight.
- What's that?
- Camels.
A small troop of camels.
Stay here, all of you.
The camels are part of Pharaoh's bodyguard.
They could be bringing word.
You must go.
You shouldn't be here. Something tells...
Why do you come and see me when the Pharaoh is gone?
Even my slave is not here. Is that your doing?
Did you send him away? Answer me! oh, by the gods. You shall answer to Pharaoh when he returns.
- He shall answer to me now.
- oh, my lord.
- Traitor, coward.
- Sire.
You were afraid to strike with your own hand.
- Let me speak, sire.
- Now you shall die by mine.
So should all traitors die.
Nellifer, Nellifer.
- Yes, my lord?
- Call Hamar.
Quickly.
Yes, my lord.
You were badly hurt, sire.
I am dying.
Call Hamar, I must talk to him.
I've already called him.
Come closer, so that I can see your face.
Nellifer.
I thought it was your doing.
Because your slave attacked me.
- I'm glad it was not.
- Yes, my lord.
Not both, you said. Remember?
Not both. Choose. over and over again, you said, "Choose. "
And I chose.
And now, you are my queen.
Where is Hamar?
He is coming, sire.
We've not much time.
I am dying, and you are to live.
I ask only one thing of you.
Promise that I shall be buried as I planned.
Promise me.
Yes, I promise.
That's all I ask.
Just that you...
What is this?
There is only one way you could have come by this.
- So it was you!
- Yes.
And you can know now.
I planned it all and it's turned out as I hoped it would.
And do you hear that?
I told you once that your treasure was too much for one man.
And do you hear that too?
You think that you will cheat me?
You think that I shall not live long enough to see you die?
You will see.
Guard.
Guard.
Hamar.
I need you.
Help me.
You were right.
- He's dead.
- Are you sure?
The heralds are going through the city telling the people.
- May he find peace.
- How did he die, Mikka?
They didn't say.
I didn't expect it so suddenly. Did you, sir?
No, I didn't.
I thought we'd finish our work, our people would go free.
And we would have a number of years still to live.
You must go.
Both of you. Now, before they come.
No, Kyra.
If we were to run now, all we've worked for would be lost.
Don't be frightened, nothing can happen to us...
...until our task is completed.
How much remains to be done?
Not very much.
- Hamar.
- Yes, my prince?
- Must we wait for Queen Nellifer, Hamar?
- It is your duty, my prince.
I am afraid I'm going to cry.
- I don't want them to see me.
- oh, no, no, my prince.
You will not cry.
- You're your father's son.
- Yes, Hamar.
We share each other's sorrow, Prince Xenon.
Thank you. May I go now, Hamar?
Yes, my prince.
It is my wish that the doors to the treasure vaults be opened.
It shall be as you wish, Your Majesty.
What is all this? All the doors are open, it's gone.
- Where is the treasure?
- In that place for which it was destined.
The tomb in the pyramid.
- By whose orders?
- By Pharaoh's orders.
It's quite safe, Your Majesty.
His own guards protect it.
It is I now who decides what is safe in Egypt.
- Yes, Your Majesty.
- Have it brought here at once.
When you are in fact the queen, you will be obeyed, by myself, as by all.
What do you say? That I'm not the queen?
According to the laws of Egypt, when you have given burial to Pharaoh...
...when his body is laid within the tomb, you will inherit all that was his.
The treasure, the power, the state.
Until then, the will of the Pharaoh lives on.
The treasure remains in the tomb. That is the law.
- When is the burial?
- According to custom, 30 days from now.
- And then I rule in Egypt.
- Yes, Your Majesty. one more thing.
Why did you allow me to come down here to find this out?
Shall we say I would save her majesty from being told in public?
My lord priest, I'm well aware of your hostility and enmity.
May I say that the feeling is mutual.
Within 30 days, I...
A long time ago, Your Majesty, I made a pact.
I swore to be buried with my friend and ruler.
Therefore, madam, when you are queen, I will not be here.
And you no longer need to worry about me.
- Mikka.
- Yes, vashtar?
Perhaps it's time we talked of a few plans.
Now, yours will be the responsibility of leading our people home across the desert.
See they carry with them only what is necessary.
Many will be tempted to take more than they should.
Have they told you when we may go?
Hamar has promised that you're to be freed when Pharaoh is buried.
Two days from now. vashtar, you've never told me or our people and we ought to know.
How are you and Senta to?
- What is to be the manner of?
- I don't know.
I believe that Hamar intends to be sealed in the tomb with Pharaoh.
He and the mute priests.
I can only presume it will be the same for Senta and myself.
- But he hasn't told you it'll be so.
- Not yet.
Tomorrow, I'm to show him the device for sealing the tomb.
Perhaps we shall know then.
- Please, Kyra, don't.
- We have so little time.
- So little...
- I know, my darling, I know.
Hold me, hold me close to you.
My lord priest, yesterday Senta asked me a question that I could not answer.
- Maybe you would?
- Certainly, if I can.
These boats, sir. What are they for?
They are solar boats, for
Pharaoh to use after his burial.
They are the means by which Pharaoh will journey across the skies with the sun.
With the god Horus.
Each day they will sail from east to west.
And each night Pharaoh will return to the east by the river which runs under the earth.
I see.
Again, you'll probably not agree with our beliefs.
- Tell me, vashtar, what remains to be done?
- only the setting of the mechanism.
Apart from that, our work is finished.
You remember the stone we lowered for
Pharaoh and you, so many years ago?
- very well.
- This is exactly the same.
When those bits of earthenware are broken, the sand will run out...
...and the cover of the sarcophagus will be lowered.
While it's coming down...
...the lever will release a stone in the chamber beneath this one.
That stone will set in motion all the forces for sealing the pyramid.
How long will it take?
Within a few moments of that cover coming down, every passage will be closed.
- only this room will remain.
- Are you certain of this? once that starts down, no power on Earth can stop the rest.
That will be the end.
You have done well, vashtar. very well.
You have lived up to your bargain.
Now as to our part of the bargain...
...I will give orders that when the burial procession starts...
...your people will be released.
Those orders will include both of you.
You may lead your people home.
- You mean that...
- Yes, my friends.
There is no need for either of you to die.
When the tomb is sealed, the secret evaporates.
When it's solid stone, what does the way through the labyrinth matter?
I will believe always, or choose to believe, you planned it this way.
I also believe...
...Pharaoh would approve of what I'm doing.
Will you set the mechanism now?
People of Egypt.
In this moment, our Pharaoh puts down the burden of this life.
Let his lawful successor now claim the power and the glory that was his.
Are you, Nellifer, prepared to do this?
I, Nellifer, wife to Pharaoh, as regent for his son and heir...
...do assume the burden he has put down.
Are you then prepared to give him burial according to our laws and customs...
...that you may inherit that which was his?
- I am prepared.
For the last time...
...we will pay homage to our Pharaoh.
All is ready, Your Majesty.
You must give the order, Your Majesty.
The order is given.
It is done, Your Majesty.
Then, I, Nellifer, am now queen of Egypt. And I order...
- What is this?
- The tomb is being sealed, Your Majesty. oh, no.
No.
Show me the way out, I command you.
- Show me the way.
- There's no way out.
This is what you lied and schemed and murdered to achieve.
- This is your kingdom.
- No, no!
I don't wanna die. I don't wanna die!
I don't want to die, please help me!
I don't want to die.
So it's finished.
A structure to house one man and the greatest treasure of all time.
- And a structure to last for all time.
- only history will tell that.
- Will he be remembered?
- I don't think I'll ever forget him.
Yes, he'll be remembered.
The pyramid will keep his memory alive.
And that he built better than he knew.
Come, we have a long way to go.
[ENGLISH]
The Vikings in Europe of the eighth and ninth century
were dedicated to a pagan god of war, Odin.
Cramped by the confines of their barren, icebound northlands,
they exploited their skill as shipbuilders
to spread a reign of terror then unequalled in violence and brutality
in all the records of history.
The greatest wish of every Viking
was to die sword in hand and enter Valhalla,
where a hero's welcome awaited them from the god Odin.
The compass was unknown,
and they could steer only by the sun and the stars.
Once fog closed in, they were left helpless and blind.
After all, the earth was flat.
Sail too far off course, and the black wind would blow them
across the poison sea that lay to the west
and over the edge of the world into limbo.
Their abiding aim was to conquer England,
then a series of petty kingdoms, each one the jealous rival of the next.
Thus, when the Vikings set forth to rob and plunder England,
they never sailed out of sight of land.
They confined their attacks to swift overnight raids.
It was no accident that the English book of prayer contained this sentence:
"Protect us, oh Lord, from the wrath of the Northmen."
Ragnar!
The king is dead. Long live the king.
For two months we have mourned the good King Edwin, who by the cruel Viking Ragnar was foully murdered, and still lies unrevenged.
The council of the kingdom now declare that Aella is of the true royal line and welcome his succession to the throne.
Your Majesty.
Thank you, my gracious lady.
Rest assured that the barbarians that murdered your husband, my cousin, will soon feel the weight of my anger.
And though your union with Edwin was fruitless, feel confident that you retain the respect of us all.
You may retire... Queen Enid.
We, Thurston Bishop and Matthew Bishop, ask you, will you take Aella as your king and accept...
You need not fear, my lady.
His words cannot hurt you.
He has no right to the throne.
There is no direct heir, my lady.
There is an heir.
What?
Brother Godwin, I am with child.
But not Edwin's.
The child is that of the Viking, Ragnar.
A bad omen.
The holy sword Requitur, the sword of kings.
Long live the king!
He is the son of a barbarian... but I love him as if he were Edwin's child.
There are already rumours of his birth.
If they were to reach Aella...
Where are you sending him?
To Italy, to be tended by monks who will not know his identity.
But his life will be safe, and yours too.
Father Godwin!
- The pommelstone of the sword Requitur.
- It is his by right.
If you hope to identify him in years to come by this stone, so can his enemies.
20 years passed. Queen Enid had died,
but the rumour that she had given birth to a son continued to plague Kink Aella.
Although his castle became the stronghold of all England,
Aella was unable to stop the Viking raids.
Now let it be known throughout the kingdom of Northumbria that I, King Rhodri of Wales, bestow on King Aella the hand of my daughter, Morgana.
I will consent to this.
I, too, King Rhodri of Wales, consent.
Praise be to God.
Amen.
Please rise, child.
On the first day of spring, you will become my bride.
I trust, Lord Egbert, that you approve of this alliance?
With all my heart, sire.
Then why do you spread tales of an heir to the throne left by Queen Enid?
"Tis common knowledge, sire.
The queen on her deathbed spoke of a son sent off to Italy with the pommelstone of the sword Requitur tied about him.
Your Majesty, is it wise to speak of things so long in the past?
I hope soon to silence these wagging tongues.
This beautiful child will present me with an heir to the throne.
And this marriage will combine our strengths and protect our people from the depredation of the Vikings.
That is not enough!
I must also expose a traitor in our midst.
Surely there are no traitors in this hall, sire.
Cousin Egbert... why have your lands never been attacked by the Vikings?
What do you mean, sire?
Neither your lands nor those of your conspirators have suffered any harm.
- Conspirators?!
- You have schemed against me.
I'll not be the scapegoat for your failure to stop the Vikings!
You have conspired with the foes of England to dethrone me!
- What foes?
- The Vikings! Take him out!
Lies will not sustain a tyrant!
Use skill. It must appear as if he took his own life.
- He's gone, sire!
- Hunt him down.
Bring me his head!
Hail, Ragnar!
- We've waited half the night.
- I nearly didn't get here at all.
Aella knows of our meetings.
You've got to take me with you!
He's no more use to us. Send him back.
That's no way to reward a man who's guided our raids.
No, we'll find good use for him.
Come aboard.
- Make sail for Long Sound.
- Make sail for Long Sound!
Shh.
Ragnar!
Come on.
Hail, Ragnar! Hail, Ragnar! Hail, Ragnar!
Hail, Ragnar!
Hail, Einar!
I drink to your safe return in English ale!
I wish that it were English blood.
Hold your mouth! This is an Englishman.
- Englishman?
- Lord Egbert. An ally.
Then drink to my father's return,
Englishman.
Do you want the English to think we're barbarians?
This is Einar, my only son in wedlock.
He's so vain of his beauty, he won't let a man's beard hide it.
He scrapes his face like an Englishman.
Hail, Ragnar. And hail, Ragnar's beard.
- I want you to teach Egbert our customs.
- I'll teach him.
- Remember I live by brains, not brawn.
- Yes, my lord.
- Then fetch him a horse.
- Now?
Why not?
- Einar... Gently, gently.
- I know. Brains, not brawn.
He's got to draw us maps of the English coast!
What man ever had a finer son?
Odin could have sired him, but I did.
Come!
Don't be frightened.
She's forbidden to hunt Englishmen.
- Too much for her to swallow.
- We have the same sport in England.
With hawks like this? Watch.
Kill.
You call that a hawk?
I think we have hawks to equal that one.
Here. Bring up Long Claw.
Look, now there's a hunting bird.
- You again. Whose bird is that?
- It's mine.
Oh? A slave with a hunting hawk?
- I found her frozen to a tree.
- Where'd you steal it?
Sandpiper was with me when I found her.
The perfect witness... deaf and dumb.
Perhaps you'd like your tongue cut out.
- Then you'd tell no more lies.
- I'm not a liar.
Is this the way slaves talk to Vikings?
Tell the English lord that you're a liar.
Kill!
Kill him!
No!
Don't kill him.
Odin!
Odin!
Bring in the slave.
Look how he glares at me.
If he wasn't fathered by a black ram in the full of the moon, my name is not Ragnar.
What would you do with him in your country?
We have a special reward which is rather entertaining in a noisy way.
- What's that?
- Nothing much, just a pit full of wolves, half mad with starvation and trained to appreciate the flavour of human blood.
Ah, you see! The English are civilised.
- Can you think of anything worse?
- I can think of something far worse.
I guess you can, with your pretty dainty face spoiled.
But he was a good slave. Kill him quick.
- No. No quick death for him.
- What do you suggest I do with him?
- Nothing.
- Nothing?
I want this slave alive.
After tearing your face apart?
Yes.
The sun will cross the sky a thousand times before he dies.
And you'll wish a thousand times that you were dead.
Kitala!
You can't kill the slave.
What do the runes say?
If Odin willed that Eric should die, Thor's hammer would sound his death knell.
But the sky is silent.
The curse of Odin waits on him who kills the slave.
Then no man shall kill him.
Let the tide of the sea do it.
Bind him, cast him into the slop-pool at low tide! Take him out!
You'll throw him into the slop-pool to be drowned and eaten by crabs?
Then let the crabs be cursed by Odin!
That's my decision.
If he survives the pool, what then?
If he's still alive when the tide turns, then any fool who fishes him out can have him!
Survives!
Odin! Odin!
Send a wind and turn the tide.
Odin! Odin!
Odin!
Put her on the testing board.
I think I'll go and watch that slave drowning.
Stay here!
You'll see something more interesting.
It does look rather an interesting game.
It's not a game.
It's Odin's test for unfaithful wives.
Is she an unfaithful wife?
- Ask Einar.
- Her husband says she is.
- Which is he?
- He's throwing the axes.
But, uh... if she's innocent?
Her husband will succeed, the braids will be cut.
Supposing he misses the braids and hits her?
- Well, then she's guilty.
- I see.
But what happens if he misses both the girl and the braids?
Three misses and we drown him.
One!
You're too drunk!
You'll split her wide open!
Drunk, am I? I haven't had enough!
You missed her, didn't you?
What a son!
Kitala.
Kitala, my legs, my legs...
Move your legs, Eric. You must move them.
- Where did this slave boy come from?
- Bjorn brought him here from a raid.
He was taken from a ship on the sea.
- And this was found about his neck?
- Yes.
It's the only possession he ever had.
He has no need of it now.
He's going to die.
Listen to me, little slave. Einar is in the hall celebrating your death!
Einar is laughing at you!
Einar... Einar.
- Live, Eric. Fight the cold.
- Live and fight Einar.
Fight Einar. Fight Einar.
Odin. Odin.
Odin!
- Odin has answered you.
- They were only flying clouds.
You're blind. They were Odin's daughters.
I heard the singing of their battle swords as they rode across the sky.
They bring the wind.
They bring the wind!
Listen to it.
The north wind, it's turning back the tide. Cut him loose.
The tide is going out. Your job is done.
I'll take the slave.
He's mine, Einar! The wind turned the tide and I pulled him out.
I'll take him, Englishman.
If your father's word means anything, he's mine.
Why such a sudden interest in a slave, my lord?
Shall we say, an English passion for converting the wicked to the paths of righteousness.
Well, you're not in England now.
And you never will be unless
I draw maps of England for your father.
All right.
You can keep the slave... for as long as you live.
- Odin's thanks for saving him.
- And at no little risk to myself.
Do you know what this is?
Some day, I'll tell you what it is.
And you'll remember then that I saved you.
I'm still a slave.
- You won't be when we get to England.
- I'll never get to England.
You're like a wounded animal.
You trust no one.
- Good day, my lords.
- Hail, Egbert!
- How's the boat coming along?
- She'll be ready in a week.
Well, she's no sea dragon, but she'll do for a toy.
Does Einar still bear me a grudge?
You were a fool to anger my son.
He'll kill you one day.
You're not still angry, are you, Einar?
- That depends.
- On what?
On how well you draw maps.
See for yourself. This is a map of Wales.
Wales? That slag heap?
That's not worth one night's raiding.
It holds the richest prize of all:
King Rhodri's daughter, Morgana.
Ha! Rhodri couldn't raise enough to ransom a Skagerrak moose.
No, but Aella could.
He's to marry her in the spring.
Oh?
Einar, I think our Englishman has a good idea.
She's leaving soon and must go round this point.
- Here? You're sure?
- I'd stake my life on it.
You already have.
Let me intercept her and bring her back here.
- How many men would you need?
- One boat.
- Only one boat?
- No more.
What about him without the collar?
Would you take him along?
Well, naturally I'd take along my slave.
You stay here and draw maps.
I'll kidnap the girl.
Get him to draw maps that'll guide a ship through fog... then he'll be worth keeping.
- There is no map of any use in fog.
- Then what use are you to us?
Think of that while I'm gone. And don't let anything happen to that slave.
It's a strange metal that fell to earth from the North Star.
Sandpiper brought it from far away.
The price he paid was his ears and his tongue.
No matter how you hold it, it struggles to return homeward to the star from which it fell.
It always points to the north.
Not in the fog.
You cannot see the stars in the fog.
Watch.
Can it see the star through these walls?
This could lead you to many places.
Even to the land beyond the poison sea, Valhalla.
You will go there one day.
Only great heroes have ever reached it.
See what the runes say.
Will this take me there?
No.
A woman will point the way.
- What will she look like?
- You will know her when you see her.
- When will that be?
- Soon enough.
Will she love me or hate me?
Love and hate are horns on the same goat.
What woman would ever look at a slave?
This one will.
You're lying, Kitala.
All your tales are lies.
Don't look so sad, my lady.
It doesn't become you.
Bridget, how can I marry a man that I hate?
It's not easy to be a princess, but you have a duty.
This alliance will help your people.
You must marry Aella.
I would rather that I were dead.
The Vikings! Turn back! It's the Vikings!
Quick, my ladies, inside.
Steersmen, cut to the wind!
Forecastle men forward!
Remember, she's not to be harmed or she's worthless in trade!
All pull at the bowline!
Bend your backs!
Oh! No! No!
Bridget!
- My lady!
- No!
- No! No!
- My lady... help!
My lady...
Bridget! Bridget!
My lady!
Bridget!
Bridget!
Welcome aboard, my lady.
Aella will kill you for this.
Aella? It would be a pity to send you back to him.
What do you know of Aella?
Well, I know he'll pay all the treasure he's got to get you back.
I'll keep you for myself.
By Odin, she'd make a fine Viking queen.
Get away from me!
Hey, now first a little kiss of welcome.
Get away!
- A little kiss of welcome.
- No!
Yes.
Remember, she's not to be harmed or she'll be worthless in trade.
Pretty bird, pretty feathers.
Build her a nest so she can hide.
Too many hawks around here!
- Make sail!
- Make sail.
Einar!
Hail, Einar!
Hail, Einar! Hail, Einar! Hail, Einar!
Stop rowing.
Oars down!
- Hail, Einar.
- Hail, Ragnar.
I give thanks to Odin for your safe return.
- Well, where is she?
- Where's who?
Who do you think?
Your friend with the pigtails?!
Oh, stop shouting. You sound like a moose giving birth to a hedgehog.
- Einar!
- Get this grain ashore.
I wanna know why you missed the wench you were sent for.
- I didn't miss her.
- Where is she?
Ah...
A little skinny, perhaps, but not bad. Not bad at all.
Restrain yourself, my lord.
If she is dishonoured, she'll be worthless as a queen and Aella won't ransom her.
- I don't need traitors to plead my cause.
- My quarrel is with Aella, lady, not you.
We agreed you would be unharmed.
- Remember that, Einar. Leave her alone.
- I haven't touched her... yet.
And you never will. I'd kill myself first.
- Ah. She doesn't seem to like you.
- She likes me well enough.
I doubt it, from the looks of her.
So do I.
- But the time will come.
- Never.
Never?
You like the scars on my face, don't you, hm?
Sure, my beauty stirs her little heart.
You have better luck with falcons.
She'll never call you dainty-face!
Any objections?
Of course not, my lord. He's just a slave.
- Let's go ashore and take her along.
- She stays here.
We'll talk about her again, when you're more drunk or more sober.
Olaf! Anchor the boat out on the fjord.
And guard her well.
Ah, come. You'll soon forget the wench.
- She's too skinny anyhow.
- She's beautiful.
Ah, all those bones sticking out, she's an old crow with all the feathers pulled out.
She said she'd kill herself if I touched her.
They all say that. What they really mean is they'll kill themselves if you don't.
Maybe, but I've never had one spit on me and bite me.
Huh! They'll bite all the more now that you're Einar One-Eye.
I wanted to thank you for proving me innocent.
Go back to your husband.
Come. Drink.
No one woman is worth all this fuss.
Well, my lady, as terrible as this captivity is, at least we should be thankful that so far our honour has been spared.
Yes, Bridget, we have that to be thankful for.
Strange how things never turn out the way you expect.
I always thought Vikings attacked their women.
We've been very lucky.
It hasn't been due entirely to luck, Bridget.
He can't help the way he acts.
He's a pagan, my lady.
- He's a mad dog.
- Well...
If it weren't for the scars on his face, he'd be rather nice looking.
Oh, for a Viking, I mean.
I don't want to talk about him.
Scratches and bites won't hold him off for ever.
What a son!
How about my mother?
Tell me, did my mother fight you?
Ah, did she fight me.
I have the scars of her scratches and bites all over me.
Ha! What a woman.
That's how I feel about Morgana.
Look at me.
Do you think with this face I want the kind of wife who'd let me touch her?
I want her to fight me tooth and nail, the first time I take her and the last.
You are my son.
And you'll be wearing this one day.
Don't forget that.
I won't forget it.
Now... if you really want her, as skinny as she is, I give her to you.
Wait a minute. What do you mean, you...
- You mean we won't ransom her?
- No! You can have her.
Oh, I'll give this little wench from
Wales a reason to bite and scratch.
I'm Einar!
Son of Ragnar!
I'll show her what forging can be done when fire fights fire!
I'll make her howl till they hear her in Wales!
Morgana!
My pretty little bird, sharpen your claws!
I'm Einar!
All right, men! Everybody off!
Morgana and I wanna be alone.
Good job, mate!
Agh... Olaf!
Thank you, Olaf!
Morgana! Out! Out!
- We don't need you.
- I can't swim!
If you touch me, I'll kill myself.
There's a sword to do it with... because I'm going to touch you.
Scratch.
Come on.
- Fight!
- A woman can't fight a man.
You wench! Kick, bite, scratch!
Now come on.
Fight me.
I will not lift one finger to resist you.
Whatever you do will be on your conscience.
Then let it be on my conscience.
- I've come to help you escape.
- Escape?
- I've stolen a ship.
- My lady, it's a tiny boat. We'll drown.
- Are you afraid?
- Yes.
- Will you come with me?
- Yes.
My lady, how do you know you can trust this slave?
I know. If you don't want to come, you can stay.
Wait. Wait for me.
Our only chance is to get far away by morning.
Yes, I can see that.
We'd go a lot faster if we all rowed.
Would we?
Yes, we would.
Do you mean that I should row this boat?
Yes, I do mean that.
Impossible.
- Get an oar and row.
- But a princess doesn't row a boat.
- Get an oar and row.
- But I can't. I don't know how.
Learn. You too.
Oh!
- What's the matter now?
- This bodice is too tight. I'll have to stop.
- What's a bodice?
- This dress I'm wearing.
It's too tight right in there... Oh!
- Row.
- Mine isn't too tight.
Eric, look!
It's Einar. Turn! Turn!
- They are heading for the fog.
- We'll get them!
- We can't go into the fog.
- Keep rowing.
Faster! Faster!
The men are afraid we'll run aground. So am I.
Keep rowing!
Faster! Faster!
Look out!
Grab hold of the mast.
Stop rowing.
Odin! Odin!
I'm going under!
Hold on!
Lift me out.
Oh!
Over here!
Over here!
Back to your oars!
- Back to your oars!
- Give up the chase.
Morgana's out there! After them!
The Great Snake is sunk.
You want to wreck this ship too?
Ragnar.
Ragnar! Ragnar!
- Where's Ragnar?
- At the bottom of the fjord.
The curse of Odin on that slave!
If I have to cross the poison sea,
I'll find him.
I swear it... by the sacred blood of Odin.
Still afraid?
No. I'm worth more alive than dead. Are you?
No. But I value my life much more now.
Of course, I'm grateful to you for saving me and Aella will certainly reward you...
- Why should I take you back to Aella?
- But you must.
Why?
I'm pledged to him on my father's word.
I didn't steal you away just to give you to another man.
Aella isn't another man. He's a king.
And I'm a slave.
And I loved you the moment I saw you.
I loved you even before then.
Kitala saw it in the runes.
That's just Kitala's silly talk.
Do you love Aella?
I belong to him... by my father's word as a Christian king.
What's your father's word compared to Odin's will?
Do you know which of all the oceans is the widest?
The poison sea.
No.
The ocean between a Christian and a heathen.
Our hands can reach across it as easily as that.
But that's just a joining of the flesh.
- What else is missing?
- The joining of our souls.
If our hands are touching, our souls must be touching.
But your soul is heathen.
If my soul is content to be heathen and yours content to be Christian, let's not question flesh for wanting to remain flesh.
Kitala.
We'll be in England soon.
Suppose Aella releases you from your pledge.
Then I'd be free.
But why should he?
I'll find a way.
How can I make you understand?
What would be the worst thing for a Viking?
To die without a sword in his hand and never enter Valhalla.
For me to break my pledge to Aella would be as bad as that.
I'll find a way.
You captured Ragnar single-handed?
We all owe you our thanks.
I don't want your thanks. I want Morgana.
This barbarian is under the illusion you desire to be released from your pledge.
Do you release me?
Surely you don't want to be released?
- Yes, I do.
- That is absurd.
- Sire, you gave your word.
- Of course.
But first things first.
Father Godwin, take the
Princess Morgana to the chapel, that she may meditate before making a final decision.
Yes, sire.
Well, gentlemen, let us proceed to the kennels.
The royal pets are hungry.
Take him.
That stone, my lady...
- Where did you get it?
- Eric gave it to me.
Where did he get it?
He said it was tied around his neck when the Vikings captured him as a baby.
Since you brought him here, the pleasure shall be yours.
Push him in.
I claim the right of a Viking to die with a sword in my hand.
And I deny you that right.
Go ahead. Push him in.
Cut my bonds and give me the sword.
Why should I?
Would you deny me the right to enter Valhalla?
What are you doing?
You dare give him that sword?
Odin!
And Einar is his brother.
And Eric has surrendered his own father to Aella.
Oh, Father Godwin, we must try to stop him.
Yes. Come.
You have dared to defy a king.
You shall join Ragnar in the pit.
I want all here to see the reward for such defiance.
Your Majesty,
I would ask you to bear in mind that I made good your promise in the name of Holy Mother Church.
Thank you, Father Godwin.
You are the watchdog of my fury.
But if a common slave can rob me of a queen and slay an enemy too cunning for a whole nation to defeat, then the day must come when he will be a deadlier foe than Ragnar ever was.
With or without God's sanction,
I tell you as your king this cannot be.
- Aella...
- Yes, my dear?
I will keep my pledge to you.
Don't kill him.
In that case, nothing could distress me more than for you to think me cruel.
Then let him go.
Hold out the hand that has defied me.
Let this serve as a lesson to all Vikings.
Take him to his ship and cast him adrift.
Eric!
Why do we wait?
Because of a slave, my father's bones lie now at the bottom of the fjord.
Ragnar was your king.
But he had no Viking's burial.
I have sworn by the blood of Odin to avenge my father's death.
Why do we wait?
We must mourn Ragnar.
It's revenge Ragnar wants, not mourning.
Every Viking wants to revenge the death of Ragnar.
Then let's go to England now for the girl and the slave.
We don't even know where they are.
Where would the slave go but to Aella's castle to be rewarded for his treachery?
Perhaps, but what chance would we have?
Aella's castle is the strongest in all of England.
I know Aella's castle well.
Here are the maps.
Einar has studied every stone and beam.
To reach the castle, we'll have to hug the English coast.
They will have days to prepare for our attack.
We don't hug the coast.
We sail across the open sea.
- And if there's fog?
- Can't we do what a slave did?
The slave used witchcraft.
His eyes saw through the fog to the stars.
Are you afraid, Bjorn?
Do not confuse fear for caution.
Odin has sent no sign.
Then you can stay here.
But we go to avenge Ragnar's death.
Who sails with me?
Not even enough to man one ship.
Odin.
Odin.
Odin must have answered me.
- Where's Morgana?
- In Aella's castle.
You dare to come back here just to tell me this?
No. I need you and your men to take the castle, and you need me to guide you across the open sea.
Why should you want me to free Morgana?
Because she shall be my wife.
All right, slave... you live until Morgana's free.
Vikings! Vikings!
- Odin has sent us a sign.
- Kill him!
Listen to me!
Make no mistake, I hate this slave more than any living man.
But he can guide us to Morgana.
What matters more to you, a foreign wench or vengeance for Ragnar?
Because of him, your father lies at the bottom of the fjord.
That's not true! Ragnar died in England!
In the fog he swam to my boat.
I took him there.
How did Ragnar die?
Aella ordered him bound and thrown alive into the wolf pit.
Ragnar, bound like a sheep and thrown to wolves?
I cut his bonds.
He died fighting with the sword I gave him.
And this was my thanks from Aella for letting Ragnar die like a Viking.
Now you know how Ragnar died.
His eyes can lead us to Aella.
Now!
Who sails with me?
- I will!
- I will!
Hail, Einar!
Hail, Einar! Hail, Einar! Hail, Einar!
Strange, isn't it?
I was going to take you to England and now you're taking me.
Do you still have that stone you wear about your neck?
No, it's gone.
Oh. Just as well.
Why?
I used to think it would bring me luck.
Now neither of us will have any use for it.
The Vikings!
It's the Vikings!
The Vikings!
Egbert, where would Morgana be?
The safest place is the tower chapel.
Odin!
Be assured, sire, the second drawbridge is much stronger than the first.
Odin!
Odin!
Aella!
Take your magic elsewhere, holy man.
This chapel is a sanctuary.
Father Godwin!
Go ahead, jump.
You will be my queen.
I knew it the first moment I saw you.
You knew it too.
You knew it that night on my ship.
- It's not true.
- Yes.
It is true.
I don't love you.
You must love me exactly as I love you.
I hate you! It's Eric I love.
- Where are you taking me?
- To see Eric... for the last time.
Don't kill him. You can't.
Look at this. It's from the pommel of the sword Requitur.
It was given to Eric by his mother,
Enid the queen.
Oh, listen to me! Ragnar was his father!
Lies won't save him!
It's true. I swear it is.
He is your brother!
Eric!
Look at him, how he hastens to his death.
He can't wait to die.
If I can't have your love,
I'll take your hate.
Why did he hesitate?
Odin!
Prepare a funeral for a Viking.
Visiontext Subtitles: Yasmin Rammohan
Hence! Home, you idle creatures, get you home!
This is a holiday. What trade art thou?
Why, sir, a carpenter.
Where is thy leather apron and thy rule?
What dost thou with thy best apparel on?
You, sir, what trade are you?
Truly, sir, in respect of a fine workman,
I am but, as you would say, a cobbler.
But what trade art thou?
Answer me directly.
A trade, sir, that I hope,
I may use with a safe conscience, which is indeed, sir, a mender of bad soles.
But wherefore art not in thy shop today?
Why dost thou lead these men about the streets?
Truly, sir, to wear out their shoes, to get myself into more work.
But indeed, sir, we make holiday to see Caesar
- and to rejoice in his triumph.
- Wherefore rejoice?
What conquest brings he home?
What tributaries follow him to Rome, to grace in captive bonds his chariot wheels?
You blocks, you stones, you worse than senseless things!
O you hard hearts, you cruel men of Rome, knew you not Pompey?
Many a time and oft have you climbed up to walls and battlements, to towers and windows, yea, to chimney tops, your infants in your arms, and there have sat the live-long day with patient expectation to see great Pompey pass the streets of Rome.
And when you saw his chariot but appear, have you not made a universal shout, that Tiber trembled underneath her banks, to hear the replication of your sounds made in her concave shores?
And do you now put on your best attire?
And do you now cull out a holiday?
And do you now strew flowers in his way that comes in triumph over Pompey's blood?
Be gone! Run to your houses, fall upon your knees, pray to the gods to intermit the plague that needs must light on this ingratitude.
See where their basest metal be not moved.
They vanish tongue-tied in their guiltiness!
Go you down that way toward the Capitol.
This way will I. Disrobe the images if you do find them decked with ceremonies.
May we do so?
You know, it is the feast of Lupercal.
It is no matter. Let no images be hung with Caesar's trophies.
These growing feathers, plucked from Caesar's wing, will make him fly an ordinary pitch.
Who else would soar above the view of men and keep us all in servile fearfulness?
- Calpurnia.
- Peace, ho! Caesar speaks.
Calpurnia!
Here, my lord.
Stand you directly in Antonius' way, when he doth run his course.
- Antonius.
- Caesar, my lord?
Forget not, in your speed, Antonius, to touch Calpurnia, for our elders say, the barren touched in this holy chase shake off their sterile curse.
When Caesar says "do this," it is performed.
Set on and leave no ceremony out!
Caesar!
- Who calls?
- Bid every noise be still!
- Peace yet again!
- Who is it in the press that calls on me?
I hear a tongue, shriller than all the music, cry "Caesar."
Speak. Caesar is turned to hear.
Beware the ides of March.
What man is that?
A soothsayer bids you beware the ides of March.
Set him before me. Let me see his face.
Fellow, come from the throng.
Look upon Caesar.
What sayest thou to me now?
Speak once again.
Beware the ides of March.
He is a dreamer. Let us leave him.
Pass. Pass!
Will you go see the order of the course?
- Not I.
- I pray you do.
I am not gamesome. I do lack some part of that quick spirit that is in Antony.
Let me not hinder, Cassius, your desires.
I'll leave you.
Brutus, I do observe you now of late.
I have not from your eyes that gentleness and show of love as I was wont to have.
You bear too stubborn and too strange a hand over your friend that loves you.
Cassius, be not deceived.
If I have veiled my look,
I turn the trouble of my countenance merely upon myself.
Vexed I am of late, with passions of some difference.
Conceptions only proper to myself, which give some soil, perhaps, to my behaviors, but let not therefore my good friends be grieved, among which number, Cassius, be you one.
Nor construe any further my neglect than that poor Brutus with himself at war forgets the shows of love to other men.
Tell me, good Brutus, can you see your face?
No, Cassius, for the eye sees not itself but by reflection, by some other things.
'Tis just. And it is very much lamented,
Brutus, that you have no such mirrors as will turn your hidden worthiness into your eye, that you might see your shadow.
I have heard where many of the best respect in Rome, except immortal Caesar, speaking of Brutus and groaning underneath this age's yoke, have wished that noble Brutus had his eyes.
Into what dangers would you lead me, Cassius, that you would have me seek into myself for that which is not in me?
Therefore, good Brutus, be prepared to hear.
And since you know you cannot see yourself so well as by reflection,
I, your glass, will modestly discover to yourself that of yourself which you yet know not of.
And be not jealous on me, gentle Brutus.
Were I a common laugher and did use to stale with ordinary oaths my love to every new protester, or if you know that I profess myself in banqueting to all the rout, then hold me dangerous.
What means this shouting?
I do fear the people choose Caesar for their king.
Ay, do you fear it?
Then must I think you would not have it so?
I would not, Cassius, yet I love him well.
But what is it you would impart to me?
If it be aught toward the general good, set honor in one eye and death in the other, and I will look on both indifferently.
For let the gods so speed me as I love the name of honor more than I fear death.
I know that virtue to be in you, Brutus, as well as I do know your outward favor.
Well, honor is the subject of my story.
I cannot tell what you or other men think of this life, but, for my single self,
I had as lief not be as live to be in awe of such a thing as I myself.
I was born free as Caesar. So were you.
We both have fed as well, and we can both endure the winter's cold as well as he.
For once, upon a raw and gusty day, the troubled Tiber chafing at her shores,
Caesar said to me, "Darest thou, Cassius, now leap in with me
"into this angry flood and swim to yonder points?"
Upon the word, accoutered as I was,
I plunged in and bade him follow, so indeed he did.
The torrent roared, and we did buffet it with lusty sinews, throwing it aside and stemming it with hearts of controversy.
But ere we could arrive the point proposed,
Caesar cried, "Help me, Cassius, or I sink!"
And this man is now become a god, and Cassius is a wretched creature and must bend his body if Caesar carelessly but nod on him.
Caesar! Caesar!
He had a fever when he was in Spain, and when the fit was on him,
I did mark how he did shake.
It is true, this god did shake.
His coward lips did from their color fly, and that same eye whose bend doth awe the world did lose his luster.
I did hear him groan.
Ay, and that tongue of his that bade the Romans mark him and write his speeches in their books, alas, it cried, "Give me some drink,
Titinius," as a sick girl.
Ye gods! It doth amaze me a man of such a feeble temper should so get the start of the majestic world and bear the palm alone.
Caesar! Caesar!
Another general shout.
Why, man, he doth bestride the narrow world like a colossus.
And we petty men walk under his huge legs and peep about to find ourselves dishonorable graves.
Men at some time are masters of their fates.
The fault, dear Brutus, is not in our stars, but in ourselves, that we are underlings.
Brutus and Caesar.
What should be in that Caesar?
Why should that name be sounded more than yours?
Write them together, yours is as fair a name.
Sound them, it doth become the mouth as well.
Weigh them, it is as heavy.
Conjure with them,
Brutus will start a spirit as soon as Caesar.
Now, in the name of all the gods at once, upon what meat doth this our Caesar feed, that he is grown so great?
Age, thou art shamed!
Rome, thou hast lost the breed of noble bloods.
When went there by a time, since the great flood, but it was famed for more than for one man?
When could they say, till now, that talked of Rome, that her wide walls encompassed but one man?
O you and I have heard our fathers say, there was a Brutus once that would have brooked the eternal devil to keep his state in Rome as easily as a king.
That you do love me, I am nothing jealous.
What you would work me to,
I have some aim.
How I have thought of this and of these times
I shall recount hereafter.
For this present,
I would not, so with love I might entreat you, be any further moved.
What you have said I will consider.
What you have to say, I will with patience hear and find a time both meet to hear and answer such high things.
Till then, my noble friend, chew upon this.
Brutus had rather be a villager than to repute himself a son of Rome under these hard conditions as this time is like to lay upon us.
I am glad that my weak words have struck but thus much show of fire from Brutus.
The games are done and Caesar is returning.
Look you, Cassius, the angry spot doth glow on Caesar's brow, and all the rest look like a chidden train.
Casca will, after his sour fashion, tell us what hath proceeded worthy note today.
Calpurnia's cheek is pale, and Cicero looks with such ferret and such fiery eyes as we have seen him in the Capitol being crossed in conference by some senators.
Casca will tell us what the matter is.
Antonius, let me have men about me that are fat, sleek-headed men, and such as sleep a-nights.
Yond Cassius has a lean and hungry look.
He thinks too much.
Such men are dangerous.
Fear him not, Caesar. He is not dangerous.
Would he were fatter.
But I fear him not.
Yet if my name were liable to fear,
I do not know the man I should avoid so soon as that spare Cassius.
He reads much.
He is a great observer, and he looks quite through the deeds of men.
He loves no plays as thou dost, Antony.
He hears no music.
Seldom he smiles, and smiles in such a sort as if he mocked himself, and scorned his spirit that could be moved to smile at anything.
Such men as he be never at heart's ease whilst they behold a greater than themselves, and therefore are they very dangerous.
I rather tell thee what is to be feared than what I fear, for always I am Caesar.
Come on my right hand, for this ear is deaf, and tell me truly what thou think'st of him.
- Would you speak with me?
- Ay, Casca.
Tell us what hath chanced today, that Caesar looks so sad.
Why, you were with him, were you not?
I should not then ask Casca what had chanced.
Why, there was a crown offered him, and, being offered him, he put it by with the back of his hand, thus, and then the people fell a-shouting.
What was the second noise for?
- Why, for that too.
- They shouted thrice.
- What was the last cry for?
- Why, for that too.
- Was the crown offered him thrice?
- Ay, marry, it was, and he put it by thrice, every time gentler than other, and with every putting by mine honest neighbors shouted.
- Who offered him the crown?
- Why, Antony.
Tell us the manner of it, gentle Casca.
I can as well be hanged as tell the manner of it.
It was mere foolery. I did not mark it.
I saw Mark Antony offer him a crown.
Yet it was not a crown neither, it was one of those coronets.
And as I told you, he put it by once, but, for all that, to my thinking, he would fain have had it.
Then he offered it to him again, then he put it by again, but, to my thinking, he was very loath to lay his fingers off it.
Then he offered it a third time.
He put it a third time by.
And still as he refused it, the rabblement hooted and clapped their chapped hands and threw up their sweaty nightcaps and uttered such a deal of stinking breath because Caesar refused the crown, that it had almost choked Caesar for he swounded and fell down at it.
And for mine own part I durst not laugh, for fear of opening my lips and receiving the bad air.
What? Did Caesar swoon?
He fell down and foamed at the mouth and was speechless.
'Tis very like he hath the falling sickness.
No, Caesar hath it not, but you and I and honest Casca, we have the falling sickness.
I know not what you mean by that, but I am sure Caesar fell down.
What said he when he came unto himself?
When he came to himself again, he said if he had done or said anything amiss, he desired their worships to think it was his infirmity.
Three or four wenches where I stood cried, "Alas, good soul," and forgave him with all their hearts.
There's no heed to be taken of them.
If Caesar had stabbed their mothers, they would have done no less.
And after that he came, thus sad, away?
Ay.
Did Cicero say anything?
- Ay, he spoke Greek.
- To what effect?
Nay, an I tell you that,
I'll never look you in the face again, but those that understood him smiled at one another and shook their heads, but for mine own part, it was Greek to me.
I could tell you more news, too.
Marullus and Flavius, for pulling scarves off Caesar's images, are put to silence.
Fare you well.
There was more foolery yet, if I could remember it.
Will you sup with me tonight, Casca?
No, I am promised forth.
Will you dine with me tomorrow?
Ay, if I be alive and your mind hold, and your dinner worth the eating.
Good. I will expect you.
Do so. Farewell, both.
What a blunt fellow is this grown to be.
He was quick metal when he went to school.
So is he now in execution of any bold or noble enterprise.
This rudeness is a sauce to his good wit, which gives men stomach to digest his words with better appetite.
And so it is.
For this time I will leave you.
Tomorrow, if you please to speak with me,
I will come home to you.
Or, if you will, come home to me, and I will wait for you.
I will do so. Till then, think of the world.
Well, Brutus, thou art noble, yet I see thy honorable metal may be wrought from that it is disposed.
Therefore, it is meet that noble minds keep ever with their likes, for who so firm that cannot be seduced?
Caesar doth bear me hard, yet he loves Brutus.
If I were Brutus now and he were Cassius, he should not humor me.
I will this night, in several hands, in at his windows throw, as if they came from several citizens, writings all tending to the great opinion that Rome holds of his name, wherein obscurely Caesar's ambition shall be glanced at.
And after this let Caesar seat him sure, for we will shake him, or worse days endure.
Good even, Casca.
Why are you breathless?
And why stare you so?
Are not you moved, when all the sway of earth shakes like a thing unfirm?
O Cicero, I have seen tempests, when the scolding winds have rived the knotty oaks, and I have seen the ambitious ocean swell and rage and foam, to be exalted with the threatening clouds.
But never till tonight, never till now, did I go through a tempest dropping fire.
Either there is a civil strife in heaven, or else the world, too saucy with the gods, incenses them to send destruction.
Why, saw you anything more wonderful?
A common slave, you know him well by sight, held up his left hand, which did flame and burn like 20 torches joined.
And there were drawn upon a heap
100 ghastly women, transformed with their fear, who swore they saw men all in fire walk up and down the streets.
And yesterday the bird of night did sit, even at noonday, upon the marketplace, hooting and shrieking.
When these prodigies do so conjointly meet, let not men say, "These are their reasons, they are natural."
For, I believe, they are portentous things unto the climate that they point upon.
Comes Caesar to the Capitol tomorrow?
He doth, for he did bid Antonius send word to you he would be there tomorrow.
Good night then, Casca.
This disturbed sky is not to walk in.
Farewell, Cicero.
- Who's there?
- A Roman.
Casca, by your voice.
- Cassius, what night is this?
- A very pleasing night to honest men.
Who ever knew the heavens menace so?
Those that have known the earth so full of faults.
You are dull, Casca, and those sparks of life that should be in a Roman you do want, or else you use not.
You look pale and gaze and put on fear and cast yourself in wonder, to see the strange impatience of the heavens.
Now could I, Casca, name to thee a man most like this dreadful night that thunders, lightens, opens graves and roars.
A man no mightier than thyself or me.
'Tis Caesar that you mean, is it not, Cassius?
Let it be who it is.
Indeed, they say the senators tomorrow mean to establish Caesar as a king.
And he shall wear his crown by sea and land, in every place save here in Italy.
I know where I will wear this dagger, then.
Cassius from bondage will deliver Cassius.
That part of tyranny that I do bear
I can shake off at pleasure.
So can I, so every bondman in his own hand bears the power to cancel his captivity.
And why should Caesar be a tyrant then?
Poor man, I know he would not be a wolf but that he knows the Romans are but sheep.
He were no lion, were not Romans hinds.
They that with haste will make a mighty fire begin it with weak straws.
What trash is Rome, what rubbish and what offal, that it serves for the base matter to illuminate so vile a thing as Caesar.
But, O grief, where hast thou led me?
I, per chance, speak this before a willing bondman.
You speak to Casca, and to such a man that is no fleering tell-tale.
Here's my hand.
And I will set this foot of mine as far as who goes farthest.
There's a bargain made!
Stand close awhile.
'Tis Cinna. I do know him by his gait.
He is a friend.
- Cinna, where haste you so?
- To find out you.
Who's that? Metellus Cimber?
No, it is Casca, one incorporate to our attempts.
- Am I not stayed for, Cinna?
- Yes, you are.
Cassius, if you could but win the noble
Brutus to our party...
Be you content.
Good Cinna, take this paper, and look you lay it in the praetor's chair, where Brutus may but find it, and throw this in at his window, set this up in wax upon old Brutus' statue.
All this done, repair to Pompey's porch, where you shall find us.
Is Decius Brutus and Trebonius there?
All but Metellus Cimber, and he's gone to seek you at your house.
Now, Casca, you and I will yet ere day seek Brutus at his house.
Three parts of him is ours already, and the man entire upon the next encounter yields him ours.
I cannot, by the progress of the stars, give guess how near to day.
Lucius.
Awake, I say. Lucius.
I would it were my fault to sleep so soundly.
Called you, my lord?
Get me a taper in my study, Lucius.
When it is lighted, come and call me here.
I will, my lord.
It must be by his death, and, for my part, I know no personal cause to spurn at him but for the general.
He would be crowned.
How that might change his nature, there's the question.
For it is the bright day that brings forth the adder, and that craves wary walking.
Crown him. That.
And then, I grant, we put a sting in him, that at his will he may do danger with.
The abuse of greatness is when it disjoins remorse from power.
And, to speak truth of Caesar,
I have not known when his affections swayed more than his reason.
But 'tis a common proof that lowliness is young ambition's ladder, whereto the climber upward turns his face, but when he once attains the upmost round, he then unto the ladder turns his back, looks in the clouds, scorning the base degrees by which he did ascend.
So Caesar may.
Then lest he may, prevent.
And, since the quarrel will bear no color for the thing he is, fashion it thus, that what he is, augmented, would run to these and these extremities.
And therefore think him as a serpent's egg which, hatched, would, as his kind, grow mischievous, and kill him in the shell.
The taper burneth in your closet, sir.
Searching the window for a flint,
I found this paper thus sealed up, and I am sure it did not lie there when I went to bed.
Is not tomorrow, boy, the ides of March?
I know not, sir.
- Look in the calendar and bring me word.
- I will, sir.
"Brutus, thou sleep'st.
"Awake and see thyself.
"Shall Rome, etcetera."
"Speak, strike, redress!
"Brutus, thou sleep'st. Awake!"
Such instigations have been often dropped where I have took them up.
"Shall Rome, etcetera."
Thus must I piece it out.
Shall Rome stand under one man's awe?
What, Rome?
My ancestors did from the streets of Rome the Tarquin drive, when he was called a king.
"Speak, strike, redress."
Am I entreated to speak and strike?
O Rome, I make thee promise.
If the redress will follow, thou receivest thy full petition at the hand of Brutus.
Sir, March is wasted fifteen days.
'Tis good.
Go to the gate. Somebody knocks.
Since Cassius first did whet me against Caesar, I have not slept.
Between the acting of a dreadful thing and the first motion, all the interim is like a phantasma, or a hideous dream.
The genius and the mortal instruments are then in council, and the state of man, like to a little kingdom, suffers then the nature of an insurrection.
I fear we are too bold upon your rest.
Good morrow, Brutus. Do we trouble you?
I have been up this hour, awake all night.
Know I these men that come along with you?
Yes, every one of them.
And no man here but honors you.
And every one doth wish you had but that opinion of yourself which every noble Roman bears of you.
This is Trebonius.
- He is welcome hither.
- This, Decius Brutus.
- He is welcome, too.
- This, Casca. This, Cinna.
- And this, Metellus Cimber.
- They are all welcome.
What watchful cares do interpose themselves betwixt your eyes and the night?
Shall I entreat a word?
Here lies the east.
Doth not the day break here?
- No.
- O pardon, sir, it doth.
Yon gray lines that fret the clouds are messengers of day.
You shall confess that you are both deceived.
Here, as I point my sword, the sun arises.
- Give me your hands all over, one by one.
- And let us swear our resolution.
No, not an oath.
If not the face of men, the sufferance of our souls, the time's abuse, if these be motives weak, break off betimes, and every man hence to his idle bed.
So let high-sighted tyranny range on till each man drop by lottery.
What need we any spur but our own cause to prick us to redress?
What other bond than secret Romans that have spoke the word and will not palter?
What other oath than honesty to honesty engaged, that this shall be or we will fall for it?
Swear priests and cowards and men cautelous, old feeble carrions and such suffering souls that welcome wrongs.
Unto bad causes swear such creatures as men doubt, but do not stain the even virtue of our enterprise, nor the insuppressive mettle of our spirit, to think that or our cause or our performance did need an oath.
But what of Cicero? Shall we sound him?
I think he will stand very strong with us.
O let us have him, for his silver hairs will purchase us a good opinion and buy men's voices to commend our deeds.
Let us not leave him out.
O name him not. For he will never follow anything that other men begin.
- Then leave him out.
- Indeed, he is not fit.
Shall no man else be touched but only Caesar?
Decius, well urged.
I think it is not meet Mark Antony, so well beloved of Caesar, should outlive Caesar.
We shall find in him a shrewd contriver, and, you know, his means, if he improve them, may well stretch so far as to annoy us all, which to prevent, let Antony and Caesar fall together.
Our course will seem too bloody,
Caius Cassius, to cut the head off and then hack the limbs, like wrath in death and envy afterwards.
For Antony is but a limb of Caesar.
Let us be sacrificers, but not butchers, Caius.
We all stand up against the spirit of Caesar.
And in the spirit of men there is no blood.
O that we then could come by Caesar's spirit, and not dismember Caesar.
But, alas, Caesar must bleed for it.
And, gentle friends, let's kill him boldly, but not wrathfully.
Let's carve him as a dish fit for the gods, not hew him as a carcass fit for hounds.
And for Mark Antony, think not of him, for he can do no more than Caesar's arm when Caesar's head is off.
Yet I do fear him,
- for the ingrafted love he bears to Caesar.
- Alas, good Cassius, do not think of him.
If he love Caesar, all that he can do is to himself.
Take thought and die for Caesar.
And that were much he should, for he is given to sports, to wildness and much company.
There is no fear in him. Let him not die, for he will live and laugh at this hereafter.
'Tis time to part.
The morning comes upon us.
We'll leave you, Brutus.
But it is doubtful yet whether Caesar will come forth today or no, for he is superstitious grown of late.
It may be, these apparent prodigies, the unaccustomed terror of the night, and the persuasion of his augurers, may hold him from the Capitol today.
Never fear that.
If he be so resolved, I can oversway him, for he loves to hear that unicorns may be betrayed with trees, lions with toils and men with flatterers.
But when I tell him he hates flatterers, he says he does, being then most flattered.
Let me work, and I will bring him to the Capitol.
Nay, we will all of us be there to fetch him.
By the eighth hour, is that the uttermost?
Be that the uttermost, and fail not then.
Caius Ligarius doth bear Caesar hard, who rated him for speaking well of Pompey.
I wonder none of you have thought of him.
Now, good Metellus, go along by him.
He loves me well, and I have given him reasons.
Send him but hither, and I'll fashion him.
And friends, disperse yourselves, but all remember what you have said, and show yourselves true Romans.
Good gentlemen, look fresh and merrily.
Let not our looks put on our purposes.
And so, good morrow to you, everyone.
Portia, what mean you?
Wherefore rise you now?
It is not for your health thus to commit your weak condition
- to the raw cold morning.
- Nor for yours neither.
You've ungently, Brutus, stole from my bed, and yesternight at supper you suddenly arose and walked about musing and sighing with your arms across.
And when I asked you what the matter was, you stared upon me with ungentle looks.
I urged you further, and then you scratched your head and too impatiently stamped with your foot.
Yet I insisted, yet you answered not, but, with an angry wafture of your hand, gave sign for me to leave you.
So I did, fearing to strengthen that impatience which seemed too much enkindled, and withal hoping it was but an effect of humor, which sometime hath his hour with every man.
It will not let you eat, nor talk, nor sleep.
And, could it work so much upon your shape as it hath much prevailed on your condition,
I should not know you, Brutus.
Dear my lord, make me acquainted with your cause of grief.
I am not well in health, and that is all.
Brutus is wise, and were he not in health, he would embrace the means to come by it.
Why, so I do.
Good Portia, go to bed.
Is Brutus sick?
And is it physical to walk unbraced and suck up the humors of the dank morning?
What, is Brutus sick?
And will he steal out of his wholesome bed to dare the vile contagion of the night, and add unto his sickness?
No, my Brutus.
You have some sick offense within your mind, which, by the right and virtue of my place,
I ought to know of.
And, upon my knees, I charm you by my once-commended beauty, by all your vows of love and that great vow which did incorporate and make us one, that you unfold to me, yourself, your half, why you are heavy, and what men tonight have had resort to you, for here have been some six or seven who did hide their faces even from darkness.
Kneel not, gentle Portia.
I should not need if you were gentle Brutus.
Within the bond of marriage, tell me, Brutus, is it excepted I should know no secrets that appertain to you?
Am I yourself but, as it were, in sort or limitation, to keep with you at meals, comfort your bed, and talk to you sometimes.
Dwell I but in the suburbs of your good pleasure?
If it be no more, Portia is Brutus' harlot, not his wife.
You are my true and honorable wife, as dear to me as are the ruddy drops that visit my sad heart.
If this were true, then should I know this secret.
I grant I am a woman, but withal a woman that Lord Brutus took to wife.
I grant I am a woman, but withal a woman well-reputed, Cato's daughter.
Think you I am no stronger than my sex, being so fathered and so husbanded?
Tell me your counsels.
I will not disclose them.
Portia, go in a while.
And by and by thy bosom shall partake the secrets of my heart.
All my engagements
I will construe to thee, all the charactery of my sad brows.
Here is a sick man that would speak with you.
Caius Ligarius, that Metellus spake of.
Boy, stand aside.
Vouchsafe good morrow from a feeble tongue.
What a time have you chose out, brave Caius, to wear a kerchief.
- Would you were not sick.
- I am not sick, if Brutus have in hand any exploit worthy the name of honor.
Such an exploit have I in hand, Ligarius, had you a healthful ear to hear of it.
By all the gods that Romans bow before,
I here discard my sickness.
Bid me run, and I will strive with things impossible.
Yea, get the better of them.
For it sufficeth that Brutus leads me on.
What's to do?
A piece of work that will make sick men whole.
But are not some whole but we must make sick?
That must we also.
Caesar! Help!
Help!
They murder Caesar! They murder Caesar!
They murdered Caesar!
They murdered Caesar!
Who's within?
Who's within?
My lord.
Go bid the priests do present sacrifice, and bring me their opinions of success.
I will, my lord.
Nor heaven nor earth have been at peace tonight.
What mean you, Caesar?
Think you to walk forth?
You shall not stir out of your house today.
Caesar shall forth.
The things that threatened me never looked but at my back, when they shall see the face of Caesar, they are vanished.
Caesar,
I never stood on ceremonies.
Yet now they fright me.
There is one within, besides the things that we have heard and seen, recounts most horrid sights seen by the watch.
A lioness hath whelped in the streets, and graves have yawned and yielded up their dead.
Fierce fiery warriors fought upon the clouds, and ghosts did shriek and squeal about the streets.
O Caesar, these things are beyond all use, and I do fear them.
Yet Caesar shall go forth, for these predictions are to the world in general as to Caesar.
When beggars die, there are no comets seen.
The heavens themselves blaze forth the death of princes.
Cowards die many times before their death.
The valiant never taste of death but once.
Of all the wonders that I yet have heard, it seems to me most strange that men should fear, seeing that death, a necessary end, will come when it will come.
What say the augurers?
They would not have you to stir forth today.
Plucking the entrails of an offering forth, they could not find a heart within the beast.
The gods do this in shame of cowardice.
Caesar should be a beast without a heart if he should stay at home today for fear.
No, Caesar shall not.
Danger knows full well that Caesar is more dangerous than he, and Caesar shall go forth!
Alas, my lord, your wisdom is consumed in confidence.
Do not go forth today.
Call it my fear that keeps you in the house and not your own.
We'll send Mark Antony to the senate house, and he shall say you are not well today.
Let me prevail in this.
Mark Antony shall say I am not well.
And, for thy humor, I will stay at home.
Here's Decius Brutus.
He shall tell them so.
Caesar, all hail!
Good morrow, worthy Caesar.
I come to fetch you to the senate house.
And you are come in very happy time to bear my greeting to the senators, and tell them that I will not come today.
Cannot, is false, and that I dare not, falser.
I will not come today.
Tell them so, Decius.
- Say he is sick.
- Shall Caesar send a lie?
Have I in conquest stretched mine arm so far to be afeard to tell graybeards the truth?
Decius, go tell them Caesar will not come.
Most mighty Caesar, let me know some cause, lest I be laughed at when I tell them so.
The cause is in my will. I will not come.
That is enough to satisfy the senate.
But, for your private satisfaction, because I love you, I will let you know.
Calpurnia here, my wife, stays me at home.
She dreamt tonight she saw my statue, which like a fountain with 100 spouts did run pure blood.
And many lusty Romans came smiling and did bathe their hands in it.
And these does she apply for warnings and portents and evils imminent, and on her knee hath begged that I will stay at home today.
This dream is all amiss interpreted.
It was a vision fair and fortunate.
Your statue spouting blood in many pipes, in which so many smiling Romans bathed, signifies that, from you, great Rome shall suck reviving blood, and that great men shall press for tinctures, stains, relics and cognizance.
This by Calpurnia's dream is signified.
And this way have you well expounded it.
I have, when you have heard what I can say.
And know it now.
The senate have concluded to give this day a crown to mighty Caesar.
If you shall send them word you will not come, their minds may change.
Besides, it were a mock apt to be rendered for some one to say,
"Break up the senate till another time,
"when Caesar's wife shall meet with better dreams."
If Caesar hide himself, shall they not whisper,
"Lo, Caesar is afraid?"
Pardon me, Caesar, for my dear, dear love to your proceeding bids me tell you this, and reason to my love is liable.
How foolish do your fears seem now, Calpurnia!
I am ashamed I did yield to them.
Give me my robe, for I will go!
And look where Publius has come to fetch me.
- Good morrow, Caesar.
- Welcome, Publius.
What, Brutus, are you stirred so early, too?
Good morrow, Casca.
Caius Ligarius, Caesar was ne'er so much your enemy as that same ague which hath made you lean.
- What is't o'clock?
- Caesar, 'tis after eight.
See. Antony, that revels long o' nights is notwithstanding up.
- Good morrow, Antony.
- So to most noble Caesar.
I am to blame to be thus waited for.
Good friends, go in and taste some wine with me, and we, like friends, will straightaway go together.
Now, Cinna.
Now, Metellus. What, Trebonius!
I have an hour's talk in store for you.
Remember that you call on me today.
- Be near me, that I may remember you.
- Caesar, I will.
"Caesar, beware of Brutus.
"Take heed of Cassius.
Come not near Casca.
"Have an eye to Cinna.
Trust not Trebonius.
"Mark well Metellus Cimber.
"Decius Brutus loves thee not.
Thou has wronged Caius Ligarius.
"There is but one mind in all these men, and it is bent against Caesar.
"If thou be'st not immortal, look about you.
"Security gives way to conspiracy.
"The mighty gods defend thee.
Artemidorus."
Here will I stand till Caesar pass along.
If thou read this, O Caesar, thou mayst live.
If not, the Fates with traitors do contrive.
The ides of March are come.
Ay, Caesar, but not gone.
Hail, Caesar! Read this schedule.
Trebonius doth desire you to o'er-read, at your best leisure, this his humble suit.
O Caesar, read mine first.
For mine's a suit that touches Caesar nearer. Read it, great Caesar.
What touches us ourself shall be last served.
Delay not, Caesar, read it instantly.
What, is the fellow mad?
Sirrah, give place.
What, urge you your petitions in the street?
Come to the Capitol.
I wish your enterprise today may thrive.
- What enterprise, Popilius?
- Fare you well.
What said Popilius Lena?
He wished today our enterprise might thrive.
- I fear our purpose is discovered.
- Look how he makes to Caesar. Mark him.
Brutus, what shall be done?
If this be known, Cassius or Caesar never shall turn back, for I will slay myself.
Cassius, be constant.
Popilius Lena speaks not of our purposes, for, look, he smiles, and Caesar doth not change.
Trebonius knows his time, for, look you, Brutus, he draws Mark Antony out of the way.
Where is Metellus Cimber? Let him go, and presently prefer his suit to Caesar.
He is addressed.
Press near and second him.
Casca, you are the first that rears your hand.
Are we all ready?
What is now amiss that Caesar and his senate must redress?
Most high, most mighty, and most puissant Caesar,
Metellus Cimber throws before thy seat an humble heart.
I must prevent thee, Cimber.
These couchings and these lowly courtesies might fire the blood of ordinary men, and turn pre-ordinance and first decree into the law of children.
Be not fond to think that Caesar bears such rebel blood that will be thawed from the true quality by that which melteth fools.
I mean sweet words, low-crooked courtesies and base spaniel fawning.
Thy brother by decree is banished.
If thou dost bend and pray and fawn for him,
I spurn thee like a cur out of my way.
Know, Caesar doth not wrong, nor without cause will he be satisfied.
Is there no voice more worthy than my own to sound more sweetly in great Caesar's ear for the repealing of my banished brother?
I kiss thy hand, but not in flattery, Caesar, desiring thee that Publius Cimber may have an immediate freedom of repeal.
What, Brutus?
Pardon, Caesar. Caesar, pardon.
As low as to thy foot doth Cassius fall, to beg enfranchisement for Publius Cimber.
I could be well moved if I were as you.
If I could pray to move, prayers would move me.
But I am constant as the northern star, of whose true fixed and resting quality there is no fellow in the firmament.
The skies are painted with unnumbered sparks.
They are all fire and every one doth shine, but there's but one in all doth hold his place.
So in the world,
'tis furnished well with men, and men are flesh and blood, and apprehensive, yet in the number I do know but one, that unassailable holds on his rank, unshaked of motion, and that I am he.
Let me a little show it, even in this.
That I was constant
Cimber should be banished, and constant do remain to keep him so.
- O, Caesar!
- Hence!
- Wilt thou lift up Olympus?
- Great Caesar!
- Doth not Brutus bootless kneel?
- Speak, hands, for me!
Et tu, Brute? Then fall Caesar.
Liberty! Freedom!
Tyranny is dead!
Run hence!
Proclaim, cry it about the streets!
Some to the common pulpits and cry out,
"Liberty, freedom, enfranchisement!"
People and Senators, be not affrighted.
Fly not, stand still.
Ambition's debt is paid.
- Go to the pulpit, Brutus.
- Where's Publius?
Here, quite confounded with this mutiny.
Stand fast together, lest some friend of Caesar's should chance to...
Talk not of standing. Publius, good cheer.
There is no harm intended to your person, nor to no Roman else.
So tell them, Publius.
- Where is Antony?
- Fled to his house amazed.
Men, wives and children stare, cry out and run, as it were doomsday!
Now leave us, Publius.
Lest that the people, rushing on us, should do your age some mischief.
Do so, and let no man abide this deed, but we the doers.
Fates, we will know your pleasures.
That we shall die, we know.
'Tis but the time and drawing days out that men stand upon.
Why, he that cuts off 20 years of life, cuts off so many years of fearing death.
Grant that, and then is death a benefit.
So we, Caesar's friends, that have abridged his time of fearing death.
Stoop, Romans, stoop, and let us bathe our hands in Caesar's blood.
How many ages hence shall this our lofty scene be acted over, in states unborn and accents yet unknown.
How many times shall
Caesar bleed in sport, that now on Pompey's basis lies along no worthier than the dust.
So oft as that shall be, so often shall the knot of us be called the men that gave their country liberty.
Soft, who comes here?
A friend of Antony's.
Thus, Brutus, did my master bid me kneel.
Thus did Mark Antony bid me fall down.
And, being prostrate, thus he bade me say,
"Brutus is noble, wise, valiant and honest.
"Caesar was mighty, bold, royal and loving.
"Say I love Brutus and I honor him.
"Say I feared Caesar, honored him and loved him.
"If Brutus will vouchsafe that
Antony may safely come to him
"and be resolved how Caesar hath deserved to lie in death,
"Mark Antony shall not love
Caesar dead so well as Brutus living,
"but will follow the fortunes and affairs of noble Brutus
"through the hazards of this untrod state
"with all true faith."
So says my master Antony.
Thy master is a wise and valiant Roman.
I never thought him worse.
Tell him, so please him come unto this place, he shall be satisfied, and, by my honor, depart untouched.
I'll fetch him presently.
I know that we shall have him well to friend.
I wish we may.
And yet I have a mind that fears him much, and my misgiving still fall shrewdly to the purpose.
Welcome, Mark Antony.
O mighty Caesar, dost thou lie so low?
Are all thy conquests, glories, triumphs, spoils, shrunk to this little measure?
Fare thee well.
I know not, gentlemen, what you intend, who else must be let blood, who else is rank.
If I myself, there is no hour so fit as Caesar's death hour, nor no instrument of half that worth as those your swords, made rich with the most noble blood of all this world.
I do beseech ye, if you bear me hard, now, whilst your purpled hands do reek and smoke, fulfill your pleasure.
Live a thousand years,
I shall not find myself so apt to die.
No place will please me so, no mean of death, as here by Caesar, and by you cut off, the choice and master spirits of this age.
O Antony, beg not your death of us.
Though now we must appear bloody and cruel, as by our hands and this our present act, you see we do, yet see you but our hands and this the bleeding business they have done, our hearts you see not.
They are pitiful.
And pity to the general wrong of Rome, as fire drives out fire, so pity, pity, hath done this deed on Caesar.
Your voice shall be as strong as any man's in the disposing of new dignities.
Only be patient till we have appeased the multitude beside themselves with fear.
And then we will deliver you the cause why I, that did love Caesar when I struck him, have thus proceeded.
I doubt not of your wisdom.
Let each man render me his bloody hand.
First, Marcus Brutus, do I shake with you.
Next, Caius Cassius, do I take your hand.
Now, Decius Brutus, yours.
Yours, Metellus.
Yours, Cinna.
And my valiant Casca, yours.
Though last, not least in love, yours, good Trebonius.
Gentlemen all.
Alas, what shall I say?
My credit now stands on such slippery ground, that one of two bad ways you must conceit me, either a coward or a flatterer.
That I did love thee, Caesar, O it is true.
If then thy spirit look upon us now, shall it not grieve thee dearer than thy death to see thy Antony making his peace, shaking the bloody fingers of thy foes, most noble in the presence of thy corse?
Had I as many eyes as thou hast wounds, weeping as fast as they stream forth thy blood, it would become me better than to close in terms of friendship with thine enemies.
- Mark Antony?
- Pardon me, Caius Cassius.
The enemies of Caesar shall say this.
Then, in a friend, it is cold modesty.
I blame you not for praising Caesar so, but what compact mean you to have with us?
Will you be pricked in number of our friends, or shall we on, and not depend on you?
Therefore I took your hands, but was indeed swayed from the point by looking down on Caesar.
Friends am I with you all and love you all.
Upon this hope that you shall give me reasons why and wherein Caesar was dangerous.
Or else were this a savage spectacle.
Our reasons are so full of good regard that were you, Antony, the son of Caesar, you should be satisfied.
I name this ship...
Titanic.
May God bless her... and all who sail in her.
- Hip! Hip!
- Hooray!
Listen to this, Sylvia.
"The new White Star liner R.M.S. Titanic is the largest vessel in the world.
It is not only in size, but also in the luxury of her appointments... that the Titanic takes first place among the big steamers of the world.
By the provision of Vinolia Otto Toilet Soap for her first-class passengers... the Titanic also leads... as offering a higher standard of toilet luxury and comfort at sea."
Let me see.
For the first class passengers, mark you.
The rest don't wash, of course.
Excuse me, sir, but are you a foreigner?
- Me?
- Or a radical perhaps?
I ask because my wife and I find your sneering remarks in bad taste.
What's that?
Let those who wish to belittle their country's achievements do so in private.
Every Britisher is proud of the unsinkable Titanic.
- Yes, indeed.
- I'm sure my husband would agree with you.
He's going to join the Titanic as her second officer.
I, uh - I apologize.
A misunderstanding, of course.
Oh, of course, madam.
Soap is no laughing matter.
It was the suggestion of criticism.
Of the advertisement, sir, not the ship.
Uh, quite so.
You're joining her at Liverpool,
I take it?
No, sir, Belfast.
Then we sail down to Southampton.
Ah, how I envy you. The newspapers say she's a veritable floating city.
Symbol of progress... of man's final victory over nature and the elements.
- 800 cases shelled walnuts, Titanic.
- Yes.
- 3,000 dozen fresh eggs, Titanic.
- Yes.
- It's all Titanic this.
- All Titanic.
250 five-pound jars Beluga caviar.
2,000 pounds of jam, greengage.
Definitely not the veal.
But we'll take the rest, subject to inspection.
Good-bye.
The final passenger list for the Titanic, sir.
- How many first class?
- Three hundred and thirty-two, sir.
Two hundred and seventy-six, second.
Seven hundred and eight, steerage.
- Total with crew?
- Two thousand, two hundred and eight, sir.
More than half the steerage join at Cherbourg and Queenstown.
There we are.
That's eight wardrobe trunks, 10 suitcases.
Eighteen pieces in all.
- They're ready.
- Mm-hmm.
- All ready, sir.
- Thank you.
Well, good-bye, sir.
I hope you have a pleasant journey.
Thank you very much.
- Are you sure you're warm enough?
- Yes, thank you.
All right, Perkins.
Now, children, here they come.
Show Sir Richard and Her Ladyship how much we respect them.
Hooray!
Hooray!
Hooray!
Hooray!
- Who are they?
- The workhouse kids.
Making sure of their Christmas turkey from the home farm.
Good-bye, darling, good-bye.
You won't forget to write to me, will you?
We'll send you a wireless from the ship.
Oh, do take care of my little one.
- Well, Godspeed to thee, child.
- Thank you, Father.
You'll all come back when your fortunes are made.
We will that, Father.
What will you do with the horse and cart?
I'll sell them in Queenstown before we get on the ship.
Well, get a good price, Tom.
They're sharp in Queenstown.
Don't worry, Father.
I'll watch me step.
Don't grieve, Mrs. Farrell.
It's a wise thing your husband is doing.
- Can I help you up, miss?
- Thank you.
That's very kind of you.
Hey, wait for me!
Do you think they'll promote you to first officer after this trip, Bertie?
Well, that depends whether they keep old Wilde on or not.
- After all, you were first on the Majestic.
- Ah, but that was temporary.
- Don't you mind?
- No.
Bill Murdock's the one with his nose out of joint this trip.
Ambitious fellow is Bill.
So are you.
You know you are.
I'd rather be second in the Titanic than first or even chief in any other ship.
With me, madam, it's the honor of serving the company, and to hell with the pay.
Language!
What would you like me to bring you back from New York?
There's nothing you couldn't buy better or cheaper over here.
Ah, but there is. Garters!
Ladies' silk garters with big frilly bows.
There's a shop on Broadway full of 'em, just in from Paris.
Blue ones, pink ones, scarlet!
What's the matter?
The idea of you buying garters with big frilly bows on them.
The idea of you wearing 'em.
Oh-ho! Ooh-la-la!
Now, Bertie, look at the time.
It's late.
And you have to get down to the shi -
- Morning, sir.
- Good morning, Pilot.
- The engine room wheel has been tested.
- Quite a send-off, eh, Captain?
- Yes, sir. Yes, they have.
- Thank you, sir.
There should be quite a welcome waiting for us in New York too.
It'll be a proud moment for you,
Mr. Chairman.
Oh, and for you, Andrews.
You're the man who built her.
You're the one who ought to take the bows.
I'm only the office boy.
We should arrive - Uh, let's see.
- Wednesday morning.
- We might do better than that.
- Not out for a fast run this trip, are you?
- Oh, no, no, no, nothing like that.
She'll do better when the engines have settled down.
Naturally, Captain, you'll use your own judgment.
I'm just an ordinary passenger on this trip.
- Mr. Murdock.
- Oh, Andrews.
Get the men to stations and let me know when the gangway's landed.
Aye, aye, sir.
See? Steady as a rock.
That's remarkable.
Of course the sea's dead calm at the moment.
All the same, Captain, dead calm or not... there are lots of other ships that'd be rolling anyway.
That's perfectly true.
As you say, sir, she's as steady as a rock.
No, someone must have jogged the table.
So sorry.
- Got any more sugar there?
- Yes, sir.
- What is it?
- More ice warnings from steamers ahead, sir.
One from the America and another from the Baltic
Hmm.
Mmm.
Just south of Cape Race.
Never known pack ice come that far south before, sir.
Been a mild winter up in the Arctic.
This ice must be drifting down on the Labrador current.
Well, our passengers aren't in any hurry.
Wouldn't be with us if they were.
- Messages for the captain.
- Oh, very good, Sparks.
- Would you see he gets them right away?
- Certainly.
Excuse me, sir.
From the wireless room.
Thank you.
Excuse me.
Ice warnings from steamers ahead of us.
Excuse me.
- Serious?
- Oh, we shall keep a sharp look out.
Hear it? That's the Titanic.
What's she saying?
"Best wishes to Joe and Hattie.
See you Wednesday. Love, Mina and Bill."
Private stuff.
Yes, there must be a lot of money in that ship.
They've been at it for the best part of the day.
Float ice.
"Buy 200,000 Rand.
Market price.
Opening Monday."
This chap's spending a fortune.
- What have you got there, Sparks?
- Titanic on her maiden voyage, sir.
She's working Cape Race.
- How far away is she?
- It's hard to tell.
Signal strength's pretty good.
About 50 miles back,
I should think.
- Get this off to all ships, will you.
- Yes, sir.
From S.S. Californian.
Ice reports.
Bravo!
Ah, well, now, that's enough of that.
Give us something livelier.
- Give us a jig now, Aloysius!
- Ja! Ja!
Would you care to dance?
Dance!
Oh, 'tis only a dance.
Come on now.
Come on.
Good evening, milady.
Sir Richard.
Good evening.
Leadville Johnny they call him.
And he was the best gol-durned gold miner in Colorado.
Fifteen I was when I married him.
- Really?
- Mm-hmm.
And he didn't have a cent.
Well, three months later he struck it rich... and we was millionaires.
- You know what he did?
- No.
He built me a house.
And he had silver dollars cemented all over the floors of every room.
I say, how very tiresome for you.
- Evening, sir.
- Evening, Kemish.
- Any troubles?
- No, sir, she's a beautiful job.
- Thank you, Hesketh.
- Good night, sir.
I've sent off as much as I could, John, but the purser's office kept sending up more.
Here he is again.
- Good evening.
- Sorry, Mr. Phillips.
"From the Titanic at sea.
Wish you were here."
Blimey.
Well, how's Cape Race working, eh?
There's a lot of repeats.
Not too bad.
There was an ice report from the Californian.
It went to the bridge.
All right.
Oh, no peace for the wicked, eh?
Come in.
- What, more?
- Afraid so.
Put them down there, will you?
Having trouble, Sparks?
Certainly not.
- Good night.
- Good night.
- Keep on course, Q.M.
- Aye, aye, sir.
- You sent for me, sir?
- Ah, yes, Chippy.
The temperature's dropping. We don't want a freeze-up in the fresh water tanks.
- So keep an eye on them, will you?
- Aye, aye, sir.
Thank you.
It's getting jolly cold.
Are you warm enough, darling?
Let's go back.
We ought not to be here anyway.
This is first class.
They're welcome to it on a night like this.
Come on.
- Evening, Mr. Lightoller.
- Good evening, sir.
- Any more ice reports?
- No, sir.
What's the temperature like?
It's almost freezing point, sir, and still dropping.
In an hour or so we'll be in the Labrador current.
Well, the weather looks clear enough so far.
If there's the slightest bit of haze, we shall have to slow down.
- Let me know at once if you're doubtful.
- Aye, aye, sir.
- Now, Mr. Moody.
- Sir?
Call up the the lookouts and tell them to keep their eyes skinned for small ice and growlers.
There might be some of that about.
- Make sure they understand.
- Aye, aye, sir.
- Tell 'em to 'pass it on when they're relieved.
- Yes, sir.
Ice ahead, sir!
Aye, aye.
- Stop engines.
- Stop engines.
Stop engines, sir.
That's field ice, Mr. Groves.
I'm not trying to find my way around that until daylight.
- Shall we report it, sir?
- Yes.
- Work out our position.
- Aye, aye, sir.
Evans, what other ships are there near?
- Only the Titanic, sir.
- Mmm.
You'll have to call her and tell her we're stopped on account of ice.
Mr. Groves will give you our position when he's worked it out.
Order from the bridge.
Special watch for small ice and growlers.
Right-ho.
I say, you won't drink all the cocoa down there, will you?
I told Chippy to keep his eye on the fresh water.
Oh, and the lookouts have been warned to keep their eyes skinned for ice.
I think that's about the lot.
- I'm off on the rounds.
- Thanks, Lights.
You're welcome to it. Good night.
Here, I -
- Oh, sorry, sir.
- Hello, Blake.
Oh, uh, pop my coat in my cabin for me, will you, please?
- Yes, sir.
- Thank you.
That'll be brandies for the gentlemen and a hock and seltzer for the ladies.
- Is that correct, sir?
- That's right.
Now, look here. You're sure about this full speed trial tomorrow?
That's what I heard from one of the officers, sir. I can't guarantee it, naturally.
Well, here's somebody who ought to be able to tell us.
- Hey, Lieutenant.
- Sir?
- Good evening, ladies.
- Uh, have a drink.
Thank you, no, sir,
I'm on duty.
We've decided to win a sweep on the ship's run tomorrow.
Now, rumor has it the captain's going to see how fast she can go. Is that right?
- It's possible.
- Aha!
Now, what would be your guess about the run, Lieutenant?
- I don't think I ought to tell you that, sir.
- Why not?
Well, wouldn't you feel worried about betting on a certainty?
Are you sure you won't have a drink?
A little later, if I may.
Please excuse me.
Here, lad.
We're trying to find our bunks.
Well, you can't come this way
This is second class.
Oh, sorry. No offense, lad.
Down to the end, then left.
- Good evening, sir.
- Good evening, Steward.
- Everything all right?
- Yes, sir.
- Good.
- Can I do anything for you, sir?
No, thank you.
Winning a lot, is he?
- Pardon?
- You know the one I mean.
Oh, uh, yes, sir, he is.
Ah. I thought I'd seen him before.
The Majestic, I think it was.
- The name of Rogers, sir.
- Oh?
It was Yates last time.
Can they afford to lose?
- Wealthy gentlemen, sir.
- Mmm.
If you get a chance tomorrow, try and drop them a hint about what they're up against.
- We don't want any complaints of that sort.
- I'll do that, sir.
Get the ship a bad name.
Get you a bad name too.
- Good night, Steward.
- Good night, sir.
I said I'll see you.
Flush.
Here's our position, as near as I can work it out.
Uh, the old man says he gave you the rest of the message.
That's right.
What's the matter?
What's he saying?
He says keep out.
Now he's calling Cape Race again.
What's he sending to Cape Race?
More private stuff.
Some big bug wants his private railway car to meet him in New York.
How about that?
Well, it's time I signed off and got a bit of shut-eye.
Oh, uh, when I get off watch,
I'd like to listen in a bit. All right?
- Beginning to get the code now, are you?
- One word in three, sometimes.
Have to make you second operator.
Then you can wind up the detector.
I'll take you up on that.
- Hello, Doc.
- Hello, Lights.
- What's the matter? Somebody ill?
- I'm on an errand of mercy.
Hope she's not too young for you.
Oh, you've got an evil mind.
Come in!
Hello, Doc.
What can I do for you?
You can stop working on this grand ship of yours and have a nightcap.
Well, I've got one here.
This is sound medical advice
I'm giving you.
Come in.
What is this?
"Restaurant galley hot press not working.
Alterations needed to the writing room.
Two few screws on the stateroom coat hooks."
This ship of yours must be falling to bits.
I like to have things just so.
People first, things second.
- Your very good health, Mr. Andrews.
- Good health.
Go on! Get on with it!
Aye.
Hmm.
Yes?
There's a big ship coming up to starboard, sir.
- How far away is she?
- Maybe 10 miles.
Well, better find out who she is,
I suppose.
- Contact her with the Morse lamp.
- Right, sir.
- What did you see?
- Iceberg dead ahead, sir.
Iceberg dead ahead, sir.
- Hard to starboard.
- Hard to starboard, sir.
- Full astern both.
- Full astern both, sir.
Close watertight doors.
Close watertight doors, sir.
Hard to starboard it is, sir.
Come on! Go!
Come on!
Up the ladders, boys!
Come on! Up top!
- What is it?
- Iceberg, sir.
I put her hard to starboard and reversed the engines, but she was too close.
- Stop engines.
- Stop engines.
I splashed my drink.
Steward!
- Yes, I saw it. Huge thing.
- Good Lord!
You can't see it now though.
Must've just shaved past it.
- What do you think of this for a souvenir?
- Where did you get that from?
It's off the berg.
There's tons of it up forward.
- Oh, sorry.
- Steward, bring me a whiskey and soda!
We've run aground, I tell you.
We've run aground on Newfoundland.
That's what we've done!
- What are you talking about?
- Oh, shut up!
- You don't know the first thing about it!
- Shut the dampers and get the fires doused!
Thanks, mate.
I tell you she's thrown a propeller blade.
I was in the old Majestic when the same thing happened.
We'll be going back to Belfast. You'll see.
They've got the pumps working.
You get a gang down here and draw the fires.
You heard!
Come on, me lucky lads!
All right, lads, come on.
Down again.
- Come on, Ted. Come on.
- I don't know.
Get down the ladder, lad.
It's my birthday today as well.
Aw, come on.
Come on, lads.
Well, if there's nothing to see up on deck,
I'm going back to bed. Good night.
Good night.
- What's the trouble?
- Nothing serious, sir.
In a few hours we'll be on our way again.
Yes?
- Why have we stopped?
- A bit of trouble, sir.
The captain's compliments, would you please join him on the bridge?
- Now?
- If you please, sir.
She's making water fast, sir.
The mail hold's practically full already.
- Aren't the pumps working?
- Yes, sir.
- Thank you, Carpenter.
- The engine room say they'll need more.
They're rigging them now.
This is most unfortunate, Captain.
Yes, sir.
Do you think the ship is seriously damaged?
I'm afraid she is.
Excuse me.
How long is this likely to delay us?
- Not long.
- We've struck a berg.
I think she's badly damaged.
I'd like to know how badly.
All right.
I'll go down and have a look.
Oh, glory be! Come on!
- Here we are!
- Come on!
Oh, no, no. If we're gonna play a game, we'll play it properly.
- Right?
- Right you are!
Oh, well played, sir!
I say, let's go down and join the fun.
But they're steerage passengers.
Come away, Ireland!
Get down there!
Anything more you want to see?
No.
Chief, I'd get those men up as soon as you can.
Yes, I'll -
I'll do that, Mr. Andrews.
The knocking woke me up.
I don't know what it was.
- What have we stopped for?
- There's talk of an iceberg, ma'am.
I expect we've stopped so as not to run over anything.
What's up?
Oh, we're stopped and blowing off steam.
Something's wrong. I don't know what.
Bumped a bit of ice, I think.
Well, I can't sleep with this racket going on.
Do you want me to give you a hand?
Well, I've finished the Cape Race traffic.
Uh, you can help with the accounts, if you like.
I'll get some clothes on.
- Do you think we'll have to turn back?
- Oh, don't say it.
If we do, we won't get a moment's peace in here.
Here's the position.
Water in the forepeak.
Numbers one and two holds.
The mail room and boiler rooms six and five.
That means a gash
300 foot long... from there to there... below the waterline.
- Do you agree?
- Yes.
Well?
The pumps are keeping the water down in this boiler room... but the first five compartments are flooding.
Well, what's the answer?
She's going to sink, Captain.
But she can't sink.
- She's unsinkable.
- She can't float.
Look.
She could float with any three of her first five watertight compartments flooded.
She could even float with four of them gone.
- But she can't float with all five full up.
- Yes, but -
These watertight bulkheads here only go as high as E Deck.
The weight of water in the bow is going to pull her down by the head.
So you're going to get the fifth watertight compartment overflowing into the sixth... the sixth into the seventh and so on as she gets lower.
It's a mathematical certainty.
With that amount of underwater damage, she can't stay afloat.
How long will she last?
Just trying to work that out now.
As far as I can see, she made 14 feet of water... in the first 10 minutes after the collision.
That's not very fast.
She should live... another hour and a half.
Yes, about that, I think.
There must be no panic.
No.
You'll be careful what you say to the passengers?
Of course.
How many people are there on board?
Twenty-two hundred or more.
And room in the boats for... how many?
Twelve hundred.
I don't think the Board of Trade regulations visualized this situation.
Do you?
Gentlemen, we are in a precarious position.
We must be prepared to abandon ship.
Mr. Murdock, you will muster the passengers.
Mr. Lightoller, you will have the boats uncovered and swung out.
Yes, sir.
Mr. Boxhall, call all hands and get them to boat stations.
Mr. Moody, you will help Mr. Lightoller.
Mr. Wilde and Mr. Pitman will remain on the bridge.
Everything will be done quietly and calmly.
There must be no alarm and no panic.
I will give the word when the boats are to be loaded with the women and children.
Carry on, please.
Captain.
Aren't you exaggerating the danger?
I'm afraid not, sir.
Well, where's Andrews?
I am acting on his advice.
This ship is going to founder.
But she can't.
In any case, we can't get everyone in the boats.
I know that, sir.
Please God, it won't come to that.
All right, now listen to me.
The ship has been seriously damaged.
The captain's ordered the boats swung out.
It's got to be done quickly and -
It's got to be done quickly and efficiently.
We don't want any panic.
If you keep your heads, the passengers will keep theirs.
Now, I know you've had no chance for a boat drill.
But you're all seamen and you've got brains.
Now's the time to use them.
- All right, bos'n, get busy.
- Yes, sir.
The ship is badly damaged.
Send out the call for assistance.
- The regulation distress call, sir?
- Yes, and at once.
As soon as you're in touch with the ship nearest to us... tell them to come as quickly as they can.
- You understand?
- Yes, sir.
- That's our position.
- Yes, sir.
What about that steamer over there?
Who is she?
I don't know.
Suppose she's in the ice too.
She stopped at about seven bells.
I tried calling her with the Morse lamp, but she didn't take any notice.
- Well, me for bed.
- Right.
- Good night.
- Good night, sir.
Any luck?
The Frankfurt - 150 miles away.
The Olympic says the Mount Temple's nearer.
Well, there must be someone nearer still.
Try sending SOS.
That's the new call.
It may be the only chance you'll ever have.
Come in.
Sorry to disturb you, sir, but captain's orders.
- What is it?
- There's a little trouble with the ship.
Everyone's to put on warm clothing, get their life belts on and go up on deck.
- What?
- It's only a precaution, ma'am.
Excuse me, sir.
Everybody up, get dressed, get your life belts on at once.
I said, you get dressed, get life belt, quick.
Savvy? Chop-chop!
Goodyard, here!
Will you get your life belt and get dressed!
Get your life belt! Get it!
Come on, lads, hurry it up.
You've had time enough.
Unfold those covers.
- Mr. Lightoller, I must insist.
- What's in that sack?
- Bread, sir.
- Right. Chuck it in the boat. This one.
Very good, sir.
Every boat must be manned by seamen.
That's laid down.
Everything's in hand, sir.
Will you please go down to the lounge.
Come along.
Ship those turning handles.
Water?
Water?
Come on, get up.
We're sinking.
- Get out of it!
- I'm fine.
Everybody up!
- Captain's orders!
- Why don't you put the light out!
Hooligans.
- Stewardess.
- Yes, sir?
Why aren't you wearing your life belt?
Well, the passengers mustn't think I'm scared.
Let them see you wearing it.
Put it on, child, for your own sake too.
Oh, madam, let me help.
Come along.
Really, it's too tiresome of them.
Everybody knows this ship can't sink.
Ah, there you are.
And me sleeping sound for the first time since we left Queenstown.
- Never mind now. Never mind.
- It'll be cold outside.
- Where's Pat off to?
- Here, hold my bag, will you?
Get up top, quick.
They say they always grow up to look like their mothers.
The older one's keener, if you know what I mean.
I know what you mean.
Why don't you try giving them both a miss this trip?
And take the mother out?
Yes, you might do worse, by the sight of it.
You're heating my blood.
I think I'll turn in.
- Sweet dreams.
- Good night, Sparks.
Mr. Dean! Sir!
- There's a distress call just come through.
- Who from?
- The Titanic. They've struck a berg.
- Is this a leg-pull, Sparks?
No. They've struck a berg. They want us to come at once. They're sinking.
- The Titanic? Don't be a fool.
- It's true.
I'm going to the captain.
- There's nothing in sight. Take over.
- Aye, aye, sir.
Sir. Sir!
What the devil's going -
Haven't you learned to knock before you come in here?
It's a distress call, sir, from the Titanic.
She's sinking.
I'm sorry, sir. I -
Mr. Dean, turn the ship round.
Head northwest.
I'll work the course out for you in a minute.
- Aye, aye, sir.
- Now, Cottam.
- You're sure this is the Titanic?
- Yes, sir.
- Certain?
- Absolutely.
All right, check back.
Find out everything you can.
- Tell them we're coming as fast as possible.
- Yes, sir.
Sir, we've contacted the Carpathia.
Eastbound from New York.
She's on her way to us.
- Well, how far away is she?
- Fifty-eight miles, sir.
She's making all possible speed.
Should reach us in four hours.
Four hours.
- Yes, sir.
- Well, what about that ship over there?
About 10 miles away.
You can see a light.
- Isn't she replying?
- No, sir.
- Well -
- She'd blast our ears off if she did.
Maybe she can't keep a 24-hour watch.
Maybe she hasn't got wireless at all, sir.
All right, Bride. Thank you.
- Mr. Moody.
- Sir?
Tell Mr. Boxhall to fire the distress rockets.
One every five minutes from the port side.
Aye, aye, sir.
Port side boats all swung out, sir.
Shall I fill them?
Yes.
Put the women and children in and lower away.
Aye, aye, sir.
Looked like a rocket, sir.
Yes.
I wonder what a ship like that would want to fire a rocket for.
Right then. Number 22.
One, two.
Step aboard please, madam, and I'll pass the children across.
- But what about my husband?
- I'm sorry. Women and children first.
- Yes, my dear, I think you better had.
- But in a small boat like that!
- I can't go without my husband.
- That lady's right.
- It's absolutely ridiculous.
- Now, madam, I assure you.
- Kindly help me out of here, please.
- It can't be helped if she won't go.
Now, madam, please.
Now, would you be good enough to step into the boat, madam.
And catch my death of cold?
Certainly not!
- Step into the boat please, madam.
- Thank you.
Eileen!
- Eileen!
- Yes?
You won't get back on board tomorrow without a pass.
But I don't see why -
I have my orders, ladies and gentlemen.
The ladies are certainly safer here than on those little boats.
The captain's opinion about that is different, sir.
Look here, sir.
I don't know whether you gentlemen have noticed it... but this ship has gotten quite a list on it now.
- That's not right.
- I don't suppose that's very serious.
You can't sink this boat.
That's quite certain.
Get a move on.
Come on, lads.
Come on.
Move along there.
What's the use, Chief?
All the pumps in Belfast would never keep that water down.
That may be so, but the longer we can keep her afloat... the more lives will be saved.
So put your backs into it.
- Sorry, sir.
- I'm sorry.
- Mr. Andrews.
- Martin, there's a job for you.
- Aren't you going up top, sir?
- Presently.
Open up all the spare cabins, take out all life belts and spare blankets... and get your men to distribute them - the blankets to the boats.
- Right, sir. I'll see to it at once.
- Good.
- Oh, Mr. Andrews.
- Yes?
I'd like you to tell me something. I -
I have a wife and three children on board.
Just how serious is it?
I'm not the panicking kind.
The ship has about an hour to live.
A little more, if some of the upper bulkheads hold, but not much more.
Get your wife and children into the boats.
Thank you.
Oh, Mr. Andrews.
I take it you and I may both be in the same boat later.
Yes, we may.
Oh, this way, madam.
This way, please. Quickly as you can.
Straight the way down there.
Please, will you tell me what's going on, Robert?
People have been rushing about, and noises overhead.
Oh, it's very tiresome.
We've struck an iceberg and damaged the ship.
- We may be a day late getting to New York.
- Oh, that is annoying.
And to make matters worse... the captain's being very fussy and correct.
All women and children have to go up on deck and get into the lifeboats.
- Oh, no!
- Mmm. Afraid so, dear.
But I don't want to wake the children.
Is it really necessary?
Yes.
I think we should do what the captain says.
Very well, Robert.
We - We must wrap the children up warmly.
We can take the blankets off the beds too.
I can deal with Tom if you'll look after the girls.
Yes, all right.
Tom.
Tom. Come on, old boy.
You've got to get up now.
- Anne, Jennifer. Wake up, darlings.
- Sorry. There we are. There's the boy.
Come on! Come on!
Up, quick! Out of it!
Quick, lads!
The bulkhead's going!
- I say! What a whizzer!
- That was spiffy, eh?
Marvelous!
What a whizzer!
Marvelous!
Get to your boats, please.
But it's only a safety precaution, madam.
I refuse to wear it.
- You must wear your life jacket.
- But I dislike it intensely.
- I-I don't want to wear that.
- Try it on, sister.
Everyone's wearing them this season.
They're the latest thing.
Hey, Steward, cancel my appointment with the hairdresser, will you?
- Tell her I've gone boating.
- Yes, madam.
Get to your boats, please.
Come along.
- Really, I'd rather not wear it.
- Come along, please.
Will you let me have one, please?
A big one.
- That's mine.
- Be quiet. Too many people.
- Purser! Here. Purser!
- Careful, please.
I must have my jewels. I must have them.
They're in the safe.
I've a receipt here to prove it.
But the word's going round that the women and children are taking to the boats.
You can't go through here.
This is not the way to the steerage boat deck.
- I've told you!
- Which is the way, then?
They'll be opening the lower deck ports when the orders are given.
Oh, they will, will they?
We'll soon see about that.
I'm going to have to cut down more steam.
- I'll have to get rid of some of the load then.
- Yes.
Well, you can cut the boiler room fans for a start.
- That'll help.
- Good.
How are things up top, sir?
Any chance for us?
Whatever happens, we've got to keep the lights going.
I'll give the word when it's time to go, and then it's every man for himself.
But it won't be so bad.
They say the Carpathia's on her way to us.
It should be here anytime now.
Well, let's hope they're right.
Eh, boys?
And if any of you feel like praying, you'd better go ahead.
The rest can join me in a cup of tea.
Cut your heating and hot water.
Cut anything you like.
I've got to have every ounce of steam you can give me.
- Aye, aye, sir.
- All right.
- Mr. Dean.
- Sir?
Get all hands on deck and prepare to receive survivors.
Knock off all routine work.
Get your boats ready and swing them out.
Rig electric lights down the side of the ship.
Open all gangway doors.
Hook a block and line rope in every gangway door.
Canvas slings.
Get those ready for the injured.
Oh, and see that all your side ladders are down.
- Have you got that?
- Aye, aye, sir.
All right.
Quartermaster.
Telephone the doctor and the chief steward.
Ask them to come and see me on the bridge now.
Aye, aye, sir.
No, no, she can't get on!
She'll swamp it!
- Not on this boat! There isn't room!
- Mommy!
You must let her on!
It's Mommy!
- You must come on! Let her on!
- All right.
- Come on!
- It's all right, lady. You can have my place.
- Thank you very much.
- Joe, you take the helm.
- Mommy!
- Right, darling!
Stand by to lower!
What's the matter?
Aren't you in charge of this boat?
Oh, I'm no seaman, sir.
Joe can manage just as well.
Ladies first, eh, sir?
Lower away together!
Quickly!
Come along, you men!
- Quickly!
- Hold it!
- What the -
- Will you kindly not interfere, sir.
We've got to get these boats away.
We are getting them away.
Do you want me to drown everybody?
Because that's what will happen if I lower these boats too quickly.
Now stand back. Please.
Carry on lowering.
Hey. There'll be trouble about that when we get to New York.
What's the matter with him?
Is he blind?
That's six rockets she's fired, sir.
Yes.
Maybe I'd better tell the captain.
What is it?
That big steamer, sir.
She's firing rockets.
Six up to now.
Well, perhaps they're company signals of some kind.
Call her up with the Morse lamp and ask her.
Aye, aye, sir.
The captain thinks she must be signaling to another ship about the ice.
Looks a bit queer, doesn't she?
I'll try signaling her again.
- Looks as if she's listing.
- That's because of the angle she's at to us.
If you please, ma'am.
My friend has been put into that boat.
We want to stay together.
- But, madam -
- Madam, you must get in.
- But I don't see why.
- Madam - Please, madam.
You cannot pick and choose your boat.
Get in.
Gangway, please!
Gangway!
I want to go back to bed, Daddy.
You're going for a ride on a boat, old Son.
First they tell us to go up, then they tell us to wait down here.
- The boats are up top, ma'am.
- Well, I wish they'd make up their minds.
Very sorry, ma'am.
- The indecision is most bewildering.
- Yes, ma'am.
If there's no danger, why do you want us to put our life belts on? Tell me that much.
Listen. I'm not here to argue with you.
I want everybody with their life belts on.
Pat and I have found a way up.
Follow me.
- Where is Pat?
- He's gone ahead. It's all right.
It may be someone trying to signal, but I can't make any sense out of it.
Could be a masthead light flickering, couldn't it, sir?
If I had a gun,
I'd put a shell into them.
This way, madam. Quickly as you can, please.
Yes, ma'am.
Straightaway down to the end, please.
This way, madam. That's right.
Hey.
The water's up to E Deck forward.
There's not much time left.
- If they won't get in, chuck 'em in.
- Right.
- Keep straight on for the boat deck.
- Oh, this way, madam.
Thank you. Quickly as you can.
Right the way down to the end, please.
- Please don't put me in the boat!
- Now come along, madam.
I'd rather die, I tell you!
I've never been in an open boat in my life.
No, I can't do it! I shall fall!
Oh, no, no, please!
You've got to go, madam, so you may as well keep quiet.
Off we go, then.
Good boy, Michael.
Through here now.
Come on.
Here, I say! No steerage up here.
This is second class.
Oh, it is, is it?
Good God, man, will you let these ladies pass to the boats?
It's against the rules.
I shall lose me job.
You'll lose your teeth if you don't shut up.
- Get off me.
- Little rat.
Come on, quick, before he fetches someone.
Look there.
Which way to the boats?
Any way you like, friend. Any way you like.
All roads lead to Rome.
This way, Pat.
- No! No!
- Come along, madam.
No! I won't! I won't!
It's women and children first, ma'am.
Please, Lottie, for God's sake.
Be brave and go.
I'll get a place in another boat.
- This way, madam.
- Come on, Lottie, please.
Robert, I can't go through with it.
It looks as though we shall have to forgo the drive down to Philadelphia and take the train.
I can't leave you here, Robert.
Cousin Henry won't mind us being one day late... but he'll draw the line at two.
I'm not going, Robert.
My dear, I never expected to ask you to obey me... but this is one time you must.
It's only a matter of form for you and the children to go first.
Everyone here will be quite safe.
Is that the truth?
Certainly it is.
If you please, madam.
The children will follow.
Now you be good girls and look after your mother.
Yes.
Here we are. Hup!
Good-bye, my dear son.
Come on, son.
- Thank you.
- Right.
- Keep everybody back well clear of the boat.
- Aye, aye, sir.
Stand back! Come on, everybody!
Stand back, please!
Stand back please, sir.
We're going to lower. Back.
Right. Lower away together.
Watch your hands, ladies.
Keep them well inside the boat. Thank you.
- Say good-bye.
- Bye, Daddy.
- Let's follow somebody, Pat!
- Oh, and get chucked out?
No, no. Let's try this way. Come on.
Oh!
First class.
Come on, Pat.
I don't care, Mary.
I don't like the look of it. We're going up.
Just a minute.
You'll be told when to go up!
Right. Eighteen.
Right! Lower away together!
Hold it!
If you please.
But there's room in the boat.
I thought -
Women and children only.
Miss Russell, I thought you'd gone to the boat.
My pig. I must have my lucky pig.
Well - Well, uh -
I - I've had enough.
We can settle later, if you like.
Yeah, yeah. Later.
Maybe he's got an appointment.
Maybe he's right.
I don't know much about ships... but I'm beginning to think that we're in a tight corner.
Then what shall we play now, gentlemen?
Happy Families?
Well, Phillips?
Carpathia, sir. She's making 17 knots and should be with us about 3:30.
That'll be too late.
- There may be someone nearer. Keep trying.
- Yes, sir.
I got you a life belt, John.
Oh, put it down there, will you?
- Don't they see us?
- No, sir.
There was a light flashing, but it must have come from their masthead.
- Quartermaster Rowe.
- Sir?
- Can you send and read Morse?
- Yes, sir.
Then signal and keep signaling...
"We are the Titanic sinking.
Please have your boats ready."
Aye, aye, sir.
- You go along and help with the boats.
- Yes, sir.
- Mr. Boxhall.
- Sir?
Ask Mr. Wilde where the arms and ammunition are kept.
They may be needed later.
Yes, sir.
We've done it, Michael.
No! No, I don't want to go!
I want to stay with you! No!
No! No!
Come along, ladies. There's no time to lose.
You heard what he said, the pair of you.
Get along.
The same with you now. Come on.
Mama -
- Your boat full, Mr. Lowe?
- There's some ladies here for the boat, sir.
Come along then, please.
Quickly. Come along.
Quickly, ladies. Hurry.
Come along, please.
Go along with you now.
Watch your step.
Make room for them in the back.
Watch your step.
But surely they'd let us take just one bag.
No, dear. No bag.
But there's my trousseau.
Everything we have is here.
Not quite everything.
Say, we only got one sailor with us.
That's not enough to manage this boat.
Hold it there!
Avast lowering!
What's the matter?
Hey, son!
We only got one sailor on this boat!
Are there any spare hands here?
I'll go... if you like.
- Are you a sailor?
- I'm a yachtsman.
If you're seaman enough to nip down that lifeline, you can go. Below!
- Sir?
- Let's have that line!
Right. Good luck.
Lower away together!
Women and children to the boats!
Women and children first!
- Please, Rachael, get in the boat.
- Yes, Mrs. Straus, you must.
I've always stayed with my husband, Colonel.
So why should I leave him now?
Please. Be sensible.
We have been living together for many years, Isodor.
Where you go, I go.
I'm sure nobody would object to an old gentleman like Mr. Straus going in a boat.
I'll ask the officer.
No. I will not go before the other men.
We stay.
Come, my dear.
She's right, you see.
We'll stay together too.
But she's old. You're young.
Please, darling.
I can look after myself.
We both can.
- Watch your step!
- All right, now you two. Come along.
- But, Dad -
- Wait a minute!
He can't go.
It's women and children only.
Of course he can go.
He's only 13.
All right, son, go on.
You can look after your mother.
Now, keep back, please, ladies and gentlemen! Keep back!
It's absurd.
On the other side the gentlemen are going in the boats with their ladies.
Why on earth we're standing here,
I don't know.
But... will there be room in the boats for everybody?
Of course there will.
Yes, oughtn't we to ask?
Somebody just said we had to hang about here.
- What are we supposed to do, mates?
- I don't know.
- Perhaps you ought to go up top.
- Sir?
Please, sir, where are we supposed to go?
Put those cigarettes out at once.
Don't you know the rules yet?
I'll have you on the captain's report.
Make way.
Come on, you two, out of it.
- Come on, you! Get out of there.
- I want to get on the boat!
Please let me stay in the boat!
Please let me stay in the boat! Please!
That's it.
All officers are requested to report to the chief officer's cabin, sir.
Right.
No men are allowed in these boats until all the women have gone!
- Come on, lady.
- Thank you.
Now, Mr. Guggenheim, you really ought to hurry.
I'll see your valet knows where you are.
This thing's uncomfortable. It hurts.
You should really be up top, sir.
My valet. Send for my valet.
- May I go too?
- Yes, sir. In you go.
- Room for me?
- Yes. Get in.
Evening, ma'am.
I guess this is the best place to be.
Open the gate!
Open the gate! Let us through!
Here, what do you think you're up to?
I'll have you arrested for damaging the company's property! The lot of you!
All right, lads, leave it now and try and save yourselves.
- Still no answer?
- Not yet, sir.
- You'd better fire the rest of the rockets.
- Aye, aye, sir.
Come along, please, ladies. Quickly now.
Come, my dear.
It's time for you to go.
Good-bye. God bless you.
Take care of yourself. And Jeanie.
Come.
Seamen to man this boat!
That's us, mates!
Off turns for lowering.
Lower away.
There's only about a dozen in there.
That boat's supposed to take 40.
If they're going to lower them, why don't they put some people in them?
Come on, mate.
Women and children up top!
All right. Women and children up top!
Women and children only up top!
Come along.
Look! Look! All the boats are gone!
There's only four!
There must be more!
- Quartermaster -
- Stand back, sir.
That's the last one, sir.
No reply to your signals?
No, sir. I think the bastards must be asleep.
Report to Mr. Murdock
He's shorthanded.
Aye, aye, sir.
God help you.
Now come along! Don't hang about!
This way, ladies!
It's only for a short while!
Your men will be all right!
Stand back! Stand back!
Sir, Captain told me to report to you, sir.
- Take charge of this boat.
- Aye, aye, sir.
- Watch yourself, or she'll swamp.
- Aye, aye, sir.
Stand aside!
Madam, please.
If I don't get through, will you send this to my sister? The address is on it.
Come along, please.
Don't forget.
Just a minute, sir.
A bit pessimistic, aren't you?
The sea's freezing.
A man won't last long in that.
We've drawn a bad hand this time.
I've never been a good loser.
I intend to get into a boat.
Then I wish you luck.
All right. That's all.
No more room in this boat!
No more space in this boat!
- Where do we go?
- Where do we go then?
- Up there!
- Up the other end!
Off turns for lowering!
- You ready there?
- Sir!
Is there no one else?
Lower away!
Avast lowering!
Lower away.
Well, Phillips?
Nothing fresh, sir.
Carpathia's coming as fast as she can.
The Olympic wanted to know if we were steaming south to meet her... and the Frankfurt keeps asking for more details, the idiots!
They don't seem to understand, sir.
It can't be easy for them.
The engine room's flooding.
You won't have power to send much longer.
- Tell the Carpathia.
- Yes, sir.
- Tell her to hurry.
- Yes, sir.
I've got blankets piled at every gangway, sir... and we're preparing the smoke rooms and lounges as dormitories.
We shall have to regroup the steerage passengers though.
All right.
Just a minute.
Our own passengers will have to keep to their cabins.
It's going to be difficult enough as it is without them underfoot.
Will you put stewards in every alleyway and tell them that if I see a -
What is it, Cottam?
From the Titanic, sir.
Her engine room's flooded and she's sinking by the head.
The wireless operator says he won't have the power to transmit much longer.
Her Captain wants to know how long we'll be.
Tell them another two hours.
Keep back!
Ten ladies, that's all!
Ten more ladies!
Ladies only! Ten ladies!
That's all! No more in this boat!
Come on! Try down the other end!
Now don't panic! Hold on to yourselves!
Get back! Come on! Get back!
Don't panic!
Take charge of yourselves!
Don't panic!
Come on. Get back.
Mr. Lowe, take charge of this boat.
Start lowering!
Ah, here you are, sister.
- You take this. It'll help keep you warm.
- Oh, no, please.
Don't you worry about me.
I got plenty of fat.
Keep pulling.
The officer said to stand by close to the ship.
If we stay too close, we'll be caught by the suction when she goes down.
You row with me.
One of the ladies can steer.
I'm in charge of this boat.
Your job is to row.
Some of the ladies can help row too.
Can't we, girls?
Sure. It'll keep us warm.
- Well, I -
- Button up, skipper.
You want rowers? Okay, you got 'em.
Hurry along. Thank you.
Sorry. Only one more lady.
- You go first.
- Oh, no.
- You've children waiting at home.
- No, my dear -
Hurry along, please, ma'am.
We haven't got much time.
Just down there. Ma'am.
Right, off turns!
Still here, Miss Evans?
We'll get you off in the next boat.
Thank you.
She's going fast now.
Are all the boats away?
All except the other two collapsibles.
There'll be no time to get them off the davits.
We'll have to try and float them off as she goes down.
I'll need some hands to get them unlashed.
Hey, you two! Follow me!
Any spare hands there?
All right, get that shoring timber!
Right, two men to each one!
- Right, Jim?
- Yep.
What's the use? No one's listening.
People don't listen when they're eating, but we play just the same.
Isn't that so, sir?
They say it helps the digestion.
Exactly.
That's because it soothes the nerves.
Right. Number 24.
You said quite clearly that you were going to drink the whole bottle!
The whole bottle!
Mr. Guggenheim, your life belt.
It was uncomfortable.
We have dressed now in our best... and are prepared to go down like gentlemen.
- That is so, sir.
- But surely -
If anything should happen to me...
I would like my wife to know that I behaved decently.
Get two check lines and we'll try and break her outboard.
The crew are trying to clear two of the collapsible boats.
If they succeed, I'm sure there'll be a place for you, madam, in one of them.
You see, you can still go.
Please, darling.
No.
We started out together and we'll finish together.
Are you married, Mr. Andrews?
Yes.
And if my wife were here,
I think she'd do as I asked.
But you have a family?
Mm-hmm.
That would make a difference, wouldn't it?
Perhaps.
Let me give you both some advice.
Don't stay on the ship until the end.
Put your life belts on... and lower yourselves down into the water by the ropes hanging over the side.
Don't jump if you can avoid it.
When you're in the water, swim away from the ship at once.
The boats will stay well clear when she sinks.
Thank you. We'll remember.
Oh, and, uh, I should wear something white... so they can see you.
I wonder if he'll save himself.
We'll save ourselves.
Now ease forward.
All together. Heavy.
Keep the strain on those check lines.
Everybody out!
Come on, lads! Out!
Everybody up top!
Power's going, John.
It's time to go now, Phillips.
You've done your duty.
You can do no more.
Abandon your cabin.
It's everyone for himself.
Look after yourselves now.
I release you both.
God bless you.
John.
John!
It's no use, John. The power's gone.
- Hey, you!
- Live and let live, sir!
Live and let live!
John! John!
John!
Come on! Put your weight in it!
Put your weight in it!
Right.
- Hold on to your check lines!
- Hang on to it!
Keep her square on!
Keep going, Michael!
Hold on to those check lines.
Hold on to those check lines!
Leave it! There's no time! We'll try and free the starboard collapsible! Hurry!
Abandon ship!
Every man for himself!
Mommy! Mommy, where are you?
Mommy!
Come on! Quickly! This way!
It's the end, boys.
We've done our duty.
We can go now.
Otto! Otto!
Look out!
Help! Here, come back! Help me!
Get out - Get out of the way!
Get out of there!
Oh, save me! Save me!
Hold me.
Keep together!
Clear the ship's side!
- Help! Help!
- Clear the ship's side!
Swim for the upturned boat!
Aren't you going to try for it,
Mr. Andrews?
Hello. What are you doing here?
I want my mummy.
Oh, then we'd better go and find her, hadn't we? You come with me.
Michael, I can't make it!
Come on, Mr. Farrell!
Come on, Mr. Farrell.
Here you are, Mr. Farrell.
Come on.
Head for the rear now!
Keep together, all of you!
Clear the ship's side!
Swim clear! Keep clear!
Keep off this child!
Keep off this child!
Let me go!
Get off my legs!
Let me go!
Get off! Get off!
She's going.
Swim clear! Keep clear!
Look! Oh, look!
A prayer. We ought to say a prayer.
Our Father, who art in heaven... hallowed be thy name.
Thy kingdom come,
Thy will be done, on Earth -
Oh, God!
...the power and the glory, forever and ever, amen.
We'll find Mummy. We'll soon find her.
Well, what the hell are we waiting for?
Those people are drowning!
This boat isn't full!
We can go and pick some of them up!
Are you mad? If we get among that lot, they'll swamp the boat.
- They'll capsize us!
- We can't just sit here and do nothin'!
Come on, girls! Row!
I give the orders around here!
Don't you know you're speaking to a lady?
I know who I'm speaking to, and I'm in command of this boat.
You get fresh with me, son,
I'll throw you overboard!
Come on! Row!
Now look here!
I tell you, you'll drown the lot of us!
This boat's returning to pick up survivors.
I'm going to pass some of our passengers over to you.
We got no room in here, sir.
Rubbish!
You've room for about 20 more.
Now hold your tongue and do as you're told.
Excuse me. Mind your back.
Just keep calm.
Madam, would you, please?
- I absolutely refuse!
- I'm awfully sorry about this, madam.
I've had quite enough!
Just as much as I could stand.
Well forward, please. Thanks.
Thank you.
I still say we ought to turn back!
We'll only get swamped!
You heard what he said.
We ought to try, I reckon.
What do you think, sir?
We're crowded enough as it is.
I'm feeling most unwell.
It's difficult to say.
Only one of us is a seaman.
I think we ought to take his advice.
Well, perhaps if we wait a bit, until things are quieting down, and then -
Well, then we can try.
Wait until they're half dead, you mean!
That won't take long in this cold.
That big steamer that was out there, sir - the one that was firing rockets.
- What about it?
- Well, she seems to have gone now, sir.
Yes?
That big steamer, sir - the one that was firing the rockets.
She seems to have gone now.
- And she didn't fire any more rockets?
- No, sir.
Very well. What's the time?
2:45, sir.
Well, enter it in the log.
Aye, aye, sir.
- Get off that back there!
- Keep away from this boat!
There's no more room!
You'll have it over!
You'll capsize it!
Get off!
Stay away from here!
Hey, you, get away!
There's no more room, mate!
Get 'em off!
Stay off! Stay away!
She'll capsize, I tell you!
All right, take it easy!
Get off then! Get off!
Get away!
Good luck.
God bless you.
Come back!
No! Come on back!
There! Throw him off!
All right, men, pull yourselves together!
Get away!
- There's no room!
- Get him off!
- We can't take any more or we'll sink!
- Shut up! This boat's not sinking yet!
But it soon will be if we don't get organized.
- It's every man for himself!
- Shut up and do what the officer says!
- Hear, hear!
- Is that you, Sparks?
Yes, sir.
Good.
How long before the Carpathia gets here?
- An hour or so, sir.
- Right.
There's a bit of a swell getting up.
We'll have to trim the boat.
Now listen to me, all of you!
Wait a minute.
Come on, lads. You're all right now.
Give 'em a hand, Sparks.
Aye, aye, sir.
Take care of the child.
Here.
Straighten up!
Steady!
Left.
Lean left!
To your right! Lean right!
Steady!
There's one back here dead, sir.
Are you certain?
- We are, sir.
- Yes, sir.
Right. Lower him over the side.
Lean left. Lean left! Gently. Gently.
All right for the baker to come aboard now, sir?
Yes, pull him in!
- Lean right!
- Sir.
Lean right!
Steady!
Thank you, sir.
I beg your pardon, sir.
It's the cold.
Look, sir. Boat. Boat ahead, sir!
All right. Steady, lads, steady.
To your right!
To your right, to your right!
That's an officer's whistle.
Make way together, lads. Starboard helm.
Uh, to your right, please, madam.
My baby.
My baby.
That man over there -
He's smoking a cigarette.
I think it's disgraceful that anyone should smoke at a time like this.
People really ought to control themselves.
I want my husband.
I'm so cold. Please, I'm so cold!
I'm so cold!
Oh -
- We should be there by now, sir.
- Yes.
Not a sign of her.
Must have given the wrong position.
Iceberg on the port bow, sir.
- Starboard a point.
- Starboard one point, sir.
- Slow ahead.
- Slow ahead, sir.
Starboard one point.
There's a flare ahead, sir.
Fire a rocket.
I tell you, we're done.
Ah, shut up.
No water, no food.
Got no compass, no chart.
That's the North Star up there, isn't it?
What's the use of that?
We're hundreds of miles from land.
What was that?
A falling star. Flash of lightning.
Lightning, my foot!
That was a rocket! Look!
It's a rocket!
Pat, will you look?
There's a ship sending up a rocket!
Sit down, please, ladies. Sit down.
You may lose your balance.
- We'll give them an answer.
- Look over there! Look!
There.
They'll see this.
Look, boyo. There's a ship comin'.
She's firing rockets.
Go on. Let me be.
Ah, come on now. Brace up.
It'll not be much longer.
Oh, look at them rockets!
Look at them lovely rockets!
Will that be the Carpathia?
Aren't you glad to see her?
Yes, I'm glad.
But then I'm still alive.
If only she'd been nearer.
There are quite a lot of "ifs" about it, aren't there, Colonel?
Keep up, Quartermaster!
Keep that line slack!
If we'd been steaming a few knots slower... or if we'd sighted that berg a few seconds earlier... we might not even have struck.
If we'd carried enough lifeboats for the size of the ship... instead of just enough to meet the regulations... things would have been different again, wouldn't they?
Maybe. But you have nothing to reproach yourself with.
You've done all any man could and more.
You're not -
I was going to say... you're not God, Mr. Lightoller.
No seaman ever thinks he is.
I've been at sea since I was a boy.
I've been in sail.
I've even been shipwrecked before.
I know what the sea can do.
But this is different.
Because we hit an iceberg?
No.
Because we were so sure.
Because even though it's happened, it's still unbelievable.
I don't think I'll ever feel sure again.
About anything.
Almighty God, father of all mercies... we, thine unworthy servants, do give thee most humble and hearty thanks... for all thy goodness and loving kindness to us and to all men... particularly to those who desire now... to offer up their praises and thanksgivings... for thy late services vouchsafed unto them.
We bless thee for our creation, preservation... and all the blessings of this life... but, above all, for thine inestimable love... and redemption of the world by our Lord Jesus Christ... for the means of grace -
And for the hope of glory.
And we beseech thee... give us that due sense of all thy mercies... that our hearts may be unfeignedly thankful... and that we show forth thy praise not only with our lips... but in our lives... by giving up ourselves to thy service... and by walking before thee in holiness and righteousness all our days.
- Through Jesus Christ our Lord -
- Yes, all right.
To whom with thee and the Holy Ghost be all honor and glory... world without end.
Amen.
- Amen.
- Amen.
Sir?
We're at the place now.
I thought you'd like to see for yourself.
Oh, yes. Thank you, sir.
We only found one body, I'm afraid.
The rest must have been carried further on by the current.
But of course we'll go on searching for survivors until we turn back to New York.
Yes. How many -
The purser's checked the figures now.
We have on board 705 survivors.
Several of those in the boats were dead,
I'm afraid.
- 1,500 lost?
- That's right, yes.
Excuse me, sir.
Oh, Cottam, yes, what is it?
A message from the Californian, sir.
She's nearby.
Just heard about the Titanic.
Wants to know if there's anything she can do.
Tell them, no, nothing.
Everything that was humanly possible has been done.
THE BRIDGE
- Do we get the bombs her too now?
- It won't be that bad.
Besides, the war is over soon.
Let's hope so. My son was else at the medical examination.
- Sigi?
- Yes.
- But they can't draft him anymore.
- You think so?
Doctor, you'll have your laundry back in 5 days.
The shirts take quite a lot.
No need to hurry.
- Thank you, Dr.
- Goodbye, Mrs. Bernhard.
Frau Borchert, what was that - a bomb?
Yes, that was a bomb.
The whole house was shaking.
- Do you know where it hit?
- They say it fell in the river.
- Weren't you in the basement?
- With the horse?
- Wait.
- Thanks a lot, I can manage.
Fabulous, how you manage alone.
With all the slave workers: aren't you afraid?
Yes, sometimes.
But I have to hide it for the boy.
- Hello, Mrs. Borchert!
- Hello, Mrs. Bernhard!
- I'll come with laundry later.
- I'll be home then.
Mrs. Borchert, Albert has told, that...
- ...your boy has volunteered?
- Yes.
- Do you allow that?
- Borcherts were all officers...
- Thanks for your help.
- Don't mention it.
- Goodbye.
But it's important to know, where the bomb hit...
They say, it hit near the bridge...
Look...!
Ah, Mr. Ortsgruppenleiter is going on a journey?!
Oh, Herr Rendoff, you are expecting new times!
People, who undermine the party...
...get quickly sentenced.
Remember that,
Mr. Rendorff.
Emma! Now hurry!
- But I can't leave everything behind.
- Do you have the passport?
- Oh, I forgot.
Just what we needed.
- Mr. Forst!
- Yes?
If you must take trees from my forest, then ask next time.
The hell I will! It's for the final victory!
Don't forget that, Mrs. major!
- Why do you shout?
- None of your business.
Sit down there.
We also have to drive by the school!
We don't have time for that.
But I have to say goodbye to my son.
The train leaves in half an hour.
I've explained it to Walter.
Drive!
Walter, Walter! Play me!
The play alone.
Hurry, boys!
What are you doing there?
Did you hear the bomb?
It should have fallen during lessons!
Yeah, in math class.
The pilot should have our schedule!
Back to class.
Just ignore him...
What a luck. Only half a lesson English left...
...and the rest of the afternoon is off.
- Franziska!
- Yes?
Do you come to the bridge?
The bomb should have fallen there.
Yes, but first we have math.
- Hey...
- Yes?
- Do you know what I have here?
- No.
- Really not?
- No.
Just show it then.
- Look.
- Where did you get that from?
- It was in the basement.
- What do you have there?
A mouse. I'll let it run during class.
You don't have the guts.
Wait and see.
- There it is.
- Eew...
- Very funny!
- How disgusting!
You're the biggest idiot at school.
According to the latest news
Oberbach has been evacuated.
Oberbach! But then they're surrounding us from south.
They've forgotten us...
They should come here, so we can show them!
Us kids, huh?
"The hope for the future..."
Let him alone.
Shut up!
The Americans made quite a wedge.
The we will get cut off here.
But we can attack their flank there.
We'll send in a division of tanks.
Rubbish! That will just create a hole in the front.
Maybe I can ask the generals...
...to join this lesson.
- Mutz!
- Sorry. I had to correct the front.
You like to play war, right?
- You want to become officer? - No, he still wants to be engine-driver.
- Really?
- Well, previously I wanted to.
Good. Soon we'll rather need engine-drivers than soldiers.
How do you mean,
Mr senior-teacher?
Of course first, when we have peace.
- Are you against peace, Borchert?
- Of course not.
Let's continue the translation.
Hager, you start.
If you... don't
...treasure
If you don't love me... they shall...
...they shall find me.
If I die in the forest,
it would be better,...
than that you don't love me.
Yes.
my whole life long.
Thanks for your efforts, Hager.
And thanks to you, Franziska.
Let's hear, how our romanticists...
...translated these verses.
Read, Scholten, you like them.
Night covers me in her cloak
If you don't want me, then let them find me.
To die from their hatred,...
is better to live without your love.
Who showed you this place?
The love, that made me be an explorer.
It gave me advice -
I gave it my eyes.
I am no captain,...
but sail with me to the farthest beaches,...
touched by the waves.
You know, night now covers my face...
Else the girls blush colored my face...
and what you wanted to ask me before.
I'd like to make time stand still.
I'd like to regret, what
I said... right before...
...and deny my feelings.
Tell me, do you love me?
I know, you will say yes.
And I will trust your words.
But if you swear...
- Vorst, close the window!
...you might become treacherous.
Maybe Jupiter is laughing at us now.
If you love me...
...that you quickly...
...will look at you...
Gerhard, close the window.
Continue, Scholten.
Move your luggage away.
Can't you see, I have a heavy suitcase?
Thank you.
Have a nice trip, bye...
When do we drive?
Why are we still here?
Stop crying.
Be happy, that you get out of here.
Walter! Walter!
Be well, my boy!
Well done!
What are you doing here?
Why are you not in school?
I couldn't even say properly goodbye to her!
That's not so important.
The main thing is, that your mother is safe.
- You only wanted to get rid of her.
- What do you say?
Isn't it true?
That's none of your business!
I want you to be a decent boy, who...
Hi, mum!
Sigi, there you are!
I worried so much.
Why?
We were in a basement.
The whole English-lesson came to nothing.
English! What do you need
English for now?
Come. We can eat.
Soon there will be bombings every day.
You should stay home.
What can I do at home?
- What do we have today?
- Cabbage.
- Cabbage again!
- But I don't have anything else.
I'll go to the bridge to see what has happened.
Do that afterwards.
First we eat.
Sigi! Come now!
What is it?
Wait! I have to feed Alberich first.
Hi, how are you?
- Sigi, I wrote to aunt Wally.
- And?
If you maybe could stay there for some weeks.
What?
Should I desert?
What will the others say?
What do you mean: desert?
You're not a soldier yet.
Look! Wotan has again eaten it all.
At aunt Wally you could eat every day, too.
And you?
Then I could use your rationing- coupons to buy for.
I don't have anything left to trade.
And you need new shoe soles!
I'd rather give you Wotan then.
But you won't get me away from here.
- Hello Karl!
- Thank you, Miss Barbara!
We had supper already.
- Oh, it's stuck again.
- Let me.
Oh, how clumsy.
What is this?
Give it to me.
- What does this mean?
- Nothing. It means nothing.
I would say so, too.
I'm sorry.
But there's nothing to apologize.
- Go. Your father's waiting.
- Yes!
...women have now signed up...
...for the party's...
- Hello dad!
- Hello, my boy!
- Are you hungry?
- Yes!
- But I have to go again.
- Where?
I want to see the bomb crater.
Well, first we eat.
If there is a bomb crater, it will also be there after supper.
Thanks, son.
Give me your plate.
- Do you want more?
- No, thanks.
- Taste good?
- Great.
- What is Barbara doing?
- She's still busy.
- So you wait for the evening?
- Yes.
Here.
I go downstairs to look for her.
These have to be washed and ironed?
Yes, but I don't have time before 6 o'clock.
The just come later.
- Good day, Mrs Weber
- Good day, Mr Horber.
- Mrs Weber will bring the laundry at 6.
- I can't earlier.
My boss says, at the front they don't get vacation either...
...for a haircut.
- Ha, what rubbish.
- Yes.
How can he know?
He's reported ill all the time.
- Just come after 6.
- Thanks.
Or do you have plans,
Miss Barbara?
- No, Mr Horber.
- Then I'll come after 6.
- Goodbye
- Goodbye, Mrs Weber.
Goodbye.
Ms Barbara, have you seen...
Have you seen the soap-coupons?
- Here in the box.
- Ah yes.
- Are you done?
- Yes, dad.
- When will you be back?
- I'll be at the boat.
Bye, Karl.
He's quite occupied by this boat.
I doubt it. He's probably walking with a nice girl.
I don't think so.
- When I was 16 years old...
- Yeah, you!
Where are those cigarettes from?
Walter Forst. From the personal supplies of the Ortsgruppenleiter.
- You want one?
- No. Not any of those.
What kind of boy is Walter Forst?
He's a great buddy.
But else: poor thing.
- Why?
- He doesn't believe in anything anymore.
And what do you believe in?
Certainly in everything, that dad had told me.
Dad always said:
Sit straight!
Keep the bridles tight without pulling them.
But back then we had real horses.
Well, this one shouldn't suffer from it, right?
That God, you have come, Mrs!
I already thought that...
Trudel, there's no reason for worrying.
Vladimir, come here!
On my way!
- Has the mail come?
- No, not yet.
I can't understand, why my draft hasn't arrived yet.
They probably want to wait until you've grown some more.
This afternoon I will visit the Jungleiter again.
Children in the war!
Just what we need.
Mum, forbid her to say these things.
Relax. You know that she doesn't mean it bad.
- Here's our ration of soap.
- What they call soap.
- In the forest they cut trees again.
- Yes, I know.
They need them for barricades against tanks.
- Our trees?
- I can't do anything either.
Let's hope they leave the firs.
But a few firs don't matter.
If dad still was alive, he's probably not mind...
- You are right.
- Sorry.
- Do you unharness them?
- Yes, of course.
Get going with your work!
Do something!
There... Easy...
Did I send wood enough for your boat?
Yes thanks, mum.
There's enough for two boats.
Stop the noise, Walter.
I can't stand it.
I'll be done in a little.
Imagine you can read with that noise!
It's alright.
- Good news from home?
- They have alarms now all the time.
Mum writes that they hardly get out of the basements anymore.
And that she's very happy that I'm here now.
Me too. Who else has two strong men in the house?
Didn't you want to repair the windows' blackouts?
- Yeah, I will.
- Then do it also.
- Still no mail from dad?
- No.
- It's been 23 days now.
- Yes.
Mum, it doesn't need to mean anything.
Suddenly we'll get a whole bunch of letters again.
You know, during an offensive...
- ...they hold back the mail.
So no secrets get disclosed.
You think so?
See?
Nothing happened.
Just a little from the banister.
The bomb must have fallen in the water.
- It was just the air pressure.
- Yes, nothing else.
Stupid boys. Be happy, that nothing else happened!
He can talk...
- Where is Sigi?
- Don't know.
- Sigi! Sigi!
- What is it?
How's our tree cabin?
Everything alright?
No special damages or casualties!
I go home.
- We go too, right, Franziska?
- Yes, for me it's OK.
See you.
- Shall we have a walk?
- If you have time.
- I have time. And you?
- Yes, but only a little.
The come!
Klaus! Klaus!
What was wrong during the
English lesson this morning?
Yesterday you still knew the text.
Yes, but I can't stand this sentimental rubbish.
"If you don't love me, then let them just find me."
When you say it,
I find it funny, too.
I have to go to gym now.
- What's the time?
- 5 minutes to half.
But where's your watch?
When mum got ill, we traded it for butter.
Here. It's a gift.
- But you can't give me a watch!
- Why not?
You are crazy, Klaus.
The maybe you borrow it?
Why?
So you have something from me.
- But when you need it, you'll tell.
- Of course.
It's luminous.
Very practical at blackouts.
- Come and help me...
- Can we?
- Yes.
Wait a second.
- What is it?
- It's flat.
Mum's biking on flat tyres.
Give me your pump, please.
- The pump was stolen from her, too.
- Hold it, please.
Say, Hans...
- ...during the bomb raids...
- Yes, what?
- Were you afraid?
- Yes, very.
- You were a real wimp?
- Yes, of course.
- You simply admit that?
- Why not?
I don't understand that.
- Have you finished?
- Yes.
I'm curious, if Walter got some rope for the boat.
Look, there's little Sigi.
We have rope and wood!
The boat can float already.
- Was it difficult?
- Why?
Someone giving you glue these days...
There was no one to give it.
It was there all abandoned.
"Wheels must roll for victory!"
Are you crazy?
How mean of you!
- Your a nice hero!
- It was just for fun!
And you had to try this with the weakest, right?
- Cut it off!
- Look here!
Here!
Someone hid something.
- Pull it up.
- It's a net.
- It's a tyke.
- There are bottles in it!
Oh boy!
Must have been the easter bunny!
- Easter bunnies don't bring booze!
- How do you know it's booze?
- Real French cognac - 42%.
And egg-liqueur!
So it was the easter bunny.
Wonder who hid this here!
Nobody with good conscience.
We'll sell them.
How many are there?
Let's hide them in the pipe!
Come on! Quickly
- Sigi, you crawl into the pipe!
- Why me?
You're the smallest.
We have to share with the others.
Why should the others get any?
- Well, we found the bottles.
- No, I found them.
The you'll get two bottles.
"Common well goes before own well", Mr party leader.
- You heard that from your dad!
- Now stop it and let's go!
- And me? Who takes me?
- You can stay here, little one.
Come on, I take you.
Throw to me!
- We got booze for you! You want?
- We don't want any.
Give it to me.
Where were you, Karl?
- Is something wrong?
- No no.
Then let's continue...
- Hello boys, you got rope?
- Yes, Mr senior teacher.
- That was probably difficult.
- Yes, very!
Borchert.
Tell your mother,...
...that the sawmill sent the last boards.
And I thank her already...
Where is Borchert?
Horber, fetch the boards.
You should have fetched the boards, Karl.
Can you give me the screwdriver?
- They are all whores.
- What do you say?
The bitches are all whores.
- You're out of your mind.
- Your Franziska, too!
Say that again!
...in three weeks...
...the Americans are here...
In Oberwald a group of Hitlerjugend...
- ...defended that station for 2 days.
- And after the 2 days?
Just asking.
What happened afterwards?
Boys! Boys!
Look - here's my draft!
We have to be at the barracks tomorrow morning at 7!
Your draft?
I talked with the Jugendleiter.
Why do you have to be there?
Tomorrow at 7.
Of course! Without us they cannot win the war!
Private Walter greets private Schorten.
How awesome!
Private Walter, turn right!
It's probably because my father is fighting at the front...
Mr teacher, don't build on the boat with another class...
It's our boat.
We'll finish it, when we're back from the front.
The we'll build it as a warship.
- Mr teacher.
- Yes yes.
I'll tidy here.
- Let's go home now...
- Yes, goodbye.
I wished it was tomorrow already!
- Hurry, Mutz.
- And tell your mother.
- I will write her a letter.
It would be easier to telephone!
Come on, it's late.
- Hurry.
- Have you put the tools back?
- Yes, Miss.
- Goodbye.
What are you doing there?
Come up!
And make it fast.
Give me that bottle.
- Liqueur, right?
- I don't know.
- Do you have more of that?
- Not me.
And the others?
Where did you steal them?
Steal?
We found them.
Come with me. Not reporting a find: punishment of 3 years.
But I have to go to the army tomorrow.
You have to what?
Yes, the draft is at home.
Really! Do I still have to come to the police station?
Nope! We go home to mum, so she can dry you first.
Sigi!
What has happened?
I fell in the water.
Has my draft arrived?
- Yes.
- Where is it?
He... he can't become a soldier already!
- He's just a child.
- I'm not a child!
And how do you look!
You're all wet!
- That's not important!
- Out of your wet clothes!
Else you'll be in bed tomorrow with pneumonia.
No way!
I have to be at the barracks tomorrow.
Hr. Vorschläger!
This must be a mistake!
You must know.
No.
They draft everybody now.
Then I'll send you away.
Sit down.
I'll send you to aunt Wally.
Yes.
There you can hide.
I'm not a deserter!
Hr. Vorschläger, what shall I do?
I don't think you can do anything.
And about this liqueur...
I'll close my eyes this time.
Where is the liqueur from?
You can trade it!
And Wotan, too.
Thank you.
The boys had a secret stock of liqueur - and that's illegal, of course.
Illegal? But then put Sigi in jail, until it's all over!
Or... this is insane!
I can't say anything about this.
I'm on duty.
You have to understand.
Mum?
Yes, Sigi?
Do you still have the little suitcase?
Can I borrow it?
You want to go to aunt Wally anyway?
I don't want to have a cardboard box for the barracks...
- ...that looks stupid.
- Yes... I understand.
- Hello lad. There you are.
- Yes. Why?
There's something for you.
Your draft.
Karl, it can't become so bad.
First they have to train you some months,...
- ...and then...
- So now you get rid of me!
- What do you mean?
- I've seen you two!
Get out! What do you want?
I don't want to see you here.
Karl!
Go! I don't want to see you!
Out!
Are you insane?
Barbara, let us alone for a minute.
What's up, Karl?
You're happy that I leave!
Then it's just you two here!
Karl ... I don't know... why you are like this.
When two adult persons like Barbara and me...
You like Barbara, too...
Would it be so bad, if she stayed with us?
Stop packing!
That can wait until tomorrow morning.
When you get sensible again, you can come down to us.
Then we can talk.
No idea what happened with the boy.
Don't be angry.
He's still a child.
You're right. I thought, he would be a man already.
And they send these kids in the war!
They don't belong in barracks, but in a kindergarten!
- Relax!
- They should be in the kindergarten!
You also have to send the tractor to the garage, mum.
Don't worry, Jürgen,
I'll take care of everything.
- Madam! The slave workers have all disappeared! - What?!
What shall we do now?
We should inform the police...
- ...or the party's...
- No!
I don't want these people in my house today!
But the laws are so strict!
When two of them disappeared at
Letmanns, and they didn't report it...
Yes, I know.
I'll take care of it tomorrow.
- Trudel, would you leave us, please?
- Yes.
How will you manage without workers?
Maybe they will send others.
But ours just got used to it.
Who knows, who they send now?
Yes?
What can I do about it?
- It's all become so strange.
- You can say that.
And exactly now I have to leave!
Jürgen, you know me.
I can defend myself!
But that's father's pistol!
Yes.
They sent it after his death.
- Mum. Can I have it?
- Take it.
Thanks, mother.
You have no idea, how glad I am.
Dad taught me to shoot with it.
As officer-applicant I am allowed to carry a weapon.
When do you have to get up tomorrow?
- We'll have breakfast together!
- Of course.
I will have us woken at half past 5.
- Good night, mum.
- Good night, my boy.
You're fantastic!
You're always classy.
Don't pack too much.
It has to fit in a rucksack.
- Here, your cardigan.
- Put it there.
- What do you want with the knife?
- I'll take it with me.
We're not playing cowboys and indians.
But the Jungführer said, that one doesn't shoot at night.
- At night you work with a knife.
- Rubbish.
He read too many novels.
Hans, you have to write home also.
- Here are more socks.
- But we'll get them at the army.
You have to have some to change.
"During the battle the warriors changed socks!"
How mum imagines the war!
I don't want to imagine it at all.
Look! You wear them out so much, that they can't be mended anymore.
I think, those are mine.
I'll do it.
- Do you do it at home too?
- No.
Mum, I also need soap.
There's a piece in the kitchen drawer.
- You can share that.
- Thank you.
Fabulous: soap!
If I had known that,
I would have taken it long ago.
- Mrs Mutz...
- Yes?
I...
I want to thank you for letting me stay here.
But Hans... Then I have to thank you for being here.
Why?
It was so good, that you were here.
For Albert and...
You're already so adult.
Ha, if my mother could hear that!
I can't find the soap.
Look in the kitchen closet.
I beg you, Hans, take care of him!
Yes... now you said "du" for the first time.
I promise.
I'll take care of him.
And take care of yourself, too.
Tomorrow you'll have lessons without me.
That's not funny at all.
Hello?
Post office 2?
No, the mail wagon comes with the passenger train 12:17. Right.
Yes, that's changed.
Klaus, we have problems again with 12:17.
What will your parents say, that you're out so late?
They'll get angry.
Shouldn't you rather go home then?
- Today I don't care.
- Really?
- Will it take long?
- If there's an air raid on Berlin...
...we won't get any connection.
- Couldn't you try again?
- OK, I'll try.
Can I have 3-14?
Otto?
How is the air situation?
Ah, thanks.
Right now there's only a raid on Hannover-Braunschweig.
Maybe we're lucky.
What's the time now?
See! One can see it clearly with the luminous numbers.
- Franziska?
- Yes?
- I want to ask you something.
- What?
But don't get angry.
Are you sure?
You can ask me everything, Klaus.
It's our last evening together.
Can I have the watch back?
When I'm on patrol at night, such a luminous watch is practical.
Here post office 2 - is that Bremen?
- Can I talk now?
- Yes.
Hello, mum.
Are you there?
What? How?
No, I'm fine.
Listen, I'll be drafted tomorrow!
What do you want?
Did you get lost?
- Here's my draft.
- Draft?
But not at this hour.
Can't you wait until tomorrow morning?
He's afraid, he'll miss the free beer.
Alarm! Alarm!
- Silent!
The bomb raid over
Hannover-Braunschweig...
Louder!
...has turned east..
An attack on Berlin is expected.
Sounds nice.
We can't use you here, boy.
Here you come precisely.
I can't go home.
Let him stay, Paul.
Alright.
Lie down there.
- Here's a blanket.
- Thank you.
Your father tells you to turn off the negro music.
It bothers him.
- It bothers him? Why?
- I don't know.
Tell him to turn off that music!
And bring my dark suit.
There's still room here.
Where is...?
Are you going on vacation?
Walter, I have to leave.
I got...
...a call from the headquarter.
Where are the cigarettes?
Everything in this house is a mess!
We have an important meeting...
And for that you need the dark suit?
Don't interfere.
- None of your business.
- Here it is.
Give it to me.
Tomorrow I'll become a soldier, dad.
Yes, I know.
But the party leader goes on the run!
"For Führer, people fatherland!"
Do you also take Miss Möhlmann with you?
- What?
- Her from the economy office.
- Shut up!
- The whole town knows it!
That you sent mum away...
...so you can have fun with this whore!
- Have you been drinking?
- Yes, from your bottles.
Those reserved for the front soldiers.
Shame on you!
When we meet again after the war...
Trust me. We won't meet again!
Just see tomorrow:
They'll teach you how to behave!
They'll teach you to march!
It's time that you learn discipline!
Brat! But they'll make a man out of you!
A man like you?
Have you slept with my father, too?
Say something!
Speak!
Your father shows much more tenderness!
First group!
Attention - get up!
Turn right! Forward!
Do you think, we can make soldiers out of these boys?
No. Cover!
Crawl into the soil!
Head down!
Do you want it shot off?
What will you think with then?
Whole group! Back!
Cover!
You don't need to train "Back" - they can do that already.
What's the idea of this?
Ask them up high!
Whole group turn right!
Forward!
Cover!
I'm beaten.
Whole group forward!
Cover!
Turn right and forward!
Excuse me, but I have to finish these papers.
- Have a seat.
- Thank you.
Make sure, we won't be disturbed.
What can I do for you?
The boys from my class...
...are in your division.
- Yes, I know.
Mr Fröhlich... I come to you as a colleague...
You are teacher, too.
I've been soldier now for 5 years.
- Yo are not in the service?
- No, because of my heart.
What do you teach?
English, History, German...
I assume, you've come to talk about your students.
Yes.
I want to ask you a favor.
I can't understand why these children...
...have to be sacrificed so meaningless.
I talked with the boys,
Mr Stern...
They are idealists.
They believe, that they fight...
...for an ideal.
They want to save the fatherland.
They believe in what you have been teaching, Mr Stern.
Hölderlin! "The battle is ours!"
My life for the fatherland!
"We don't count the dead!
No sacrifice is too small!"
But Mr Fröhlich, all these ideals...
...heroism, fatherland, freedom...
...have fallen in the hands of criminals!
They aren't valid anymore!
Some days ago my son died at the front.
What is not valid anymore?
Forgive me.
I don't think, that I still can be a teacher after this war.
Mr Fröhlich...
The purpose of my visit was,...
...to ask you to do something for my boys.
How do you mean?
Maybe you as leader of the division can keep my boys out of this...
Don't talk rubbish!
I'm not even allowed to listen to this.
I have my orders and have to follow them.
Captain...
- Is it clean now?
- No, it's still dirty.
I can't see anything.
Hi, little one
- exhausted?
I feel so bad.
I'm at the end.
Give me your rifle.
We'll do it for you.
Now we should have had biology.
Then I would feel bad, too.
Does the bayonet need to be cleaned, too?
After all we have to clean our weapons...
...or do you think it's a tooth stick?
Why isn't it sharp?
- So the hole gets bigger.
- Why?
Obvious: if it was sharp as a knife...
...it would easily get in and out.
You're finished, when you get this in your belly.
In the belly?
Where else?
Afterwards you have to put your foot against, to get it out.
How do you know?
I read about it.
That's something different than flirting with girls, huh?
Shut up!
Attention!
Group three about to clean weapons.
Notice, Forst: when cleaning weapons...
...there is no "Attention", understood?
- Yes sir.
- Go on.
You're quite good at this already.
Learned at the pre-military education, Mr sergeant.
Talk only when asked.
Yes, sergeant.
- You want to become officer, right?
- Yes.
Your rifle.
Keep it still.
Higher.
You haven't learned everything at this pre-military thing.
- Once more.
- Yes, sergeant.
Go ahead...!
You think, there is enough oil around, huh?
Oh, oh, oh! You're wasting public property.
What are you doing there?
Private Siegfried cleaning weapons, sir.
I can see, you don't steal apples
What sort of knife is this?
It's pushed in the belly, and you have to stem the foot against.
Shake before use, it said on the bottle...
...filled with poison.
Continue!
Alarm!
Prepare to leave!
Alarm!
Prepare to leave!
Alarm!
Prepare to leave!
Alarm!
Prepare to leave!
Alarm!
Prepare to leave!
Alarm!
Prepare to leave!
Alarm!
Platoon, get up!
Hurry! Up! Move!
Alarm!
Prepare to leave!
Alarm!
Prepare to leave!
Alarm!
Prepare to leave!
They don't even let us sleep.
I can't close the buckle.
Attention!
- How's it going?
- All ready, sergeant.
Get out! Hurry!
Get that buckle straight.
- Do you have everything?
- Yes, sergeant.
- Don't forget your bucket!
- What does the sergeant mean?
Here! Your helmet!
What are you waiting for?
Out! Move!
Hurry people, move!
One of them actually forgot his bride!
Move! Move!
The situation is crap.
Zimmerman! A cigar!
We make a wedge here, which must stand until tomorrow.
It must hold.
Fire anyone?
Thanks.
This afternoon the Americans reached this line.
Bees, come in.
Bees, come in!
My orders are...
...to throw everything to the front, that can carry a rifle.
Only the wounded stay here.
Zimmermann, read.
Captain Fröhlich leads the battalion on the march.
The battalion follows march-order...
...1, 2, 4, 3, with the ambulances and supplies at the rear.
The defense positions must be reached at sunset.
All units at...
...4 o'clock in the morning.
Check the watches.
Battalion!
Attention!
Battalion ready, lieutenant!
Eyes right!
Grenadier battalion 463 reports ready.
Thanks. At ease.
At ease!
Soldiers!
Yesterday the Americans started a new offensive.
Our battalion is from now on part of division 336.
We proceed tonight.
I expect from the experienced soldier of the battalion...
...that they
- as always- ...
...do their duty.
We will engage the enemy tomorrow morning.
Every square meter, which we defend,...
...is part of the heart of our fatherland.
And who defends just one square meter...
...he defends Germany.
We know, that the situation is bloody serious.
But we are soldiers - whether we live or die.
History will judge,...
...if we did our duty.
The young soldiers on their first mission shall know...
...that our battalion only knows "Forward"!
Never "Back"!
Our battalion only knows fight, victory or death!
I expect, that the fatherland in these serious times...
...can count on you.
The parole also for this mission is: ...
Forward for Führer, people and fatherland!
- Let the battalion be dismissed.
- Yes, captain.
- Zimmermann! A cigar.
- Yes, sir.
Battalion dismissed!
Get ammunition and supplies.
First platoon...
The new report.
Zimmermann, make sure there's enough brandy.
This will become a slaughterhouse.
Where's my car?
Get it!
Yes, captain.
What is it?
Captain, I have 7 new privates in my platoon.
And?
They are 16 - untrained.
- Soldiers since when?
- Since this morning.
At the first shooting they will run
- and the platoon with them.
Just what we need.
Zimmermann!
Where are you?
We have to go!
There's this little bridge at the entry of the town.
It's not important anymore.
The Americans already have a bridgehead in the north.
And the bridge will be blown up anyway.
But we should secure the bridge.
The boys could do that.
It's OK with me.
Just put them there.
Yes, captain.
Drive!
- Heilmann! The lieutenant calls you.
- I'm coming.
Sorz!
- You are in charge.
- Yes, sir.
- Sergeant Heilmann!
- Yes! I'm coming!
Now they make us be cannon fodder five minutes to twelve.
They don't care.
Let me get through.
No contact with the enemy!
No shootings.
- Understood?
- Yes, sir.
How long have you been soldier?
7 years, sir.
And what did you learn during those 7 years?
Not to be noticed.
That's exactly what I expect, Heilmann.
The bridge isn't important.
It will be blown up.
- No meaningless casualties!
- Yes.
Thank you.
Here we have order!
- Wait! You're only allowed one can!
- What?
- Put one can back!
- I beg your pardon?
Here they count everything - all into the mass graves
Then keep your damned cans!
What on...
Pick them up immediately!
You only have a big mouth, because you're in uniform!
Shut up or you'll regret it.
Trust me in this:
I'll survive until the end,...
...just to pay you back!
- I will report you.
If you live long enough!
Coward!
- Verbitsky!
- What?
- Don't delay anything.
- Yes.
- Don't be stupid! Move.
- Yes, sir.
I couldn't know, that this is a kindergarten.
Hurry and get your weapons...
...and go outside.
Get going.
Get up.
Close the hatch.
Heilmann, here.
Sergent Heilmann!
Get your people off.
- Group 3, off the truck!
- We don't go further?
The rest of the group goes on.
Are we already at the front?
Rubbish.
But... but this is our bridge!
What are we doing here?
Be glad, you idiots!
Would you rather be there, where shit really is boiling?
What a theater!
Those from "Volkssturm" seem to have gone home already.
Even better. Like this they can't wreck anything.
Keep them busy.
In the meantime make sure,...
...that the demolition command arrives in time.
The bridge needs to explode in the right moment.
Understood.
- I trust you, Heilmann.
- Yes, sir.
- Stupid carrying!
- It's not fun anymore.
Stop complaining and bring the gear over here.
Do you think, we're safe here tonight?
Tonight something will happen everywhere.
Soon the dragging is over.
Then we'll have a nice time, OK?
They put us off far away from the front.
The backseats are the best - like in the cinema.
In the front seats it's flickering.
Let's put the gear here.
Put the tank fists over there.
Position of the first machine gun?
At the right side of the road.
And the second?
Here at the left.
We know the bridge. We know good shooting positions.
You played indians here, right?
Yes. Up there is our recognition post.
Can't I take position there?
OK, climb up and keep an eye on everything.
Yes, sergeant.
Assemble the machine gun,
I said. Get going.
I go forth with this, sergeant.
No, stay here.
And don't play around with it.
Better go over there and help them dig.
And what can I do?
You go on the bridge and keep guard, understood?
- Yes, sir.
- And don't abandon your post.
Keeping guard is the most important thing in war.
- Yes, sir.
- Now go.
And what are you doing?
I need ammunition on the tree.
What a luck, that we don't have a cannon also.
You would drag it up, too, right?
- Isn't it deep enough now?
- Don't be silly.
When they come, they can still shoot in here.
In this fog they can't see us anyway.
And when the fog disappears?
Third group, attention!
Listen...
When it gets light, you'd probably like some coffee, right?
- Yes, sergeant.
- I'll go and organize some.
In the meantime the command is at...
- ...Scholten!
- Understood.
- Yes, sergeant.
- Take my rifle.
- Yes, sir.
And carry on.
What a guy!
Why? He's nice.
Rubbish. A good soldier doesn't leave his rifle behind.
- Excuse me, do you have fire?
- Yes.
- Cigarette?
- Yes, thanks.
Hide.
- Stop! What did he want?
- Why?
- What did he say?
- Err...
Move on! Quickly!
Stop!
What are you doing here?
- Me?
- Yes, you. Where are your orders?
- I don't have them with me.
- What unit do you belong to?
Sergeant Heilmann. 463. battalion, 3. platoon.
- And what are you doing here?
- I...
Your report book!
Here.
I'm securing the bridge.
Rubbish! That bridge doesn't need to be secured.
It will be blown up.
- No stories! You're a deserter!
- What do you mean? Deserter?
Follow to the office!
There you'll see, what will happen.
But I have my group at the bridge.
I can't leave them.
Don't talk!
Follow me!
They are still kids! They've been soldiers for only one day.
My orders are to take care of them.
Then why do you walk around here at night?
But I'm on duty!
Everyone can say that.
You idiot!
Don't be so stubborn!
Come to the bridge and have a look yourself!
To send kids in the war and then abandoning them! It's insane!
It's...
Take that stupid thing away!
Stop! Stay here!
What was that?
It was shots...
Can you see something up there?
No. Nothing.
Just come down then.
With this weather war should be prohibited.
When will Heilmann be back?
He'll come.
- I'll have a look.
- You stay here.
Yes, sergeant.
If only Heilmann doesn't leave us in the lurch.
Not him!
A lot better persons than him have deserted.
You have too much imagination.
Did you hear that?
Just some fish...
Now we have 10 rolls already.
We'll never need so many.
Listen!
Artillery.
But far away.
- Everything OK over there?
- Yes.
Then come.
Walter, can I borrow your torch?
Are you afraid in the dark?
Can't we eat soon?
- Yes!
- Then let's eat.
Cut some slices.
And Heilmann had promised coffee.
He left us in the lurch.
- Rubbish.
- Can't we talk about something else?
Sigi, why didn't you send the sergeant to your mother?
She makes the best coffee.
I can't tell the sergeant what to do.
Don't you have your own?
Don't make such a scene.
If my mum knew, that we are here...
This sausage is fabulous.
Here, for Sigi.
- Here, Sigi.
- Can I eat when on guard?
You have to. You're still growing.
Aren't you hungry, Karl?
No, thanks.
Not such a bad place.
We're just missing something decent to drink.
We should have some brandy.
There the sergeant comes.
No way. He left over there and comes back here?
What are you doing here?
Having breakfast.
Want some liver pate?
Do you plan to start a shooting here?
We have our orders.
This bridge is strategically important.
- Boys, you better go home.
- What?
Are you insane?
But what you do here, is foolish.
The whole town will be destroyed.
I know it.
I've been through it, before I got evacuated.
Go home.
You want to persuade us to desert!
Bad nerves, huh?
We're at war, understand?
And we have to secure the bridge.
You have no idea, what you are doing!
You just want to play heroes.
Move! Go away!
Don't do anything unreasonable.
Away! Now!
You don't know, what you're doing.
Look, fast as a rabbit.
How fast he can run!
What a coward!
He runs like a girl.
Maybe he's right. We don't know, what he's been through.
Me too!
Stop fooling around.
Stop acting like you're in charge.
Who hits them first?
- Listen!
- What is it?
- A truck!
- Quick! Pull the barricades out!
What's going on?
What are you doing?
Hurry!
Take positions!
Damn it!
What's going on here?
What idiots are blocking the bridge?
Are you insane!
Open the road!
Get moving!
- Hurry!
- Yes, sir.
Get down and help them.
Move.
It's unbelievable.
- What happened?
- Don't ask stupid questions.
Move that away.
Let's drive now.
Quickly.
We pull the barricades back on the road again.
No, not yet. There will come more trucks, he said.
I think we should wait.
I go back to my post.
What happened, Helmer?
It's finished, lieutenant.
It's dead.
We have to walk.
Damn. Get your stuff.
We're changing vehicles.
Quickly.
We have to get out of here.
Look! He has a...
Watch out!
Bloody pigs.
Get your rifles out!
The next who doesn't stop...
...will get a bullet in his head.
Come on, what are you waiting for?
Leave it behind. Or throw it in the water.
- But...
- Leave it behind!
Hurry now!
We have to get out of here.
There's no more room.
Drive!
Do you all want to die here?
- When do we drive?
- I don't know either.
Why do we stop in the middle of a bridge?
- We want to go home.
- Hurry a little!
Don't be impatient.
I do what I can.
It's getting light already.
We have to go.
Wilhelm, look at those kids.
Here, little fellow,...
Have some chocolate, before you get pickled.
Come on, drive.
What did he mean "getting pickled"?
He wanted else to give you some pickles.
Be happy, that you got some chocolate.
What a coward - the one with the Iron Cross.
He was deserting?
He was very busy for sure.
He simply ran away!
They should all be shot.
Now there's no one left between us and them!
- You want to go home maybe?
- Of course not.
- If everyone is running, it's maybe the best.
- What?
- Best to go home.
- Are you insane?
What do you mean?
We are soldiers, and it's our order...
...to secure the bridge!
We won't win the war,...
...because we defend this bridge, Jürgen!
But with every square meter of land,...
...we defend Germany!
Who wants to throw the weapons and go home?
- You?
- Why me?
- And you two?
- No.
I stay.
- And you?
- You think, I leave you alone?
- And you?
- I'm not a coward.
And you?
Are you a coward?
I stay.
Great! Well, everyone on their posts.
I go over there with my tank fist.
Watch out! Airplanes!
Down! Down!
It's still some kilometers away.
They're first dangerous, when they come right towards you.
See him!
Flat like a stamp!
You want to lie there, until the war is over?
Have you peed in your pants?
Our brave Sigi!
What will mummy say, if she sees you like this?
Watch out, it's coming back!
Down!
Come on, get up!
It's safe now, Sigi!
Sigi! Sigi...
Sigi...
Come here!
Damn it!
Come here!
Those swine killed him!
Sigi is dead!
Come here!
Come here, bloody hell!
What happened?
Those criminals...
What do we do now?
We have to tell his mother...
Poor Sigi.
I'll show them!
Hey, help me.
What sound is that?
It's tanks!
Hurry!
The barricades on the road!
Bloody tanks!
Back!
We let the tanks pass and blow it up later!
Into the basement there!
Walter has hit a tank!
Shoot now!
Get the boxes with ammunition!
Damn! Something's stuck!
Help me.
Walter is crazy!
Cover him!
Are you crazy?
Cover!
Those bloody kids will have us all killed!
What a bunch of idiots.
If they had let the Americans pass,...
...we would have had blown up the bridge already!
Oh God, how shall this end?
This is nothing.
The real fireworks is at the front.
My son is soldier, too.
They drafted him yesterday!
You think, he's at the front already?
Yesterday?
The he can't even hold a rifle yet.
What should he do at the front?
Now show, how brave you are.
You're not going to break down now, are you?
I don't want to die!
I don't want to die!
Are you only tough in front of girls?
I want to go! I want to go!
I want out of here!
- Jürgen! Jürgen!
- Stay here!
- Jürgen!
- Stay here!
What are you doing?
Are you insane?
There are Americans up there.
And there are women and children in the basement.
If you don't leave,
I'll scream.
Go away.
Don't be stupid!
Don't shoot!
"Bloody kid!
What did you do that for?"
- There's another one! Watch out!
- Shoot him!
"Hey, hey! You!
Let's not shoot!"
- "Come on, give up."
- What's he shouting?
"We don't fight kids!"
"Go home! Go to your kindergarten."
"Go! Go home!
To the kindergarten."
Kindergarten?
I'll show you!
Karl!
Karl! Karl, shoot!
Kill him, Karl! Shoot!
Shoot!
Finish him, Karl!
Finish him.
Karl! Karl!
Karl, Karl shoot!
Karl shoot!
Karl, Karl ...Karl...
Karl...
Karl...
Karl...
Karl ...I didn't mean to hit you!
It was only because of Franziska, Karl.
Hit me now, Karl!
Karl, hit me!
Hit back, Karl! Help!
Help! Help!
I have to go to him!
They're killing him!
Help...
Help... help...
Get down!
I killed him, Hans.
I killed him!
I killed him...
Come, Karl...
Karl ...Karl ...Karl ...Karl...
Come with me, Karl...
Karl ...
Come... Karl...
Karl ...Karl...
Klaus, cover!
I killed him, Hans!
I killed him.
I killed him!
Stop it!
Leave me alone!
Let me be!
Calm down, Klaus!
Karl! Karl!
They are gone.
- Albert!
- It's not so bad.
Take the jacket off.
I put a bandage on it.
I'll help you.
- They'll fetch reinforcement.
- You think?
We have to get away.
Walter!
Walter!
Come.
The dynamite and fuses.
Put the boxes there.
Use a lot.
It's a massive bridge.
Yes, sergeant.
- What are you doing here?
- We blow up all this mess.
What a circus you've made here!
How many have died?
And now you expect a medal around your neck, huh?
Well, go home to mum and get celebrated!
This is not true!
This is not true!
- This is not true!
- You're some nice heroes!
Be quiet! Shut up!
Shut up!
It's not true!
- Get lost! Go away!
- Take it easy, my boy.
Take your rifle away.
Don't be stupid. We have our orders.
Move! Get off the bridge - now!
I had to do it...
I had to do it!
Pigs!
Criminals!
Away! Get lost!
Get lost!
Away with you!
Hans! Hans!
What's up?
Answer, Hans! Hans!
Come.
I'll take you home.
Hans, come on.
I beg you.
Hans...
Hans, come...
Come with me, Hans...
Hans ... Come... Hans...
Hans, Hans!
Come, Hans... come...
Hans, come...
This happened on April 27th, 1945.
It was so insignificant,
That it was not mentioned...
...in any military report.
THE BRIDGE
FORBIDDEN GAMES
JUNE 1940
- Well?
- I'm trying!
Clear the way!
Let me get out!
The swine!
- It's wrecked!
- I told you not to stop the engine.
- What'll we do?
- We gotta get past the bridge.
My little Jock.
Give me a hug.
- We can't go on with three bags.
- We'll stop a car.
Paulette!
- Let me carry those.
- No, let go!
Jock!
Paulette!
What are you doing there?
You want to get killed?
Come on, get in.
As if we don't have enough burdens.
Get rid of that thing.
Can't you see it's dead?
It's dead?
Of course it's dead!
Break my cart and I'll burn your truck!
If you want a fight, the war's that way!
- Save the hot air for your other end!
- Never mind my other end!
A horse.
What's this horse doing here?
There's a horse!
That's right.
Why's that horse there?
Careful, Georges.
It's a war-horse. Don't touch it.
- Did they get you?
- No, it was the goddamn horse.
I told you not to touch it.
Easy, you're hurting me!
Titine took off!
Couldn't you have stopped her?
Were you scared?
- No, cows aren't scary.
- Then why didn't you stop her?
- I have my dog.
- What's wrong with your dog?
- He's dead.
- Where are you from?
- Over there.
You're not from around here.
No. Are you?
Yeah.
Where's your mother?
She's dead.
- And your father?
- He's dead.
Well, my father's not dead, and he'll whip me good if I don't bring back the cow.
Come on.
Help me bring her back.
- What about my dog?
- Leave it. I'll find you another one.
- A good one?
- Not bad.
- Where is it?
- At home.
- Is that the dog you'll give me?
- No, that's the neighbors'.
Can that dog swim?
I don't know.
We're on the outs with 'em.
What's his name?
We call him Gouard.
That's their last name.
- What's your last name?
- Dollé.
- And your first name?
- Michel. Yours?
Paulette.
- Are you from Paris?
- Yes. And you?
No, not me.
Will your father let me keep a dog?
I don't know.
What the hell are you doing here again?
Damn dog!
I'll teach you to sniff at our door.
What did my dog do to you?
He's always yapping.
We've got a wounded man here!
You care for the wounded now?
So they'll die sooner?
Oh, but it's all right for you to let people die!
Me? Who pulled your grandmother out of the water?
She'd already drowned by the time you pulled her out.
I got a medal for saving her life - so there!
Who asked you?
Anyway, I'm sick of hearing about your medal.
What's this now?
Her father and mother were killed.
What am I supposed to do about it?
Maybe we could keep her.
Are you crazy?
With your brother laid up?
All right.
She'll go to the Gouards.
Shame on you.
So they can claim another medal?
Come on.
Tell us all about it.
Easy! You're hurting me!
That goddamn horse!
Easy!
My money!
Pick my money up.
- Maybe he'd like a little drop.
- Yes, I would.
Drink, my poor George.
Who's that there?
I was just about to tell you.
She came from the road.
I found her.
Who is she?
She's all dressed up.
I want material like this for my dress.
Her parents were killed on the road.
She's going to tell us about it.
I'll give it to her.
Really? You'll tell us about the war?
- You saw the bombs?
- Where are you from?
- What's your name?
- How old are you?
Aren't you going to say anything?
Are you thirsty?
It's dirty.
Of course it is. Look at that.
There's a fly in it.
There you go.
Not thirsty?
She doesn't want it.
You'll scare her, crowding her like this.
She's not some strange beast.
Better to just go about our business.
Michel, I'm tired.
"The military situation took a sudden turn for the worse on all fronts over the course of the day yesterday.
Government officials held meetings around the clock."
You see?
"The cabinet in Bucharest -"
Who cares?
"Our troops' resistance continues to be strong and effective.
The archbishop of Westminster has ordered -"
Do your homework.
"A veal roast weighing
51/2 pounds costs 1.42 francs."
"Alert in Malta."
"How much would a five-ounce portion of veal cost?"
- Look at that!
- Don't wake her up.
- The Gouards' son.
- What?
Are you crazy?
Why would he be in the paper?
Why not?
He was decorated.
Decorated? Him?
That really hurts!
At least he's doing his part.
Enough about the Gouard boy.
What do you need?
A blanket for the kid.
Take Raymond's.
Sorry, but I need mine.
- Take mine.
- We share the same blanket.
Then it's mine to give.
You're not really gonna -
Poor kid.
At that age they don't understand.
Seventeen dead on the bridge just today.
They don't even have enough coffins.
Hear that? This is no time to die.
You don't even get a box.
What do they do with 'em?
They dig a hole and in they go, like dogs.
Watch what you say.
She's asleep.
Did you see this?
"A German sidecar was captured."
Look.
Does it hurt?
Oh, I don't know.
She's so clean.
Smells like perfume.
No, she's just clean.
- She'll never get used to it here.
- Why wouldn't she?
You want to keep her, don't you?
All right, everyone downstairs.
I'm scared of the dark.
Just call my name and I'll come.
Louder.
That's the way.
- What's she want?
- I don't know.
- Shut her up, for God's sake.
- Shut her up.
- What about my homework?
- Do as you're told.
Fine.
I won't do my homework.
I can't see anything.
Close your eyes and count to ten.
How many fingers?
I told you I can't see.
- Can't you count?
- Three.
So you can see.
- Why'd you stick out your tongue?
- To see if you could see.
A rocket! Come look.
I'm scared.
We better get on the floor.
You're afraid of the dark and the light too!
Is it still bright?
Liar!
All right.
- It's over. I swear.
- I don't want to stay here.
You have no choice.
Where would you go?
I want to go back to Mama and Papa on the bridge.
They're not there anymore.
Why? Where are they?
In a hole.
In a hole?
"In they go, like dogs?"
Are they in a hole to keep dry from the rain?
That must be why.
What about my dog?
Won't he get wet?
Are you asleep?
Not scared anymore?
Then I can go.
Michel, goddamn it!
- What is it?
- Don't you hear her?
- Who?
- Stop her yelling.
Stop shouting.
Why are you yelling?
Are you scared?
Then don't yell.
I didn't.
There, I told her.
She's sleeping.
Well, I'm not.
If you want,
I'll stay up too.
Want me to read you the paper?
Shall I read about the war?
No, not the war.
Read the serial.
"It was still too soon to give the signal to leave.
Nonetheless, some who were traveling on horseback -"
No horses.
All right. I'll skip some.
"Thus, all the precautions had been taken around the ha... ha... hacienda."
Paulette!
Aren't you up yet?
- I'm dressing.
Hurry up!
Keep it down!
There's a sick man here!
What's wrong with him?
A horse kicked him.
What's that?
That's the good Lord.
Haven't you ever seen a cross?
Yes, but I never knew what it was.
Come drink your milk.
Good morning.
She doesn't know the good Lord.
I'm thirsty.
Makes you wonder where she came from. Where are you from?
She's from Paris.
- Poor child.
- She should be baptized.
We have to tell the mayor, or they'll say we stole her.
Not the mayor.
The police.
Mayor, police - in any case, we have to report her.
I'll go to the police.
You take care of your cows.
- Want to come with me?
- Wait, I'm not done.
Look what those Parisians dropped by the wayside.
Don't make me laugh!
Don't make me laugh.
It hurts.
There, now you can't see it.
Don't make me laugh.
Good Lord, it hurts.
- What about the doctor?
- Oh, that's right.
He was called to the hospital because of the bombings.
I don't need a doctor.
I need an undertaker.
- Don't worry.
We can use the old hearse if we fix it up a bit.
I don't believe I know you.
You're not from around here.
Cat got your tongue?
Where do you live?
At Mr. Dollé's.
Papa and Mama are dead.
Poor child.
Did you say a prayer for them?
Wouldn't you like to?
I don't know how.
I'll teach you.
Put your hands like this.
Now repeat:
May the good Lord receive them into paradise.
In the name of the Father, the Son and the Holy Spirit. Amen.
Do as I do.
Don't you want to?
Michel will teach you.
He knows his catechism well.
Paulette!
- What are you doing?
- None of your business.
I've been looking all over for you.
You're digging a hole?
Ah, for your dog.
Give me that.
The ground's too hard.
I've got an idea.
We'll make a nice little cemetery.
What's a cemetery?
It's where they put the dead all together.
Why together?
So they won't be sad.
Then my dog will be sad if he's all alone.
I'll find him another one.
Another dog?
That won't be easy.
What's that?
- That's the Mayor.
- Why?
That's his name.
He's an owl.
- Is he mean?
- No, he sleeps all the time.
I'll show you.
Don't kill him.
I couldn't anyway.
They live to be a hundred.
A hundred.
May the good Lord receive him into paradise.
In the name of the Father, the Son and the Holy Spirit. Amen.
Don't move.
I'll get you another one.
I have a mole.
A pretty one!
- We'll need more.
- There are plenty around.
And cats.
And hedgehogs and lizards.
And horses and cows.
And rattlesnakes.
- And lions.
- And tigers.
And people.
If you want.
And we'll plant crosses for all of them.
Why crosses?
Didn't your parents teach you anything?
I'll show you.
See, it's not hard.
That's a cross.
It's the good Lord.
That's right.
It's the good Lord.
Wait.
- Your necklace is pretty.
- It's broken.
That's better.
But there's a prettier one over your brother's bed.
You think it's pretty?
I'll make some better ones with a hammer and nails.
We'll put 'em all over the place.
Look at this.
Darn, I have to start over.
You start over too.
Hail Mary, full of grace -
The Lord is with thee.
Blessed art thou among women, and blessed is Jesus, the fruit of thy -
Of thy womb.
Prayers.
The priest knows some good ones.
You know your prayers?
What did we used to say to Gran?
"Our Father who art in heaven."
- To Gran?
No, it was "Hail Mary."
I don't want anyone calling me Mary.
What are they doing up there?
The priest said we should be quiet.
Michel, what's a womb?
It's around where Georges is wounded. Go on.
And wounded is the fruit of thy womb, Jesus.
Blessed.
- What comes next?
- That's the end. Say "amen."
Why do they all end the same?
That means they're done.
Start over.
Start again.
Our Father who art in heaven, hallowed be thy name -
Thy kingdom come.
Here's your kingdom!
I'll teach you to pound like that.
We're supposed to be quiet.
- I was teaching her her prayers.
- Her prayers?
- I don't know them.
- You call this a prayer?
Making a cross in a sick man's house!
You want him to die?
I don't want to see you together.
Stay there.
You'll go to bed without dinner.
What's wrong, Georges?
- You don't answer your mother?
- Is something wrong?
He's spitting up blood.
I can't understand him.
He's spitting up more.
What's wrong with you?
No dinner for you!
- What's wrong?
- Answer.
First time I've seen someone spit up blood.
- We'll have to wash the sheets.
- Give him a handkerchief.
- Is that better?
- Tap him on the back.
- A little tea.
- Must be his heart.
All of us here, and no one can even say a little prayer.
Michel knows his prayers.
You're right.
- I'm being punished.
- Get down here!
So I'm not being punished?
Go over there and say your prayers.
On your knees.
Our Father, blessed art thou among women.
Give us our daily bread and blessed is the fruit of thy womb, Jesus.
Pray for us sinners.
Thy will be full of grace.
Our Father, Mother of God, give me my daily bread!
Crap, crap, crap, crap!
Shit!
On earth as it is in heaven.
Our Father who art in heaven...
- He's not moving.
- Shh, you'll scare him.
He was talking about fixing up the hearse.
- Not in front of him.
- He said it.
- He needs a laxative.
- There's castor oil.
Give him a little.
If it doesn't help, at least it won't hurt.
Won't you open your mouth?
His eyes are just like Gran's were.
We have to be gentle.
Be reasonable, Georges.
At least open your eyes.
- They're closed now.
- Maybe he's sleeping.
Here, drink this.
You give it to him, Mother.
His teeth are clenched.
Maybe he's dead.
Our Father who art in heaven, hallowed by thy name.
Thy kingdom come, thy will be done on earth as it is in heaven.
Give us this day our daily bread, and forgive us our trespasses, as we forgive those who trespass against us, and lead us not into temptation, but deliver us from evil. Amen.
May the good Lord receive him into paradise.
I think he's dead.
Feel his heart.
I think so too.
He's dead.
What do you think, Mother?
There's no doubt.
He's dead.
He's dead?
Is your brother dead?
Will you dig a hole for him?
Are you crazy?
He's my brother.
My poor Georges.
He slipped away so quietly.
There was no way we could have known.
If only I'd given it to him sooner.
You don't know that it would've helped.
Oh, you're just saying that.
You're right.
I'm saying that.
Hand me a nail.
A big one.
- What are you up to?
- Nothing.
Not bad.
Not a bad contraption at all.
Do we need to nail those crosses down?
No, they'll stay on.
You need me anymore?
Hand me a nail and you can go.
Not like that, idiot.
I've got crosses.
Three of 'em.
Why three?
There's only my dog and the mole.
You're right.
No, you already had some.
Do you like chicks?
Everybody up!
What's that?
Well, well.
- Is that Gouard's son?
- The war's not over.
With bums like him, it wouldn't surprise me.
Sneak around back and see if it's Francis.
I'll cut some grass for the rabbits.
There are no more leaders, no more English, no more nothing.
So I said to myself...
"No point marching forever."
Don't touch that.
So I lit out of there, and here I am.
Where are the Prussians?
Probably not far away.
- In the cavalry we had horses.
- Half-tracks are faster.
In '18 we didn't need to run.
If you'd had Messerschmitts on your tail, you'd have run.
- Want a hand? What are you up to?
- I'm cutting some grass.
- It's not yours to cut.
- Papa told me to.
It's Francis!
And they wonder how we lost the war.
And I don't want to see you buzzing around him.
Me?
Hello.
- You all right?
- Yes.
Were you asleep?
Look.
They're so warm.
Happy now?
- You swear you didn't kill them?
- Yes.
I just wanted to give them a drink.
But their eyes were closed.
I thought, "Maybe they're asleep."
I'll make them a wreath.
Their teeth were clenched, so I thought, "Maybe they're dead."
Why?
That's just how it is.
Are you happy?
You're a corporal?
Yes, I was promoted in battle.
- Who told you I watch the cows?
- Michel.
He's a clever one.
Be careful.
The kid's around.
Who's that kid?
Paulette, Michel's little friend.
He's a clever one, Michel.
Yes, he is.
Five... six.
It's far off, at the bridge.
Rotten luck!
They're following me.
No more lovey-dovey?
Is Paulette here?
- She sure is.
- Scram, you kids.
Have you got the chickens?
Look what I got.
They're ugly.
You're never satisfied.
- Do we have to take it inside?
- Of course.
It's the bottom plank.
I just cobbled it together.
It's not very sturdy.
If we keep dragging the coffin out and pushing it back in -
It has to be done.
What a thing to happen!
You shouldn't have.
It was the last one, so I'm afraid it's for a female cousin.
- It doesn't matter.
- Yes, it does.
Just a minute.
You'd never think there was a war going on here.
At least he'll have a Christian burial.
- With a mass.
- Aren't you coming inside?
- In a second.
Ten... eleven... twelve.
Thirteen... fourteen.
But those don't come apart.
They're not very pretty anyway.
You two about done talking?
Look.
That one would be good for a bee.
Bees sting.
Yeah, but not too bad.
The hearse broke down, like Francis' half-track.
- Don't laugh.
- Why shouldn't I?
Well, I never!
That's really strange.
Michel, come here.
Do as your father says.
I told you to check the crosses.
- They were on tight.
- Well, they came off.
See if we lost them on the road.
No, we didn't lose them.
I'd have noticed.
If they're not lost, then someone took them.
Who'd do that?
I don't know.
Maybe the Gouards.
The bell's ringing.
We have to go back in.
Yes, indeed.
Maybe it was the Gouards.
He noticed the crosses were gone.
I said it was the Gouards.
- Look at that one.
- That's the priest's.
It's pretty.
I'd have gone to the funeral if I'd known.
Right. You didn't know.
They didn't say a word.
All the same, it'll be tough for them now.
Who've they got left now?
That Raymond's useless.
There's Berthe.
She's a good worker.
She's a whore.
Hey, what happened to manners?
Are you defending her?
Yes, I am.
You should've defended France with your iron horses.
France?
I can't marry France.
You mean you might marry
Berthe Dollé?
I just might.
You'd have to be in a cavalry on wheels to be that stupid.
And maybe a swift kick from those cavalry horses might have knocked some sense into you!
- You speak to your father like that?
I mean it!
And that's not all!
I'm going to marry Berthe, you hear?
Well, that's that.
And now, my friends, a few words for a family carrying a very heavy burden.
That one would be good for a mare.
And that one for a pigeon.
A cat.
A big one.
And that one for a giraffe.
I said to myself, this is Gouard's doing.
You have any proof?
- He's got it in for us.
- They call me a deserter.
- Why does he have it in for you?
- He's jealous.
That's no reason to steal the crosses off your hearse.
When I was fixing the hearse earlier, those snotty girls sneered as they went by.
Francis is more of a deserter than me.
I'll break his back if he keeps this up!
I respect the dead, but they have no respect at all!
- You took the crosses off the hearse?
- Yes, Father.
But why?
- As a present.
- For whom?
I can't say.
Bring them to me right away.
Now say five Our Fathers and make your act of contrition.
My God, I am heartily sorrow for having offended thee.
I firmly resolve to sin no more and to avoid the near temptation of sin.
Our Father who art in heaven...
Twice, Father.
You're all the same!
- It was for a good reason.
- I'm sure it was.
But you've put the cart before the horse.
We want to get married.
We just don't dare tell our parents.
You know how they are.
I certainly do.
And we thought you might -
- Reconcile them?
- Exactly.
Michel, I saw you.
Taking the cross right off the altar!
You didn't even finish your penance before starting in worse!
Get your shoes and get out!
- What did he do now?
It doesn't concern you.
Get back inside. We're not done.
Well, did you speak to Gouard?
Yes, I did.
I said, " So now you steal crosses off hearses?"
He said, "What crosses?"
So I said,
"Don't be a wise guy."
And he said,
"I swear on my wife's grave,
I didn't touch those crosses."
Her grave?
There's a sight to behold!
Let me finish.
That's exactly what I said.
I said, " I wouldn't be swearing on her grave.
That's no grave.
That's a dump.
Swear on her grave all you want, but you'd do better just to clean the thing up."
And why weren't they at the funeral?
That proves it.
- No one told them.
- As if they didn't know.
Maybe they did.
Still, we didn't tell them.
That bugle is getting on my nerves.
It's not a bugle.
It's a trumpet.
Whatever it is, he's still a deserter.
"Chick."
We need two.
There are two graves.
JOCK WORM CRICKET
What's that called?
A cockroach.
Does it sting?
No, but it stinks.
Don't kill them!
It wasn't me. It was a bomb.
Are you crazy?
Don't kill them!
They have to be dead if we wanna bury them.
- I'm not talking to you anymore.
- Idiot!
Anyway, you promised me the priest's cross.
You're no fair.
I don't want it.
What is it?
- A doll's hand.
- I don't want it.
You're just sulking about the cross.
That jerk! He'll get us spotted by the planes!
All right, kids.
Bedtime.
- Good night, Mr. Dollé.
- Night, sweetie.
- What are you doing?
- Waiting. You done kissing everyone?
- Want me to kiss you?
- You're not nice.
Why?
- What you said about the priest's cross.
- You didn't give it to me.
I tried, and I got a good slapping for it.
It was right here.
Kiss me here.
Better than that.
I said get to bed!
Enough smooching!
I'm on my way.
I know a place with crosses.
- Where?
- The cemetery.
- You're not scared?
- Why?
What if dead people grab me by the feet?
I don't want to.
- Shall I come up there?
- I'm coming down.
I was just kidding.
Dead people aren't scary.
- Really?
- Yes.
What does that mean anyway,
"putting the cart before the horse"?
What we were doing just now.
I've never heard it called that before.
- We'll take the wheelbarrow.
- What for?
We'll fill it full of crosses!
- I'm scared!
- It's a rocket. Close your eyes.
I can't see my way down if I close my eyes.
What are you doing?
- What about you?
- Is that any of your business?
I'm getting the wheelbarrow.
Oh, I see.
- You see what?
- Nothing.
- A wheelbarrow at this hour!
- We're going to get snails.
- Aren't you scared?
- No, are you?
No. Shall I sing a song?
If you want.
We have to get down.
They can't see us.
Come on, quick.
- We lost a cross.
- We've got plenty.
He loved daisies.
We'll make a nice garden on his grave.
It's our first Sunday mass without him.
Take that off.
Let's go.
- I don't want to.
- Take that.
- And that.
Jeanne!
Go pick some flowers.
- Why?
Just do it.
Go pick some flowers, quick.
They're not the only ones who've lost somebody.
My God!
That's Georges's cross.
It sure is.
The price is still on the back.
That's strange.
It didn't get here by itself.
- Now it's all too clear.
- What is?
- That proves it.
- Proves what?
She's right.
That proves it.
I'm not going.
Darn! It's the Gouards!
- He called it a dump!
- It'll be prettier than theirs.
The cross is gone!
Just a hole.
It's not there.
- My God!
Watch this!
Bastard!
Vampire!
Bastard!
Monster!
- You're quite a sight, the two of you!
- Did you hurt yourself?
Father?
Answer me!
Joseph, watch out!
He's a bad one!
This is no place to be fighting.
Where did you fight, you deserter?
You're the deserter.
The army turned me down.
I have albuminuria.
Albuminuria!
That's enough now!
Grown men and fathers - aren't you ashamed?
- He stole Georges's cross.
- I don't steal from the dead!
- Who was it, then?
- Aren't you ashamed?
Dollé, it wasn't him.
I know the prankster who's been stealing crosses.
He tried to steal the one off the altar.
Michel, come here!
Hey, what about me?
Bunch of bastards!
JOCK THE DOG
EARTHWORM
ROBIN
CHICK
If he hasn't come home, it's 'cause he's scared of you.
- He should be.
- Don't hurt him.
I can't.
I don't know where he is.
Does it still hurt?
What could he have done with 14 crosses?
I don't understand.
Get to bed.
- Let me finish.
- What is it?
- I don't know, but it's beautiful.
Fourteen?
Yes, fourteen.
The priest and I counted them.
And that's not including Georges's.
The Galuchets - one.
The Bredillons - two.
The widow Entrat - three.
- The Gouards!
- Shut up!
What's it going to cost?
That's easy.
Georges's was 250 francs.
250 multiplied by 14...
Take 14 and carry the -
You never could do math!
Just wait till I find him.
Paulette!
Why don't you want to?
Will you tell me?
You know, so tell me.
I don't know.
Yes, you do.
Your nose is twitching.
- Why?
- It twitches when you lie.
You realize what Michel did?
He stole his own brother's cross!
Is that a nice thing to do?
I didn't ask you to cry.
I asked where they are.
What do you want crosses for?
They're not toys.
No, they're not toys.
Now listen.
Put your hand down.
Mr. Dollé will spank your bottom until it's black and blue.
So just tell me instead.
I'll go get them, and no one will say another word.
Isn't that better?
See? Where are they?
I don't know.
Then why did you take the wheelbarrow from the barn?
I'll tell Mr. Dollé!
- What'll you tell Mr. Dollé?
So there you are!
I'll tell him too.
- What?
- Who you were with in the barn.
- You lie!
- So do you!
- I'll call him.
- Go on.
Don't do anything smart.
I said to get to bed!
I've locked up.
If he knocks on the door, let him in like nothing's happened, then come get me, understand?
She didn't say anything?
Good night, angel.
The light's not for reading.
I can't see to get undressed.
For all you've got to show...
Good night, Mr. Raymond.
I'll say good night to you when you return the crosses.
- You coming?
- Where?
- To the cemetery.
- Not now. It's dark.
And he's locked up too.
We'll go tomorrow.
- Is it nice?
- You bet.
All the crosses and names!
Tell me about it.
I arranged some pebbles.
All the animals are there, and flowers too.
Pieces of broken plate, and snails -
I'm gonna sleep in the barn.
You're here?
Good morning.
- Let's go.
- Where?
To see the cemetery.
I'm hungry.
I don't like apples.
That's all I have.
I like café au lait.
You're awful picky!
The Gouards have filed a complaint!
You think that's funny?
Are you gonna pay for the crosses?
- And that brat's not back!
- He's not far.
- Why didn't you speak up before?
- You didn't ask.
- Damn it, the police!
- What'll they do to us?
I don't know, but don't say a word.
You swear?
No, say "I swear."
I swear.
And I swear too.
Cross my heart and hope to die.
You little brat!
Now the police are here!
You gonna tell me where those crosses are?
Tell me, you stubborn little runt!
Tell me where they are!
- I'm not telling!
- You'd rather go to jail?
Yes, I would!
Fourteen crosses, for God's sake!
What did you do with 14 crosses?
Fourteen crosses!
14,000 kicks in the pants!
Joseph!
Leave him alone!
- Can't you see I'm busy?
Leave him alone!
They didn't come about that.
They came for Paulette.
That's right.
They came looking for her.
Come along.
- They can't take her!
- Who asked you?
They won't hurt her. They'll take her to an orphanage with other little girls.
I don't want to go.
- She's not going!
- We can't keep her.
Are you the boss here?
Don't be afraid.
They're nice.
If I tell you where they are, will you keep her?
- That's got nothing to do with it.
- Then you'll never get them, ever!
- I'll take care of you later.
- You won't get them that way.
- Then how?
- Let her stay.
We'll give the crosses back and apologize to everyone.
And she'll go to catechism and school and help around the home.
And then you'll get married.
- Tell me where they are.
- You didn't promise.
All right. Now tell me.
Tell me where they are.
Tell him, Michel.
At the mill.
The mill?
Why the mill?
Come with me.
Here she is, the poor thing.
Hello, little girl.
What's your name?
What's her name?
- We call her Paulette.
Your parents were killed in the bombings?
- What?
- That's what she told us.
What do you mean, no?
Try to remember, my child.
Don't worry.
She'll remember.
- It was probably too much for her.
- That's right.
We don't even have her name.
She'll tell us.
Your name's Paulette what?
Paulette what?
- Dollé.
Now she says her name's Dollé!
I want Michel's name.
Kids are like that.
- We need the facts.
- You'll take her though, right?
To the Red Cross.
You're going for a ride with these nice men.
In an automobile too.
Sign here, Mr. Dollé.
You can't! You promised!
First, I didn't promise, and second, shut up.
Liar!
You talk like that to your father?
He said she could stay if I told him where the crosses are.
Be quiet.
You'll never get them now!
- What crosses?
- Oh, you know kids.
Here. Keep this for a hundred years.
Don't lose that now.
Did she tell you her name, Sister?
You'll see, my little... Paulette.
You're going to like it.
With other little girls just like you, all with their own share of sorrow, but you'll all be very happy together.
Now don't move, and be good.
Mama!
TOHO CO., LTD.
THRONE OF BLOOD
Producers: KUROSAWA AKIRA and MOTOGI SOJIRO
Screenplay by: OGUNI HIDEO,
HASHI MOTO SHINOBU,
KIKUSHI MA RYUZO, KUROSAWA AKIRA
Cinematography: NAKAI ASAKAZU
Art Director: MURAKI YOSHIRO
Score: SATO MASARU
Cast:
MIFUNE TOSHIRO
YAMADA ISUZU
SHIMURA TAKASHI, KUBO AKIRA,
TACHIKAWA YOICHI, CHIAKI MINORU
Director:
KUROSAWA AKIRA
Look upon the ruins
Of the castle of delusion
Haunted only now
By the spirits
Of those who perished
A scene of carnage
Born of consuming desire
Never changing
Now and throughout eternity
HERE STOOD
SPIDER'S WEB CASTLE
Fujimaki mutinies at North Garrison.
Caught unawares, fire ravages the Fourth and Fifth Fortresses.
And the Third Fortress?
The Third Fortress had no time to prepare itself.
And the Second Fortress?
Fighting like a man possessed,
Second Fortress commander Miki has redeployed men of the Third Fortress.
Our First Fortress?
As flames engulfed the Fourth and Fifth Fortresses,
First Fortress, under commander Washizu, came under assault from Inui's men, some 400 strong, who poured across our border full force.
So, this is Inui's scheme.
And how does Washizu fare in battle?
A bitter fight.
Attend to this man.
Shall we strike?
Or barricade ourselves in this castle?
We must confine ourselves here.
Striking at forces bent on victory will only bring greater injury to our men.
First, post sentries at the edges of Spider's Web Forest, divide our foe's forces by luring them into its maze, and wound as many as we can.
Then withdraw and barricade ourselves here.
This would be my strategy.
Our supplies?
We can eke out three months, slurping gruel.
I bring word.
I am a messenger
from the Second Fortress.
Let him enter.
Let him enter.
Lord, the tides of battle favor you.
How is that?
Even as Miki's valiant defense exhausted our foe's strategies,
Washizu tore through
Inui's lines at the First Fortress, raining arrows on their ranks.
- Washizu did this?
- Yes.
Washizu did that.
Washizu's gambit has easily wasted our enemy, and turned the tide of war to our advantage.
Lord, even now Washizu and Miki's men have driven the enemy back, trapping them in the Garrison.
Lord.
Lord.
At the Garrison,
Fujimaki prepares to abdicate and begs for peace.
No, we shall not talk of peace.
Noriyasu.
Take your men to North Garrison at once and slay Fujimaki.
Fortify our border positions, and if Inui refuses to move his men...
Bring Washizu and Miki here.
I wish to thank them myself.
What is this day?
I have never seen such peculiar weather.
Make haste. I wish to see our Lord's joyous face.
Indeed.
No, this is... the very path where we last stopped our beasts.
Indeed, see the hoof marks where our horses tread.
This is baffling.
Is not this the Spider's Web Forest?
Without question.
Then the castle must be but very near.
We have wandered the forest two hours now.
Finding no outlet.
The infamous Spider's Web Forest.
Stretching out like a spider's web, protecting Spider's Web Castle against all foes.
Ridiculous.
Though perilous to our foes, surely we know this forest well.
Hear that?
There's evil afoot.
That was an evil spirit.
Then I'll trust my spear to conquer it and pass.
And I shall depend upon my faithful bow and arrow.
What is that?
Do you recall such a hovel?
No, the sight is new to my eyes.
Also the work of an evil spirit.
And yet...
Look at the horses.
They're out of their wits.
Strange is the world
Why should men
Receive life in this world?
Men's lives are as meaningless
As the lives of insects
The terrible folly
Of such suffering
A man lives but
As briefly as a flower
Destined all too soon
To decay into the stink of flesh
Humanity strives
All its days
To sear its own flesh
In the flames of base desire
Exposing itself
To Fate's Five Calamities
Heaping karma upon karma
All that awaits Man
At the end
Of his travails
Is the stench of rotting flesh
That will yet blossom into flower
Its foul odor rendered
Into sweet perfume
Oh, fascinating
The life of Man
Oh, fascinating
Who are you?
Are you human or of the spirit world?
Speak now. If you can sing, surely you can speak.
Yes.
Washizu Taketoki.
Commander of the First Fortress.
What? You know of me?
Yes.
From this day forward,
Lord of the North Garrison.
What? Lord of North Garrison from this day?
Yes.
One day, you shall also be Sovereign over Spider's Web Castle.
How dare you.
Cease your jesting.
Why should you show fury when my tidings are so joyous?
Our Great Lord is the only lord of the castle.
Human beings are so strange.
Terrified to look into the bottom of their own hearts.
Wait now.
Though this may be a spirit creature, it would not jest with your arrow poised at its heart.
Let me question further.
Answer me this.
Do you see into the future as clearly as my eyes now see?
Yes.
Miki Yoshiaki.
Commander of the Second Fortress.
And henceforward, commander of the First Fortress.
Even today, commander of First Fortress?
And my realm and rank thereafter?
Your destiny is both smaller and greater than that of Washizu.
What?
What can you mean by this?
One day your son shall rule
Spider's Web Castle.
Ah, there's the castle.
Finally free of that spider's web.
Come, at a gallop.
No, wait.
My fatigue is great. My armor weighs heavily, as never before.
And no wonder.
We've tired three mounts since yesterday's battle.
Shall we rest?
I'm drowsy.
I desire nothing more than a deep, restful sleep.
I can't help but feel this is already a dream.
Our encounter with that spirit may well have been a dream.
They say dreams manifest our basest desires.
In truth, who would not dream of ruling over a vanquished castle?
It seems your son shall become
Great Lord of that castle.
No, it is you, yourself, who shall rule over that castle.
But first, I must become
Lord of the North Garrison.
And I, commander of the First Fortress.
- Joyous tidings.
- Joyous tidings.
- Yet...
- Yet...
- What? What did you mean to say?
- No, what did you?
And yet, what if as of this night,
I do become Lord of North Garrison, and you command First Fortress...
Most distinguished warrior in battle,
Washizu Taketoki.
Henceforward, you are
Lord of North Garrison.
Miki Yoshiaki.
Your service was equally distinguished.
From this night forward, commander of our First Fortress.
Awfully peaceful.
Surely, this is paradise.
Vastly superior to the discomfort of a fortress.
Life can always be improved.
Fine fortune for we who serve them, but our Lord and Lady must be well satisfied.
Is your heart resolved?
No.
I dreamt an evil dream.
Beguiled by a wicked spirit.
But I no longer waver.
Preposterous, to wish I were
Lord of Spider's Web Castle.
Do not call your dream preposterous.
Any man who takes bow in hand would dream of such a fate.
No.
I prefer to remain here.
I will serve my Lord loyally from this Garrison.
Savor the peace of a life befitting my rank.
- That shall not come to pass.
- What?
What if Miki Yoshiaki should disclose the forest spirit's prophecy to our Great Lord?
If that comes to pass, we shall not survive here.
At once, the Great Lord would surround this castle with his men, jealous of the threat you pose to his hegemony.
My Lord, you have but two paths ahead.
Remain here and patiently wait for our Great Lord to slay you, or slay him first and become the Lord of Spider's Web Castle.
Slaying the Great Lord would be high treason.
Did not the Great Lord secure his own position murdering his predecessor?
No, only because his own Lord doubted him and sought his death.
Our Great Lord trusts me.
He treasures me like no other.
Only because he does not know the depths of your heart.
My heart?
There is nothing in my heart.
That is a lie.
Ridiculous.
I am... perfectly content with my station at North Garrison.
Even if that were true, do you think the Great Lord will trust it is so, should Miki inform him of that prophecy?
Miki is...
Miki is my beloved friend from childhood.
He is incapable of betrayal.
To advance themselves in this world, parents will kill children, and children, their parents.
In this degenerate age, one must kill so as not to be killed.
I cannot help wondering if Miki has already informed the Great Lord.
I have no respite from this fear.
Asaji. Do not speak of your doubts again.
Lord.
I've word. 300 men of
Spider's Web Castle lurk in the woods.
They have assembled in silence.
My Lord.
The forests surrounding North Garrison are thick with armed men, all from Spider's Web Castle.
Their flags and spears are lowered, their horses bridled with twigs.
News for Washizu,
Lord of North Garrison.
The Great Lord approaches.
What is it?
My Lord, the Great Lord approaches.
Men, form your ranks.
Form your ranks.
Fall in, men.
Washizu, there is no need.
The Great Lord is out hunting incognito.
And thus no need for an official reception.
My congratulations on your bountiful kill.
No, the hunt is only a pretext that I may deploy my men to attack Inui.
Inui's behavior is untenable.
Knowing this day would come,
I overlooked his conspiracy with Fujimaki.
Take heed. Hereafter, I quarter at North Garrison here, secretly fortify our border, and attack when opportunity permits.
Until then, not a word to anyone.
- Washizu.
- Sir.
- Miki.
- Sir.
I elevate you in recognition of your courage.
Washizu take my vanguard,
Miki, Spider's Web Castle.
- Sir.
- Sir.
Asaji.
Now your suspicious heart must find respite.
Our Great Lord trusts me.
In your uneasy heart that would slander Miki, that evil spirit lurks.
I cannot agree.
And still you doubt. Listen.
Great Lord places his trust in me above all others.
Thus he gives me the noble rank of vanguard commander.
This vanguard commander is vulnerable to arrows on every side.
Great Lord is a fox.
With easy words, he cheats you of the North Garrison, sends his trusted Miki out of danger to guard Spider's Web Castle, and casts you, his most hated adversary, into danger.
From the heights of the castle keep,
Miki will laugh as he watches you take your last gullible breath.
- Who's there?
- We are with the Garrison.
That way lie the Great Lord's sleeping quarters.
No one may approach them.
I do not seek his quarters.
I come to air the sealed chamber.
Sealed chamber?
The place where the former Lord,
Fujimaki, took his life.
No scrubbing will cleanse the bloodstained floor, and thus the chamber remains locked.
Why open the room on such a night?
The Great Lord sleeps in our Lord's chambers, thus he must rest here.
I thank you for your labors.
You may pass.
Most peculiar.
Though I have waded through endless mires of battle dead, these blood stains never fail to chill my spine.
For this is dog's blood.
The blood of a traitor most foul who, when his rash schemes failed, begged our Great Lord for his life.
This is coward's blood.
Damn, even the birds cry ominously.
You accuse me of doubting too deeply.
Yet even my distrustful heart, cannot help but trust that spirit's prophecy.
Open your eyes and look for yourself.
Each truthful provision of that prophecy has come to pass, without the slightest help from you.
Do you still not comprehend it?
The Great Lord himself has flown into your very hands.
If you let this night pass, such an opportunity will never come again.
And yet... under what pretext can I commit high treason?
In any case, all his men will turn against me.
Though the Great Lord claims to trust you, he's left Noriyasu's men to guard him.
This is our good fortune.
We'll quench their thirst with a sleeping potion mixed in sake.
As his guards dream, you shall slay the Great Lord, and denounce Noriyasu as the murderer to his own men.
What do you hear in that bird's cry?
"Will you risk the world?"
So it sounds to me.
Ambition makes the man.
From your stronghold, Spider's Web, you may yet aspire to all the world.
The cry is from heaven.
Who's there?
Your sleeping quarters are ready.
Good work.
And how did you leave the Great Lord's guards?
Spears poised, they maintain
their sleepless vigil.
Indeed they do.
Let us offer them some sake, then.
Intruders! Intruders!
Take arms!
The Great Lord is in danger.
Traitor.
- Let me go.
- You must hold your temper.
First, back to the castle, Prince.
Let me go.
Surely this is Washizu's work.
Flee now and they mark us traitors.
Hear my story, Prince.
No justice for the dead.
Let me go.
Let go of me.
Do not heed the minions.
Noriyasu is our only foe.
- Where's Noriyasu?
- He was nearly ours.
So he's escaped.
He fled to the castle with the prince.
What, to the castle with the prince?
My God. Spider's Web Castle is in Miki's charge.
If he admits those two...
Admitting those foul traitors insults our Great Lord.
Press forward.
Give chase.
Ready your arrows.
Damn them.
Word for Lord Miki.
As he prepared to attack Inui, our Great Lord died tragically, in the Garrison at Washizu's treasonous hand.
I, Noriyasu, fought my way back to this castle with the prince under my protection.
Open the gates in haste.
Open the gates.
Lord Miki.
Washizu swiftly approaches.
Open the gates.
Open the gates.
Miki, how dare you?
Prince.
Strike them, Lord.
Hold back.
Give chase and strike them, Lord.
No, hold back.
We cannot move until we perceive Miki's design.
With our Great Lord gone,
Miki may plan to usurp the throne, and then Miki himself will become our next enemy.
Lord.
Lord.
A message from your lady.
What is it?
If Miki refuses to open the gates, approach the gates bearing the Great Lord's coffin.
I see.
Open the gates.
The Great Lord returns.
Open the gates.
Washizu will enter, guarding the Great Lord's coffin.
What of the Great Lord's lady?
She has taken her life.
She could not bear to see an enemy occupy the castle.
Surely the evil spirit of Spider's Forest foretold the truth.
With the Great Lord gone,
Inui will surely turn against this fortress.
They will come in force.
You alone have the strength to defend this castle.
I will argue the justice of this before the Council.
We shall speak of it at greater length.
Where lies the Garrison?
At the foot of those mountains, see?
From this height, it seems almost pitiful.
Life can always be improved.
Fine, fine fortune.
If only there were an heir, this house would have great joy.
So I cannot persuade you of the folly in naming Miki's son as heir to the throne of this castle?
At the Council meeting, he ardently argued my right to succession.
I owe my position to his unflagging friendship.
I must repay his loyalty.
I cannot agree.
Miki did not promote you out of friendship.
Surely you know this yourself.
Do not speak of it.
Miki is courageous.
He's a shrewd strategist.
Terrifying as an enemy, but a trustworthy ally.
If I appoint his son to be my heir, he will engage in any labor on my behalf.
Hear this.
At tonight's banquet I will announce and celebrate my successor.
Entertain Miki and his son lavishly.
I did not soil these hands with blood for the sake of Lord Miki's son.
My rule lasts but a generation.
Thereafter, Miki's heirs succeed.
If you believe in the Forest prophecy, it is the most we can hope for.
- I refuse.
And yet, we are barren.
Someday, we must choose an heir.
I am... with child.
With child?
Yes.
Fool.
What is this?
His loyal horse went mad today.
He bucked his bridle, tore off his reins and fled.
Father, this bodes ill.
We cannot visit the Castle.
Ridiculous.
We are honored guests at tonight's banquet. We must attend.
Father.
As I have said already,
I am grateful for these honors...
You complain?
No, I make no complaints.
But I refuse to trust an evil spirit's prophecy.
Foolish.
Foolish?
I saw it clearly with my own eyes.
For Washizu, the prophecies have been fulfilled.
For me, tonight...
Such reasoning proves you are possessed.
The spirit has tricked you into fulfilling its prophecies, and now you believe the prophecies have come true. Is it wise?
Then believe them not.
And yet,
Washizu's wish to name you heir is neither dream nor illusion.
Listen well.
You can become lord and master of a castle, without bloodshed, without heaping corpse on corpse.
What got into that horse?
Look at my wounds.
Kept me behind.
Made you miss out on castle sake.
He's back.
Where can Lord Miki be?
Great Lord is vexed as well.
Such impudence is unlike Miki.
Oh, terrible gods
attend our story well
The very same tale
foretold in ancient legend
The warrior Chikata
whose devilish men
served his traitorous schemes
Yet when his demon henchmen
murder him in betrayal
their debt of royal treachery
swiftly brings their own ruin
And thus it came to pass
That's enough.
Enough of your dancing.
Sir.
Damn you, Miki.
Such insolence.
Remove yourself.
Remove yourself.
Great Lord.
Calm yourself.
He has imbibed too freely.
Lately, he is often this way when he has had too much to drink.
No doubt his predecessor's violent death tears at his heart.
I'm terribly drunk.
What's wrong?
Will you men not take a drop?
Let's celebrate.
What can be the cause of Miki's delay?
Rumor has it that Inui has spies afoot.
I pray all is well.
There he is again.
If you reprove me so, draw your sword and strike.
I'll slay you yet again.
My Lord.
Pay him no mind.
His confusion will subside with the liquor.
Forgive this unseemly disruption of our feast.
Please retire for the night.
Retire!
How brilliant.
A Great Lord, his ambitions set on the world, terrorized and undone by phantoms.
Who's there?
Lord Miki is done with...
Enough!
Retire.
My Great Lord.
There is a more pressing question.
His son?
I wounded him, but he escaped, clinging to his steed.
What? He escaped?
I have no excuse.
A fierce wind blows.
As if to shake the castle to its foundation.
These foundations already tremble, without need of the wind.
Nowadays, even the garrison and fortress commanders, who once paid court here daily, are hardly seen.
Let sleeping dogs lie.
Two commanders, whom the Great Lord doubted, forced to take their lives.
Hard to believe it was Inui's spies that murdered Miki.
I've heard tell that Miki's son has taken shelter with Inui.
Only a fool would side with his father's foe.
They say even Noriyasu and our last prince have pledged themselves to Inui.
What will come of this?
In any case, we can no longer trust this castle's invincibility.
I heard a guard of the watchtower say he saw a pack of rats fleeing the castle grounds.
They always say,
"Rats flee a house before it burns."
How is she?
My lady, how does she fare?
Speak.
Why are you silent?
There is nothing to speak of.
My lady has given birth.
The child was stillborn.
Stillborn?
And lifeless first some days within my lady's womb, my lady's health is far from certain.
Great Lord.
Great Lord.
Fool!
Fool.
Great Lord.
Great Lord.
A messenger from the First Fortress.
What?
What is it?
Inui's men swarmed our border, taking the First Fortress.
Noriyasu leads the vanguard, swearing vengeance for the prince's father.
The Second Fortress is surrounded.
Miki's son commands them.
First and Second Fortresses are both lost, our foe has joined forces and approaches the Third Fortress.
Cowards.
It is two hours since I called council.
How can we greet this attack?
Enough with you.
What need for the advice of cowards, who quake and pale under fire?
Bring my horse.
My horse.
Come forth.
Evil spirit.
Evil spirit.
Come forth, evil spirit.
Come forth, evil spirit.
Come forth.
Show yourself.
I must know.
Whom have we here?
Is this not the Great Lord of Spider's Web Castle?
Damn you. Answer me plainly.
Is it true Miki's son will be Lord of Spider's Web?
So I see, you have finally come to the end of your wanderings.
You have done well.
You have done well.
Damn you. Tell me.
If you have the power, foretell the outcome of my battle.
You may set your fears to rest.
Until the very trees of Spider's Web Forest rise against Spider's Web Castle, you will not be defeated in battle.
The trees rise to attack?
Such a thing is impossible.
Which means,
I will not be defeated in battle?
If you choose the path of bloodshed, then climb to the very pinnacle of evil.
Noriyasu, the prince and even Miki's son,
I swear I shall kill them all.
If you choose to build a mountain of corpses, build its summit as high as you dare.
I'll lay a fresh mountain of corpses over these bleached bones.
If you will make blood flow, let it be a river, no, an ocean of blood.
A deluge of blood shall stain these woods crimson.
Come for me, Noriyasu.
Ally yourself with Inui, with the prince, and Miki's son.
Join forces with the First and Second Fortress, too.
Thousands, tens of thousands.
Bring every man you can find and lay siege to Spider's Web!
Heed this.
The Spider's Web Forest is but a web of trails.
Do not let the paths beguile you.
Avoid the trails.
Once inside the forest, ride straight through the trees, and press only forward.
What? My hidden troops in the forest have withdrawn?
Cowards.
The men who lay in wait withdrew en masse without receiving a single arrow?
Our foe Noriyasu knows the forest.
We cannot entrap him.
I was remiss...
Men, hear me well.
In battle, the final victor takes all.
Skirmishes mean nothing.
Take heart.
I, Washizu, demand your trust.
On no account shall I meet defeat in battle.
If you do not believe me,
I'll tell you why.
This happened when I still commanded the First Fortress.
As I returned to the Castle after rushing Fujimaki's mutiny,
I saw an evil spirit in Spider's Forest.
According to its prophecy,
I would that eve become
Lord of the North Garrison, and later, of this Castle.
Behold my fate.
The prophecy foretold my destiny precisely.
And then, today.
I spurred my steed back into the Forest to ask the spirit of my fortune once more.
Rejoice.
None may defeat me, though heaven descends or the earth rends.
The spirit told me, until the trees of the forest rise to attack the Castle,
I shall never be defeated in battle.
Men.
Don't tell me.
Do trees attack?
Those of you who trust my fate, raise your spears.
Can't see a thing.
Hey.
What can the enemy be plotting, with nary a torch?
What can that be?
No doubt they've abandoned their attack to build defenses.
Even the formidable Noriyasu has no power against these legendary fortifications.
The attackers can see nothing inside the castle.
Yet we have a bird's-eye view of them.
If they do attack us, let them draw near and then shower them with arrows.
What is it?
Is it a covert attack?
What is it?
An ill omen.
Commanders of cowardice who quake and pale.
Do you not see this as good omen?
How dare you let an auspicious omen of our victory fluster you.
My lady.
My lady.
It won't come out.
What an awful bloodstain.
No matter how I wash it, why won't this blood wash away?
It reeks of blood even now.
Why can I not clean this blood from my hands?
Asaji.
What is the matter with this blood?
The stain will not leave my hands.
No matter how many times
I wash and wash again, still these hands reek of blood.
Asaji.
This awful stain of blood.
Fools.
Why this confusion as victory approaches?
Quiet down.
Quiet down, I say.
Great Lord. The trees, the trees of Spider's Forest.
- What of them?
- The trees have risen to attack us.
Ridiculous.
A madman's delusion.
How would a forest move?
What is this!
Hold your stations.
Do not yield.
Return to your stations.
Cowards.
I see it now.
You'll slay me and offer my head when you surrender.
You traitors.
Murdering a Great Lord is high treason.
And who killed our last Great Lord?
They know our every move from the castle.
Send the large and small carts first.
Hide yourselves beneath the carts.
Conceal yourselves among the branches and don't expose yourselves.
Look upon the ruins
Of the castle of delusion
Haunted only now
By the spirits of those who perished
A scene of carnage
Born of consuming desire
Never changing
Now and throughout eternity
HERE STOOD
SPIDER'S WEB CASTLE
THE END
As you pass by.
Here you are, sir.
All right, lads.
So long, guv.
Will all Signals personnel arriving on the 8:22 from Taunton
report to the RTO for onward routing.
Will all Signals personnel arriving on the 8:22 from Taunton
report to the RTO for onward routing.
Left, right, left, right.
Hurry up at the back there!
Pick 'em up!
Consolidated Industries.
Good morning.
Personal manager, Export, please.
What is your enquiry, sir?
- I have an insurance problem.
- One moment, sir.
Putting you through.
Harvey, been expecting you since last night.
The ferry boat was late.
Look, I'm going to be a bit longer.
I've got a character tailing me.
Yes, well, don't worry about him.
He's a new boy just learning the trade.
- What?
- He picked you up as soon as you landed.
So don't hang around anymore.
Drafty places, stations.
This is going to cost you a very large drink.
Drinks are rationed.
There's a war on, you know.
Oh, sorry. Must have tripped over your cloak.
Well, how about this for a...
Catch.
What? Oh.
I had run out, as a matter of fact.
Well, you can't say I don't think about you while I'm away.
Expected you last night.
Don't overdo the welcome home, will you?
It embarrasses me.
What was the idea of having me tailed?
Oh, just policy. Wanted to make sure that you came straight here.
I see.
- Uh, where's Peggy, by the way?
- Who?
Peggy, you know, the one who was out there before I left.
- Wore seamless legs.
- Oh, her.
Yes, well...
I don't keep track of them.
We've had about four since she went.
You mean, she's gone?
Now listen, we had a deal, remember?
You said you'd keep her.
She had some sort of reason for wanting to go. Can't remember what.
- Sounded valid enough at the time.
- Yes, but where to?
I had some unfinished business there.
I want to make the most of this leave.
Oh. That's cancelled.
- What is?
- Your leave.
Now listen, I know you're the Colonel and all that, but I've got it due to me, it's on the cards.
Yes, I know, but it's still cancelled.
- Filthy taste these things.
- What do you mean, cancelled?
Just that. I need you here.
Oh, I see.
Well, why didn't you say so before?
Of course, that makes all the difference.
You need me here.
Now listen, don't give me the mystery routine. I've just had a bellyful of that.
No mystery. They tell me, I pass the buck.
Is this on the level?
Well, I'm not doing another drop, that's for sure.
- Nobody said you were.
- Well, I'm just telling you.
Well, this one calls for brains, not a parachute.
You weren't the obvious choice, of course.
No, no, of course.
As you know, I like to surround myself with lesser talents.
You basket!
Admitted.
I'm glad you're back in one piece.
One of these days,
I'm going to try my hand at that.
- Try what?
- I've always fancied myself as an author.
You should see the uncensored version in the men's room.
Mm. It's nearer than most of our anonymous friends think.
How near?
I see.
Is this new job connected with it, directly, I mean?
I'll tell you how directly.
Invasion without tears.
There we are and there, in due course, we undoubtedly go.
As everyone expects us to.
Now, the question is, can we persuade the Germans that we might, just might, do something different?
Here. No.
Here. Bloody fools if we did.
Here. Possibility. Could be.
Could mount an invasion from North Africa, agreed?
Mm, I suppose so.
You're supposed to say yes.
So, yes, we could, just.
Now, that's the seed of suspicion.
Has to be planted in Berlin.
Yes.
Well, that is the problem.
The War Cabinet gave it to Deception.
Deception, very wisely, threw it under the table to Intelligence.
Us, to be exact.
You're not serious?
Oh, yes. Top priority.
They wanted it yesterday.
But how do you kid the Germans where we're going? They know.
They've known for the last two years.
Oh, of course, they don't know the date, they don't know the map reading, but it's got to be here, or here, or here.
Course, we could go round by the Cape and sneak up on them by the way of Tibet.
Good point.
Do you mind if I make notes?
Hey, put that light out!
All right, let's go back to the beginning.
The Germans know we're going to invade this year, right?
- Right.
- Right.
They also know we'll go to any lengths to conceal the actual time
- and place of the invasion, right?
- Right.
Therefore... What was I saying?
The Germans will expect us to try to fool them.
- Who are you ringing?
- I'm trying to trace Peggy.
Peggy?
Now look, don't let's go through all that again.
- Do... Do you mind?
- Hello?
Hello, Peggy?
Oh, I see. The theatre?
Do you know the name of the show?
"Khaki Kapers". Yes, sounds great.
I see. Thanks so much.
Sorry to have troubled you. Goodbye.
So, listening?
We've got two choices.
We either fool the Germans with something so big, so real, that it even confuses Eisenhower, or something tiny, unimportant, trivial.
Something that might conceivably have been overlooked in the heat of the moment.
- Something human, in fact.
- Yes, I follow you.
Well, I don't where to.
That's my contribution for the night.
I know what human problem
I'm going to solve, right now.
Good idea. I'll join you.
I feel a bit peckish myself.
With all due respect to your rank, sir, no, you will not.
And I'll give you two good reasons.
You're too old and you're the wrong sex.
See you in the morning.
Through there, sir.
Excuse me.
Excuse me.
Whht!
Whht! Peggy.
Wrap up, can't you?
Peggy.
Fine.
- What did you say?
- I didn't say anything, darling.
Just a minute, ladies and gentlemen, a very special visitor has just arrived and would like to say a few words to you.
- Why don't you take a powder?
- I just took one.
It's not him!
Officers only. Anyway, we're full up.
I booked in earlier - Major Harvey.
- What number?
Harvey. Right.
Too late for a meal, of course?
Kitchen closed ten o'clock.
- No chance of a drink?
- Bar closed 10:30.
- You haven't got an evening paper?
- You have to order one.
Thanks.
Did you want it to read?
That was the idea.
You can borrow mine if I get it back.
Thanks. I'll take good care of it.
Not that it's worth reading.
Load of rubbish.
Believe anything, some people.
Thanks.
- Oh, sorry about the noise.
- Yes, so am I.
Well, aren't you going to ask me in?
- Help yourself.
- Thanks.
- What's the time?
- Oh, it's not late.
Just as well.
Don't want to die in bed, do you?
- Mind the blackout!
- Oh, sorry.
Damn!
All right.
Look, I, uh...
I want to ask you a question.
Well?
Who would you say is certain to command our land forces in the invasion?
- Where have you been tonight?
- No, no, stay with it. Who would you say?
Well, at a long shot,
I'd guess at Montgomery.
Here, don't smoke your own.
That's it, Monty.
Now, a commanding General would have to be with his forces on the eve of the said invasion, right?
How long is it since you had leave?
So if Monty was somewhere else, out of the country, in the Mediterranean, say, just before D-Day, what would the German reaction be?
I know what the War Office's reaction would be.
They might think the invasion was going in there, right?
- Possibly.
- Put it this way.
If we produce Montgomery in the Middle East and made sure the Germans knew about it - you know, an open top secret - there's a fair chance they'd buy it.
- That's a big if.
- Listen...
I, uh... I saw Monty tonight.
- You what?
- Not officially. I went to the theatre.
Monty made an appearance on the stage.
Big reaction, audience went wild.
Or at least, somebody so like Monty that he fooled me and about 1,200 others.
- Is the penny beginning to drop?
- Give it to me again.
Look, if this character that I saw tonight can be made to give a repeat performance on a bigger scale...
- we might be in business.
- Who was he?
I don't know. It was an army show.
Shouldn't be too difficult to trace him.
- Who's our contact in public relations?
- Old Dick Coppard. He'll find out for us.
- Discreetly?
- He invented the word.
Well, that's it then.
We'll get on to it first thing in the morning.
- Was it worth waking you up for?
- I hate to admit it.
On the whole, I think it was.
The big question is not so much whether this chap
- can look the part off stage...
- Well, he's got to look it.
...but actually think it.
I mean, all you've seen him do is to walk on stage, face the audience and salute.
- Well, that's a start, isn't it?
- Mind the step.
Couldn't you have these things switched?
And another thing, we don't know that he's not a raving pony.
- Oh, good morning, sir.
- Good morning.
- I mean, after all...
- Good morning, sir.
Good morning.
- Is that ours?
- What?
Hello? Yes. Extension 4-2.
Oh, good morning, Mr Coppard.
Yes, I suppose so.
They're always circulating.
- We get them from the typist pool.
- Oh, really? That's interesting.
Oh, I remembered about that other girl.
You know, uh, Peggy.
- Yes, she got married, that was it.
- Thanks very much.
A Mr Coppard just came through with the information...
- Thank you.
- ...you wanted.
- Uh... What's your name, by the way?
- Angela, sir.
Good, good.
Nice to have you with us, Angela.
Thank you.
- Oh, Angela, uh...
- Yes, sir?
- Uh, that's all for the moment, thank you.
- Right.
Have they traced him?
- Hmm?
- Have they traced him?
Oh, yes. Um... Yes. Lieutenant
Clifton James, Pay Corps, Leicester.
Pay Corps.
Just where you'd expect the army to put an actor.
Matthews, I'm still out on the final balance.
- I'll run the old eye over it, sir.
- Oh, terribly good of you.
You know, it's a bit of liberty putting you here in the first place.
I mean, you being an actor, you don't want to be bothered with finance.
Ah, there it is, sir.
Forgot to go with that total forward.
Oh, really? Thanks a lot.
Lieutenant James here. Yes?
Oh, James, we want you for an army film.
Could you say that again, sir?
I said we might be able to use you in one of our army training films.
Look, I'm coming through
Leicester tomorrow.
- I thought we might have a word about it.
- Could I have your name again, sir?
- Major Harvey.
- Major Harvey.
- I'll meet you tomorrow at...
- 12:30, tomorrow.
Queen's Hotel.
Could you tell me anything about the part, sir?
Hello?
- What will you have?
- Bitter, please, sir.
- Pint of bitter, large Scotch, please.
- Single only. We're rationed, you know.
- Oh.
- I've brought along some stills.
- Stills?
- Photographs.
I didn't know what you want, so I've brought a good selection, sir.
- Is this your sister?
- No.
I was Charley's Aunt there.
Must have just slipped in.
Yes. Yes, well, it's a very good collection.
You always wear the old moustache, do you?
Well, I do, but I wouldn't mind shaving it off. I mean, if the part calls for it.
Yes. Yes, of course.
- Let's sit over here, shall we?
- Of course, sir.
I, uh... I've got some cuttings here, sir.
They're mostly provincial papers.
But I always think that the local dramatic critics are tougher than the West End ones.
Yes, I'm... I'm sure. Yes.
- Cheers.
- Cheers, sir.
- You don't drink much, do you?
- No, not much.
- Now, this notice might interest you.
- Ever gone on the wagon altogether?
Well, I can do. Take it or leave it.
You know, I've often wondered whether actors need a drink.
You know, first night and things like that.
Oh, I'm usually too sick.
You get nervous, do you?
No, no, no, not more than anybody.
Get the old butterflies, you know.
Yeah, but you're in pretty good health as a rule.
Oh, yes, I think so, touch wood.
- Why? Do I look a bit...
- No, no, no. I just mentioned it.
Films cost a great deal of money. Tricky if an actor goes sick in the middle.
No... No understudy, I mean.
Oh, you needn't worry about me, sir.
I've never missed a performance yet.
Good.
Oh, I realise you can't give me an answer now, sir, but do you see me in this film?
Well, that's a little bit difficult to say just at the moment. You see, we haven't finalised the script yet.
Documentary, I suppose?
- Broadly speaking, yes.
- Is it...? Would it be a large part?
Yes, yes, it will be a very large part if it turns out the way we want it to.
Yes.
- Good Lord, is that the right time?
- I make it a quarter two.
Well, I must dash.
I'm only between trains really.
- It's been very nice, uh, seeing you.
- Are you going to take these, sir?
What?
Oh, yes, yes, jolly useful. Well...
- Hope we meet again. Goodbye.
- I hope so too, sir. Goodbye, sir.
Oh, sir!
I agree about the likeness, fantastic.
Yeah.
Well, what now?
Assuming we get the go-ahead.
Well, the first thing would be to have him posted to HQ staff, so that he could study Monty at close quarters.
Yes.
And in that case, he mustn't look like Monty or Clifton James.
- Have to disguise him in some way.
- Within reason.
It doesn't have to be plastic surgery.
Well, let's, uh, let's run through what we've got so far.
- Is he a drunk?
- Wouldn't say so.
No, but, of course, he's bound to be on his best behaviour with strangers.
- He smokes.
- Yeah, he'll have to cut that out.
What about his hair?
That's need fixing.
This is all supposing he wants to play ball.
- Oh, he'll play.
- Yes.
Now, one point.
You handle the roughing up.
I want to stay in the background for the time being.
I've got a suggestion there.
If we take the moustache off that will help a lot.
I'll carve him up so his own mother won't recognise him.
Fine.
You stand by then to receive progress reports.
- I'm going straight to the War Office.
- It's going take an awful lot of selling.
Don't worry about that.
It's just a question of deciding whose head to go over.
All right, driver.
Two lumps for me, please, Angela.
Or perhaps you think
I'm sweet enough already.
You know, you're obviously a girl who anticipates a man's needs...
I like to do my best, Major, but unfortunately at the moment we don't possess two teacups.
Uh, thank you, uh, Miss, uh...?
- Bearing.
- Bearing.
- Are you with us now?
- Yes, Major.
Miss Cook has taken her undoubted talents further down the corridor.
I am what is known as a permanent replacement.
Are you?
Yes, well, I'm sure that... that will be very nice for all of us.
Thank you, Major.
Harvey, this isn't going to be easy.
I've bulldozed them into approving it in principle but that doesn't mean a thing.
No, no, I've left there.
A jungle. Absolutely hopeless.
I'll have to jump a few paces, so keep on the phone.
Oh, by the way, there's a permanent new girl turning up.
Very efficient. She'll look after you.
Yes, well, thanks very much for...
Marvellous, Miss B! An egg too?
They're still being laid, Major, if you know where to find them.
- Any word from the Colonel?
- Uh, no, nothing yet, no.
I expect he's laying a few himself.
Uh, Miss B, you might get on to Records, will you, as soon they're awake and ask for everything they got on Montgomery.
- Photographs, biographical details...
- That's already been seen to, Major.
They're being sent round by special messenger.
Meanwhile, here's the material on Lieutenant James.
Oh, thank you.
- Who gave it that heading?
- I did, Major.
- Just a suggestion.
- Operation Hambone.
Mm, I like it, Miss B.
Extension 4-3.
One moment, Colonel. It's for you, sir.
Thank you.
Any joy?
You have? How did you manage it?
Well, I finally got to the right man.
Great. Look, you get yourself some sleep.
I'll take it from here.
Good boy. Goodbye.
Miss B?
- It's on the menu.
- What is?
That Hambone of yours.
Get on to the Pay Corps, Leicester.
Yes?
- You sent for me, sir?
- What's the explanation, James?
The mistake was in the transfer account, sir.
- I was checking it when you sent for me...
- What are you talking about?
I want to know how this character -
Harvey, is it?
- got in touch with you in the first place.
I won't have my officers going behind my back.
I'm afraid I don't quite follow you, sir.
I've just had a call from the Army
Kinematograph Unit, whatever that is, asking me to grant you seven days unofficial leave to undergo a film test.
- Now do you follow me?
- Oh, that, sir.
Coming back to you now, is it?
They did approach me about a week ago, sir, but I thought nothing would come of it.
Getting on a phone, telling me how to run this place.
You know, you want to forget you're an actor, James, and put away the bloody motley for the duration.
- Yes, sir.
- I don't like films, I don't like actors, and most of all
I don't like War Office actors.
Just because you pulled a fast one doesn't mean you're going to get away with it.
Seven days is seven days and you'll be back on the dot.
- Otherwise, I'll throw the book at you.
- Yes, sir.
- Thank you, sir.
- That's all.
Can... Can I put in for a railway warrant, sir?
- Well, don't ask me, ask the CSM.
- Yes, sir.
I'm surprised they're not sending a car for you.
That's usual, isn't it? With film stars.
- Would you wait in here, please?
- Thank you.
Well, we can be sure of one thing, he's an actor, all right.
Shall I break it to him?
I suppose so.
That's the worst part of all these schemes.
The time always comes when someone has to be let in on the secret.
All right, go ahead.
- Hello, James.
- Oh.
- How are you?
- Fine, thank you, sir.
- Good. Come and sit down.
- Thank you.
Well, how are your old nerves?
- Oh, not too bad.
- Good.
Cos I've got some rather odd news for you.
You're not going to make that film for us.
Oh, I see.
On the other hand, we're going to offer you just about the best part you've ever had or probably ever will have.
Look, before I go any further,
I, uh, I want you to read this.
It's not a contract, I'm afraid. It's an extract from the Official Secrets Act.
Just the part that matters. When you've read it, I want you to sign it.
- Finished?
- Yes. Have I...
Have I done anything wrong anywhere?
No, no, no. That's just a formality for what comes next.
Thank you.
You know, if I thought you were really a security risk, you wouldn't be here.
I've got quite a big file on you.
I know where you went to school, who your friends are, what books you read, the lot.
Oh, really?
I suppose I, um... I owe you an apology.
You see, I'm nothing to do with army films.
I'm an intelligence officer and you've just been recruited.
- What as?
- A very big noise.
You may not be God's gift to the theatre, but you've got one special talent we need very badly.
- You look like Monty.
- Oh, Monty, that one.
I only did that appearance as a gag.
Well, we're going to make that gag pay off.
You're going to act as
Monty's double before D-Day.
Well, don't look so shattered. You've done it before, you can do it again.
Only this time, you're going to play it straight and to a much bigger audience.
- But this is fantastic.
- That's right.
It so fantastic, it's going to work.
Between us, we're going to trick the Germans and, uh, probably save the lives of a lot of men.
You won't get many more of those when the job starts.
Monty doesn't use them.
That goes for drink too.
But I don't know what to say.
From now on you don't exist as
Lieutenant Clifton James of the Pay Corps.
You won't write any letters, make any private phone calls or contact anybody you know.
You'll live and sleep here.
And don't worry about your chum the adjutant, that's all taken care of.
- Can I ask you something?
- Yeah, go ahead.
Do I have to do it?
- What do you mean?
- Well, is it an order?
No, I can't say that it's an order, exactly.
But... What are you getting at?
Well, I can't stay here now.
I'm expected home.
- I mean, I...
- You want to do it, don't you?
I don't know. It's quite a thing to decide just like that.
I haven't played many big parts.
I've understudied a few, of course, but that's completely different.
- Well, James, it's up to you.
- I'll have to think about it.
Well, what have you to think about?
Absolute gift to any actor.
- My name's Logan. How do you do?
- How do you do, sir?
- I'd no idea. I mean, in Leicester...
- Don't worry about that.
You did very well.
Uh, sit down, James, sit down.
But what's happened to you now then?
I mean, this is a big opportunity for you.
You'll do it standing on your head, of course you will.
The reception you got that night in the theatre.
The audience were completely fooled from the word go!
Of course! Why, most actors would give their right arm for a chance like this.
- Both arms, most of them.
- Yes!
Hmm, I think it's rather good.
I always wanted to play a dashing juvenile.
- Sit down here, Jimmy.
- What?
You may have to sprinkle fertiliser on your upper lip a bit later on to get it back in time but right now it's perfect.
Now for the hair.
- You're not going to shave my head?
- No, no, nothing to be afraid of. Look.
Take years off you.
- All set, Miss B?
- I think so, Major.
Good.
Here you are, Jimmy, get this on.
- Oh, it's a bit tight under the arms.
- What? Well, it's not meant to fit.
You look marvellous. Do the buttons up.
I say, I feel like something out of the Boer War.
- Oh, that'll wear off by tomorrow.
- Tomorrow?
- Is that all the time I've got?
- Effective midnight tonight, you are on the strings of Monty's personal staff.
- Does he know I'm coming?
- Of course he knows you're coming.
Don't forget, when you get down there, watch him like a hawk wherever he goes.
Try and get his mannerisms, the way he walks, everything.
You can't tell me anything about understudy.
I say, look at this coat.
I mean, it's hopeless.
That's it. Yes, you're... you're fit for active service.
- Here are your documents, Corporal.
- Walker! Talking to you.
- Quite right, Miss B, keep him at it.
- AB64, driving licence, restricted area permit, headquarters permit, railway warrant and movement order.
- Portsmouth?
- That's where Monty is at the moment.
You'll travelling on the 11:30 from Leeds. to the station, hadn't we?
A car's laid on, Major, and I've had some travel rations made up.
- Come along with me, Corporal.
- Hey, don't forget this.
I say, who's going to meet me when I get down there?
A Dawson - Colonel Dawson.
Now, if you get in a jam, just go to him.
- I'm worried about the time, Major.
- Right.
Hey, Jimmy, good luck!
See you when you get back.
- Daw..?
- Dawson.
- Oh, yeah, Dawson.
- I'll be back in a moment, Major.
Come on now, lads.
Come on, lads, let's have your feet on the floor.
Hey, you, out of it!
Hey, come on, or I'll have your guts for bootlaces.
What do you think you're doing, you clumsy...
Yes, go on.
- Nothing, Sergeant.
- "Staff Sergeant" to you.
- You're the new boy, aren't you?
- Yes, Staff Sergeant.
Well, the first thing we got to do is to learn to get up in the morning, got it?
- Yes, Staff Sergeant.
- Right.
What are you staring at?
Come on, let's have you.
I'll be back in ten minutes. I want to see you washed, shaved and shined, got it?
- You ought to get a mention in Dispatches.
- Cor blimey! Did you see his face?
'Ere, what was it you called him,
Corp, a clot?
Drivers, attention!
Drivers ready for your inspection, sir!
Drivers, dismissed!
Corporal Walker...
Sir.
You'll be driving me today.
That Humber over there.
Yes, sir.
My name's Dawson.
Stay as close to the General as you can without attracting attention.
Yes, sir.
Right, Corporal, let's go.
Come on, sort 'em out, man!
What's your game, Corp?
Watch it.
Well done, Walker.
'Ere, are trying to land us in it?
- I beg your pardon?
- All this polishing lark.
Turn it up or we'll do you.
Well, even if you can't impersonate him, at least you'll be fit!
- Knock next time.
- I did knock.
Cloth ears!
- This has just arrived, Colonel.
- Oh, thank you, uh, Miss, um...
A-huh, they've given us the itinerary.
First stop Gibraltar, then on to Algiers.
- Do they mention a date?
- Yes, you leave a week today.
Oh, they've bought it with a vengeance, haven't they?
Excuse me, Colonel.
Lieutenant James is back.
Oh, fine. Show him in.
- Hello, Jimmy, how are you?
- Fine, thanks.
Bet you weren't sorry to say goodbye to Corporal Walker, eh?
Come and sit yourself down.
Dawson told us they gave you a bit of a rough time down there.
It wasn't too bad.
Well, did you get what you want?
That's the point.
I was able to study him pretty thoroughly.
And?
I don't know.
I don't know if it's going to work.
It isn't that I don't think I can imitate his voice and mannerisms.
They're more or less tricks.
I can get them all right.
It's the actual personality.
- Well, that'll come too.
- I don't know that it will.
It's one thing getting up on the stage for a couple of minutes, but I've watched him close to, seen the effect he has on people.
You're a professional actor. You learn to do it just like any other part.
Well, if you can handle Charley's Aunt,
Monty will be a cakewalk.
I know I can look like him but that isn't enough.
I've never commanded, not even a platoon, let alone an army.
There's no question of your actually commanding.
But it's got to be there, inside, the ability to, don't you see?
Now, listen, James,
I would never have asked you to do this job if I hadn't complete confidence in you as an actor.
So stop worrying.
I'd like to do it.
I liked to play Hamlet at the Old Vic, but it doesn't mean I'd be any good.
You better go and change, anyway.
I had to say it, didn't I?
Yes, that's all right, Jimmy.
Yes, well, I suppose that's better than being overconfident.
Is it? With a week to go we haven't time for any prima-donna stuff.
- I'll get him back into it.
- You'll have to do better than that.
Keep him working night and day.
Don't give him time to think.
Yes, all right, but let's give him a few hours breather.
No, start him off straight away.
Just don't give him time to think.
That's the way to tackle it.
...which is about to begin, will be one of the most important battles in... in English history.
Go on, Jimmy, go on!
It's coming, it's coming!
All that is necessary is that every officer and man... Oh, it's terrible!
It's fine, Jimmy, fine.
What school did you go to when you were 14?
- St Paul's.
- Good.
- What were you captain of?
- Rugby, First XV.
- Mm-hm.
- Do you mind?
- Thanks.
- Mm, sorry.
- What are your two favourite books?
- The Bible and, uh...
Pilgrim's Progress.
See that? Typical stance.
Uses it time and time again when he's listening to people.
Now, work on that one, Jimmy.
There you are, look. There it is again.
...did you hold at the end of the First World War?
- Captain.
- No.
- Lieutenant Colonel then.
- Mm. Not much difference, is there?
- I shall get indigestion, you know.
- That's out. Monty doesn't suffer from it.
All right, Jimmy.
Now, that's the aircraft.
Line of waiting officers - navy, army, air force.
Now, all we need's the governor's residence.
Leave that till later. Let's rehearse the arrival at Gibraltar first.
Now listen, Jimmy, point one, the
Governor won't be at the airport himself.
Instead he'll send his ADC, a Major Tennant.
- Tennant.
- Point two.
You'll be met by the Garrison Commander, in this case an Admiral.
Point three. Don't rush it.
Take your time. Make it human.
- Yes, but who else will be there?
- We've got a list.
Now, there's one man in particular...
- Carlton, Lieutenant Colonel.
- That's him, Carlton.
He served with you in South Eastern Command.
- You'd have a special word for him.
- Yes, but how will I recognise him?
- He'll be presented to you by the Admiral.
- Look, let's try it once.
- Come on, Jimmy.
- Miss B, you're Colonel Carlton.
Now, stand to attention.
Now, all set?
Now, the plane has just taxied to a stop.
The guard presents arms.
Short pause and out you come, Jimmy.
Salute.
Good.
I'm the Admiral now.
- Welcome to Gibraltar, sir.
- Glad to be back.
- Major Tennant, I believe?
- Yes, sir. Good trip, sir?
- Very smooth.
- This way, sir.
Uh, this is my Chief of Staff,
Captain Knowles.
Commander Baker. Colonel Carlton.
- Oh, nice to see you again, Carlton.
- Thank you, General.
- Bit warmer than when we last met.
- Yes, indeed, sir.
- Oh, I'm sorry, sir.
- Oh, don't apologise!
If you do that on the day, which, God forbid...
Just give him a look.
The ground will open up for him.
All right, Jimmy.
Relax for five minutes.
Harvey, I'd like a word with you.
I mean, fancy apologising.
If he's only progressed that far, well...
- He just hasn't got it, has he?
- It's just nerves.
I told them we were ready this morning.
We're obviously not.
If we send him off like this, he won't get out of the plane.
Don't let's panic.
I've got a vague idea.
It is lit.
You know, you're in a bad way.
Come and have a glass of water in your office. I think this may work.
Can't you tell me where we're going?
Jimmy, you trust me, don't you?
Well, of course, I do. Why?
And yet you won't believe me when
I tell you that you can do this show.
You think I'm just kidding you along.
Well, I'm taking you to see somebody who's going to convince you.
The only person, in fact, who really can.
Monty.
Will you say that again?
Monty's sent for you.
You see he doesn't share your lack of confidence.
He wants to tell you face to face.
- He sent for me?
- Yes.
He's got the authority, you know.
Thank you, sir.
All right, Corporal.
All right, Jimmy?
He's only flesh and blood, you know.
Come in.
Well, it's been a wonderful evening.
Pleasant change from homework.
I feel good. Really relaxed for the first time in ages.
- You hear that, Logie? Good, isn't it?
- Yes, very good.
Glad to hear it, Jimmy.
Fit for anything, eh?
- Top of the world.
- Good.
Because this is it, you're leaving tonight.
Tonight?
It's all right, Jimmy. Now, just relax.
You've got a whole hour.
- Whole... An hour? But is that all?
- Come along, Jimmy.
- But we'll never make it in time.
- Yes, we'll make it.
- I say, this feels a bit big.
- Nonsense, it's perfect.
- Why, it fits like one of mine.
- Don't go too far, Colonel.
- Here's the Major.
- Miss B.
- Sorry, Brigadier!
- Ooh, you've done all right for yourself!
I want a gold chain that goes across here, please.
What for?
You've got a wrist watch, haven't you?
Fine pair of intelligence officers. Monty always has a gold chain across his chest?
Now, don't panic, General,
I've got a chain bag.
Oh, Miss B, don't forget the handkerchiefs.
We've had some handkerchiefs done with Monty's initials on them.
- You want me to drop them, I suppose.
- I say, the boy's really caught on!
Handkerchiefs. Now, there's a key on one end and a penknife on the other.
- So don't try and tell anybody the time.
- Well, time's getting nearer.
- I'll check outside.
- Oh, Jimmy, just one thing more.
Whilst you're on the job, you'll draw
General's pay. Monty's own suggestion.
He said if James is good enough to wear my uniform, he's good enough to draw my pay.
- That's was very kind of him.
- How much does he get, by the way?
- I'm afraid I don't know.
- You're in the Pay Corps, aren't you?
Excuse me helping myself to your glasses, Colonel, but I've brought along a little something of my own, just to speed the parting guest.
I'm awfully sorry. I should have thought of that, you know.
Hey, Miss B, what's going on here?
Oh, it's quite safe - vodka.
No trace on the breath, you know.
Oh, marvellous, Miss B, marvellous!
Jimmy, Logie.
Miss B's favourite tipple, keeps it in the bathroom cupboard.
- Well, cheers, everyone!
- Cheers!
- Dosvedanya! Russian, you know.
- Polish, actually.
Delicious, isn't it?
Well, Hester, we'd better say our goodbyes here.
We shan't have an opportunity at the airport.
- Good luck, General.
- Thank you, Miss B.
Good luck, Brigadier.
Take care of yourself.
Of course I will, Miss B.
I'm all I've got.
Come on.
Chocks away!
Come on, Hester, let's go and polish off that vodka.
- How you feeling?
- All right.
Don't worry, Jimmy, they're feeling much more nervous than you are.
You're on.
Jimmy.
You're on!
Guard of honour!
Slope... arms!
Glad to have you with us, sir.
You were lucky to get here in one of those.
Oh, I don't know.
I think they're here to stay.
Do you know Harvey?
- How do you do?
- How do you do, sir?
- Major Tennant, sir.
- Yes, sir. Smooth trip, sir?
No trouble at all.
I say...
Our Chief Staff Officer, Captain Morton.
My Secretary, Commander Higgs.
Captain Brand.
Commander Blakely.
Colonel Wentworth. Colonel Carlton.
- Major Evans.
- You know, Colonel Carlton, sir.
Oh, yes, yes, Carlton. We're old friends.
- Nice to see you again, Carlton.
- Thank you, General.
We've lost a few enemies since we last met.
- Yes, indeed, sir.
- Took us a bit of time.
Got there in the end.
We haven't stopped yet.
- We'll save some for you.
- I hope so, sir.
Good.
Arms...
Thank you, gentlemen.
- Tennant.
- Sir?
Open a window.
Someone's been smoking in here.
Yes, sir.
Honour guard...
Present... arms!
Honour guard, slope arms!
- Hello, Monty. Good to see you again.
- Rusty, looking very fit.
Yes, and you too.
You have a good trip?
Excellent. Fine weather all the way.
We shan't need you for some time,
Sergeant, but you'd better stick around.
Yes, sir.
Sir?
Excuse me, sir,
I found this on the airfield.
Oh, very observant of you, Lieutenant.
I simply can't get over it.
It's really staggering.
- I'm glad you think I look the part, sir.
- How about me?
- Did I sound all right?
- Oh, yes, of course, sir.
Do you really think so?
I was as nervous as anything before you arrived. Cigarette?
I'm afraid that would be quite out of character, sir.
Oh, good Lord, yes, of course. I forgot.
You must pull me up if I make a slip like that again.
Well, would you like to have a shower and settle down in your room before...
Come in.
- Brigadier Harvey, sir.
- Ah, Harvey.
- How do you do?
- How do you do, sir?
And, Tennant, show the General to his quarters, will you?
Thank you, Rusty.
General's looking fit, sir.
You know, it's quite extraordinary.
I've known old Monty for years.
- I know exactly how you feel.
- I shall dine out on this after the war.
- Well, come along and sit down.
- Thank you, sir.
Now then, what's the form?
Well, now we've got Monty here, sir, we'd like the rumours to start in as big a way as possible.
They started days ago.
Your boys have seen to that too.
It's a small place, you know.
Well, the quicker they get to Berlin, the better, sir.
If you could think of any shortcuts, sir.
Oh, let me think.
Yes, I wonder... Come and have a look at my rogue's gallery.
- That might give you a lead.
- Right, sir.
Plenty of choice, you know.
More enemy agents perching on the Rock
- than there are monkeys.
- Well, I hope they're tamed, sir.
Oh, yes. We've got them all on the end of a chain, quite a long one, so as they can't feel it dragging.
Here they are.
Carl Nielson.
Jolly useful bloke.
We feed him no end of rubbish.
Quicker than phoning Berlin in most cases.
I wonder, sir, could you, um, stretch a point socially and invite him to Government House?
That's easy. He dines here, quite often.
How long since his last visit?
He was up here about a fortnight ago.
Perhaps it's time he made another call, sir.
Yes, not a bad idea.
Get me Mr Carl Nielson, will you?
Is it him?
- Just arrived.
- Oh, Lord.
Now, take it easy.
You'll do it in your head.
Now, just remember, speaking without thinking is like shooting without aiming.
- I read that somewhere.
- It's all right for you.
The fact is, I must ask you to treat our dinner party tonight
- in the strictest confidence.
- You intrigue me, Your Excellency.
I've got what they call a VIP staying under my roof.
He's passing through on his way to a top secret rendezvous, but in view of our friendship and the quite extraordinary contributions you've made to our cause, I felt that we could relax security for this evening.
- Of course. Who is it?
- General Montgomery.
Really? It will be delightful to see the General again.
Our last meeting was most stimulating.
Well, here we are, Monty.
A very good friend of ours, as you know.
Mr Carl Nielson, General Montgomery.
- Delighted, Mr Nielson.
- It is I who am honoured, General.
Brigadier Harvey.
How do you do?
Carl reminds me that you've met before, Monty. Carl.
Will you drink?
What will you have, sherry?
Thank you, Your Excellency.
Some of your delicious Fino.
- I'll get them, sir?
- What about you, Harvey?
- I'm all right, thank you, sir.
- And for you, sir?
- Whisky, I think.
- Right, sir.
I, uh... I thought I recognised you the moment you came in, Mr Nielson.
Didn't connect the name at first though.
I feel very flattered.
I didn't expect you to return the compliment.
I was a very humble citizen in those days.
I don't often forget a face, just trying to place where it was.
- Sir.
- Thank you.
Now...
- Where were we?
- Cheers.
- Cheers.
- Your health. General.
Remember all that fuss about the
Skofer gun? We had quite a chat about it.
I tried very hard to impress your government.
Oh, yes, the Skofer gun, not a bad weapon that.
I tried to get the War Office to test it, you may remember?
Did you, sir? Oh, yes.
Of course, in 1938, there was quite a lot of sales resistance in, uh, certain countries, if you don't mind my saying so.
Yes, I hope I didn't seem disinterested.
Not at all, you were very polite.
It was I who was rude, in trying to combine business with pleasure. An old failing of mine.
Of course, a Buckingham Palace garden party is hardly a place to try and sell guns.
Oh, no. No, quite so.
Those were happier days and let's hope they come back again soon.
Well, I know one thing, you've, both of you, come up a few places since then.
Carl's a very influential man, Monty.
And what's more, he's far from being neutral where we're concerned.
- Oh, well, shall we go in?
- Right.
Tell me, General, do you think the war's going to last much longer?
I never make prophecies, Mr Nielson.
English history is littered with enough
Generals who made the wrong guesses.
But you do see the end in sight?
The end is always in sight.
Trouble is, sometimes the enemy gets in the way.
Yes, there's no doubt about it, these thousands bomber raids must be having a devastating effect.
Don't you agree, Monty?
Hit them for six with all you got, that's always been my contention.
Uh, Carl, don't smoke your own.
Oh, forgive me, but these are something rather special.
General.
I don't use them, I'm afraid.
- Don't let me stop anybody else, please.
- No, thank you, sir.
Haven't seen one of those since before the war.
You must have a secret contact, Carl.
Well, if you'll all excuse me,
I think I'll turn in.
I have a certain amount of paperwork to get through before leaving tomorrow.
Yes, of course, Monty, I'm sorry.
But it's your own fault, you know.
- You shouldn't be such a good talker.
- Oh, General? One last favour.
Surely, what is it?
My youngster would love an autograph.
Of course, delighted.
I think we can do better than that for the young man, sir.
If you excuse me just for a moment.
Well, I don't know what Harvey's got up his sleeve, but I expect he'll take care of your boy.
- He collects autographs, does he?
- Yes, he's very keen.
Some time ago, I was able to get him Churchill's.
Yes? Yes, I used to collect stamps, once upon a time.
- Never kept it up though.
- One should never neglect a hobby.
I hope you don't mind, sir.
I remembered we had one of these.
Oh, good.
Here, I have a pen, thank you, sir.
- There we are.
- Thank you, sir.
Oh, thank you. My boy will be thrilled.
- Goodnight, General.
- Goodnight, Mr Nielson.
- Goodnight, Brigadier.
- Goodnight.
Thank you, Your Excellency.
It's been a memorable evening.
Yes, it has indeed.
Well...
- You saved the day then, all right.
- Me?
What about you and your ruddy Skofer gun.
I was ready to jump out of the window.
Do you think he bought it?
I don't know.
He's a pretty smooth customer.
Come on, Jimmy.
You deserve a good night's rest.
We've got an early start in the morning.
Sir, just had a radio message. Two
German fighters milling about somewhere.
Routine stuff. They have been engaged.
- Right. Thank you, Flight Lieutenant.
- Sir.
- Well, they've got a good day for it.
- Yes, sir.
- Hey, Skipper, we're in luck.
- You don't have to tell me.
I said we were in luck.
Bandits heading for home, chased by our gallant comrades.
- On the level?
- Yeah, panic over.
We're now taking reservations for dinner.
Good.
Bit of a false alarm, sir.
- Apparently, it's all clear now.
- Glad to hear it.
Flight Lieutenant,
I don't want to contradict you,
- but is that anything to worry about?
- Excuse me, sir.
- What's that, sir?
- That.
I'll just check, sir.
There's something coming in, Skip.
- Looks like he's bought it.
- Think he wants to know, Skipper?
The clot's turning in.
He's still coming on!
I haven't got the speed!
He can't pull up.
He's not going to make it!
Well, it proves one thing,
Berlin swallowed the bait all right.
- Well, that's what we want, isn't it?
- Yes, afraid it is.
Slope... arms!
Here you are, sir.
Okay?
- Ready for act two?
- Fit for anything.
Just follow me, Harvey, and you won't get hurt.
All right, now, you guys, listen.
Your job is to escort
General Montgomery to Allied HQ and to make sure that he gets there, period!
We've a tip-off enemy agents are looking out for him, so it's up to you.
A word of encouragement, if anything should happen to the General, every last one of you will be court-martialled, period!
Squad, 'ten!
Hello, sir. This way, sir.
Squad, fall out, on the double!
Okay, boys!
What's going on, Corporal?
Don't worry, sir, we're carrying out safety precautions.
That was quite a ride you chaps gave me.
Sorry about that, sir.
Couldn't take any chances.
Period.
Excuse me, sir, this way.
Ah, there you are.
Yes, they told me the plane had got in.
Have trouble with the Customs or something?
- He's pleased to see us.
- You can tell.
How are you, sir?
What dragged you away from home, run out of cigarettes?
No. I can offer you one, if you like.
- Not in front of me, Logan.
- What?
Quite right, you keep yourself in check, we have to.
Both flushed with success, I see.
Very dangerous state of mind.
Sit down, Jimmy.
- Thank you, sir.
- I...
I suppose you've come all this way to tell us they've called it off, eh?
Quite the reverse. It's going over big.
- It is?
- Bigger than anyone ever expected.
I've been sent to broaden things out still further.
- I hope you're both feeling fit.
- Well, it depends what you've got in mind.
Well, a whistle-stop tour of North Africa, inspecting troops, the lot.
By the time you've finished,
Jerry's really going to believe that something's up.
When do we start?
You're leaving tonight.
Tonight?
Look, I don't know about Jimmy, but I could do with a breather.
Well, you're not going to get it,
I'm afraid.
Monty's due to address a meeting of Staff Officers here in exactly two hours' time.
Thanks for telling me.
Have I got to say all this?
Yes, really, it's all typed out for you.
The Allied forces will be present and, what's more, the Americans will be there.
So a wrong word could be politically explosive as well.
What are you trying to do, build up his confidence?
No deviations, Jimmy, it's got to be exactly as written.
But this is a three-act play.
All right. Okay.
- Hey, Mac, no smoking.
- Huh?
Orders from the General, no smoking.
All right.
- Well, very good house.
- I should think so, nobody's paying.
Cosmopolitan bunch.
I've seen one or two already that look like security risks.
- Yes, I spotted one too.
- Really? Where?
Standing to one side, British Colonel, wearing his Sam Browne belt the wrong way round.
Better keep an eye on him. Where?
Right!
Let me have your attention.
This meeting is to be treated as top secret.
Our distinguished visitor is here for an obvious reason.
Now, let's make sure that reason stays in the family.
There's no necessity for me to introduce him by name, because you're all going to find his face very familiar.
That's all.
Yeah, yeah. Okay, let's take-off.
Good afternoon, gentlemen.
- Can you all hear me at the back?
- No!
Very well, I'll speak up then.
How is that?
We all know, we all have a pretty good idea, why we're gathered here today.
Very soon we're going to send out invitations... to a party... uh, to a party we're going to throw.
These invitations are going out on a large scale, a very large scale.
We have the fine young men...
Can you all hear me clearly?
Seeing your faces reminds me of some of the stories that were going the rounds a short time back.
What's he blurbing about?
That's not in the script.
- He's forgotten his lines.
- One of them I remember was, that it took no time at all to train the American army because you only have to train them to go one way.
Another, that the English were prepared to fight to the last American.
I agree with you, they're rotten stories.
And I'm delighted you didn't laugh.
They implied that we're on different sides, we're fighting separate wars.
We're not. We're in the same war... and we're in it together to the finish.
Hear, hear.
We may wear different uniforms and some of us don't draw as much pay, and that applies right the way to the top.
I can speak with some authority.
I see that found its mark.
Of course, we don't always see eye to eye.
We can't expect you to understand anything about cricket.
And it goes without saying that baseball remains to us one of the unexplained mysteries.
I remember an American colleague once inquiring if I'd seen a certain "pitcher".
I thought he was asking me about a new film.
That's the sort of thing that could lead to an international incident.
Because, as we all know, we both take our sport more seriously than we do war.
Hear, hear!
But whatever our material differences, we share one common belief, and that is that freedom is worth fighting for.
Hear, hear!
I hope you get to the coming party and I hope you to live to talk about it and make sure the invitations never go out again.
If you'll excuse an American expression,
"Let's make it heaven, hell or Hoboken by Christmas!"
How much further, Sarge?
We'll be back at headquarters within the hour, sir.
Good.
- Keep going, Sergeant!
- Right, sir.
Well, it was a mine.
Whether it was planted or merely a stray, we'll never know.
Anyway, that's beside the point.
As far as you're concerned, Jimmy, the show is virtually over.
Over? Is that official?
I'll have to wait for confirmation from
London but barring the shouting, yes.
And what then?
We're putting you into solitary, more or less.
But I've made sure that the cell is comfortable and you'll have that old lag Harvey for company.
And after that?
Back to Corporal Walker.
A troop ship from Alex and home via the back door.
And then the Pay Corps.
Ah, well, any time.
Always open to offers.
At least I shan't have to pay anybody ten percent.
Okay, Jimmy, I'll drive you up, eh?
Goodbye, sir.
Cheerio.
That's the place, Jimmy.
You'd never know there's a war on.
Thank you, sir.
Open up!
Thought there was something odd.
This ruddy thing's three months' old.
Just about suits my mood.
Any news from HQ?
Nothing official.
Do you know something?
Yeah.
I don't see why I can't tell you.
The old man got definite word through today.
The Germans have held back 60,000 men and one Panzer division in the south.
- Is that because of us?
- Directly because of us.
Or, rather, because of you.
Not bad for an amateur.
Right.
Second relief, take post!
Message from HQ for Brigadier Harvey.
Very good, sir.
Squad commander!
Excuse me, sir.
Message for the Brigadier.
Thank you, Adams.
- Brought up from the gate, sir.
- Mm-hm.
- All right, thank you.
- Sir.
Anything important?
Don't know. The old man wants me down in town.
Never mind, a young chap like you should get out a bit more.
- You'll be all right, yeah?
- I won't stir.
Don't relax too much. He might have thought up an epilogue. See you later.
Can I get you anything, sir?
No, thank you, Sergeant.
Very good, sir.
- Adams.
- Sir?
I expect you're surprised at finding me like this.
No, sir.
I got all the confidential jobs, sir.
I think the general feeling is that Adam's cooking's not so hot, but his security's 100 percent.
If that's the case, perhaps security wouldn't mind if you had a drink with me.
- I hate drinking alone.
- Thank you very much, sir.
- Where will I find Colonel Logan?
- You might try the officer's mess, sir.
Did he leave a message for me -
Brigadier Harvey?
- Not that I know of, sir.
- Thanks.
Well, hi there! Hi!
Let me buy you a drink.
Hello. Seen Logan?
I've got a date with him.
- Oh, you've got yourself a long wait.
- Why? Is he out?
Well, I wouldn't put it as strong as that.
He got slightly cut.
Boy, can he hold it.
I put him to bed about an hour ago.
Did he mention sending for me?
I got a message up at the villa.
No, he never mentioned it.
Hey, something wrong?
Operator?
Get me Jupiter 4-0.
What's going on?
What?
Are you quite sure?
Well, keep trying.
Line's dead. Now, look... get Logan and tell him exactly what I told you.
I'm going back to the villa.
- Hey, you.
- Sir?
- Get in this car.
- Well, I've just...
- Get in the car!
- I've just come off duty, sir.
- Well, I've just put you on again.
- Could I ask what for, sir?
Get in!
Remember that?
Remember it, I was in it.
Don't tell me you were a pro?
Only one thing stopped me from having a great musical comedy career.
Talent.
It doesn't matter what we find when we get there, keep your mouth shut.
Right, sir.
What's your name, by the way?
Butterfield, sir.
Bill?
Where's that door to? I going to need it in a minute. Do you know?
- Oh, it's up here.
- Oh! Why didn't you tell me so before?
Good thing that didn't happen the night you appeared.
Coo, yes, sir.
I've got some old stage photos and press cuttings in my room, sir.
- Don't know if you'd care to see them?
- Yes, I'd like to.
I'll get 'em.
- Shouldn't there be a guard, sir?
- Shut up!
The Colonel says to the General that he will be treated in accordance with international law.
He wishes to interrogate you.
I will answer precisely two questions.
My name and my rank.
The Colonel says you will soon be in German-occupied territory where you will be meeting an old friend of yours, Feldmarschall Rommel.
Get off! Get away!
Go on, get out of here!
Come on!
Okay.
They're leaving the hut. Make for the open beach. We want clear targets.
- They're coming, sir.
- How many are there?
- Looks like half a dozen.
- Right.
Better get started.
- When I shout, hit the deck.
- Right, sir.
They'll spot our uniforms, sir.
It's possible.
They're getting very close, sir.
They're getting bloody close.
Wait for the word.
Jimmy, get down!
Is he dead?
No, his heart's beating like a sledgehammer.
Oh, better late than never, I suppose.
D-Day plus one.
Under cover of constant sea and air support,
the build-up goes on.
From hundreds of landing craft, wave after wave of troops pour ashore.
A bridgehead, now extending over 15 miles,
is being consolidated as the German defences continue to crumble.
Troops on the beach were confronted by a familiar figure.
Wearing his famous beret and fur-lined coat,
General Montgomery was there to see for himself.
Why don't you watch were you're going?
Who do you think you are?
Yes, who do you think you are - Monty?
Oh, I see!
Get up!
Go on!
Get up! Get up!
Get up!
Get up! Get up!
- Shall we have 'em out, Tom?
- Yeah.
I'm obliged to ask you to lighten the load up the hill.
I think you'll have some slight difficulty in... waking my companion.
Sir? Sir!
Wake up, if you'd be so kind, sir.
No breakfast for me. I never take breakfast.
Breakfast?
We're a long way from Dover yet, sir.
Then what the devil's happening?
We are mud-bound, sir, and have been asked to lighten the load.
Ah.
Then it shall be lightened.
A little help for hard-working horses is a worthy cause to one who detests work as much as I do.
Indeed, sir. For a man of business like myself, it would be a matter of serious disability.
Er, no. I thank you.
Ho! Away!
- You, I presume, are not a man of business.
- Business? Lord love you, no, sir.
Nothing nearly so respectable.
But you need have no cause for alarm.
- If I were the robber you now suspect...
- No, no.
.. is it likely that I should be travelling unattended to the assizes?
Ah! The assizes. You are a lion of the law?
A lion? You flatter me, sir.
I'm a jackal rendering service to a far better-fed lion than I shall ever become.
When one is born without energy...
Whoa there!
- What do you say?
- It's an 'orse coming up at a canter.
I say 'orse coming up at a gallop, Tom.
Gentlemen, in the King's name. Both of you.
It will be useless, I fear, to assure you this is no partner of mine.
Whoa there!
You! Stand or I shall fire
Is that the Dover Mail?
Why do you want to know?
Have you got a passenger -
Mr Jarvis Lorry?
No. Carton. Sydney Carton is my name.
I am Jarvis Lorry. Who wants me?
It's Jerry, master. Jerry Cruncher.
I've got an urgent despatch for you from T and Company.
I know this messenger well, guard.
There's nothing to fear.
I belong to Tellson's Bank in London.
I'm going to Paris on business.
- Wait. A crown for a drink.
- Hello, you!
- Yes?
- Come on at footpace.
If you're wearing a pistol don't let me see your hand go near it
Whoa.
Here, there, master.
Wait at Dover for Mam'selle.
Huh!
Recalled to life.
Beg pardon, sir?
That will serve for my answer.
- Recalled to life.
- It's a blazin' strange answer.
Take back that message. They will know
I received this as well as if I wrote myself.
Good night, Jerry.
Good night, sir.
Recalled to life.
Come on.
That was indeed a blazing strange answer.
Whoa! Away there!
Go on! Get up!
Morning, sir.
Morning.
I want a bedroom and a barber.
- Yes, Mr Lorry.
- If you please.
I wish accommodation to be prepared also for a young lady.
- A Miss Manette.
- Yes Mr Lorry
She will be arriving by the evening Mail.
I'll have rooms prepared.
And for you, sir?
- Nothing at all, apart from a bowl of punch.
- No bed, sir?
I seldom keep awake long enough to reach my bed.
Nor, alas, can I look forward to the pleasure of being joined by a young lady.
You are travelling home to France,
Miss Manette?
- I'm going to Paris.
- Oh.
But England has long been my home.
You know this country well?
I used to come here often before the war.
It's a pleasure to be able to travel freely again
I fear this is my destination.
Oh.
How very rude.
May I hope we shall meet again?
- Perhaps on the packet ship tomorrow.
- Get up there
It would be a pleasure to me, Mr Darnay.
There goes an evil-minded blackguard, if ever I saw one.
Who? Mr Darnay?
Oh, I thought he was a most agreeable gentleman.
No, not your Mr Darnay. The other one.
I might have known you'd have eyes for nobody else.
Ah!
There you are, Sydney. Have you done yet?
There.
Mm-hm.
Yes. You've had your bottle, I perceive.
Two tonight.
I dined with our client.
Or rather, I watched him dine. It's all one.
You were very sound in the matter of those Crown witnesses today.
- I'm always sound.
- I don't deny it.
If to your talent you would only add purpose and energy.
Pray, spare me your favourite example of the man I might have been.
You cannot blind yourself to the truth.
We began level at school.
Even then I did your exercises for you, and seldom my own.
Whose fault was that?
It was your fault my dear Stryver
It's been in your nature always to be driving and riving and pressing and shouldering to such a restless degree, that I had no chance in my own life but in rest and repose.
Is that the Mail I hear?
It is. If I may point a moral, Sydney...
Oh! Hello!
Hello! What a charming creature.
Look, Sydney.
Here
Most picturesque.
How say you?
Oh come Sydney show some taste for once
Isn't she truly delightful?
A pretty little doll.
Sydney, if you were a fellow of any sensitiveness, any delicacy...
Oh, but then I know you never mean half you say.
A pretty little doll, indeed!
I'm not sure, Miss Manette, how much you have learned already from the bank about this affair.
Miss Manette, when your father married the English lady who was your mother,
I, on behalf of Tellson's Bank, was one of the trustees.
Your father, like many other French gentlemen, left his affairs entirely in Tellson's hands.
Please understand that I handled this matter as a man of business, and therefore a man without sentiment.
A mere machine
I am still waiting for you to begin, sir.
Yes. Yes, I'm going to.
I find it very difficult to relate this story to you in such a way that you will be able to bear the hearing of it.
I can bear anything, sir, rather than the insecurity in which you leave me at the moment.
You speak collectedly.
That's good.
This story is incomplete.
It relies largely on some information we have received from a man named Defarge, who was formerly your father's servant.
According to this man Defarge, it appears that one night, some eighteen years ago, your father, Dr Manette, was returning home late after attending a case in Paris, when he received an urgent summons to the country home of a certain nobleman.
The patient was a young peasant girl
The doctor found her suffering from a high fever of the brain
To keep her quiet
she had been gagged and tied with sashes and scarves
No-one considered that she might suffocate
In fact it would not have shortened her life by much if she had
For although Dr Manette was able to ease her last hours
she died that same day
from the violence she had suffered in body and mind
Nor was she the only victim of that young nobleman
In the stables was a boy of seventeen her brother
He was dying from a sword wound
It was while Dr Manette was attending him
that he heard the full story from the servant a man by the name of Gabelle
They were a family of four, my master's tenants.
Which means that nothing they possessed was their own, not even their bodies.
The law allows the father no right to resist a claim on his daughter, but their father resisted.
You're perhaps aware that these nobles have the right to harness their tenant to a cart and drive him like a horse or dog!
That's what happened to their father.
This boy was set on revenge but my master's a skilful swordsman
- Doctor!
- Yes. Yes, my poor fellow, I'm a doctor.
Lie quiet, now. Let me see to this.
- My sister?
- I've seen your sister.
She is... at peace now.
My other sister.
All alone.
There's a second sister.
Only fifteen, God help her.
Who told you to bring the doctor here?
Erm, Monseigneur, the boy is suffering so much,
- I thought perhaps...
- Get out!
Doctor, you were not summoned here to listen to the babblings of this hind.
You...
You promise?
This boy is dead.
You may forget these serfs.
I wish to impress upon you, Doctor, that the things you have seen and heard are not to be spoken of.
You would do well to mark that
Dr Manette had a conscience which would not allow him to heed that warning
He decided it was his duty to write a report of these events to the Minister
This action he confided only to his servant Defarge
I'm telling you this, Defarge, because
I know what influence these nobles have.
Should I be prevented from keeping my promise to that boy...
- It will be carried out.
- His last concern was for his younger sister.
She is now alone and unprotected.
I promised him I would do my best to save her from the sport of that gallant gentleman.
- My parents... in our village...
- She would be safe there, I think.
Safe as any child of the people may expect to be in this France of ours.
Then tomorrow, Defarge, you will see to it.
I must go to my patient.
He went out of the door.
He never came back.
Murdered?
No, Miss Manette.
That was not his fate.
What, then, was the manner of his death?
Miss Manette, Miss Lucie, all this time we have had no word of what befell him after he passed through that door.
We could only conjecture.
We never dared to hope.
And now, after eighteen years, he has been found.
He is alive. Greatly changed, no doubt, but who would not be after all those years in that vilest of prisons?
The Bastille?
But he is alive, and free.
His old servant is taking care of him, that same Defarge.
He later married the girl that he had protected, and they now keep a wine shop in Paris.
It is there we are going tomorrow.
Oh, Mr Darnay!
Madam?
You are not Mr Darnay.
- Mr Carton.
- I'm so sorry.
But at your service, nevertheless.
I do beg your pardon, sir. I was under the impression that you were someone else.
Would that I were!
Providing always that my awakening was graced by so charming a lady.
Oh, come away! The man's not yet sober.
TWO such charming ladies.
Ah, you are ready.
- Where is that porter? Porter!
- Coming sir
I've been to the sea.
Our crossing should be tolerable.
At last. And the lady's baggage.
Oh, the good fortune of some gentlemen, to be bound for France with a fair lady for escort.
We are travelling to Paris, sir, on a matter of business.
I see.
Then may I wish you an agreeable voyage?
And you, sir, an agreeable business trip.
Goodbye, Prossie. Have a good journey home.
Yes.
Perhaps... perhaps I may offer you a small consolation, madam, for the disappointment of being left behind.
Disappointment? If ever it was intended that I should cross salt water, do you suppose Providence would have cast my lot on an island?
What a strange prejudice.
France has so much to commend her.
Hey!
One cask only.
One only Monsieur Defarge
Even that is more than they have the money to buy.
Ah, the people will soon forget the very taste of wine.
Many of them have forgotten it already.
Aye, we taste nothing but black bread and death.
We'd do well to bolt the door.
Once the tiger's tasted blood...
Tiger? Poor, crazed cattle.
Enough, Gaspard!
Your pardon, Monsieur.
Strangers are rare in this quarter.
I think you're looking for me.
Ernest Defarge.
My name is Mr Lorry. This is Miss Manette.
Miss Lucie.
My wife.
You'll have forgotten me, I think.
Follow me closely.
I'm afraid of it.
Of "it"? What?
Of him.
Of my father.
Good day.
Still hard at work, I see.
Yes, sir. I'm working.
We have a visitor today
Show Monsieur that shoe you are working at.
Take it, Monsieur.
Now, tell Monsieur what kind of shoe it is, and the maker's name.
It's a lady's shoe.
And the maker's name?
Er...
105 North Tower.
Is that all the name you have?
Mm. Er...
105 North Tower.
Monsieur Manette, do you remember nothing of me?
Do you remember nothing of this man?
Look at him.
Look at me
Is there nothing rising in your mind?
You recognised him, Monsieur?
Yes. Just for a moment. I thought at first it was hopeless, but just for a moment...
Shh...
Back
What is this?
You're the jailer's daughter?
Who are you?
Oh, my dear. Soon you shall know my name.
All you need to understand now is that your agony is over.
I have come to take you away.
Away from France to peace...
.. and rest.
Good gentlemen, he understands.
Thank God.
Good morning. Is Miss Lucie at home?
No, she's out walking with her father.
- How is Dr Manette?
- Progressing. How else with such a daughter?
- He even talks of starting up in practice again.
- She's very devoted.
Well, you'd better come in.
Miss Pross,
I have come here to ask certain questions of you, as well as Miss Lucie.
- Of me?
- Do you recall a certain gentleman who talked with Miss Lucie in the Dover Mail when you brought her to meet me?
What if I do? He was respectable enough.
Quite. I agree.
He happens to be a client of mine.
- Mr Darnay?
- Charles Darnay.
Now, do you also recall another passenger in the coach?
Another foreigner?
A man named Barsad?
There was an evil-looking ruffian who never opened his ugly mouth.
- Seated beside Mr Darnay?
- Yes, he was.
Good. That is the evidence we want.
What's all this about?
I'm afraid, Miss Pross, my client finds himself in grave trouble.
He appears to be the victim of a pernicious plot engineered, I am sure, by this man Barsad.
What do you want?
There's a Monsieur Barsad here to see you.
Ah. Send him in.
- Oh, Father, I hate him.
- I know, child. I know.
But as long as they have these rights, you know what it means to resist.
If only Monsieur Charles would come back.
And he's already in prison?
Newgate. Awaiting his trial.
Eating and sleeping with the scum of the streets.
Excellent.
A nobleman condemned to live with cattle.
My cousin would at last begin to appreciate the benefits of our own good French system.
Ah, my dear friend.
Miss Lucie.
And Dr Manette.
Mr Lorry, I'm very concerned to hear from
Miss Pross about our friend in the Dover Mail.
Charles Darnay. Yes.
A bad business.
He's to appear at the Old Bailey next week.
What is the charge against him?
He is accused of being in possession of secret papers on naval matters, which he is said to have been taking to France.
A spy?
But I don't believe it!
Nor I. I'm sure those papers were planted on his person without his knowledge.
I have engaged a very able counsel for his defence.
A man named Stryver.
Now, this gentleman wishes me to ask you if you would be willing to appear in court in Mr Darnay's defence.
- Willingly.
- Good.
And I shall arrange for you to be escorted there by a messenger of the bank.
Flowers, lady! Flowers.
Swam ashore from the hulks.
Be a long time before he takes a bath again.
Don't, my precious. Lead on, you wretch.
If we haven't caught jail fever already!
I'm getting you there as quick as I can.
Might as well enjoy the fun while you're...
Ooh! Here!
Here's something to make you laugh.
- I don't know what he's done, but I'll bet he's...
- Body snatching.
Here. This way, ladies. This way.
Make way, there.
Witnesses. Witnesses. Make way.
- Out of the way!
- Follow me, ladies.
Oh. Oh, no. We're too late.
We'll have to wait till the prisoners go by
Which one's your treason, miss?
Ooh. Good-looking young fellow.
Shame innit what he'll look like soon!
Hold your tongue!
- What will they do to him?
- No, ladybird, no.
What will they do to him if he's found guilty?
Oh... Well, seeing as how it's treason, he'll be drawn on a hurdle and half-hanged.
Then he'll be taken down and sliced before his own face.
His insides will be taken out and burnt while he looks on
His head will be chopped off and he'll be cut up into quarters. That's the sentence.
It won't happen, precious. It won't.
We know he's innocent.
MISS PROSS: Oh, for goodness' sake, get us out of this place.
- Allow me.
- Oh, Mr... Carton.
The same. A new ache here, of course, but in all other respects, the same.
Follow me closely.
I'm looking after these ladies, sir.
Heaven help them.
That is what we call the Tyburn Mail.
A vehicle in which, my friends assure me,
I shall one day have the pleasure of travelling.
It's a false assumption.
I live by crime in what is not only the easiest but quite the safest way.
This is where you'll go in.
Mr Lorry will join you once he and Stryver have completed their business.
Mr Carton, are you acquainted with our case?
I am part of your case.
Where the great Stryver goes, there follows his jackal.
I did not know.
Mr Carton!
Please, you will do your best for Mr Darnay?
After such a request, I shall be doubly industrious on his behalf.
Had you any motive, Mr Barsad, apart from your sense of duty to your adopted country?
Had you any motive for denouncing the prisoner?
No, sir. None at all.
And you were not actuated by any thought of gain?
Certainly not
I did only what I thought was right
If I'm offered any reward,
I shall decline to take it.
Mr Barsad, what first caused you to suspect the prisoner of being a spy?
The way he was talking.
You are sufficiently experienced in the ways of spies to detect one from his conversation?
Perhaps I am a little sharper than most people.
No doubt.
So it was on account of his conversation that you decided to get out
- and follow him when he alighted?
- It was.
As a result of which you saw him handed certain papers
by a certain mysterious stranger?
- I did.
- You had never seen these papers before?
How could I?
These papers had never previously been in your own possession?
I don't know what you're talking about.
I am suggesting you acquired these papers for yourself some time previously, and, in the darkness of the coach,
- you transferred them to the person...
- It's a lie.
.. transferred them to the person of the man who now stands there in the dock, falsely accused to satisfy your own greed for enrichment.
It's a lie, I say. A foul lie.
Those papers were given to him in the dockyard, and I wasn't the only one that saw it.
I've said I've no wish for any reward
Miss Manette, we have heard some evidence as to your conversation with the prisoner in the Dover Mail.
Is there anything of which we have not heard?
It is impossible, sir, to recall every word.
Impossible... or inconvenient?
I will endeavour to refresh your memory!
Did you and the prisoner hold a discussion about the recent war with America?
- Yes, we did.
- Speak up please!
Now that I have recalled your mind to that event, perhaps you can tell us what was said about the war with America.
The gentleman tried to explain to me...
- Do you mean the prisoner?
- Yes, my lord.
Then say "the prisoner".
The... the prisoner tried to explain to me how that quarrel had arisen.
He said...
Yes?
He said that it was a wrong and foolish one on the part of England.
Silence!
Anything else?
He added...
There was no harm in the way he said it.
It was said laughingly to beguile the time.
What did he add?
He added that he thought perhaps George Washington might make as great a name in history as George lll.
Silence!
Thank you Miss Manette
Officer, look to that young lady.
Take her outside See she gets some fresh air
Have we your permission to continue, Mr Carton?
Yes, my lord.
That, Mr Cly, was the only time you ever saw the prisoner? In the dockyard?
Until today. I see the other party hand him the papers, secret, like, and I says to myself, "Hello," I says.
Never mind what you said to yourself.
Would it surprise you to learn that the prisoner has never been near the dockyard
- in Dover?
- What a wicked lie.
Look at him now and tell me if you're quite sure he was the man you saw.
That's him sir
You're absolutely certain that it was the prisoner?
I am, sir.
Have you ever seen anyone sufficiently like the prisoner for you to be mistaken?
Not as I recall, sir.
Look well upon this gentleman, my learned friend here.
Stand up, Sydney. Let the witness see you.
That's right.
Remove your wig.
Now look well upon the prisoner.
How say you? Do you detect some resemblance between these gentlemen?
There is a likeness.
When I now reveal that my learned friend was in fact in Dover on the day in question
would you not agree that you might have seen him there
and mistaken him for the prisoner?
Am I to take it, Mr Stryver, that we shall next have to try Mr Carton for treason?
I trust not, my lord.
I seek only to illustrate my contention
that the prisoner is no more memorable by virtue of his appearance
than many others of his age
Thank you Sydney
Whatever the verdict, I must congratulate you on a most able defence.
I have done my best, sir, and my best is as good as another man's, I believe.
Is nobody going to say "much better"?
It was on the tip of my tongue.
Now, Sydney. Most impudent fellow, sir, to have for one's junior. Oh, pardon me.
How is Miss Manette?
The better for being out of that court.
The prisoner is distressed to have caused you so much... agitation.
Did you see Mr Darnay?
He asked me to tell you that with his fervent apologies.
Will you be seeing him again?
I would so much like to ask his forgiveness.
For neglecting to commit perjury?
It's a grave failing in a witness.
Let us hope you'll be able to express your own regrets to him.
If I might...
What does Mr Darnay expect?
The worst.
It's the wisest thing to expect, and the likeliest.
The jury is coming back.
- Have you reached a verdict?
- We have.
How say you?
Do you find the prisoner guilty or not guilty?
Not guilty
Silence! The prisoner is discharged
I am only just beginning to feel that I belong to this world again.
It must be an immense satisfaction to you.
As to me, the greatest desire I have... is to forget that I belong to it.
It has no good in it for me, except wine like this, nor I for it.
So we're not much alike in that particular.
Indeed, I begin to think we're not much alike in any particular, you and I.
I am glad the jury thought otherwise.
I believe it was our likeness which turned the scale against Barsad.
Barsad's a dangerous fellow.
You must be on your guard against him.
Ha. I don't think he'll dare denounce me again.
Nor anyone else.
You've deprived him of a very good living.
Then perhaps my ordeal was worthwhile.
Don't take this too lightly, my friend.
One acquittal usually means ruin for a common informer.
Mr Barsad will have to take his revenge quickly, then.
I leave in a few days for France.
No doubt you'll soon be back.
Does this country not hold a certain irresistible attraction for you?
Why don't you call a health, Mr Darnay?
Why don't you give your toast?
What toast?
It's on the tip of your tongue.
It ought to be.
It must be.
I'll swear it's there.
Miss Manette, then.
Miss Manette, then.
That's a fair young lady to hand to her coach in the dark, Mr Darnay.
A fair young lady to be pitied by and wept for by.
Is it worth being tried for one's life to be the object of so much sympathy and compassion, Mr Darnay?
You puzzle me, Mr Carton.
I probably owe my life to you, yet it now becomes apparent that you have no liking at all for me.
There is nothing in your dislike of me to prevent my calling the reckoning?
No. Do you call the whole reckoning?
- Certainly.
- Then, drawer, bring me another bottle.
Good night.
Why should I like a man because he resembles me?
There's nothing in me to like.
I am a disappointed drudge, sir.
I care for no man on earth.
And no man on earth cares for me.
Aaargh!
What has gone wrong?
Pardon Monsieur le Marquis It's a child
Why is he making that abominable noise?
Is it his child?
It is a pity. Yes.
He's dead! He's dead!
You killed him!
It is extraordinary that you people cannot take better care of your children.
Take that.
He's dead!
They've killed him.
I know. I saw it all.
Be brave, my Gaspard.
Who threw that?
You dogs! I would ride over all of you willingly and exterminate you from the earth.
- Drive on!
- Giddy-up there!
Ah.
There he is, fresh from his English jail.
Charles.
My cousin Charles, Monsieur Foulon.
- My respects.
- Your cousin has been telling me about you.
A young man with strange views, eh?
I think perhaps he has seen fit to moderate those views after his recent taste of the system in England.
To me it's preposterous that this is a farming estate, yet there isn't one single family in the village out there which has even bread to eat tonight.
Let them eat grass.
That's what I always say. Let them eat grass.
Judging from your recent conversation, you do not appear to have learnt very much from your little lesson.
You speak as if my misadventure in England was not entirely chance.
I warned you, my friend.
I will not tolerate the spreading of disaffection among my tenants.
You needn't concern yourself any more on that account.
I am here only to collect my few small belongings.
After which you'll see no more of me
You will forgive my idle curiosity, but how do you graciously intend to live?
I must do what the noblest of my countrymen may have to do one day.
- Work.
- In England for instance?
Yes, in England.
With a name as hated as ours,
France holds nothing for me.
In England I have another name
You may as well know now, my visit there was for the express purpose of planning my future life.
We must not keep you from her a moment longer than necessary.
Goodbye, sir.
Goodbye.
Drive him fast... to his tomb.
- He's here again.
- Who is?
A man has been frightening Prossie for the past few weeks.
He appears to haunt this street.
A drunken man.
He pretends to be drunk, but how do we know he really is drunk?
Your father's a Frenchy, and these Frenchies with all their spies...
Let me look.
Ah.
I wanted to... Doctor, come quick.
I'll come at once Mr Miller
You run on back. Have some water on the boil.
I'll walk with him, keep an eye on him, just in case.
- That drunkard's gone.
- Don't wait up for me. Good night, my darling.
Good night, Miss Pross.
Doctor.
I've been awaiting an opportunity to ask if I might come and see you in private.
You're ill, Charles?
No, sir. It's not my health.
Ah.
Then if it's what I think, come before I take surgery in the morning.
Thank you, sir.
I appreciate your understanding.
If you ask me, he's hiding behind that tree.
There! He moved I knew it
He's very intoxicated.
Why should a drunken man trouble to hide himself from the doctor, miss?
- Stop. It may be a trap.
- I can't, Prossie. He's hurt.
It's Mr Carton.
That'll cause more worry for us.
He's hurt his head.
Lucie.
Beautiful Lucie.
Mr Carton, can you walk?
Just a little way.
Help me, Prossie.
Oh!
Leave him be, I say. Disreputable sot.
What's he up to here?
That's what I want to know.
Frightening us out of our wits and falling about all over our street.
This way, Mr Carton.
Carefully.
Down here.
My humble pardon.
I never intended to venture into this house.
Will you be so good as to brew a pot of coffee?
I'll not leave you with a man in his state.
Nonsense.
I wouldn't touch a hair of her head.
Of course not.
It's a very bad bruise. I must bathe it.
And then some ointment.
- I'm not worthy of your kindness.
- Oh, it's not much to do.
Mr Carton, do you reside hereabouts?
Miss Pross believes that she has frequently seen you.
I come here every night.
Every night?
Here?
To be near you.
I get drunk.
Must be near you.
My pardon.
I alarm you.
There's... no necessity to be alarmed.
I love you.
No harm to it.
Never ask any return
I did not know.
Why should you?
It's ridiculous.
A beautiful girl, sweet and beautiful.
No-good, drunken waster.
Do you know what?
Head back.
If you said, "Return that man's love... "
Ridiculous.
But if you said that,
I wouldn't let you.
No, I wouldn't let you.
I'd only drag you down into... misery and disgrace.
Why am I telling you all this?
I never meant to speak of it
Now that I know, is there not some way in which I may help you?
None. Hopeless.
When I first saw you,
I... I thought...
Just... just for a moment,
I thought...
I knew then.
I tried not to think of it again.
It's hopeless.
Too late to start again and strive again.
But you can! You're young
Too late. A dream, all a dream, ends in nothing.
But a beautiful dream.
You inspire it
And have I no power for good with you?
No power at all?
Keep my secret.
Never share it.
Never forget it.
You promise?
That I promise.
Willingly.
That's all I need.
All I ask. A small matter.
When I die, one good thing to remember.
My name, my faults, my miseries, all carried in your heart.
Never shall I forget.
Anything ever I could do for you, keep in your mind, know that I would do it.
Anything
Enough useless talk.
I only distress you.
Not worthy of such feeling.
What's this?!
I had coffee to sober you!
Who wants to be sober?
Oh!
Believe me, Doctor. It's the last thing I want, ever to part you from her again.
What I ask, as a fellow exile, is to be allowed to share this new life with you, under the same roof, if Lucie will accept me.
Lucie, of course, is the whole world to me.
Without her, my return to life would mean nothing.
But if you are essential to her happiness, and I truly believe you are, then I must give her to you, Charles.
Dr Manette, I swear you shall never have cause to regret your faith in me.
You're no doubt eager to speak to her.
That, I think, is a patient.
Doctor, before I see her, there is... one thing I should tell you.
My name as an exile is not my true name.
Oh, stop it. I take you as I've come to know you, Charles.
Tell me nothing more.
- But, sir...
- No don't speak
You've been told what happened to me 20 years ago.
If my future son-in-law is a past aristocrat,
I'd prefer not to know it.
Mr Carton.
- Mr Carton!
- Miss Manette, I am here for a moment only, because I am not a man who takes much time over apologies.
I owe so many that it's easier to dispense with the whole business.
Then, pray, dispense with it.
I would, but for one thing.
I know from er... my hazy recollection that my behaviour last night was unpardonable.
That doesn't greatly concern me. It often is.
But you made me a certain promise which I recall as clearly as if I'd never taken a glass of wine.
It shall be respected.
Thank you.
That was my chief concern in coming here, lest you were simply humouring a drunken fool.
Is it not often said that the truth emerges at such time?
And truly said.
Miss Manette, in all my drunken babbling there was not one false word.
That's what I wanted you to know.
Rest assured that
I shall never refer to this again.
Charles!
Come in, Darnay. I was about to take my leave.
Goodbye, Miss Manette.
Goodbye, Mr Carton.
You're not your usual loving self today,
Miss Pross.
No invitations to coffee?
Oh, wait.
What is it now?
Something I should have remembered to tell Mr Darnay.
My profoundest apologies
Mr Carton! You shall be the first to hear our news.
- No, Charles.
- We are to be married.
I congratulate you most sincerely.
I am sure that nobody could make you happier.
For my part, I have a piece of news which will be your first wedding present.
I came back simply to tell you that you have nothing further to fear from our friend Barsad.
He is no longer with us.
No longer with us?
He's dead.
He took a false step into the river.
I passed his funeral on my way here.
That's a relief, indeed.
Though he could have chosen a better moment to inform us.
- Are you sure this is the right one?
- It's Barsad's grave.
- I saw him buried this very day.
- You said he was a little 'un.
He must have fattened himself up since he was at the Bailey.
He didn't die of hunger.
Come on. Let's have him.
All quiet.
And how much is that worth to them medical doctors?
Eh?
The slippery viper, swindling honest tradesmen!
The first one I've met that didn't turn up at his own funeral.
It's on account of his dirty trade.
Lost his reputation when they acquitted the Frenchy. He has to make a new start.
Best put him back.
Just like that Barsad!
Can't even be trusted to croak.
Good day Madame
A glass of old cognac.
They have taken Gaspard.
Poor Gaspard.
You are acquainted with Gaspard?
I know him round here as the assassin of the Marquis St Evremonde.
This is my husband.
Good day, Jacques.
You deceive yourself, Monsieur.
My name is Ernest Defarge.
Quite so.
But isn't it the custom for those of... certain sympathies to address one another as Jacques?
You may address me as Jacques.
Who sent you here to spy on us?
Madam, whatever gave you such a preposterous idea?
Only a spy of the aristocrats would dare to speak to us like that.
Wouldn't a far-sighted person do so?
One who sees which way the wind is blowing
What wind, Monsieur?
You know very well, Jacques.
The first puff of that wind swept the Marquis St Evremonde to his grave.
And, speaking of Evremonde,
I think you'll be interested to have news of his cousin, the new Marquis.
- He's settled in England. We know that.
- Yes, and getting married.
Did you know that, too?
You should have, for you're acquainted with his bride-to-be.
To whom do you refer?
Why, to Miss Manette.
Didn't she call here once to claim her father?
The poor oppressed doctor
You see, I make it my business to find out these things.
I could be a very useful comrade,
Jacques.
Never before have I unpacked for a man.
Cheer up. Honeymoons go all too quickly.
- We shall soon have them back.
- Have the guests all gone?
Mr Carton is still here.
He found it necessary to take a little... nap.
I'm sure he did.
Why our ladybird ever wanted to invite that tosspot to her wedding,
I shall never understand.
Doctor!
Mr Carton!
Oh, Doctor, what is it?
Mr Carton! Mr Carton!
Oh! Oh, come quickly. The doctor...
To me, it seems almost a symbol.
I wonder how they're having it out there.
In France, you mean?
There's a storm coming to them, surely enough.
Though whether by the hand of nature
Such a storm it's likely to be.
But if ever the rulers of a nation invite...
Oh! Good gracious. I've been asleep.
And look at the hour!
What sort of a host you must think me.
You've not slept alone.
It's this excellent wine of yours.
Half-undressed! I'm truly most ashamed.
I... I'm afraid we all partook a little too freely.
Not you, Mr Lorry?
Worse than either of us, Doctor.
He lay back in that chair and snored loud enough to shame the thunder.
I... I don't seem to remember.
Nor I. Shocking state of affairs.
Leaving the heavens to awake us.
This is a storm indeed.
Enough to bring the dead out of their graves.
Jacques fifteen!
Keep away!
Give me something to kill with!
Hey!
Grab one of these!
You take it!
The armoury. That's the place for muskets.
The armoury!
Open up!
Stand away. We shall fire!
Fire, I said, Number Two Company!
Fire!
The Gardes Français have come over!
Hooray!
Yes!
You're the one who shot the people down.
Stand aside!
Show me the North Tower, quick!
What...?
What is the meaning of 105 North Tower?
What is the meaning?
- Is it a captive or a place of captivity?
- I don't know.
Does it mean you want to die?
- Kill him!
- It is a cell number.
Show it me!
- Follow... follow me.
- Come on!
You found it!
In 105 North Tower.
We've got old Foulon.
- Foulon!
- Foulon?
He who told us to eat grass.
HE'S eating grass now in the very place we last met him.
Hey, citizens, let's get down there!
Mr Lorry, can you not wait a little longer before you leave for France?
Impossible, miss.
If you could see the chaos in our Paris office...
Now it's spread to the countryside, there'll be danger beyond Calais.
They'll be too busy with their own affairs to interfere with an old fellow like me.
I'm taking Jerry Cruncher as a bodyguard.
- I wish we could change your mind.
- I've delayed too long already.
Even as I'm talking to you,
Paris may be afire or sacked, our customers' property burnt or plundered.
- You cannot save it.
- Maybe not, Charles.
But in a tidy business way, I can see that all changes of assets are truly recorded.
- If there's anything of yours I may look to...
- There is nothing of mine in France.
But tell me only what the charge is!
Acting for an emigrant.
What I have done for my new master was in your interests!
But let me only write to him
Father!
Not my daughter! Hold me responsible, if you must, but what has she done?
- What have any of these others done?
- Father, don't let them take me.
Don't blame her. What have they done?
- What have any of these others done?
- You ate whilst we starved!
Hello, Carton.
I'm afraid Lucie's out. She and the doctor.
I made sure they would be out before I came here to give you this.
I was visiting the bank this morning and saw it awaiting you in the rack
How did you know it was for me?
- Where did you get that?
- You were careless enough to have it still.
How did you come by it?
I stole it. I went to your room the night Dr Manette was taken sick.
Curiosity impelled me to trace its noble origin, and when I saw the same name on that letter and identified you as a French nobleman,
I was prepared to discover some episode in your past, some covered-up disgrace which would explain your rebirth as Charles Darnay.
Knowing your dislike of me, I'm sure you would have found it most welcome.
I was truly thinking more of Lucie.
Then allow me to reassure you.
I disclaimed my title, and with it my estate, solely because the name on this letter is one of the most hated names in France.
Before asking Lucie to marry me,
I decided to renounce it completely, wash my hands of it.
How simple it all sounds.
Far simpler than I'd imagined.
Goodbye to France, farewell to all responsibility.
Would you like me to burn that?
I see now that you have no cause to read it.
It comes from Gabelle, the man I left in charge of my estate.
I sent him instructions long ago to give the people their freedom.
Devil take it!
You were right to chide me.
Gabelle and his daughter have been imprisoned
taken to Paris and lodged in La Force
He fears for their lives.
Oh! I have been selfish.
I should have gone back to France when my cousin died, worked out and supervised all I meant to do.
Carton...
I'd be obliged if you'd say nothing to Lucie of this.
She would only share my own concern about it, and... she's not in a condition at this time to be worried.
We
We haven't voiced it abroad yet
Our child is due in the spring.
I see.
In view of that,
I hope you won't contemplate doing anything foolish.
You must leave me to make my own decision.
Lucie.
- Sydney, forgive me for disturbing your work.
- My work.
But you did once say if there was anything you could do for me.
And meant it.
Charles has gone to France.
You'll see why. Some servants are in danger.
Sydney, I must go to him.
I need a permit. I would have gone to Mr Lorry, but unfortunately he's in Paris already.
It's most unwise to go to France at a time like this.
Sydney, I must.
You may not know, but Charles's family were aristocrats.
Yes, I knew.
You knew?
Then you will understand.
- But you can't...
- Sydney, I must.
I know he's in danger. I must go to him.
- Has he arrived in Paris by himself?
- He did.
- Bring him to me.
- Yes, sir.
- Is Citizen Defarge here?
- Yes
Another from the list supplied by your excellent wife.
Charles Darnay, or as he would prefer
NOT to be known, the Marquis St Evremonde.
Darnay? But I thought he was lost to us, living in England.
Your age, Evremonde?
My name is Darnay.
Your age, Evremonde.
Twenty-seven.
- Married, Evremonde?
- Yes
Where is your wife?
- In England.
- Without doubt
You're consigned, Evremonde, to the prison of La Force.
Just heaven! Under what law?
For what offence?
We have new laws, Evremonde, and new offences, since you were here.
I invite you to observe that I have come here voluntarily in response to this written appeal of a fellow countryman.
That's no interest of mine.
I surely have the right to be heard.
Emigrants have no rights, Evremonde.
There is a new decree confiscating their property.
But I... I have no property.
And condemning to death all who return.
Take him away, Defarge.
Hello.
Monsieur Charles.
Marie!
It's good to see a friend.
Though I wish it were somewhere else.
Tell me, your father?
Ah, I'm too late.
Yesterday.
I asked to be tried with him, but they wouldn't listen.
Thank God at least for that.
My cause is yours, Marie.
And it's a good cause.
We'll go out free together.
You do not know them, Monsieur Charles.
What did he ever do except be kind?
Oh, I loved him so.
- Some more wine?
- Why, yes.
Well, my wife!
- A pleasing day, eh?
- A beautiful day.
- Forty-seven heads.
- I've got good news for you.
Yes?
Come here.
- What?
- Come, you sit down.
The first name on your register, here in Paris.
Evremonde?
I took him myself to La Force.
At last.
Evremonde.
Is he alone?
His wife is still in England.
He asked me to communicate with her father.
I refused.
You refused?
But why? That information is the one certain way of bringing her here.
Dr Manette has surely suffered enough.
I'm not concerned with the doctor.
It's his daughter.
She's an Evremonde now.
But if she is to be punished for her marriage, it will mean fresh anguish for him.
Anguish? You talk to me of anguish?
What is one daughter beside a father, brother, sister?
All dead at the hands of that accursed family.
She is not of their blood.
Been married for six months.
What if there's a child on the way?
An Evremonde.
Now, listen.
I've had this family a long time on my register for extermination to the last of the line.
Isn't that so?
It is so.
Then tell wind and fire where to stop, but don't tell me.
Alexander Manette?
- Yes.
- French, physician. Good.
Lucie Darnay French
This is my daughter.
Emily Pross.
- English
- Yes, and proud of it.
Is this your first visit to France?
It is, and I hope my last.
Prossie! She's my companion.
Oh. Sooner yours than mine.
Where is the fourth passenger?
Hey!
Wake up!
Come on wake up!
Patience, my good citizen, patience.
It's bad enough to rob a man of his dreams.
Don't put your hands on me. I am no aristocrat.
That's very true.
Sydney Carton, advocate.
English.
What brings you to France?
Your wines, my good citizen. What else?
Proceed.
They're back, master.
Do not do anything to attract their attention.
Ain't there no way of stopping 'em coming here?
It's a convenient spot for an armoury, between the two big prisons. We dare not protest.
There's blood on them blades.
It's too horrible to watch.
Yeah, 'tis, innit?
I'm like you, master.
Scares me to the marrow, but I...
I have just got to keep on looking.
- Mr Lorry.
- What?
Was you expecting visitors?
No.
God help them whoever they are
It's Dr Manette.
I beg you, please. I beg you.
Please, I beg you.
Stop! Stop! Stop!
This is a prisoner from the Bastille.
It's true, friends.
Eighteen years in the Bastille.
Can these be the people I used to know?
Brutality only leads now to more brutality, and worse.
They can't even wait for prisoners to be tried.
Oh, don't heed it, my precious.
What would a banker know about it?
- What have I said?
- Charles Darnay is a prisoner in La Force.
Oh, may heaven forgive me.
We've searched everywhere he might have been. We heard but an hour ago.
Dr Manette hopes to plead for him at the tribunal. That's why we've come.
Then all will surely be well, judging by the esteem they show for him.
If we're still in time.
Any help I gave my father, sir, was only for the good of our neighbours.
He was a kind man.
He did his very best for them.
Your father was executed as an enemy of the people
Do you dare to impugn the justice of this tribunal?
How say you?
Guilty Death within four-and-twenty hours
Charles Evremonde, called Darnay.
I knew Darnay was not his true name.
Charles Evremonde, called Darnay, you are accused as an emigrant whose life is forfeit to the Republic under the decree that banishes all emigrants on pain of death.
- Enemy of the Republic!
Death!
What have you to say, emigrant?
I submit that I am not an emigrant.
I left this country more than a year ago to live by my own industry in England.
Sooner than live on the industry of the overladen people of France.
Have you any proof of this?
Yes, I have.
The truth of my statement will be confirmed by Dr Manette, the good physician who sits there.
I am Alexander Manette, prisoner for eighteen years in the Bastille.
I was released nearly two years ago and settled in England.
The accused was one of the first friends
I made there.
He has been faithful and devoted to my daughter and myself in our exile.
And she was the witness in his favour when he was tried by the aristocratic English government as the foe of that country and friend of the United States.
You have heard enough.
We find the accused not guilty.
Stop!
Hold the accused.
You have a further charge?
The accused is a denounced enemy of the Republic.
An aristocrat, one of a family of tyrants.
Denounced secretly or openly?
Openly, Mr President.
By whom?
Alexander Manette, the physician.
President, I indignantly protest.
That is a foul and wicked lie
The accused is the husband of my daughter
Who would believe
I could denounce my own son-in-law?
They will believe it when this document is read.
What is this document?
President, I knew this Bastille prisoner
Alexander Manette had been confined in a cell known as 105 North Tower.
On the day the Bastille was taken
I examined that cell
Hidden in it I found that document
It bears the writing of Dr Manette
which I know well
I ask that it now be read
I, Alexander Manette, unfortunate physician, native of Beauvais and afterwards resident in Paris, write this melancholy paper in my doleful cell in the Bastille during the last months of the tenth year of my captivity.
I write from the fear that soon my failing memory will erase from my mind
the events I wish to record
lest the crimes of my oppressors be forever buried
There he goes.
Then we have him.
Are you sure I'm right?
If that ain't Barsad, I'll have my head took off.
What's he worth to us?
That remains to be seen.
Mr Barsad.
You remember me?
You mistake me for somebody else, Monsieur.
My name is Solomon. Jean Solomon.
I beg your pardon. That was tactless.
You would appear to have become a person of some importance,
Mr Solomon.
May I ask what function you perform?
I have duties with regard to the interrogation of prisoners.
I might have guessed it.
A spy. A secret informer.
Just like our old friend Barsad.
I've told you, that's not my name.
Who said it was?
There was a man of that name who resembled me, but he's been dead for eighteen months.
It is possible, Mr Solomon, that I might have to ask you a favour.
Some slight recompense for my tact in forgetting certain particulars of your past.
Don't you dare to threaten me, Mr Carton.
You remember my name. I am flattered.
I stand in high regard here amongst the people who count.
Excellent. That makes your friendship all the more valuable.
Regard it as a game of cards.
The stake that I have resolved to play for, in case the worst happens, is a friend among the people who count.
And the friend I propose to win, Mr Solomon, is you.
- You'll have to hold a good hand, Mr Carton.
- I do.
Firstly, I am an Englishman with no axe to grind in France, and no cause to represent myself under another name.
That's a very good card.
My second one.
Mr Solomon, now in the employ of the Republican French government, was formerly Mr Barsad, in the employ of the aristocratic English government, enemy of France and freedom.
That's an even better card.
Do you think I should play the ace, Jerry?
You play it, Mr Carton.
Then fill up our friend's glass and let the ace be played quietly.
Let's say Mr Barsad was at one time in the employ of no lesser personage than the late Marquis St Evremonde.
For the love of heaven, be quiet.
I think Mr Solomon requires his cognac, Jerry.
What do you want from me?
Nothing at all... I hope.
That will be determined by events now in progress.
I was brought to my living grave here in the Bastille with only one remaining hope, that my servant Defarge may have been successful in saving the poor hapless girl, who alone was left of the family exterminated by that young nobleman.
He and his descendants to the last of their race
do I now denounce for the crimes
I denounce them to heaven and to earth
It is a tragic and frightful testimony indeed.
But in the name of justice, I must observe that Dr Manette, either by reason of his failing memory, or because it was unknown to him, makes no mention therein of the name of this nobleman he has denounced.
I will name him.
And no-one in the world has better cause, for I was that young girl who was the last one left alive in that family.
I was rescued by Defarge and brought up in the village by the fishermen
That father driven to death in the shafts was my father.
That mortally wounded boy in the stables was my brother, and that poor outraged peasant girl was my sister.
Do you think I haven't cursed again and again the name of that vile monster?
He was the cousin of the accused.
The Marquis St Evremonde.
I tell you once and for all, it's impossible.
No prisoner ever yet escaped from La Force.
Who spoke of an escape? Did you, Jerry?
Not me, Mr Carton. Let's hope there won't be no need for an escape.
Amen.
So you see, Mr Solomon, we all three sit here round this table, hoping there'll be no cause to trouble you.
- Is there a verdict in the Evremonde trial?
- Guilty.
Death in twenty-four hours
It seems, Mr Solomon, that I shall have to ask you that favour.
What happened?
Oh, my precious!
Oh, Prossie!
My father is ill. The shock.
If he could only regain the power of speech.
He must have some sleep and after he's slept perhaps
You must rest now
Come.
Come.
It's happened again.
I feared it, and that vile woman denounced the family of Evremonde.
- The family?
- You heard her yourself.
- I wasn't there at the end.
- You weren't there?
I heard the verdict from the rabble in a wine shop.
- You're disgusting.
- Forget about me. I'm of no importance.
Did you say the whole family was denounced?
To the last of the race.
You realise the danger in which this puts Lucie?
Thank God her relationship is by marriage.
Lucie is carrying a child, an Evremonde.
He's gone to sleep.
Almost at once.
Like a child.
It's the best thing we could wish.
Sydney, you're an advocate. You must know.
There must be some form of appeal, some chance of a reprieve.
I think perhaps there may be.
Do you? Do you really believe that?
We shall do all that's humanly possible.
You'd better get a little sleep yourself now.
He wouldn't want you to fret and worry.
No.
I think, perhaps, I may sleep.
Now.
Lucie.
God bless you.
How can you be so unkind, so heartless?
You know there isn't a chance of stopping this execution.
- None.
- Why raise the poor child's hopes?
You could waste all night taking me to task and we haven't time.
Attend to everything I have to say
Ask me no questions and give me the promise I shall exact from you.
I have a reason.
You understand now that Lucie is in grave danger?
It depends upon you, and you entirely, to save her.
Heaven grant that I may, Carton. But how?
I shall tell you how.
I don't think I could depend upon a better man.
Early tomorrow have a coach and horses ready for a rapid journey to the sea coast.
- They must be in starting trim at ten o'clock
- It shall be done.
Tell Lucie tonight what you know of the danger to her child.
Say that her father's in danger, too.
Press upon her the urgency of leaving Paris at that hour. Tell...
Tell her it was her husband's last arrangement.
Tell her that more depends on all this than she dare
- believe or hope.
- I will.
See Lucie and her father into a coach out here in the courtyard.
Take your place with them.
The moment I come to you, take me in and drive away.
I may not be in a condition to assist you.
Don't look at me like that.
For once in my life,
I am quite sober and deadly earnest.
Promise me, solemnly, that nothing, nothing will make you change my instruction.
I promise.
Here, then, are my papers.
Take them and keep them with the rest.
You may need them tonight.
It's dangerous to be abroad in Paris without papers.
You are not to question my instructions.
Remember your promise.
I shall remember it.
I hope to do my part faithfully.
I hope to do mine.
If only the poor darling can sleep.
That one's a lot of good at a time like this.
Going out now to get drunk I suppose
No, Miss Pross, no.
Not this time.
The bravest and best of us all.
What do you want? Who's this?
He's a friend of Evremonde.
He's English.
Evremonde.
Poor old Evremonde.
He's got permission to say goodbye to him.
Looks as if he has been making a night of it.
Trying to keep his courage up.
Remember, a few minutes only.
Carton!
Of all people on earth, you least expected to see me.
I cannot believe it to be you.
You're not a prisoner?
No, I'm accidentally possessed of a power over one of your guards.
I come from your wife.
You must do everything I ask without question.
- Put on this coat.
- There is no escaping from this place.
It can't be done.
You'll only die with me. No, no, it's madness.
It would be madness if I asked you to escape, but do I?
If I ask you to pass that door, tell me that I am mad and refuse me.
Carton. Dear Carton.
Whatever you have in mind,
I implore you not to add your death to mine.
You must trust me.
Take that pen.
Sit down and write as I dictate.
Hurry, my friend. Hurry.
Write exactly as I speak.
I knew it was not in your nature to forget the words which passed between us long ago.
I am thankful that the time has come when I may truly... prove them.
What vapour is that?
Vapour?
I am conscious of nothing.
Write on.
That I do...
.. is no subject...
.. for regret...
.. or grief.
Let there be no grief.
Ah, Thérése, I was just coming for you.
I saw you here. I have some business to do before I go to the guillotine today.
But today is your day of days.
I shall be there for the twenty-third head.
Oh, Evremonde.
That will bring the loudest shout.
What I have to say is not for the ears of my husband.
Eh?
Defarge is a good enough Republican, but he has weaknesses.
He's weak enough to relent towards a certain doctor and his daughter.
The wife of Evremonde.
She will be at home now awaiting the moment of his death.
She will be mourning and grieving.
Yes, and it's an offence to mourn for an aristocrat.
She will be in a state of mind to speak against the justice of the Republic.
And I shall be there to hear.
Ha ha ha!
My cherished!
What a splendid woman this is.
Take this. Keep my usual place for me.
But you won't be late?
I shall be there when his turn comes.
You see
Is your hazard so very great?
My hazard is whether you remain true to your bargain.
I shall remain true to it.
To the very end.
Can any man keep to a bargain like that?
Have no fear. I shall soon be out of harm's way.
And so, please God, will they.
My coach is still outside?
Yes, it was a minute ago.
Get some assistance.
Have him taken to it.
Hurry, man. Hurry.
Mr Carton...
Tell them to take him to Tellson's Bank.
He has friends there.
Hey you there!
Goodbye, old Sydney.
Hey you there
The gentleman needs a bit more help this time.
Out like a light.
I'm not surprised, the load he had when he came in.
I wish I were rich enough to stink like this one.
That must be our Mr Carton.
All right. Put him in this coach.
He can sober up on the journey.
Do you have your papers, and Jerry's?
Don't bother about us.
We can look after ourselves.
You and Jerry will follow in the second coach.
Send Miss Lucie out.
The time. It's so near.
You must go quickly.
Has Mr Carton returned?
Come. This minute.
Wait!
Mercy! Mercy!
- Stand aside!
- Never.
You can't get the better of me
I'm a Briton.
I tell you, there's a terrible woman in there with Prossie.
We can't leave her alone.
All right. Jerry will look after her.
Drive on!
Marchand
Duvernois
Garnot
Gabelle
Evremonde.
Four travellers to England.
Jarvis Lorry banker English
That's me
Alexander Manette
Alexander Manette.
Alexander Manette.
Can it be the same?
Lucie Darnay Of course his daughter
- The wife of Evremonde.
- That is so.
Evremonde has an assignation elsewhere.
Sydney Carton, advocate, English.
Ha, ha, ha. It's proving difficult to waken our friend.
I recall this Englishman.
The one that even a revolution couldn't keep from our wines
Let him dream on.
Ah, that's it. Ah!
Twenty, Marchand.
Twenty-one, Gabelle.
Twenty-two, Duvernois.
Twenty-three, Evremonde.
Twenty-four, Garnot.
Twenty-five Garnevech
Monsieur Charles.
Monsieur Charles.
I thought you were Citizen Evremonde.
And who shall say I am not?
You?
Are you dying for him?
And another.
May I hold your hand, stranger?
Down with Evremonde!
Down with
- Evremonde!
- Hush!
- What?
- He's going to pay the forfeit.
Keep your eyes on me and mind nothing else.
I mind nothing while I'm with you.
I shall mind nothing when I go, if they are quick.
They will be quick.
Thérése! Thérése Defarge!
Who has seen her? Thérése!
- She's never missed before.
- No. She won't miss this time.
Is the moment come?
It's come.
Suddenly I want to weep
But I must hold my tears in check
lest they think it is myself I weep for
And who would weep for Sydney Carton?
A little time ago
none in all the world
But somebody will weep for me now
And that knowledge redeems a worthless life
Worthless but for this final moment
which makes it all worthwhile
It is a far far better thing I do
than I have ever done
It is a far far better rest I go to
than I have ever known
As far as I'm concerned, you have my blessing.
Thank you, sir.
The rest is up to you.
May I suggest the garden at the west side of the house?
It's a very romantic spot.
I'd like you to meet an old friend of mine.
Dr. Alan Bent. Meriwether Lewis.
-Doctor.
-How do you do?
Mr. Lewis is here from Washington.
He's Mr. Jefferson's secretary.
I trust the President is in good health.
He's very well, thank you.
Will you gentlemen excuse me?
I was wondering, Julia, if you'd care to take a walk in the garden.
I was hoping you were going to ask me to dance.
-Would you excuse us, Mrs. Hancock?
-Certainly.
Julia, couldn't we go outside for a minute?
I thought you liked to dance.
Well, it's....
I have something to say to you.
It's important.
I have something important to tell you.
Your friend Mr. Clark is coming here tonight.
Bill Clark, coming here?
It was Father's idea.
He thought it'd be a nice surprise for you.
I haven't seen Bill since I got out of the Army.
I want you to tell me all about him.
That is indeed wonderful news.
I must tell my guests.
Orchestra!
Ladies and gentlemen...
Mr. Collins has brought us news that I'm eager to share with you.
The Congress has approved
President Jefferson's purchase... of the Louisiana Territory.
The President has acquired...
500,000 square miles of new territory... more than doubling the size of the United States.
Ladies and gentlemen...
I hope that you will drink a toast with me... to this healthy young country of ours.
Orchestra!
-Good evening, Lieutenant.
-Good evening.
-Lieutenant, this is a great pleasure.
-Mr. Hancock.
My dear, may I present Lt. Clark?
Mrs. Hancock.
-Lt. Clark.
-My pleasure, ma'am.
-Mr. Collins, Lt. Clark.
-Your servant, sir.
Thank you.
Will you take punch with us, Lieutenant?
Nothing I'd like better.
There's Bill now.
It's good to see you.
Merne, what are you doing out of Washington?
Well, I....
I'm sorry.
Julia, may I present Bill Clark?
Bill, Miss Julia Hancock.
-Miss Hancock.
-How do you do?
You'll have to forgive the Lieutenant's appearance. He's been fighting Indians.
So I understand.
What about you, still running the White House?
Well, I get a little help from Mr. Jefferson.
-Come and meet our friends, Lieutenant.
-Yes, I'd like to.
-I'll join you right after this dance, Bill.
-That's fine.
Miss Hancock.
Mr. Lewis, a soldier just come from Washington with this message.
-Thank you.
-He's waiting outside.
Pardon me, Julia.
It's Mr. Jefferson.
He wants me back at the White House.
-Tell him I'll leave within the hour.
-Yes, sir.
It says, ''I'm sure you appreciate
I would not call you back...
''from your vacation except for a matter of utmost urgency.
''Please convey my apologies to Mr. and Mrs. Hancock...
''and especially to Miss Julia.''
I wish you didn't have to leave tonight, Merne.
So do I.
-Goodbye, Mrs. Hancock.
-Goodbye.
-Goodbye, sir. Thank you for everything.
-Good luck.
Goodbye, Julia.
-You come back as soon as you can.
-Of course.
Take care of yourself, Bill.
-Safe trip, sir.
-Goodbye, Tom.
Seems a shame Merne's visit had to be cut so short.
Yes, indeed.
You must plan to spend a few days with us, Lieutenant.
By all means.
Thanks, I'd be most happy to... if Miss Hancock has no objections.
Why don't you ask her to dance and find out?
Come in.
-Good morning, sir.
-Merne.
Congratulations on the Louisiana Purchase.
I hope you and Miss Julia have forgiven me.
We're happy to hear of your success with the Congress.
Dealing with the Congress is like shaving.
No matter how well you do, you have to get up next morning and do it again.
However, in this case, we've made a good beginning.
I'd say it's more than that, sir.
We paid $1 5 million, and we got a lot of real estate.
We know it stretches... from the Mississippi River to the Continental Divide.
That's all we do know about it.
What do you have in mind, sir?
A military expedition to explore and map our new territory.
Find out what's there: soil, minerals, animal life.
Land is no good unless people can use it.
-Sounds like a big order, Mr. President.
-This is now a big country.
The first step is to explore the Missouri River to its headwaters.
The second is to press on further west.
Beyond the limits of the purchase?
To the Pacific Ocean, if possible.
-But we don't own that territory.
-Neither does anyone else.
That's the point.
Here is the Mississippi River.
Here's the Missouri.
Here are the mountains, and here is the Pacific Ocean.
Now, we believe there are rivers flowing westward to the sea.
If those rivers could be navigated... we'd have a strong claim to the land that lies along the Pacific Coast.
-Your mouth is open, Mr. Lewis.
-I'm sorry.
We are surrounded by foreign powers... who would dearly love to see us fall.
The dream on which this nation was built will never be secure... until the United States stretches from the Atlantic to the Pacific.
Do you really think it's possible, sir?
Would you please help me with this?
The leader of this party must be a man of many talents.
A soldier, a mapmaker, an adventurer... and above all, a diplomat.
A man like that might be hard to find, sir.
I don't think so. What about yourself?
-Me?
-Your mouth, Merne, it's open again.
Well, what do you say?
I'm tremendously flattered, sir.
I'm tremendously pleased.
Then it's settled.
I'll apply for a reinstatement of my commission.
I took the liberty of going over your head.
You'll need one other officer.
Anyone in particular you'd like me to request?
-Yes, sir. Lt. William Clark.
-Yes, Clark.
He's a good soldier.
He's had a lot of experience fighting Indians.
I want you to remember that, in a sense, you'll be acting as my ambassador.
You will use diplomacy instead of force wherever possible.
Yes, sir. I have one request, Mr. President.
I'd like Lt. Clark to share command with me, in a position of equal rank.
If that's the way you prefer it... you make your plans and we'll discuss them.
Yes, sir.
Now I suppose Miss Julia will really hate me.
I'm afraid she will, sir.
-Mr. Lewis.
-Good morning, Tom.
-Mr. Hancock is in the library.
-Yes.
-Welcome back. It's good to see you.
-Thank you, sir.
Is Julia around?
She went for a walk, I believe, with Lt. Clark.
They should be back any minute now.
Come and sit down and tell me about this expedition....
Well, you....
You told me that garden was a romantic spot.
I guess you were right.
Merne, I'm very sorry.
Mr. Hancock, I've just asked your daughter to marry me... and she's accepted.
I hope you've no objections. She--
No, I won't object to anything that will make Julia happy.
-Capt. Lewis is here.
-Wonderful.
I'm sure you'll understand... if he doesn't seem to share your happiness.
No, I can't say that I do.
Congratulations, Bill.
Thanks.
I must tell you, Merne...
I don't think Lt. Clark knew of your feelings in this matter.
I can see now that my feelings were never shared by Julia.
I can't blame anyone for that.
Excuse me, gentlemen.
You got my letter?
Yes. I also got my orders from the War Department.
Merne, I didn't realize how you felt about Julia.
I'm sure you didn't, Bill.
I knew you were good friends.
I thought that's all there was to it.
I wanted to think there was something more than that, but there wasn't.
Now about the expedition, do you want to go?
Yes, of course I want to go.
Merne, you've got to tell me the truth.
We have to be honest with each other.
Do you still want me to go, now?
We leave for Wood River in the morning.
If everything goes well, we should be there by early spring.
You, Shannon!
-Yes, Sergeant?
-Take up on them back stays.
-Capt. Lewis, sir?
-Yes.
Sgt. Gass, sir.
I'm in charge of the enlisted detail.
I'll show you to your quarters, sir.
What about the men, Sergeant?
They're a pretty good lot, sir.
Young and strong and full of the devil.
-They're all volunteers.
-Good.
I wish I'd had these boys back in '76 against the British.
All they need is training and a firm Irish hand.
Between us, we'll see they get plenty of both.
-You are Lt. Clark, sir?
-This is Capt. Clark, Sergeant.
Sorry, sir. This War Department dispatch... came addressed to Lt. Clark.
You were right the first time, Sergeant.
I thought you said
I was supposed to get a promotion.
Seven hundred men in the Army and not one vacancy in the grade of captain.
-You said the President authorized it.
-He did.
You know the Army.
Somebody forgot to tell somebody else.
-That's no help to me.
-Don't worry about it.
As far as this expedition is concerned, you're a captain.
Who should I believe, you or the War Department?
-They say--
-I don't care what they say.
Mr. Jefferson said we'd share command and it'll be that way.
-Is that clear, Sergeant?
-Yes, sir.
Capt. Clark and I will share these quarters.
-Will you send for our duffle?
-Yes, sir.
In gangplank.
Let go forward.
Fend her off.
Let go aft.
Helm hard to starboard.
Safe journey!
Goodbye.
Pull!
Put your backs in it.
Time.
Five-eight-six.
Forty degrees and 12 minutes.
Forty degrees, 12 minutes.
-Watch that line.
-Keep that line moving.
I just saw another one.
We must be getting pretty close to their village.
Pass the word, Sergeant.
Everybody on the alert.
Expecting trouble, Captain?
They're Indians, aren't they?
When we land,
I want everyone in full uniform.
I thought maybe we could sail right past them.
What's the matter, Sergeant?
Don't you want something to tell your grandchildren?
Shore, march.
Company, halt.
Order firelocks.
We have come to see LeBorgne,
Chief of the Minnetarees.
I am LeBorgne.
We have come from the Great Chief of the United States.
Our chief sends you this as a sign of friendship.
-He wants you to know--
-Messieurs.
Americans cannot trade here.
This territory belongs to France.
-Who are you?
-My name is Charboneau.
I have the permit to trade here from the Northwest Company.
The news evidently hasn't reached here.
This territory has been purchased from France... by the United States government.
We are here to explore it.
This is a picture of our chief.
He is your chief now, as well as ours.
These words... they stand for peace and friendship.
It is our desire to live in that spirit with the Minnetarees.
In return, you will get protection from your enemies.
The Minnetarees need no protection against their enemies.
My warriors are brave. We too have guns.
The white man has more guns and more warriors.
If we were weak, we would not come as friends. We....
We need one of you to guide us to the mountains where the river begins.
That is the land of our enemies, the Shoshones.
We'll not go there.
How about you, Charboneau?
You ought to know this country.
If you are successful, other Americans will come.
There will be trading posts at every bend of the river.
No. I will not help you to ruin my business.
This is a big country.
There's room enough for everybody.
I like it better the way it is.
We came as friends.
We will leave as friends.
With your permission, we will camp here for the night.
We have brought gifts for your people.
Company, shoulder firelocks.
To the right, about face.
To the front, march.
Excuse me, sir. There's a squaw outside.
She wants to see you.
-All right, send her in.
-Yes, sir.
Yes?
My name is Sacajawea.
At the village, you said you are going to where the river meets the mountains.
Yes, we are.
That is the land of my people.
That isn't Minnetaree country.
I am Shoshone.
I was captured by the Minnetarees.
They raid our villages, steal our horses... and carry our women off as slaves.
Take me with you. I will show you the way.
What you ask is impossible, even if what you say is true.
I do not lie.
I was wearing this when I was captured.
You will not see one like it here.
These are seashells.
The Shoshones live in the mountains.
My father got this from beyond the mountains.
From the people who live by the Great River.
-There's a river beyond the mountains?
-Yes.
The river that flows to the big salt water.
I want to return to my people.
My brother is chief of our village.
You would be made welcome.
No.
Sorry.
We'd like to help you, but we can't.
If you find your way, give this to my people.
I have stolen these seeds, one at a time.
Teach them how to plant the seeds... so they will not go hungry when the winter comes.
-This will be done.
-My people will thank you.
Bill, maybe we're making a mistake.
We could use somebody that knows the country.
I've been fighting Indians long enough to know you can't trust any of them.
I think the girl was telling the truth.
I have given much thought to the white man.
If they are allowed to pass, many more will follow.
Then the white men will have too many soldiers, too many guns.
This is true.
Already they speak of their chief as my chief.
You have something on your mind?
I will need your help.
You asked once for the Shoshone slave.
Sacajawea.
I will give her to you.
What is it you wish me to do?
Crow Woman, leave us alone.
You will go to these white men.
You will tell them that you will lead them up the river.
''It is further agreed that the Government of the United States...
''hereby undertakes to guarantee the protection...
''of Chief LeBorgne and his people from all enemies.
''By the wearing of this emblem...
''Chief LeBorgne acknowledges his allegiance to the authority...
''and sovereignty of the United States.''
Sergeant.
Detail, to the left, face!
To the front, march!
Take her in.
-Gangplank aboard.
-Sergeant, cast off.
Cast off!
Fend off there.
Pull in those lines!
Lay down your oars! Now!
Give way together!
Pull!
Tomorrow, you ride against our enemies.
The Great Spirit will ride with you.
You will bring back many scalps!
Shoshone.
Tonight you will sleep in the hut of Charboneau.
I don't understand.
You have been given to Charboneau by Chief LeBorgne.
He will want you in his hut when he returns tomorrow.
But Charboneau has gone.
He will not come back for many moons.
He will return tomorrow.
Be ready for him.
He is leading the white men up the river to the mountains.
How can he come back tomorrow?
Perhaps the white men will not be allowed to go so far.
We are slaves, child.
This is no concern of ours.
Halt, or I'll fire!
Sergeant!
-Take me to your chief.
-Wait here.
What are you doing here?
I came to warn you.
The Minnetarees are going to attack.
-How do you know?
-I saw them leave the village.
Then how did you get here ahead of them?
Look at my horse.
Why do you ask questions?
You must do something.
I think she's telling the truth.
We'll see if she is.
Sergeant, double your guards.
Assemble the men.
Yes, sir.
McNeil.
Fire!
Hold your fire!
Thought you said they wouldn't give us any trouble.
They are savages, Captain.
Who knows what they will do.
Maybe you'd like to deliver these yourself.
-Hey, look over there.
-What is it?
-Fresh game.
-Hand me my gun.
Buffalo meat.
Good size herd, too.
How about pulling into shore?
There it is, Capt. Clark.
Look at the elk.
Plenty of them, too.
Better eating than buffalo.
-Anything would taste good to me.
-Sure are a lot of them.
Never seen so many.
Hey, they got one.
Give us a hand here!
Fresh meat!
All right, I got it.
You should've seen the whole herd.
Bigger than horses.
We've been carrying this carcass for miles.
Pull!
Which way?
That way.
To the left, Cruzatte.
Bear to the right.
Better pull in to shore.
Merne, you wanted her along because she knows the country.
She's positive it's the left fork.
I know, but she could be wrong.
According to my calculations, it's the right fork. Here.
You will find out.
On the river that comes from the mountain there is a great falls.
How far up from here?
Two days.
But we've got to be sure, Bill.
We can't afford a mistake.
Time is so important.
Why don't we split up and look for this falls?
All right. I'll take Charboneau and try the right fork.
The one who finds the falls waits there.
The other one turns back after two days.
All right.
Cast off forward!
All clear!
Fend off there!
You take great care with these tools of yours.
We use them to make maps.
Pictures of the river.
Here. Like this.
Look.
But you cannot see the sun on the water... or the blue of the sky.
I would rather look at the river.
So would I.
These pictures, they are important?
Yes. I guess they are more important than we are.
A picture is more important than a man?
Sometimes.
You see, our job is to get these pictures to our people.
They will come here.
They will bring their women, and they will stay.
Maybe. Someday.
They are beautiful, the women of your people?
Some of them.
Just like some Indian women.
You know, that's the first time
I've seen you smile.
What is it?
I would like to see a woman with red hair.
Cruzatte! The rope!
Cruzatte!
Keep her bow upstream!
I'm trying!
I can't hold her!
You should put on dry clothes.
I have to get this sextant dry first.
A little cold water never hurt anybody.
Do you like it?
It's very pretty.
It's nice and dry.
You know....
Maybe we could... fix it up a little.
There.
That's much better.
You look a lot more like Mary Jane than Sacajawea.
That name's going to give me a lot of trouble.
You mind if I call you Janey?
Janey?
It sounds pretty.
What does it mean?
It means ''beautiful.''
I'll tell you one thing, Janey.
That dress is too long.
Get to work, you lazy, worthless, prying scum!
Go on!
You men, get the supplies onboard.
Make ready to cast off.
Go on!
Steer for the bank!
What do we do now, sir?
We'll wait here for Capt. Lewis.
Then we'll push on.
What about the boat, sir?
We'll take it with us.
Up over them falls? Sir, that's impossible.
I'm surprised at you, Sergeant.
In the Army, nothing's impossible.
Well, sir, in the Navy, they say it was impossible.
Let her fall!
Let clear!
Now!
All together! Heave ho!
Hey, Sergeant, why can't they find a river going our way for a change?
Help me out, fellas!
Everybody get a hold!
Hang on!
Get your backs in it!
That's done it.
Hold hard now.
Sergeant!
-Capt. Lewis.
-Hello, Sergeant.
-Well, the Indian girl was right, huh?
-Yes, sir.
You men have done a lot of work around here.
You wouldn't believe it, sir.
We've been doing things that are impossible.
Where's Capt. Clark?
-He's in the tent, sir. He's laid up.
-What happened?
Well, he just keeled over while we was working.
It looks like the fever to me.
Fever is high.
I will take care of him.
Good.
If you're as excellent a nurse as you are a guide...
Capt. Clark will be in good hands.
Let him sleep now, but when he wakes up, give him two of these.
I'll come back as soon as I can.
Well, Sergeant, let's get the boat around the falls.
You like this American.
You should know that LeBorgne, your chief, has given you to me.
-Why did he do this?
-Why is not your business.
You are mine.
Remember that... if you want this American to get well.
The fever is gone now.
Look... what was that you gave me to drink?
I didn't think you would remember.
My head was in your lap.
Your hands were cool on my face... and soft.
When a man has the fever... he has strange dreams.
I wasn't dreaming.
Go to sleep.
I wasn't dreaming.
How is Capt. Clark?
He wants his breakfast.
Breakfast? It's almost 4:00 in the afternoon.
A man needs his sleep.
Those pills worked faster than I expected.
What pills?
I used another medicine.
It tasted like boiled gunpowder.
-How are things going up above?
-They're not good.
The men are tired, discouraged, and hungry.
We're going out to see if we can find some fresh meat.
I'll go up there later and see if there's anything I can do.
He's in your hands, doctor.
Janey will take good care of me.
Who?
I will take care of Chief Red Head.
Chief Red Head?
He gave me a white girl's name.
I have given him an Indian name.
I see.
This is just about the sorriest looking camp I've ever seen.
Cruzatte, where's that fiddle of yours?
Sergeant, what would you say to a drink?
I don't mind if I do.
Boys, you haven't tasted the likes of this in over a year.
It's called whiskey.
Well, what are you waiting for?
It's enough to make a man homesick.
That will put sand in your belly.
Come on.
All right, Cruzatte.
You've wet your whistle.
Give us a tune now.
Sgt. Gass, choose your partner.
Come on, give me some.
Come on.
Give me some.
Take your hands off. This is my woman.
-What are you talking about?
-She belong to me.
No knife!
Let him go.
Watch the knife.
That's it, Captain.
That's it. You gotta go.
Get him while he's down.
What's going on here?
He tried to steal my woman.
She's mine. She was given to me.
I do not belong to him.
Sgt. Gass... give this man some food and send him back down the river.
I thought you had more sense.
Janey.
What's all this?
You have fought for me and you have won.
-Well?
-I belong to you now.
Wait a minute.
I fought Charboneau because he tried to kill me.
I belong to you, as if you had bought me.
It is the custom.
This is a free country now, Janey.
You don't belong to anybody.
You do not want me?
That's not what I mean.
You see, our customs are different.
We don't get our women by fighting over them or buying them.
How does a white woman get a man?
She waits... until he asks her to marry him.
I will wait.
Another thing.
You see, where I come from, a man's only allowed one wife.
This is a good idea.
You don't understand.
-You have a wife already?
-No.
I'm not married.
Then I will wait.
It's not quite that simple, Janey.
You see, there are other people involved. I can't--
You asked me to wait, and I said I would wait.
Now you are trying to tell me something else.
Janey, look.
Sit down.
You see, what I am trying to explain to you....
You stay here tonight.
Get a good night's sleep.
We'll talk this over in the morning.
Do you mind if I sleep in here tonight?
No, I guess not.
What's wrong with your tent?
Things are getting pretty crowded over there.
Janey seems to think that fight with Charboneau... makes her my squaw.
By the way, what did you name this fork of the river?
Sacajawea.
What did you call the other one?
I called it Julia.
These are the mountains where my people live.
Somewhere up there is the end of the Louisiana Territory.
What do we do now, Captain?
Carry the boat or move the mountains?
We'll try to find a river that runs uphill.
Let go of the anchor!
Ready with the firelocks!
Cruzatte, hold her in the center!
Man the swivel gun!
Prepare to fire!
Stop. These are Shoshones.
Janey!
Get out of there!
This is my brother, Cameahwait.
We have much to be thankful for.
With these seeds we can grow food.
We will not go hungry when the snow falls.
The white chiefs have delivered my sister from our enemies.
We owe them more than we can pay.
We are your friends. You owe us nothing.
As friends, we ask your counsel and your help.
Speak of what you need.
We need horses to cross the mountains and someone to guide us.
We will repay you with food and supplies.
The white men say they are friends.
Let them give us guns, then, to fight the Minnetarees.
We are not here to make war among the tribes.
It is peace we want.
These are big words.
But words cannot feed us.
They cannot destroy our enemies.
I have talked with my sister.
These white men speak the truth.
Do the thoughts of a woman now guide our council?
I, Cameahwait, guide your council.
Now hear me.
I myself will take the white chiefs across the mountains.
Whatever they need, they will have.
Does any man oppose this?
Your sister, Sacajawea... she will remain here?
That is for her to say.
Before she was captured, she was promised to me.
Much time has passed since then,
Wild Eagle.
Many things have changed.
If there is someone else who claims her... we will settle it... between us.
It is already settled. My sister has told me.
She belongs to the chief with the red hair.
You will sleep here.
This is yours.
You are angry with me.
What did you tell your brother?
He wanted to know everything that has happened.
He said you belonged to me.
What did you tell him?
I told him that you fought Charboneau... and you won.
What else?
He is a man. He understands the rest.
But you lied.
There was nothing else to understand.
I did not lie.
I did not tell the truth.
-But I did not lie.
-Why?
Why didn't you tell the truth?
I was ashamed.
Ashamed?
He would think I did not please you.
I am sorry.
I will go now.
What are those for?
To keep evil spirits from our door.
What will happen if you leave now?
It is a man's right not to want a woman.
No. I mean, what will happen to you?
-I said I would go now.
-Janey, answer me.
I will be given to Wild Eagle.
You'll sleep here tonight.
From this lake, a river leads to the great salt water.
These white men are friends.
They come in peace.
You give my people food, they will give you canoes.
That is agreed.
-Sergeant, bring up the pack horses.
-Yes, sir.
Bahrie.
Go downriver to the land of the Nez Perce.
Tell them they are not to harm the white men.
Tell them Cameahwait said it.
This will not be forgotten by my people.
We are friends. That is enough.
She was supposed to leave with her brother.
Why is she still here?
She changed her mind.
She's coming with us.
Who told her she could?
I did.
-You better tell her she can't.
-Why?
You don't care anything about this girl's feelings, do you?
Any more than you care about Julia's.
I don't think that's any concern of yours.
Anything that happens here is a concern of mine.
Tell her to go back to her people.
Is that an order?
That's an order.
-Everything ready, Sergeant?
-Yes, sir.
We'll keep one canoe out ahead as point at all times.
The rest of you stay together.
You want to take the point?
You're giving the orders around here.
-Sgt. Gass, take the point.
-Yes, sir.
Launch your canoes!
Easy now.
Too much power.
Shove off!
Watch the rocks there. Hold them steady.
All clear.
Janey.
Janey, darling.
That's our point canoe!
Sergeant, send four men ashore.
Make sure they have plenty of ammunition.
Yes, sir.
Thayer, Collins, Fraser.
Better get started with your burial detail.
I'm sorry, Sergeant.
You'd better take that up with Capt. Lewis.
Yes, sir.
The Sergeant here has something he wants to say.
What is it, Sergeant?
-It's about the men, sir.
-What about them?
They've had enough.
We've been away 1 8 months.
They know we've gone beyond the Louisiana Territory... and they don't want to go any further.
-They're soldiers, aren't they?
-Yes, sir. They're good soldiers.
-There's something else, sir.
-What's that?
They know things ain't right between you and Capt. Clark.
I think that's got them worried more than anything else.
-Is that all, Sergeant?
-Yes, sir.
Then let's get on with the work.
Send out a patrol to scout the other side of the river.
Yes, sir.
George. Ross. I want two volunteers.
Where are you going?
That patrol's been out three hours now.
They may have run into trouble.
I think it's time somebody did something.
That is my responsibility, not yours.
From now on, you'll do as you're told.
-Just a minute.
-I told you not to bring that girl along.
You paid no attention.
Now I'm telling you for the last time.
Put her in a canoe and send her back.
-Sorry, Merne.
-I'm giving you a direct order.
If she goes, I go with her.
-I won't send her back.
-That is insubordination.
Why don't you prefer charges against me?
I will. If we ever get back,
I'll have you court-martialed.
I swear, I believe you would.
I've watched you with this girl.
You've been leading her on, the same as you did Julia.
Maybe you've forgotten about that.
But I have good reason to remember.
What are you trying to do, Merne, get even with me?
I'm not worried about you.
I'm thinking about Julia.
We might as well get one thing straight.
I'm in love with Janey.
-That's what you said about Julia.
-I love Janey. I'm gonna marry her.
I think you're a liar.
Merne, I....
Excuse me, gentlemen.
Go on to the camp, George.
Since you're not behaving like officers,
I'll not speak like a sergeant.
I don't know what's between you two, and I couldn't care less.
But if you have any sense of responsibility... you'll stop acting like a couple of schoolboys.
Them woods down there is crawling with Indians.
If we're to get out of this alive... you'll need every man in the outfit.
I'll follow you, but the others won't.
And I can't say that I blame them.
If you'll excuse me,
I'll get on with the burying.
Our Father, who art in heaven,
Hallowed be thy Name.
Thy kingdom come. Thy will be done...
On earth as it is in heaven.
Give us this day our daily bread.
And forgive us our trespasses...
As we forgive those who trespass against us.
And lead us not into temptation,
But deliver us from evil.
Amen.
I owe you men an explanation.
You volunteered to explore the Louisiana Territory... and you've accomplished your mission.
But I haven't yet accomplished mine.
I have orders from President Jefferson to push on further.
If this river can be followed to the ocean... the United States will be one nation from the Atlantic to the Pacific.
We've traveled a long, hard way together... and I'm not going to order you to follow me further.
You've served with courage and devotion.
And I think your sons will read about you in their history books.
To those of you who want to go on,
I can promise little.
I can't be sure we won't dig other graves.
All I can promise you... is a chance to serve your country well.
I'm going with Capt. Lewis.
Anybody who wants to join us, launch your canoes.
Well, what are you waiting for?
Ambush! Hold your canoes!
Ambush!
Watch the logs!
Board your canoes!
By right of exploration,
I claim for the United States of America... all the land we have traveled... from the Rocky Mountains to the Pacific Ocean.
Sgt. Gass, dismiss your men.
Fall out!
Have you changed your mind about taking the girl back with you?
No. Have you changed your mind about my court-martial?
Those charges are part of the official record.
You can check them for accuracy if you like.
I'll take your word for it, Captain.
You are sure of what we talked about last night?
If I go back to Washington, you go back with me.
You will be glad to see your people?
I don't know, Janey.
I don't know.
I ask you to bear this in mind... when you study the budget...
I am requesting for the year 1 807.
Come in.
-They're here, sir.
-Good. Show them in.
All right.
-Mr. President.
-Lewis, my boy, I'm glad to see you.
-Thank you.
-And this is Capt. Clark?
Lt. Clark, sir.
I hope you'll forgive that unfortunate mistake.
I have your certificate of promotion on my desk.
Thank you, sir.
I've also arranged a little surprise for you.
It won't repay the debt your country owes you... but I think it will be welcome all the same.
Please sit down, gentlemen.
-May I ask a favor, Mr. President?
-Of course.
There's someone outside
I'd like you to meet.
Someone who helped us a great deal.
Saved our lives, as a matter of fact.
By all means. Bring him in.
Thank you, sir.
Sir, may I present Sacajawea,
Shoshone Tribe.
Janey, this is our chief.
It is an honor to receive you, my dear.
I am very happy to be here.
Clark isn't exaggerating, sir.
We owe this girl a great deal.
She is responsible to a great extent for the success of the expedition.
I hope we can show you some measure of our gratitude.
Come in.
Come in, Julia.
How are you, Julia?
-Merne, it's good to see you.
-It's good to see you, Julia.
Julia, I want to present a visitor of ours.
-This is--
-Janey.
Thank you, my dear.
Janey was with them on the expedition.
Saved their lives, as a matter of fact.
We're very grateful to you.
Why don't you take Janey up to your room.
I haven't had a chance to talk to these two.
Of course, Mr. President.
I want to thank you very much.
You'll get your chance later, at the reception this evening.
Shall we go upstairs?
Well, gentlemen?
Before we talk, perhaps you'd like to read... the official record of the expedition.
Of course, we kept daily journals.
We have complete maps, charts, and so forth.
Good. I'm most anxious to.
Then we can talk, after I've read them.
Fine, sir.
Please make yourself at home.
I have to pick out a dress for tonight.
Later, I want you to meet my mother and father.
-You live in a house like this, too?
-No.
Compared to the White House, we live quite simply.
Didn't I hear the President call you Janey?
Capt. Clark gave me that name.
He said Sacajawea was too long.
The President said you saved his life.
What happened?
That was a long time ago.
I have forgotten.
Capt. Clark, he will be a chief now?
Yes.
I think perhaps he will.
I hope so, for his sake.
Then he would live in a house like this.
It's possible.
Someday, perhaps in this very house.
These are all yours?
I know it seems rather silly... but here in Washington, we have to have a dress for every occasion.
Don't worry. Your dress is lovely.
Among my people, there is not so much to learn.
A woman cooks for her man... works in the fields, and has the babies.
That is all.
I think that's quite a bit, don't you?
Here, I think it is different.
A little more complicated perhaps, but not so different.
The wife of a white man, what does she do?
That's a little hard to explain.
She does have certain social duties.
But these can be easily learned.
She runs her husband's home... entertains his friends... tries to make him happy and successful... and proud of being married to her.
Most important of all... she must love him very much.
But this is not enough.
I don't know.
You see...
I'm not married myself.
It's very beautiful.
Would you like to try it on?
You love him, too, don't you?
You like this? Please take it.
I won't be going to the reception tonight.
Julia.
What's wrong?
Nothing.
It's about Bill, isn't it?
I'm sorry.
I wish there was something I could do.
Don't be angry with him, Merne.
If anything happened between you two, I....
I'm proud of you both, what you've done together.
I don't want anything to spoil that.
If you'll excuse me, Julia... the President is waiting for these records.
Come in.
The President would like to see you in his study, Captain.
Do you know if he's read
Capt. Lewis' report, sir?
I believe he has.
Capt. Lewis is already there.
They are waiting for you.
After you, sir.
Come in.
I've just finished reading Lewis' report.
I don't know how you feel about it, but I think it's very clear and objective.
Yes, sir.
Anything you'd care to add from your own viewpoint?
No, sir.
I can assume, then, that these are the facts.
Yes, sir.
Excuse me, gentlemen.
I have to say goodbye to someone.
I'm curious about one thing, Lewis.
You were so meticulous about everything else.
Toward the end of your report, there are five pages missing.
Yes, something happened to those pages, sir.
I can't explain it.
Perhaps if you gave it some thought, you could reconstruct them.
I have thought about it, sir.
I find that I have completely forgotten the incident.
In any case,
I want to congratulate you both.
And I want to thank you with all my heart.
Please ask the guests to come in.
I'll be back at once.
Yes, sir.
Ladies and gentlemen, the President would like you to come in.
I wonder where Janey is.
Mrs. Hancock, have you seen Julia?
No, she hasn't come down yet.
Frankly, I'm a little concerned.
Martha.
I think I'll go upstairs and find out.
What's the matter? Where's Janey?
-She's gone, Bill.
-Gone where?
I wrote it all down just the way she told me.
''When you hear this,
I will be on my way back to my people.
''I have talked with his chief, and he is going to help me.
''He is a good man, and he is very wise.''
-The President had no right.
-Bill, please.
''Words do not come easy.
''I only know what is in my heart.
''I have seen your country now, and I have met your people.
''They were very kind to me.
''But it is not my country, and they are not my people.
''I am proud of what I am.
''I do not want to try to be something else.
''If I did, I would fail.
''I would fail you, but I would also fail myself...
''and all my people.
''Many women grow old and die...
''and never know the happiness I have had.
''For this, I will always be grateful.
''Now there are others who love and need you...
''as you will need them
in the years that lie ahead. ''
There is much we both can do
for our people.
Many things we have learned
from each other we can teach to them.
Patience, kindness...
and the wisdom to know the truth.
You would not have let me
say these things to you...
but in your heart,
you will know they are true.
You will be sad, as I am sad.
And you will think of me...
as I will think of you
many times in the years to come...
when you see a river of white water
dancing in the sun...
or clouds hanging high above the mountains.
But soon the memories will grow dim,
as memories should...
and there will be others to take their place.
May they be happy ones for you, my love...
as happy as those we shared together...
all the days of your life.
The coach!
The coach! The coach!
The coach! The coach! The coach!
What is the meaning of this?
Why this disorder?
His Highness's new coach.
It's arriving.
That's no reason for this lack of discipline.
Go back to your posts... all of you.
Out of a dream! Out of a dream!
- Just like a dream.
- Remarkable.
Magnif´cent.
How much would you say... my dear duke?
Much more than the grant for a chief justice, Your Honor.
I have little regard for the material things of life.
Would you say this coach represents one more little trinket for our poor, dear marquise?
Nothing His Highness might do could surprise me.
I doubt if our marquise will remain a widow much longer.
The bath is icy.
Now you're boiling me.
Oh, now there's something in my eye.
Let me.
Oh, it's only an eyelash.
There.
Thank you, Marquise.
You're my guardian angel.
What do you want, Martinez?
Your Highness, the coach is just crossing the palace square.
- The coach?
- My new coach.
The Santa Ana docked early this morning.
The coach has been carefully loaded onto an oxcart.
It remains only, to have the horses harnessed... the wheels mounted...
- And the bill paid.
- Oh, I want to see.
Shall I charge it to Your Highness's personal account... or shall I place it on the roster of off´cial expense?
Off´cial expenses, naturally.
Balthazar, Domingo,JosÚ, Martinez, these lazy rascals have left me here.
- You may have them beaten.
- Immediately, Your Highness.
- Your Highness should come and look.
- Oh, is it really as splendid as all that?
Beautiful, exquisite, breathtaking.
It glitters so I can hardly look at it.
- But why send all the way to Italy for it?
- Well, I always wanted a foreign coach.
In Spain, when I was young,
I always promised myself one... if ever I got out of debt.
- What graceful lines.
- Ah, but it's the craftsmanship that counts.
- Those springs, English steel.
- It's out of a dream.
- Magnif´cent, Your Highness.
- Your Highness has excelled himself.
A perfect piece of workmanship.
I congratulate you.
- Unbelievable.
- Quite superb.
Yes, yes, I know.
It's out of a dream.
What's that other vehicle coming into the square?
That wagon there?
Foreigners undoubtedly.
Those strange costumes, all those musical instruments... painted canvas.
If I didn't know better,
I'd say, they, were actors.
Actors? How shocking!
The bishop would certainly not approve.
Such a saint.
Here we are.
Maybe it's better inside.
After that ship, any kind of bed at all would be welcome.
Innkeeper.
Good day, sir.
Are you the innkeeper?
Yes. Are you the actors?
Don Antonio and his world-famous troupe of commedia dell'arte... just come from Italy,.
- Well, come inside.
- But your letter said -
We'd better have a little talk.
This way.
Yes, we'd better.
Well, how do you like the new world?
- It will be nice when it's f´nished.
- Throw wide the doors.
Advance.
Don't you feel sad seeing it go?
It was certainly the most comfortable room on that terrible ship.
Well, there it goes.
Good-bye.
I thought babies play, with emeralds here, hmm?
No streets paved with gold either.
No streets.
Those books certainly weren't true.
Those writers were only, exaggerating, I suppose.
- Let's go inside the inn.
- No, I won't move.
- I stay here.
- What for?
For the next cart to take me back to the port and Italy.
Be sensible.
You're just tired. That's all.
Mm-mmm. Look at Isabella.
Is she tired?
- With five babies.
- No, but-
And the others, not tired.
Not the way I am.
They still believe.
- Believe what? - That those two hours on the stage every night... are worth everything.
Well...
I'm not an actor, but...
I love you, Camilla... not the people you become for those two little hours every night.
Marry me.
Felipe, you read this man's letter.
He promised a world capital... a comfortable inn and a theater.
Here is the city... here is the inn.
As for the theater, step this way.
Our theater.
It's not exactly ready yet... but it never rains here.
The shed can be made into a very f´ne stage.
All you have to do is clean up the place.
Oh, Felipe.
- I'll provide the seats, and there's our theater. - And that's the public.
- Cool and comfortable.
- I'll treat with that -that innkeeper, my love.
You wait here a moment.
You're all young and strong.
It won't take you long.
It is too much work to make a theater out of this - of this -
- Barnyard.
- Thank you.
Permit me, Don Antonio.
- So, you claim to be Spanish, do you?
- Pure Castilian, sir.
- Which town?
- Toledo.
You've heard of my family then.
I'm Juan Aguirre's son.
- The great swordsman.
- Yes.
And I'm astounded at your greed... and ashamed that I have to protect these artists from a fellow Castilian.
Artists? Mountebanks!
Street singers!
Street singers? Us? The delight of all the crowned heads of Europe?
- Ha, ha!
- What percentage do you extort from them?
- Only 80%.
- Eighty per -
I paid for their passage,
I am ready to house and feed them.
While they construct a theater.
That's worth a lot more. You'll take 50%.
Oh, no. I'll take no less than 70... if they build a theater.
You mean 50.
And that's more prof´t than you deserve.
You can all get out.
More than I deserve indeed!
We'll go, but I'll teach you a lesson in honesty f´rst.
- Fernando, Manuel, Pedro! - Don't call your ruff´ans, or there'll be another lesson.
And I'll help you. Look at him.
Come, Felipe, let him stay in this pigsty.
Yes, better not cause any trouble, or it's Cuzco for you.
- It's what? - Cuzco. The army - they're trapped by Indians there... and not too particular how they get replacements.
- So be careful.
- If they're not particular, they'll take you, too.
Come, we'll go together.
You act bravely enough here.
Shh! Now, never mind that.
Very well, then.
You can stay... but I'll be losing money.
Since he's sitting up asking so nicely... shall we be gracious and stay?
My dear public.
Oh, my love.
I love you.
I love you.
Andiamo.
Within my heart, love "stroogles" to awake.
Struggles.
Within my heart, love strrr...
Str...
Oh, Felipe, is impossible.
I can't win them in a foreign language.
- Win who?
- Them -the audience.
The only "them" who matters.
- Is he an actor?
- Who? That old fool?
No.
- Rum and spirits. Cuatro reales.
- Shh!
Noble sirs and gentle ladies.
Rum and spirits. Cuatro reales.
- Don Antonio's world-famous troupe...
- Sit down! jesters to the crown heads of all Europe, greet you.
- We are proud to introduce...
- Rum and spirits. the ancient traditions of the commedia dell'arte... to your charming country.
I, Don Antonio...
- Salute you in the garb...
- What's his name? of the master of our ceremonies...
- and present to you our characters.
- Hello, grandfather!
First, Pantalone, the old merchant... as much a part of Venice, queen of the seas, as San Marco.
Pantalone.
Where are the pretty, ladies?
She's older than you are!
- Dr. Ballordo...
- She's older than you are! master of the classics, a fountain of empty words.
- He looks like...
- Papische Valento.
A military sight upon a quiet street... last to the fight and first to retreat.
Cuzco!
Fathered by Vesuvius... he's erupted in many countries.
To the French he's Polichinelle.
The English watered him down.
Poor Punch.
Our lovers.
Florindo, slightly ridiculous... like all sentimental cavaliers.
Isabella, tender yet perf´dious... like all women.
Harlequin, spirit of theater.
Our incarnation of Mercury... patron of thieves and go-betweens.
In his looking glass what he finds is Columbine!
Rum and spirits, cuatro reales.
Rum and spirits.
I'll hold hands with you, lady,.
I'd like to get through that mirror!
Music. Music.
Lock all the doors and windows.
If any gallant arrives to court my daughter, chase him away.
Are they good, these actors?
Brilliant, Senor Ramon.
Very well. We'll go in.
Near the stage.
- Don't they pay either?
- Silence.
That's Ramon, the bullf´ghter... the most popular man in the city.
If he likes the performance, it guarantees our success.
Ramon! Ramon!
- Cosa c'Þ?
- Toreador.
- Oh?
- The audience isn't there, Mistress Columbine.
- Here they are.
- Oh.
I thank you, Master Pantalone.
I thought it was the fashion here to look the other way.
Pssht! Ah.
They look better now,
Master Pantalone.
You there, don't glare at me like that.
I - I'm not a bull.
To arms! Indians!
Only the actors.
Go on dozing, Papa.
They seem to be enjoying themselves over there.
They might be less noisy about it.
Not dozing. Thinking.
Thank you so much.
- What for?
- For your enthusiasm.
Oh. Pardon.
So many worries.
- Let's raise the stakes.
- Why not?
100 piastres.
- I have a better idea.
- Which is?
Let's play for the new coach.
Against what?
One of your gold mines?
- You don't love me anymore.
- What have I done now?
Four years ago, when you arrived from Spain, I stood by you loyally... when you ordered my poor husband to Cuzco... a general commanding an outpost like that.
- Four years ago you would have given me any carriage in the world. - Ynez...
- But since those beastly Indians made me a poor, defenseless widow... - This coach doesn't belong to me.
It represents a tool of my profession... like a razor for a barber or a cannon for a general.
My poor husband. You know how frightened of Indians he was.
General Altamirano died a hero.
Listen to them.
I'm really curious to know what they're laughing about.
Martinez. Martinez.
Since you're already behind the door, why do you wait to come in?
You called, Your Highness?
Have a look at those actors and arrange for a performance at the palace.
Uh, which day would be convenient for the marquise?
Well, tomorrow Papa's being bled with leeches.
The day after, I have my purge.
Why not Thursday?
Thursday, Martinez.
Uh-uh.
Felipe! Felipe!
They like me, these people.
- Wait until you know them.
- I don't want to know them.
I want to feel they are there.
Like tonight. It was wonderful. Wonderful!
- Well, how much?
- Oh, the receipts.
- 19 piastres and three reales.
- No.
Unfortunately, it's true.
Which leaves, uh, 5.951 piastres you still owe me.
If things continue as well as this, you'll be out of debt in a year... and then you can start to make some money.
- But every seat was occupied.
- Let me see.
They don't pay.
Do you understand, Don Antonio?
Here, the people attend, but they don't pay.
He says it's traditional in the colony.
Well, back to reality.
Come, Felipe.
My dear friend, you cannot insult our nobility by asking them to pay... and the poor, as everywhere, are too poor... leaving us only the middle class as paying customers... people like myself.
You surely do not expect me to ask my few intimate friends to pay.
Not after all I've done for you.
Please, Felipe.
Have you told Don Antonio about us yet?
- Not yet.
- Well, you'd better.
You may f´nd your future husband f´ghting
Indians for want of something better to do.
Oh, don't be silly, please.
An admirer.
- Who is it?
- Se±orita Camilla?
- You?
- I want the pleasure of your company later.
I'll play the guitar, and you can sing for me.
And do I sing for the bulls, too?
You've heard them speak of me,
I dare say.
Ramon, the toreador.
They're always talking about me, following me around.
I might even get them to come to your little play here.
Really? Oh, so kind of you.
You ruin my f´rst entrance, and now you dare invite me?
Get out. Get out!
- Do you speak Italian?
- No.
Ah, what fortune.
A gentleman waiting to see you, Camilla.
- She's nervous.
- I understand.
Some of the bulls behave like that when they f´rst see me, too... the ones worth fighting and taming.
- Back to your cows!
- Camilla, I'll take care of this.
- Will you leave, sir.
- Felipe.
- Don't you understand you're annoying the lady?
- Annoying? You insult me... and you'll answer for it.
- Why, you impudent...
- Felipe. Felipe, please!
- When you like.
- Please, Felipe.
I'll be waiting.
Are you crazy?
Compose yourself. You have another visitor -a very important one.
- Oh, no! No!
- May I present Senor Martinez?
No, no, no.
What do you want from me tonight?
Can't I have a little quiet, please?
Senor Martinez is conf´dential secretary to His Highness, the viceroy.
How is the king? Well?
Good.
His Highness, the viceroy, has graciously invited the company... to give a performance at the palace.
- At the palace? They pay?
- Camilla.
His Highness's generosity is already legend in the colony.
Sit down, please.
Sorry.
My servants are so lazy.
A f´asco. It's impossible.
"Harlequin Gives Birth" was a bad choice.
Too elegant.
- I wanted to tell you that...
- Oh, we know already.
No, it went very well.
It's just that it's not considered elegant to applaud too loudly at court.
No, they don't like me.
Of course they do.
Ah! I can breathe again!
OlÚ!
I love them!
Charming. Charming.
Most amusing.
Didn't you f´nd it so?
- My dear duke?
- Unusual.
Unusual and very refreshing.
- Well, did you like it?
- Like it? Much too vulgar.
Vulgar? That's what I liked.
So we've observed, my dear.
Watch your sharp tongue, my angel.
You're just jealous, my sweet.
Jealous? If I wanted to...
Why argue about the impossible?
We two should unite against a real enemy.
- Who? - This dreadful mania of His
Highness for trying to mix with the rabble... going out in the streets in disguise... inviting these low comedians to the palace.
He can't have a very happy home life, can he, dear?
That's what I enjoyed about these Italians.
I couldn't understand a word they said, so I just presumed the dialogue was excellent.
Martinez, f´nd me some money.
Count... please tell the head of the troupe to come here.
I must confess I prefer not to consort with players.
Who knows what lies behind those masked faces.
I'd rather meet that little... how is she called?
Isabella. I'll wager she does a pretty minuet.
Bit too scrawny for me. I'm dancing the f´rst minuet with the marquise.
Leave my little girl in peace.
- She's already granted me the honor.
- Why you can hardly walk... much less dance.
Go to sleep, Adolfo, before I forget that I must respect my elders.
A splendid performance. Bravo.
Give my congratulations to your actors, and distribute this among them for me.
I am your humble servant,
Your Highness.
Martinez, send them something to drink.
After all those capers, your actors need our wine as well as our thanks.
Oh, and, Martinez, ask the ladies of the company to join us here for refreshments.
- Shall we not, Baron?
- A splendid idea, Your Highness.
Hear! Hear!
Che musica!
Ah. Such perfume.
- What's it like?
- Pork pie!
The smell of a good life, hmm?
Hee-hee, hee-hee, hee-hee.
I remind you that His Highness is awaiting the ladies.
Si, si. Andiamo, andiamo.
Oh, wait. All the gold.
Follow His Excellency.
- You go, Camilla.
- Not like this.
I beg you, please hurry.
All you need to do is send your excuses.
Just say you're tired.
I'm sure the viceroy will understand.
You don't want to see the court?
Excuse us.
We have only three women.
One is senile, another crawling with children.
All her children may be acrobats. Still...
This is the only presentable one.
- How do I address the viceroy?
- No ceremony here.
- Just say "Your Highness. "
- Your Highness.
Your Highness.
I'll be back in a moment.
Ah. Sorry.
A little rouge, a little powder.
- And with your little son.
- An artist is always the uncle.
To my mind, those actors' jokes were far too daring for such tender ears.
- How do you know?
- Well, I hardly think the bishop would approve.
- His Excellency is a saint.
- Tsk, tsk. Alas.
Mademoiselle, what is your name?
Columbine on the stage,
Your Highness.
In life, uh, Camilla.
I don't think that gentleman enjoyed our performance.
Our chief justice never enjoys anything.
- And what about them?
- Pretty little geese, but frightened of shadows.
- Come, Adolfo.
- You promised me this dance, Ynez.
I am pleased to accept now.
Oh.
May I ask Your Highness's permission to retire also?
If you're bored,
I can readily understand.
I am not.
It's so shiny and clean.
A beautiful sight.
There's an even more splendid view from there.
Get away! Get away!
You'll be called if wanted.
Really, it's like a new world,
Your Highness.
Is this world so different from yours?
We have a few tricks of speech now and then... one or two different gestures, a few rules.
Which I don't know, alas.
There.
- Where?
- Well, it's too dark to see, unfortunately... but by day we get a f´ne view of the cemetery.
Somewhere over there there's a gray flat building.
That's our prison.
Ah, at last.
Is this why you wanted to...
I must confess, in this heat, a wig is absolute torture.
As I thought. I'm glad I'm not vain.
- Forgive me.
- Of course.
Thank you. It's a rare occasion when I'm able to laugh like this.
Why? You should all be so happy.
- You're laden with gold.
- That's it. That's the point.
We're here only for this treacherous gold.
No one dreams of anything else.
And where gold commands, laughter vanishes.
If you had a gold mine here, you too would stop laughing.
No, no. Never.
If you did find one, what would you do?
Ah. Buy a beautiful golden coach.
Just as you did.
I want to ask Your Highness a favor.
- Granted.
- I must see the coach.
- You must?
- Mm-hmm.
- Well?
- No, no. Not now.
Shall we go?
Ah.
No.
He actually removed his peruke before her.
Vintage wine for those actors!
The extravagance! This whole party when the treasury's completely empty.
Just between us, I've already sent a personal note to my cousin, the general... one of His Catholic Majesty's great favorites.
I am certain that tomorrow His Excellency, our bishop, will be informed of this orgy.
Entertaining actresses!
Ah.
Ta-da. And not only is it a thing of beauty... but the craftsmanship is perfect.
- Devil take it.
- Allow me.
Well.
Can you solve everything as easily?
I slept here for f´ve months.
You what?
We traveled on the same boat, we two.
- Oh.
- May I?
- Of course.
- Thank you.
Here it is.
Mm-hmm.
Is that why you wanted to -
It's a good comb.
Well, I'm glad I'm not vain.
Oh, thank you.
Your Highness will please forgive us.
We were looking for
Mademoiselle Camilla.
Here she is.
I'll return her to you.
Your world, Camilla.
Your Highness.
And thank you again.
There he is.
Give me a cigar.
Oh, Columbine!
To a simple servant, master?
Oh, Columbine!
A servant is too busy master.
True love is not for me.
Ah, my mistress comes. Shh.
Pantalone, Dr. Ballordo, Florindo... all in love with Isabella.
Come. We will take their letters and money.
Money. Always money.
There must be more to life.
Within my heart, love struggles to awake.
Columbine!
Please, Felipe.
Oh, my love.
Present for those too old in love.
Here. Nice, huh?
I'm afraid to hurt it jumping through the window.
- Uh, no, I'm leaving.
- Where to?
I've been offered a captaincy in this war they're f´ghting here. I'm taking it.
Florindo...
I am yours.
Harlequin.
I think you are doing the right thing.
It's better to go and f´ght savages.
You have a chance of winning at least.
Trying to win Camilla, that's something else.
- The one I adore.
- The one I hate.
That's very nice.
Take it to her.
Good-bye, then, Don Antonio.
Thank you for all you've done for me.
Addio.
His Highness, in appreciation of your great talent... hopes you will accept this token.
Oh, thank you.
Oh, mamma mia.
- Real gold?
- Yes.
For me?
Wonderful!
Wonderful, wonderful, huh?
Things have certainly changed for you since I was...
- Loo...
- Give me that.
- Why?
- I'll return it to His Highness myself.
- You're mad! He is mad.
- Give me that.
- No, Felipe!
- Sir!
- Give it to me!
- Sir!
Leave me alone. No! Aiuto!
Columbine! Columbine!
Aiuto!
I hate you! Aiuto!
Ow!
Aiuto! Aiuto! Aiuto!
Columbine! Columbine!
Camilla.
Camilla!
Musica. Dottore, improvvisa.
Musica!
Mamma mia!
Aiuto! Aiuto!
They'll be yelling for their money back in a minute.
Take it inside.
Please, Felipe.
Felipe!
Felipe, listen. Listen.
Because you are jealous of my success.
Of your success?
No. Of this!
I don't care!
Good evening.
Camilla! Camilla!
Gentlemen, I request your presence at a meeting of the council of grandees... to take place tomorrow morning at 10:00.
May one know the object of this meeting?
- I...
- With your permission, Your Highness... a last detail.
Your servant, Your Highness.
I shall request that all nobility at present residing in the colony... make a voluntary contribution to our treasury for the war effort.
But we've no more money left for that sort of thing.
We've already been bled white giving donations for those miserable paupers...
His Excellency our bishop looks after.
- Such a saint.
- Why not call things by their real names?
You intend taxing the nobility.
That is the fact.
Nobility has never paid taxes in any country of the world.
Never. Down with taxes.
I am suggesting a completely voluntary and isolated contribution... for a state of emergency.
In such an emergency we should like to make sure that our contributions are isolated. for the purpose of paying soldiers and purchasing arms.
What do you mean?
What are you insinuating?
I don't insinuate.
I question.
Who, for example, paid for this coach of yours?
Lying so strangely idle for months.
Its proprietor - the state.
Don't you think it so great an emergency... the state could more readily have used the company of fusiliers?
If the state treasury paid, it belongs to us as well.
Most entirely Adolfo.
Hear! Hear!
My dear viscount, it doesn't belong to any of us.
It's a symbol, and I await the proper occasion to display it.
The natives here need symbols.
This coach, I assure you, is worth at least 800 muskets.
Since we're at war, why not use so powerful a weapon... place it at our disposal?
The duchess and I will give the rabble a taste of Spanish glory they'll never forget.
If this coach is the property of the state... surely it owes its prestige to the guardian of justice... the sentinel of His Majesty's laws.
What about my poor little girl, conf´ned to bed because of unjust treatment at court?
And my riding along with her will give a certain tone.
My compliments, gentlemen.
I'm deeply touched by your devotion to our cause... which flinches at no sacrif´ce.
If I had known, I should have ordered a regiment of carriages.
However, the observation of the duke relative to fusiliers... places this coach in a new light.
When I ordered it, we were at peace.
Now, unfortunately, we're at war and need cannons to win.
So, gentlemen, I decide to consider the purchase of the coach... as an entirely personal obligation.
But let me remind you...
Gentlemen, I shall see you tomorrow in the council hall.
But the coach - when can we start riding in the coach?
Enough of the coach.
I told you. I will pay... but my plans for it are none of your concern.
Good day, gentlemen.
And don't forget - contributions and the war, tomorrow at 10:00.
But tonight, dinner with a lady.
Inform her, Martinez.
Mademoiselle Camilla's new home is very nice, Your Highness.
A great improvement over the inn.
Cleaner and a little more privacy.
I hope.
My beautiful home!
If the heart of a man is depressed with cares
The mist is dispelled when a woman appears
Like the notes of a f´ddle
She sweetly, sweetly raises the spirits
And charms our ears
Roses and lilies her cheeks disclose
But her ripe lips are more sweet than those
Press her, caress her with blisses, her kisses
Tonight again.
He might learn another song.
Your Highness, this way, please.
That my heart calls to hers flying upward, upward
Camilla.
Why do the flowers bring her near
Good evening, Your Highness.
Closing the shutters in this heat?
Privacy isn't worth it.
Yes, but that music, it's so loud.
Isabella likes it.
Toss him a flower.
He'll be pleased.
Come.
It's the custom here.
Isabella will appreciate it.
Well, what luxury.
Hmm, this looks delicious.
Pork pie, homemade.
Well, this knife isn't very sharp.
Have you another?
- Ah. Sorry.
- Roses and lilies her cheeks disclose
But her ripe lips are more sweet than those
- That better.
- Press her, caress her
- That's better.
- With blisses, her kisses
Dissolve us in pleasure
And soft repose
Ah, at last, huh?
Why? The song was charming.
You're not jealous at all, are you?
We highly civilized people... so-called... no longer have the energy to feel such a simple emotion, I'm afraid.
A- An ordinary man becomes sentimental when his sweetheart betrays him.
He beats her and cries... tears his hair out...
Does a bit of knifing.
All this is so noisy and untidy.
Really far too tiring.
This looks very good.
I want to ask you something,
Your Highness.
Be brave. I shall answer at length, you may be sure.
Can they be learned?
What?
All those nice little tricks - your ease, the way you dismiss everything we feel is so important.
It depends...
Strange, but that's how it is.
It depends on which sex you are.
The country lout remains that always.
His unwashed childhood pierces the perfume of gold and good living.
But the weaker sex have that extraordinary talent... of completely adapting themselves.
Give her a good manicure... and perhaps a dancing master that knows his business - and, of course, a lover of suitable rank... with these and a gifted woman, one can create the most arrogant of duchesses.
And tomorrow I shall prove it to you... and to all those tiresome drabs at my court.
Tomorrow, when I give you the coach.
Eh?
That coach? For me?
That coach.
It's the only one that matters.
You must go to the palace tomorrow and ride away in it.
It's a feast day, and there'll be a bullf´ght... and everyone will be out to see you and admire you.
You're joking.
That coach for me?
Oh, mamma mia!
Oh, forgive me. Forgive me.
Now that I have so f´ne a coach,
I must try to behave like a lady.
Will Your Highness would be kind enough to sit down?
- Oh, no, no, no.
- No?
A grave mistake. Never forget, my dear, that every woman is an empress.
Any man, no matter how high his rank, is always her servant.
King Louis XIV, uh..., a distant relative of mine... uh, indirectly... when at home, never passed a serving maid without dusting the floor with the plume of his hat.
- Yes, but you're the king here.
- And you must be seated f´rst.
- Oh, thank you.
- No, no, no. Here.
- Uh, but that's for you.
- No, no, no.
Now, I await your permission.
Well. Will Your Highness would be... would be enough to... to... to be...
Ferdinand, sit down.
- Ramon!
- Ramon!
Camilla! Camilla!
Camilla!
Get out of the doorway!
- My coach, please.
- Well, uh...
- It's not exactly ready yet.
- Is something wrong?
Well, His Highness gave instruction, but will you wait in His Highness's suite?
- Mm-hmm.
- This way, mademoiselle.
Come here.
- The new driver.
- Arriving for her orders.
Or to collect her wages.
- Well, well, well.
- Disgraceful.
- An actress.
- It's that actress Camilla.
Coming to take away our coach.
It isn't fair.
How many silver mines are located west of Cuzco?
- Two belonging to the duke, three to the marquise. - Three? What a woman.
- My dear.
- Ferdinand.
Everything in order. Forgive me.
This council meeting demands my presence.
- Yes, but -
- Your coach is ready. Just pick it up.
- Isn't that so?
- Not exactly, Your Highness.
- Why isn't it? - May I remind Your Highness that the grandees are present... and the ladies have gathered to felicitate Y. H. on the anniversary of the Battle of Monte Blanco.
- No. Congratulations.
- Thank you, my dear.
- Congratulations!
- Prepare the coach at once.
- Hurry, hurry.
- If they rage a bit, all the better.
- Oh, thank you. - These council meetings... if I could only f´nd some way to abolish them.
Oh, yes, I know, my love.
Don't worry.
Your coach will be ready, in five minutes.
- All you have to do is go down and ride away in it. - Thank you, my love.
Thank you, my love.
Thank you. Sorry.
- How many belong to the viscount?
- Two silver mines.
- Indians!
- Quiet, Baron.
Gentlemen, the council is in session.
You may be seated.
Order of the day, the war and its related expenditures.
I must f´rst announce the unfortunate news that reliable sources report... that several extremely cordial talks have taken place between our enemies.
We shall have to face their combined forces in the not-too-distant future... which will certainly mean the loss of Cuzco and its wayside attractions... those mines of which you are so sentimentally fond.
Your Highness, we are in full accord.
We have met and decided -all of us- to contribute to the war effort.
His Most Catholic Majesty, the king of Spain, has never appealed in vain... to the patriotic fervor of the nobility of this colony.
Long live the king.
You mean, gentlemen, that you agree to a voluntary contribution to our war effort?
Well, thank you, gentlemen.
It's a handsome and generous deed.
Perhaps it would be well to f´x the amount of your contribution now.
We have already agreed to a f´rst sacrif´ce of f´ve million piastres.
Thank you again.
I'm deeply touched.
So much so I hardly know what to say.
- I have prepared a few words.
- Not now.
We have attached a small condition to our contribution.
Of course. Certainly.
Just tell me this little condition and...
Uh, a moment, gentlemen. I seem to lack a certain important document.
No, no. Stay here.
History gives us many examples...
- Did you want me?
- Look.
- My dear, I...
- What's she doing here?
- I don't know.
- You told me she wasn't at court anymore.
Well, she was ill.
She's evidently cured now.
- You told her to come back.
- Me? Of course I didn't.
I'm not too sure. Hmm.
Anyway, make her leave now, hmm?
Why don't you go down and get your coach?
- Oh, yes, and leave you alone with her?
- No, no. I'm in the council meeting.
- Please go and take your coach.
- Not yet. Not yet.
- Well - Well, then, be quiet.
- I am quiet.
I am quiet.
Rodriguez of the crossed eyes... when Queen Isabella commenced her siege of Granada, followed...
The glorious example of his queen... and vowed to wear the same shirt for the duration.
That siege, as you know, lasted 12 years.
And the shirt in question...
- Ferdinand. - Rests to this day as the foremost treasure of my family.
Voluntary sacrifices on the part of our aristocracy...
- Now, may I see you out?
- Not before I tell you you're in danger.
I swear that you're in grave peril.
You must do as the council asks.
The council? But they're so nice today like little lambs.
It's the f´rst time
I've enjoyed a meeting.
I think you'd better go lie down.
Too many purges, my dear.
Go home.
Now, do go home.
Our distinguished ancestor, of his own free will... sold all the family silver.
What did he do with the money from the sale?
History tells us, gentlemen.
History notes it.
He generously equipped a whole company of f´ghting men.
- Well, what's the matter now?
- I'm asking you that.
Will you put that thing down and be quiet.
- Has she left, that one?
- She's leaving now -right now.
Get her away quickly, eh?
Or she'll be sick in bed again... especially after I throw her down the staircase.
- Be calm. Now, please be calm.
- I am calm.
Years after the victory, the same money lender... was reported as having been burned at the stake in the public square... which naturally enabled the silver to be returned to the family.
You want to get rid of me to go to another woman.
Whatever in the world could make you... think that?
- If I ever meet her face-to-face, I will raise such a scandal! - Shh! Please be calm!
- Is it true that you gave away my coach?
- Your coach?
Oh, my vapors! My vapors.
Oh, Ynez, I beg you, faint at home, not here!
They pretended to be converted to Islam, sported the turban.
Very interesting, my dear viscount.
And the clever devils married many wives.
That's enough nonsense.
She's just leaving.
I can absolutely give you my word.
- It's just as if she was never here.
- Except she's still here.
Look, once again, I ask you, please leave my guitar alone.
While you go to get your coach,
I'm going to get her out. Def´nitely.
I hope!
Hmph!
Well, don't you agree, gentlemen, that everything possible has been discussed?
Happily your generosity has made this council meeting quite superfluous.
Your Highness has not forgotten that there's a condition to our contribution.
Well, may I know what it is?
We are proud to give our money... and, if necessary our lives... for the external defense of the colony.
But only on the condition that our colony be as strongly defended internally.
Well, there's hardly any need for that.
The natives here are too lazy to revolt.
You don't know of any revolutionaries in this city, do you?
I know one. You.
Always the practical joker, eh, my dear duke?
I don't joke.
Something has happened which we all consider most serious.
You yourself explained the importance of the golden coach... qualifying it as a symbol.
You pointed out its effect on the population... and now you have given away this symbol of our glory to a common actress.
Our condition is... that you renounce your gift of this coach to a highly unworthy person.
And if I refuse, no money for the war?
If you refuse, we are determined to invoke the privilege accorded the nobles of this colony... by His Most Catholic Majesty,
Charles V... to depose his viceroy of the New Indies and constitute a provisional government.
You forget.
His Majesty's decree specif´es... that such a move requires the signed approval of our bishop.
We shall obtain it.
While His Excellency is steadfast in his refusal to interfere with state affairs...
Precisely, who is riding in that coach.
I have here two short decrees.
We ask very little of you.
One, an authorization for an attachment to the coach by the government of the colony... and its restriction to off´cial purposes only.
Two, prohibiting entrance to this palace... to all persons not descended from at least eight noble ancestors.
I cannot sign them.
So much the worse for you.
Martinez... give me a pen.
Very well.
Give them to me.
And you sign it... doing what they tell you to do.
I thought you were great.
A great man.
But you're little.
Little.
Too little for me.
Oh, welcome back.
- Oh.
- Ah, I forgot.
- And now I take my coach.
- Papa!
- Papa, please.
- Papa!
- You.
- Don't be frightened. I'm holding the fort.
- My coach.
- Her coach? What does she mean her coach?
- It's my coach!
- Mademoiselle Camilla's coach.
Mademoiselle Camilla's coach.
Bring out the coach!
- Tear up your decrees.
- You fool! You traitor!
Don't you realize the consequences?
I adiourn this meeting.
He's a traitor!
The man's a traitor!
An absolute traitor! A fool!
At the end of the second act... when Columbine goes, driven away by her masters... there's a tradition that you seem not to know... the comedians bow to her.
And one other tradition you may well respect.
Isabella, our great lady, never listens behind doors.
Please, open the door.
My dear friends, the coach is mine!
Thank you.
To the bullf´ght.
- To the bullf´ght!
- To the bullf´ght!
Hey, they weren't supposed to give it to her.
Were you at that bullf´ght this afternoon, Balthazar?
Uh, yes, Your Highness.
Tell me something, Balthazar.
Have you ever been in love?
Like everybody else, Your Highness.
Were you ever deceived in love?
Of course, Your Highness.
Just like everybody else.
- Humiliated?
- Oh, Your Highness.
Ridiculed? Scoffed at publicly?
And after having been deceived and humiliated in love... did you ever lower yourself to f´nd her again... the woman you loved?
Oh, no. Never, Your Highness.
I may have been an idiot, but never that crazy.
And you were right!
Oh, that Jezebel!
The ingrate! I despise her!
I detest her!
- Your Highness called?
- No! Yes!
Martinez, arrange for my escort.
Tomorrow morning, His Excellency the bishop is privileged to order the hangman for me.
But I'm still the viceroy tonight, and I order an escort!
Very well, Your Highness.
Shall I inform...
No! Better not.
Don't let her know.
I want to...
Yes, you're right.
You may inform the lady.
- What is it?
- For the viceroy.
Take it away.
Not even a glass of water for that wishy-washy.
- Take it away. Get out.
- Where are your manners?
I'll teach him manners!
Do you love the viceroy?
- Go to bed.
- But the viceroy.
You!
Surprised?
You!
Me. You gave me a sign... so here I am.
I don't understand why you're all so surprised.
I'm not surprised.
You were waiting for me.
I knew you would be.
Camilla, we're meant for each other, you and me.
King of the bullring and queen of the stage.
Your public is at your feet now, and mine is at mine... like one of my bulls.
You bring your public to me, and I'll bring mine to you... and they'll go mad to see us together.
Every real king and queen will be jealous.
Only one thing I warn you about:
I'll be jealous, too. Understand?
If another man speaks to you alone, if you smile at some man I don't like... or even if you look at him in that way you do, he dies right here.
I swear it.
Like a little bull.
OlÚ. With one stroke.
Ah. At last...
I f´nd a real man.
Now I know what is so wonderful about you.
You're simple.
You have nothing inside.
Absolutely nothing.
Nothing complicated, I mean.
Ah. Such a change.
Maria!
Hello.
- Are you the viceroy?
- The viceroy? Much more than a viceroy.
- I'm a king.
- The king!
The king!
- The king!
- Guilio.
- How are you?
- Bene.
That's a good boy.
- The king.
- Oh, my.
Stay here.
I'll tell Camilla.
The king.
And one other thing you must absolutely do.
- Give back the coach.
- Are you mad?
- My coach? Why?
- Because another man gave it to you.
Oh. Yes, but I have used it so little.
All the better.
You and I go about only on horseback.
- The public will like that.
- OlÚ!
Can you f´nd a very small, quiet horse for me?
What do you want?
Why not talk about it tomorrow, eh?
Come and dine here. I...
I'll make a pork pie for you.
- No.
- Oh. Why? You don't like pork pie?
You were expecting another man.
Go ahead. Admit him to die on the point of my sword.
Oh, put that away, idiot.
It's only the viceroy.
How can you be jealous after the way I treated him?
Very well. You can receive him just long enough to tell him that you belong to me.
- Surely. - And give him back his coach.
I stay here and listen.
Uh, it's a wonderful idea.
Uh, you... you wait, huh?
Go in there.
And be quiet.
- Keep calm, Camilla.
- Don't worry. Come.
The king!
Felipe!
- Oh!
- Isabella, how are you?
Huh.
- Camilla.
- Oh, Felipe.
You're still alive, and you're here.
Oh, Felipe.
How thin you are.
You must be starving.
- There's pork pie left.
- No. No pork pie for him.
Spaghetti.
You loved spaghetti, remember?
You loved spaghetti.
Camilla, you're happy?
You've had great success.
And great complication.
Success is not always enough.
But you -you.
Are you happy, huh?
Yes. Very happy.
I've learned a great many things since we were together.
Tell me, Felipe.
I was a prisoner of the Indians for many months.
At f´rst it was miserable.
Then I began to learn their language and to understand their way of life.
Now I know them.
They're not savages. They helped me discover truth and kindness... and beauty.
Tell me.
They're much better than we are.
That's what I've discovered.
I'm going back to the Indians, Camilla.
I'm going to leave this... civilization... that's making us brutal and dishonest... start a new life, close to nature... among rivers and forests.
A new life with you, Camilla.
- Will you come back with me?
- That's what I wanted to hear.
Won't they dance with joy to see us arrive in the coach?
You know, it's mine now.
Yes. So I see.
We'll have to give up the idea of traveling in it, though.
Where we're going, there aren't any paths wide enough.
I suppose I can live without it.
All that's f´nished.
I told him once... but evidently I must tell him again.
When?
It's really the viceroy.
Now.
Your Highness.
- Camilla, I...
- If Your Highness will follow me.
Please.
Uno, due.
Sorry. Not here.
This way, if you please.
Sit down, please.
Sit down.
Does he speak Italian yet?
Listen.
Stay here.
Che bella collana.
Che bella, bella.
Che bella collana. Che bella, bella.
Che bella collana.
This strange room.
Why here?
This room is reserved for people of quality.
Eight noble ancestors... at least.
You're very cruel.
Forgive me, Camilla.
I ask your pardon.
You despise me, and you're right.
I was a fool.
Camilla, help me.
I'm very unhappy.
Oh.
A person of your rank unhappy?
You surprise me.
I surprise myself.
Living now means only suffering.
- You suffer?
- I do.
From jealousy?
Jealousy.
And do you desire to meet your rival face-to-face?
I can't think of anything else.
Would you insult him?
I'm afraid I would.
- And kill him?
- Joyfully.
You'd like to be an ordinary man.
Yes.
Ha! Something's changed you.
Let me see.
Ah, yes, you're different.
What's happened?
Oh, nothing very important.
I'm unemployed.
Can your troupe use another actor?
- What happened?
- This morning, after you left...
I refused to sign their decree... bow down to their ultimatum.
In reprisal, they've decided to depose me.
- Can they?
- If the bishop approves, yes.
- But he won't.
- I'm afraid he will.
Because of me.
It's worth it.
Because of me.
That's terrible.
- Terrible.
- No, no, it's not.
Now I can love you like an ordinary man.
You love me like a man.
Can I love... like a real woman?
The king.
The king!
Ah. So this is the attraction, huh?
One for me.
You.
I told you I'd be waiting.
Now... it's just the two of us.
Oh, no, you don't.
Gentlemen, please.
Come on, you.
En garde!
Be reasonable. Swords aren't gonna...
Quiet!
Really!
Now, now, gentlemen.
You mustn't look!
Don't get excited!
Besides, dueling is forbidden.
I must understand.
I'm absolutely sincere in life... and on the stage.
Then why do I succeed on the stage... and destroy everything in my life?
Where is truth?
Where does the theater end... and life begin?
You're evidently tired of the stage.
And, incidentally, my political career... seems to have come to a rather, uh, dismal end.
What do you think you're doing?
We might well ask that question of you, mademoiselle.
I'm sure these gentlemen are as amazed as I am at this strange family reunion.
Go away.
Go away, all of you.
Everything all right, Your Highness?
Police. Police.
Police. Police.
Don't be unhappy, Camilla.
We are artists... and the world is our home.
Let's move on.
I stay.
I stay with my coach.
Real silk, real gold.
Nothing else left.
You fool!
You want us to wait around... to give one last performance in the public square... with the hangman introducing the characters?
We are in real danger.
We are not the only ones.
I stay.
Did you hear the news? They've arrested all Camilla's friends last night.
Ramon and that soldier will be sent to the gallows.
As for the viceroy, the bishop is on his way.
Now he'll be deposed for certain, and a convent for Camilla.
That settles it. I'm swearing my men over to the duke, the pig.
He'll certainly be appointed viceroy.
And what difference is one highness from another to us?
One thing I know:
When there's a political crisis... or a military defeat or any shift of power... choose your moment, change your colors... and go right along with whoever's on top.
There he is.
I'm gonna speak with him.
Halt!
Halt! When His Highness's visitors arrive, you're to stand to attention.
Attention, all of you!
Now we've lost our chance.
Why did you stop us?
Because -
Because His Highness -
Because I don't like the duke.
Neither do I.
Look! Here comes the coach!
The golden coach!
Camilla! Camilla!
Camilla! Camilla!
Thank you, my daughter.
Beloved children... in this colony, and in our world... true charity is all too rare.
Today, I have witnessed an act of pure charity.
Mademoiselle Camilla owned a coach... a golden coach... which all of you here at court coveted... and all the colony, admired.
She has been so generous as to give her coveted, admired coach... to our church.
In the future, when a person facing death... begs for the solace of religion... this golden coach... will carry the last sacraments to him... in time for his soul to achieve salvation.
Mademoiselle Camilla's gift was the act of pure charity,...
I witnessed today... and I have come here to proclaim it.
Oh, Mademoiselle Camilla... has also promised to sing at the high mass.
- Oh!
- I would like all of you to attend... as a token of peace... and reconciliation.
I want to see His Highness... surrounded by the gentlemen of his court... with their ladies.
I would like everyone in the city present.
And most especially all of our actors.
Ladies and gentlemen, to celebrate the triumph of Camilla... over the intrigues of the court...
I would have liked to present to you... a new melodrama in the Italian style... but Camilla is still missing.
Camilla!
Camilla, on stage!
Don't waste your time in the so-called real life.
You belong to us... the actors, acrobats... mimes, clowns, mountebanks.
Your only way to find happiness is on any stage... any platform, any public place... during those two little hours when you become another person... your true self.
Felipe...
Ramon... the viceroy... disappeared... gone.
Don't they exist anymore?
Disappeared.
Now they are a part of the audience.
Do you miss them?
A little.
Armies, for the most part, are made up of men drawn from simple and peaceful lives.
In time of war, they suddenly find themselves... living under conditions of violence, requiring new rules of conduct that are in direct contrast... to the conditions they lived under as civilians.
They learn to accept this and to perform their duties as fighting men.
But some begin to perform, as military language puts it,
"at the risk of life, above and beyond the call of duty."
Military histories are filled with incredible examples of individual courage... that are only made more incredible by the fact that they were everyday events.
As Senior Staff Officer at Supreme
Headquarters in Worid War Il, it was my privilege to know the records of many such men.
The story you are about to see is theirs:
The true story of the foot soldier, as seen through the eyes of one of them, Audie L. Murphy.
He received every decoration for valor that his country could award, and he became the most decorated soldier for combat action... in the military history of the United States.
In 1937, in northeast
Texas, at the age of 12,
Murphy was already a fair rifleman.
I don't suppose you giris have had time to fill the wood box. Uh-uh, Audie.
Hey, Audie, look at me!
Get off that woodpile, Preston.
Do you want to break a leg?
Did you get another rabbit today, Audie?
Yeah. Now you come with me.
You sit down right over there.
You watch that until I get back, okay? Okay.
It'll keep you off the woodpile.
Now, you watch it.
Hi, Mom. Audie.
I saw Mr. Huston today. He said he'd get the window fixed.
- That's good of him.
- He was askin' about Pa.
No word today.
But we'll be hearing from him real soon.
Hi, Mr. Brooks! Hi!
Any mail for us today, Mr. Brooks?
Nothing today, Mrs.
Murphy. Sorry.
Thank you. Maybe tomorrow. Bye.
Why does Mom get so worried when no mail comes?
Because we got no money.
Here, take these to the house.
Where are you goin'?
I just made my mind up about something.
When he makes up his mind, he sure does it sudden. Where is he goin'?
Hi, Mr. Huston. Hello, Audie.
That was a first-rate job you did on that chicken coop the other day. Thanks.
Hi, Mrs. Huston. Hello, Audie.
Sir, I know you don't hire any steady help except at picking time, but could you give me a full-time job?
A full-time job?
I wouldn't want much money, and you could keep half until we pay back what we owe you.
What does your ma say to that? I wanted to talk to you before I said anything to her.
It's not right. Why, you'd have to quit school.
Yes, ma'am, but I need the money.
What about your sister in Farmersville?
Can't she help? Edna.
Corinne's helped all she can, but, well, she's got a family of her own to take care of.
A boy your age! You can't do it, Ben.
This is man's talk.
Will you please go to the house, and let me run the farm?
Seems like she's forgot, Audie,
I never finished school neither.
A couple years older than you, I quit to go in the Marines when we was in the big war.
Sometimes I wish I'd stayed in.
Probably be retired by now on more money than I make out of the farm.
Now about that job...
I guess the best thing to do is leave it to your ma.
Thanks a lot, Mr. Huston.
Ma, I got a full-time job!
I'm gonna work for Mr. Huston in the morning.
But you've got to go to school.
I don't care for school.
I don't like it anymore.
You can't stop your education now.
I'll learn, Ma. I'll read books.
We can't go on without money.
We can manage a little longer.
Your daddy's doing the best he can, and we can wait...
We can't keep waitin' for some old letter that maybe won't ever get here.
- What's the matter, Mom?
- Nothing, dear.
Audie and I were just talking things over.
Something bad? Of course not.
We just decided who the head of the family is.
It's your turn. I did them yesterday!
You did not! Gene keeps saying...
Shh! Gene keeps saying it's my turn to do the dishes today.
Who did them yesterday?
I forget.
Beatrice and I did them, and he knows it.
Then you do them today, and you won't forget tomorrow.
Besides, your hands could use a little soap and water.
Smarty. I told you so.
Time for breakfast, Mom.
Oh, thank you.
All the kids are home from Sunday school.
They can do everything that needs to be done today, so don't you try to get up.
Yes, sir.
I'm gonna take a run over to Mr. Huston's.
But this is Sunday.
This is not about work. Jim, their nephew, is on leave from the Marines,
I haven't seen him since he went in.
Oh, I see.
You try to eat. I won't be long.
All right.
The Japanese bombers swept over the island...
Come in, Audie. At 7:55 this morning, Honolulu time.
Pearl Harbor has been attacked.
The attack was without warning,
and launched from aircraft carriers standing off Hawaii.
Casualties among naval personnel will run into the thousands.
At Hickam Field, the barracks sustained a direct hit.
Details are at a minimum, but we will continue to interrupt broadcasts...
as more information reaches us.
Ben, we're really at war.
We sure are. How does this affect you, Jim?
I'll probably be ordered back to base right away.
It'll be an honor to serve, and don't you ever
forget it.! You've got the best training!
I've had a lot of it, anyway.
Why, you leathernecks...
will have this war won in two months.
Just wish I was young enough to help you do it.
Biggest mistake I made was gettin' out.
Why, I might have been a general by this time.
I'll bet you... Never mind, General.
War or no war, you boys are gonna eat the doughnuts I fixed.
I'll get a pitcher of milk.
I was too optimistic, Audie, but so was a lot of folks.
War is gonna last longer than most of us figured. How aboutJim?
You heard from him lately? He's doin' real good. Up to sergeant now.
Audie!
You gotta come home! It's Ma!
All of a sudden Ma got worse!
How about Doc Snyder?
Is he with her? I called him.
He should be by now.
Doc, is she...
She went peacefully.
I should have been with her.
She didn't know, Audie.
She was happy and proud of you and her family, right up till the end.
I'll telephone Corinne...
and make all the necessary arrangements.
If you don't let the children come into the church orphanage,
Social Welfare will place them in some public institution.
I took care of'em for a long time.
I can take care of'em now.
He's right, Audie.
All right... if that's the way it has to be.
As soon as I can, I'm gonna get them out.
I know this must seem like the end of the worid, Audie, after taking care of your family all these years, but look at it another way.
You've got no responsibilities left now, except to yourself.
It's time you were thinking about your future.
I have been. That's what
I wanted to tell you.
After all the talk you and I had about it, I've decided to go into the service.
I was hoping you'd say that.
It'll be a great chance for you to catch up on your education.
Yeah. The only thing is, I hate running out on the kids. They've had enough of that.
You can do more for 'em with your service pay than you can by staying here.
I guess I hadn't thought of it that way.
Course, being under age, you'll have to get a letter of permissión.
I'll get Corinne to write one for me.
Good-bye, Mr. Huston. Thanks.
If I were you, Audie, I'd think about it for a career.
You stay in 20 years, and you can retire on good money.
Don't make the mistake that I made.
I might have been a general...
Yes, sir. I'll remember that.
It'll take more than a letter from your guardian to get you in this outfit, sonny.
We separate the men from the boys, but we like to have something to start with.
Why don't you try the Army?
I'm sorry. The Navy makes men out of boys, but you're too much of a job for us.
Why don't you try the Army?
Attention! Attention, please!
This being our fourth day at sea, it is now permissible... to report our destination as being French North Africa,
which we will reach in approximately five more days.
According to the last communique on the fighting in Tunisia,
the Axis forces are still retreating toward the coast.
Their losses in men and equipment are reported to be extremely high.
Further bulletins will be announced as received. That is all.
Sure picked a beaut for acting platoon sergeant, didn't they? Huh?
Murphy, here you are.
Baker Company.
Well, what do you know?
We're being reinforced.
Wonder what Boy Scout troop they dug him out of.
Don't let them old soldiers eat you alive.
Man, that's really fresh meat, huh?
Sergeant? Hmm?
I'm supposed to report to Captain Marks.
All officers and noncomms are at división briefing. You're the replacement?
That's right. Let's have your orders.
Hey, Sergeant, send him over here.
I need somebody to help carry my Purple Hearts.
At ease over there!
Fall in for inspection.
You go to 3rd Platoon.
Hey, wait a minute.
I see you were acting sergeant on the trip across. Ain't that nice?
I think you should see the way some real tough veterans handle their equipment.
You inspect the 3rd Platoon!
Acting Sergeants, take over and inspect your platoons!
Platoon, attention.!
What's this man's
Army coming to?
Ayardbird replacement, already he's taken over the platoon.
Open ranks.! Open ranks, march.!
Platoon, attention!
Open ranks, march!
Ready, hut!
How did you collect all those Purple
Hearts? Did your rifle blow up?
...promote the general welfare and secure the blessing... of liberty to ourselves and our póster-ity...
Posterity. Ah, that's what I said.
...do ordain and establish this Constitution... for the United
States of America.
By George! I know that, all right!
That's pretty good.
Now, what date was it adopted?
Uh, 1774.
Oh.! Six.!
No, no, no. What was signed in 1776?
Oh, the Declaration of Independence.
Right.
That other was 1774.
No, it wasn't.
Chief, he doesn't want to be an
American citizen. He isn't even trying.
Uh, 1780...
1787. That's right.
But don't just guess. Memorize it.
Yeah, I do that.
Hey, Chief, coffee ready.
You have some, huh?
- From Casablanca to Bombay So send me...
- Hey, Johnson!
What do you got this time?
Bonded date juice.
"Bonded date juice"? You're gonna go blind drinking that native stuff.
I might as well with nothing but you Joes to look at.
That reminds me of an old gal I met in Omaha.
She was colorblind. Took her out to buy her a red dress... Never mind.
We've all heard that one.
You and your dames.
It's the dyin' truth.
Here. Oh, no, not me. I wouldn't touch that with a bayonet.
- What are you doing with my rifle?
- Now, drink!
Now hold it on me so I can have one.
This stuff don't smell right.
You don't suppose that connivin' first sergeant... He knew I had it.
Knock it off so a guy can get some sleep, will you?
Mail call! Mail call!
Here we go for the
"DearJohn" roundup!
Stevens.! Right here.!
Arthur.! Yo.!
Jacobs.! Here.! You know about mail call?
Casano.! Yep.! I don't think my mail... has caught up with me yet.
Oh, too bad.
Brooks.! Here.!
Cooper.! Yeah.
Gomez.! Here.
Eisenburg. Uh-huh.
Davis.! Oh, Brandon.
Dugan.! Yo.!
You dropped something. Everett.!
Family?
They were once.
Harper.! Roger.!
Sir, Private Murphy reports to the company commander as ordered.
Lieutenant Harris, 3rd Platoon leader.
Murphy.
We've been looking over your file.
"Spent the first week of basic training in the hospital:
Reaction from inoculations."
Yes, sir. L-I'd never had any shots before.
"Spent most of the trip over in sick bay."
Yes, sir.
L- I'd never been on the ocean before.
Well, there were a lot of other guys in there with me.
"Requested transfer to paratroops.
Denied due to physical deficiencies."
It was a mistake assigning you to a rifle company, and I'm going to see that you're reassigned.
But, sir, I asked for a combat outfit.
I don't want anything else.
Well, except for the jumps, duty with us is just as rugged as a paratrooper's.
The captain's trying to do you a favor.
I know that, sir, but...
I don't want any favors.
I don't want to be transferred.
All right. I believe in giving a man a chance.
Especially if he wants one as bad as you do. That's all.
Feisty pup, isn't he?
Yeah, but he's got a good side to him.
Did you notice?
Practically all his pay goes for bonds in the name of an older sister.
It looks like he signed for every educational course we've got during training.
He's got the spirit, but, in action, it's gonna take two strong men to take care of him.
♪ I wouldn't give a bean ♪
♪ To be a fancy pants Marine ♪
♪ I'd rather be a dogface soldier like I am ♪
♪ I wouldn't trade my old O.D. S for all the Navy's dungarees ♪
♪ For I'm the walking pride of Uncle Sam ♪
♪ On all the posters that I read, it says ♪
♪ The Army builds men ♪
♪ So they're tearing me down to build me over again ♪
♪ I'm just a dogface soldier with a rifle on my shoulder ♪
♪ And I eat a Kraut for breakfast every day ♪
♪ So feed me ammunition ♪
♪ Keep me in the 3rd División ♪
♪ Your dogface soldier boy's okay ♪♪
Hey, that connivin' first sergeant must have been here too!
Come on, honey, have a slug of this stuff.
It won't hurt you a bit.
Honest. This is good for you. It picks up your whole attitude.
A toast to the one and only 3rd División.!
Turn on the radio so we can dance!
Can you jitterbug?
- Little Texas.!
- One day, I was drivin' along...
Hey, Little Texas, where you been?
I went to Alaska on a vacation.
Hey, that's great.
You must need something to warm you up.
Come on. I got just the thing to do it.
Hey, Cleopatra! Come here!
Come here!
I want you to meet a friend from Alaska.
He owns a gold mine.
Would you like to dance with me?
I'm not very good at it. If Cleo can't teach you, nobody can!
What's all the excitement about?
The Germans have surrendered in Tunisia!
Did I hear right?
Africa's all ours?
That's what she said!
Hey, talk about luck! With us about to move into the line!
All that training for nothing!
We'll be goin' home!
"Goin' home," he says.
That's where we're goin'.
I just didn't know we had to take Sicily to get there.
To hell and back, that's where this outfit's goin'.
General Patton was just tellin' me the other day,
"You boys think that Fedela landin' was somethin',
"you just wait till the next one.
It'll be so rough, they'll be haulin' dog tags back by the truckload."
Shut up, Johnson. You're scarin' us to death. It's the dyin' truth, son.
Hey, Murphy...
I'd unfasten that chin strap if I were you. Why?
The first time a shell goes off anywhere near you, the concussión will blow your helmet off, your head with it.
How do you keep it on?
Half the time, you don't.
One of us better stick with him when we hit the beach.
The way I see it, after we take Sicily, we'll hit the Italian mainland.
That's when this war gets real personal with me... because I'll be liberating my ancestral home.
Home? Weren't you born in Flatbush?
Sure, I was.
But my mother was born in Naples. I promised her I'd look up the family.
If I get there in one piece, I'll bet they'll greet me like a conquering hero.
Sure, they'll put your statue right next to Mussolini's.
I'm gonna fix you guys spaghetti like you never had before, with my own Valentino sauce.
Hey, Kovak, will you let me use your stove?
By George, you get your own.
Everybody think they're so smart they throw their stoves away.
I keep mine. No, this is for Chief and me.
All right, you guys, check your gear and get ready.
Come on, Little Texas.
You stick with me.
How did you like the rough landing
Johnson was yellin' about?
He never got the right dope in his life!
Murphy, you see how lucky you were to land in the 3rd?
When theJerries heard this división was comin', they headed for Berlin!
Yeah, I'll bet. I never thought the first day would be this easy.
They got the lieutenant.!
Steiner, take three men and see what we're up against.
Right.
Johnson, Brandon, Murphy.
Is it rough enough for you yet, Murphy?
I figure there's only one machine gun up there.
Right? Yeah.
I'll get word back to Klasky.
Keep 'em busy.
Where does he think he's going?
I'm supposed to take care of him?
Hey, you think you got a private war?
No, I think there's enough to go around.
Keep low, Brandon!
Stay there!
This more the way you figured the first day would be like, Murph?
Somewhat. Relax.
Get through the first three or four days, you'll be just like us.
That's what it means to be a veteran: You're scared all the time.
I didn't notice you being too scared.
Just crazy, standing up like that.
I had to take care of you, didn't I?
War, to the foot soldier,
is a continual fight for a few yards of dirt...
that always seem to lie ahead of him,
to be taken from the enemy or to be held at all costs.
Why? As often as not he doesn't know...
in regard to the overall campaign.
On Sicily, all he knew was that he took the entire island in 38 days.
What he had accomplished gave the Allies...
a giant base of operation close to the Italian mainland.
Hey, you guys, you know what we've been doing the last few weeks?
I want to forget. We've been
"advancing against light resistance... and squeezing the last of the enemy forces off Sicily." What do you know!
And our spirits are high! Speaking of high spirits, you know what this jug cost?
In Tennessee, I could have gotten a fifth of bourbon... 3rd Platoon.!
On your feet!
We got a new lieutenant. I hope he's luckier than the last one.
As you were, men. I'm
Lieutenant Manning.
I've been told that
Sergeant Klasky here... has been handling the platoon for quite a while now.
He's been doing a good job so there won't be any changes, at least for the time being.
Any news from up above, Lieutenant?
Yeah.
The 36th División and the British
10th Corps has landed at Salerno.
They're having a rough go of it. Looks like we're a cinch to be going across too.
Why us? We took enough beatin' already.
The 36th is a Texas outfit.
Somebody's gotta give them a hand.
They were doing all right till they started draftin' you Yankees.
At ease. I've got a special order here.
One promotion.
Murphy to corporal.
I don't want any stripes.
I didn't hear anybody ask you if you wanted them or not.
All right, that's all.
Why'd he pick on me?
You ought to get the promotions. You've been in this outfit longer than I have.
When you've been in the outfit as long as we have, you learn how to avoid these things,
Corporal. Don't feel bad, Murph.
We recommended you, so you could lead us on to victory.
Hey, you guys, welcome to sunny Italy, the beautiful home of my ancestors!
How come there wasn't any brass band to meet you back at the beach?
When we hit Naples, I'll get the big greeting, and you'll get your spaghetti dinner.
How's it been going, Mac?
Been a bit sticky.
Glad to let you chaps have a go at it.
Looks like Jerry's making his stand at the Volturno River.
How do you know? The blokes blew out the blasted bridges!
Have a good time.
Yeah, thanks a lot.
Sure looks peaceful, don't it?
That's what I don't like about it.
If Jerry's over there, he's sure invisible.
He's over there, all right.
They've already blown the bridge, Lieutenant.
Hey, Lieutenant.!
They want you for battalion briefing.
After dark we'll move down close to the river and dig in.
Gentlemen, our missión here is a diversionary one.
We're to make the enemy think that the main effort will take place here.
Actually, the 7 th Regiment will be the attacking force.
They'll go across upriver from us.
Captain Marks, Baker Company will start things off.
River like this reminds me of an old gal I knew in Perth Amboy, New Jersey.
Had a pet seal. She was a beautiful thing.
- The seal?
- No, the girl.
Sure is quiet.
Jerry must know we're over here.
Be more natural if he opened up.
Why open up tonight and get ten of us... when they can catch a hundred in the middle of the river?
It's none of my business, but you got something on your mind?
It's nothin'.
Thinkin' about home?
Yeah.
About my little girl, my ex-wife.
Sometimes I think I got my mind rid of her, but... when it gets quiet like this, she keeps coming back.
How come you busted up?
We were still in school when we got married.
Then the baby came.
I had to give up school and work full-time.
I began blamin' them for all the big things that I'd planned that weren't pannin' out.
I just walked out on them.
"Walked out on them"?
A guy with your guts?
I sure did.
Did she get married again?
I don't know why, but she hasn't yet.
Sounds like maybe you ought to try patching things up when you get back home.
Maybe it's better if I don't make it.
Oh, knock off that kind of talk.
I fouled up once.
Who can say I wouldn't foul up again if she gave me another chance?
I'll say you wouldn't.
Thanks, Murph.
Say, what are your postwar plans?
I think I'll let the Army do my planning for me.
Think I'll stay in.
Hey, Murphy.!
The lieutenant wants to see you.
That Klasky... Learned to whisper in a sawmill.
We gotta get a combat patrol across the river and stir Jerry up.
Do you think that squad of yours can cut it?
Give it a good try, sir.
All right.
Move out as soon as you're ready.
What's goin' on?
Nothin' much. What do you mean, "Nothin' much"?
Oh, I almost forgot. Klasky wants to see you at the C.P.
What about? I don't know, but you better get yourself up there.
Get that flare.!
Back out of here!
Open up!
Klasky didn't want me. How come you left me behind? 'Cause I got sentimental?
No, 'cause you take too many chances.
"Too many chances"?
Look, you take care of you, and
I'll take care of me. Remember?
I ought to let you freeze to death.
I might anyway.
Sounds like the patrol worked, Murph.
They're really moving motorized stuff in.
At 0500 we'll open up with small arms fire.
The 7 th will move across at the same time.
I'm sure theJerries will throw some entertainment our way too.
You can count on it, Lieutenant.
Yeah.
Just sitting here being a target isn't my idea of how to start a day.
You ever think of resigning?
Who'd win the war if I did?
Baker Six, this is Baker Three.
Medics!
Get Klasky.
He and Jones are both dead, sir.
Baker Three.! Baker Three.!
Baker Three, this is Baker Six.!
Baker Three! Corporal
Murphy speaking!
Isn't Manning down there now, Murphy?
Lieutenant Manning's been hit pretty bad, sir, and Sergeant Klasky's dead.
You'll have to take charge of the platoon.
We're still taking a pretty bad pounding, sir!
Shall we pull back?
Stay where you are.
Increase your fire if possible.
The 7 th is about ready to cross.
TheJerries have shifted the artillery onto the 7 th.
However, they are across and in good shape, so get moving!
Yes, sir!
The 7 th made it! Come on!
For the next couple of months,
the 3rd División continually engaged the enemy.
As usual, the foot soldier wasn't concerned with why.
His greatest concerns were a vicious German defense,
the fact that Italy was one mountain after another...
and that weather conditions were impossible.
These elements, combined, finally brought the Allied advance to a stop at Cassino.
Hey, watch what you do!
Why don't you put a sign up?
I put a sign on your face!
All right, break it up, you two!
We got enough trouble without this kind!
You clumsy fool.
Kick over my stove.
We better keep an eye on Kovak.
He's gettin' a little edgy.
He any different than the rest of us?
Who isn't?
Look who's here.
Lieutenant Manning.!
Hello, Lieutenant. It's good to see you.
Kerrigan.
We figured you'd be married to a nurse by now.
Good to have you back, sir. Thanks, Murphy.
Nice to be back.
I've got some good news for you men.
We're moving back to a rest area near Naples.
Naples! I was beginning to think we missed it for good.
Do they think we're getting soft, Lieutenant?
We've only been in the line two months solid.
I know. After medical inspections, there'll be some passes.
What do they think we got, mud sores?
A few weeks of easy soldiering... while we get replacements and new equipment.
Then we're going to practice up on amphibious tactics.
What you think this is?
I've got some more news for a couple of you. Promotions.
Murphy to sergeant. Hey, Sarge!
Johnson to corporal. Did you buck me into that?
I have a request, sir.
What is it? I'd like to change to another squad.
With Johnson heading this one, the war is lost.
Oh, yeah?
Forget the war. Imagine,
12 hours in bella Napoli.!
Oh, at the speed of one woman per hour! Yow!
You guys can have the town.
I'm gonna stay in camp and see what some real sleep is like.
Would you like my mashed potatoes?
There will be trucks leaving this corner for camp tomorrow morning at 6:00.
If we're not here, don't wait for us, Mac.
We've got ground to cover.
I sure wish I could do the town with you, but I promised my mother
I'd look up her family.
You really got relatives here?
Sure.
You don't think I'd give my extra G.I.
Shoes to anybody else, do you?
These are worth their weight in gold.
Take it easy.
I'll see you in the morning. Good luck, Val. All right, let's move out.
Oh, pardon me! Sergeant
Murphy, CorporalJohnson.
I can see Valentino now.
Big family reunion.
Valentino kicks open the door, tosses in the grenade... and then counts ten before he enters the old homestead.
By George, he do that! That only way he know how go in house anymore!
It should be right down the end of this street and around the corner.
Hey, Joe, no papa, no mama.
Hey, Joe, you want a fried egg?
You want a beef steak?
No, thank you. Hey, you got a cigarette?
You give me one cigarette?
You're too young to smoke.
For my papa. One cigarette for my papa.
Hey, "no papa." Remember?
No cigarette? No cigarette.
How about this?
How about you? You want a chocolate?
No grazia.
Boy, they sure picked a great time to be born, didn't they?
By George, they no start
Hitler's war. Look!
Look what it does to them.!
Well, we didn't start it either.
Let's get rolling.
I don't want see this no more.
It makes me think of Poland.
I go back camp.
It'll do you good to blow off steam!
Come on, Kovak!
I know what I want do!
Got him pretty good, hasn't it?
Let's not let it spoil things.
Let's go!
You stick with me, Little Texas.
Man, I invented women!
Hey, what is this? These fly-boys got a corner on all the livestock?
"Livestock"?
Oh, aye! They're stationed here.
And they got the medals to charm 'em.
Maybe the infantry can tear that charm down a little.
Hey, dogfaces!
♪ Into the air, Junior Birdmen ♪
♪ Into the air Boy Scouts too ♪
♪ Into the air Junior Birdmen ♪
♪ And keep your nose up in the blue ♪
♪ Up in the blue ♪
- ♪And when they make that presentation ♪
♪ And hand out those wings of tin ♪
♪ You, too, can be a
Junior Birdman ♪
♪ If you'll send your box tops in ♪♪
Charge!
Hello.
Break it up! Come on!
Break it up.! Come on.!
I said, "Break it up!"
What's the matter? Don't you guys get enough fighting at the front?
All right, who started it?
He did.
He didn't like our singing.
All right, all right!
If he started it, how come you were mixed up with the Air Corps?
"Mixed up with the Air Corps"?
Why, they're our pals! Yeah.
That's right. We've been sittin' here drinking.
After he started the trouble, we were so anxious to stay out of it, we all headed for the door at the same time and got tangled up.
Don't let it happen again.
Grazia.
Man, that's what I call a real joint operation!
Drinks on the house!
I can't find my hat.!
Seven and three-quarters!
No, I don't think so.
Come here, baby.
He doesn't understand women.
Here.
She reminds me of an old gal I knew back home.
She was a real beaut. Comes up to me in a U.S.O. Club in Nashville.
Takes me ridin' in a yellow roadster.
We hit a curve doin'
65 miles an hour... and the cops take after us.
Says she, "Don't..."
"Don't say a word while I lay the charm on these boys."
Hello there.
Can I have a shine, please?
All right.
I don't seem to have any money, but, uh... how about this, huh? Grazia.
Vincenzo!
My brother do not beg, soldier.
He wasn't begging. He did a job for me, and I paid him.
I see what you call job.
You do not let him finish.
Oh, why don't you let him have it?
Here, I have enough for all the children. No.
Well, we tried anyway. Wait.
There is no begging here, but... if you would like to share our food, then the children can have your chocolate.
You don't have to do that.
If you are nice to the children, my mother and I want to be nice to you.
- Please stay.
- All right.
It's a deal.
I sure wish I knew what she was saying.
It was nothing. She was...
Maria.
Come. You go with us. Oh, no.
I'm not spending my first pass in some bomb shelter.
Please, you can't stay here.
You run along. As soon as the streets clear, I'll head back for camp.
Maria.!
Oh, this is just what
I've been needing.
No, no, don't get the wrong idea.
I've been looking for a long time for somebody I could talk to, and you are it... because you can't understand a word I say.
Si, si.
I want to talk about my girl, the real one.
She's gonna be my wife if I get home.
You see, I can't tell my buddies about the real one.
They'd have to make cracks about her and say things that I don't want to hear, even if they are joking.
Naw, I gotta make up some wild ones... for the entertainment of my buddies.
But you, I can tell the truth to.
Can't I? Can't I?
You just keep it that way,
'cause I'm gonna talk about my girl all night long.
I got an awful lot to get off my chest.
Well, what do ya know, a rug.
I haven't rested my poor dogface feet on a rug in two centuries.
Man, I gotta lay my feet on that rug.
You sit down. I pour your wine.
I sure will.
Man, this is really livin'.
You are crazy to stay here.
How about you? Why did you come back?
I do not know.
I'm sorry I could not talk to you before, but my mother does not like for me to speak English.
The English have killed my older brother in Africa.
Then she must have hated me too.
No, she do not hate.
But when she hear English, she think of her son she love very much.
I'm sorry.
I'm not anymore.
What good is it?
One cannot feel sorry for all who die.
It's too much.
My little brother, Vincenzo, he like that sound.
He say he is going to shoot big gun when he grow up.
I hope he doesn't have to.
Where is your father?
He went away when bad times come.
He never come back.
Well, I guess we all want to quit sometimes.
It's hard not to take the easy way out when it's right there in front of you.
Why do we talk of bad things?
It is no good.
Are you afraid?
All the time. I, too, am afraid, but I am glad I come back.
I am too.
It can be so lonesome when the bombs fall.
When war is close, a woman wants someone to hold.
The family wanted you guys for the spaghetti dinner...
after we got back from the bomb shelter, but I couldn't find you.
Hope we get you into camp before the M.P.
S spot you... or you're gonna be in trouble.
Be in trouble?
Man, where do you think I've been?
I was rolled by an expert. Takes an expert to get old Kerrigan's shoes.
I told you they were worth their weight in gold.
Hey, Johnson, how come you're not bragging up that old gal you were with?
Lost my voice. Must have been bad wine.
Hey, to keep you from talkin', I wish I had a truckload of it.
You should have stuck with me, Murph.
You've gotta just quit being scared of women.
There wasn't much time to think about women...
because, in a few weeks, the combined force...
of British, Canadian and American units was landed at Anzio...
to bypass and cut off Cassino and open the road to Rome.
A beachhead only seven miles in depth was consolidated.
It took everything, including naval gunfire support, to hold it...
because five crack Nazi divisions were thrown against it,:
Divisions that otherwise would have opposed the impending invasión of Normandy.
Hey, who's Sergeant Murphy?
I'm Murphy. We're your replacements.
I'm Thompson. This is Saunders.
I'm Sanchez.
Well, you men picked a good time to come up.
Find yourself some cover.
I'll be right with you.
They're blasting Johnson's squad out of that house, Lieutenant.
And thoseJerries will be right on his tail.
Bronson, bring that gun up here with me!
You men over there, cover 'em!
Give 'em fire!
Let's get out of here!
We'll never get out of here!
Take it easy!
We'll never get out of here!
Take it easy!
Get down!
Jennings, huh?
Yeah. Didn't last long, did he?
That farmhouse cost us five casualties already.
Who wants it anyway? Some general lookin' for a place in the country?
Why don't you be clever someplace else.
With Jerry holding all the high ground, every company in the line... fights for a two-story building for observation purposes. Just asking.
Sergeant Murphy!
Thompson, Saunders and
Sanchez, Johnson.
Best I can do for your squad.
What difference does it make?
I'm not gonna be here to watch over them.
Feel like I'm gonna walk into one for sure this time. Knock it off.
Ten to one, we jump off again.
To hell and back, that's where we're jumping off to.
We've been in that farmhouse five times, got knocked out six.
The law of averages got to catch up with you sometime.
This is Lieutenant Lee, our new forward observer.
Just in from the beach. How are things going there, sir?
It's under artillery fire and dive-bombers all the time.
Men and equipment gettin' to shore any better?
It's pretty rough. We've got to hit that farmhouse again, Murph.
German tanks have been spotted moving into the area.
Wouldn't take many to push us right back into the ocean.
If we can take that house in one piece, we might be able to keep those tanks off you.
We haven't had too much trouble with them.
They've been held to the road.
The fields have been too muddy to support them.
If it starts to rain again, I'll feel better. We'll get ready to go, sir.
I never thought I'd hear a foot soldier ask for rain.
I make some coffee, then, by George,
I go back, I kill all Germans.
You better make it good and strong.
All right, you guys, we got to hit her again. Again?
What did I tell you? You new men drop your packs here.
Oh, sure.
You all right? Yeah, yeah, I'm fine.
When it cuts loose, stick with us older men. "Older men"?
A couple of days, you'll be as old as we are.
Okay, on your feet. Let's go.
Set your gun up behind that wall over there. Yes, sir.
You men stick with the first squad.
Keep working on that second-story window.
Murph! Murph! I'm hit!
Murphy!
Where is it? My back! I'm bleedin' to death. I can feel it!
You clown, get moving. Murph, you can't leave a man! They shot my back clean off!
All they did was spoil your lunch.
Well, I'll be a dirty men.
Hey, give me back my
Thompson, will you?
All right, you guys over there, get ready to go!
You stay here and make sure those artillery people get up there all right.
Hey, wait a minute!
Cover us, Johnson!
We're going in!
All right, you men! Get moving!
Come on!
Man, that's the first time I ever saw a Texan beat himself to the draw.
You say one word about this to the other guys, and I'll turn this loose on you.
Don't you go blabbing either.
That machine gun's on the other side of the house. Let's go get it!
Kovak, hurry up!
It's no use, Chief. You'll get yourself killed too.
What's going on? He'll be all right in a minute. Kovak.
Must be the same gun that got Lieutenant
Manning. We'd better get it, Murph.
Stay right where you are. Our orders were to take this house and hold it.
Why did Manning have to come back anyway?
He didn't have to come back.
I guess he figured the platoon needed him.
Crank that thing up before they blast us out of here!
Red nine! Red nine! Five tanks attacking near eastern junction!
Coordinates: 4-1-8-6-0-3!
Situation urgent!
Fifty short, 200 right!
One hundred right!
That's good shootin',
Lieutenant.
With that tank blocking the road, they can't get to us, as long as the field's muddy.
I sure wish it would rain.
Kovak was sure a good soldier.
You'd have thought he was fightin' a holy war. Maybe he was.
Are you nuts? What did he have to save?
Not even a citizen. His whole family liquidated in Poland.
Then maybe he didn't mind dyin'.
Maybe that's what fightin' for a cause means.
Something none of us really understands.
Look what I found! A stove!
Now we can have some coffee!
Takes a new guy to take care of you fellows.
Wait a minute!
Let him alone! You expect me to take that kind of stuff?
What's the matter with him?
You'll find out... sometime.
Sarge, can you hear that clanking noise out there?
Yes, sir, Jerry was sure nice to let us borrow the house from him for the night.
Now tomorrow, if he wants it back just a little bit, he'll wake us up with some of that 88 millimeter stuff; you know, small caliber.
If he wants it back real bad, he'll open up old Annie.
Rumor says its barrel is just short of a quarter of a mile long, can use old railroad cars for shells and a pile driver for a ramrod.
Did you tell them about that bean can that won you the Purple Heart?
Um, yeah, I was just gettin' around to it.
Three machine guns lined up on me...
You three guys just volunteered to go fight a tank. What?
I heard them working on that one that got hit.
If they get it off that road, we're sunk.
Anything to get away from this guy.
I better tag along so you won't miss the ending. Oh, no, you don't.
Probably see that the Jerries heard it too.
I'll go, Sarge. Me too.
We don't need you.
What's eating him? He was friendly enough this morning.
Does he have to snap our heads off just 'cause we offer to go with him?
He doesn't want you for friends.
That's why he did it.
You see, when you guys have been in the line as long as we have, you find out it's no good to make friends.
Because when a friend gets it, well, it's rough on you.
The buddies that come with you, you're stuck with, but you don't make no new ones.
It's the dyin' truth.
They've got a machine gun on the right.
You stay here and cover me.
Less chance of noise.
Hey... Shh.
As soon as I open up on those tracks, let 'em have it.
Hey, you guys keep your eyes open.
Those fields are really drying up out there.
Captain. Nice work last night, Murphy.
I'm recommending you for a decoration.
Well, there were three other men with me, sir.
Yes, I know. They told me the story.
Coffee, Captain?
Hope you can take it black.
Thanks.
I've been talking to Colonel Howe.
We want you to take a battlefield commissión.
Oh, no, sir. I couldn't do that, sir.
You couldn't?
No, sir. I'm not qualified.
What do you mean?
Education, for one thing. Another is
I'd have to transfer from the outfit.
That's the rule in this división, but
I still think you should take it.
I couldn't transfer, sir.
Why not?
It's a hard thing to answer. Murph, they're moving up tanks and infantry!
They're trying to use the fields!
Lousy break, those fields drying out.
Pull back to the old positions.
I'll contact the other platoons.
Yes, sir.
Lieutenant Lee, we're pulling out of here!
Come on! Get ready to go!
You did right turnin' down lieutenant.
Don't ever take it.
If you do, I hope you get your can shot off! Thanks a lot!
Hey, Murph, looks like you'll be up for retirement... before we get off this beach.
Don't bank on it!
What's the matter with Johnson?
Don't this remind him of some old gal he used to know?
Hey, what is wrong with you?
Just a scratch.
A silly, little scratch.
It's the dyin' truth.
For one lousy farmhouse.
The trouble is makin' friends, learnin' to love guys like Kovak and Johnson.
Well, isn't it?
I'm sure you'll all agree that the four months here on Anzio... have been the longest of your lives.
The enemy has played host with a vengeance.
Every time we've gotten a división ashore, he's moved two in to face it.
But we've finally gained the balance of power over him.
The 1 st Armored División's been landed, and we're going to break out.
We're going all the way to Rome.
We'll have strong air cover. We'll mark our own position with red smoke.
H- Hour is 0500. Good night, gentlemen.
Captain Marks?
You're still short a second lieutenant.
I'll see what I can do about it.
I'd rather not have a new man, sir.
Murphy's one of the best platoon leaders I've ever had.
Then why won't he take a commissión?
Something about not wanting to take responsibility.
He's mixed up because, instinctively, he does take it all the time.
The main reason is he doesn't want to be transferred.
Maybe we can do something about that.
Good luck, Marks.
Thank you, sir.
Look what's coming!
Oh, you beautiful dolls.!
I'll lay you two to one, the
Chief traps one. You got a bet.
Hey, you guys, get a load of this.
"Normandy beaches fully consolidated.
Allied forces continue advance."
They're doing all right.
It figures we'd miss that landing.
Must have been a breeze.
I heard a couple of officers talking.
With things going so good in Normandy, we're gonna stay right here and garrison Rome.
No kiddin'? What's the matter with going home?
Home? With all these Rome women?
Here comes Murph and the new 90-day wonder.
Men, this is Lieutenant Burns.
Rest.
You picked a good time to join us, Lieutenant. Oh?
I got it from a good source, we're gonna garrison Rome.
I've got it from a better source, we're on orders to move to the coast tomorrow for amphibious training.
More of that? I feel like
I got webbed feet now.
I thought the Marines were the amphibious experts.
They are, but we're the only Marines in Italy.
Any idea where we're goin', sir?
Could be southern France.
It was southern France.
For the fourth time in Worid War II,
the 3rd División was about to land on a hostile shore.
But this time the foot soldier knew why he was there.
He knew the enemy, being closed in on from two sides in France,
was now falling back toward his own border.
He knew the sooner the enemy was pushed into Germany,
the sooner the war would be over.
And this was all he lived for.
How bad is he? He'll go home.
You got the million-dollar wound, Chief.
Hey, you timed that just right.
You only had one left.
See what chance we have to flank that hill. Yes, sir.
Take a radio so we can be in contact.
Yes, sir.
You three men right here, you with the extra radio, come with me.
Brandon, this is Burns.
Over. Brandon!
I can't contact Brandon. Do you think
I ought to send up another patrol?
Why don't you give me about ten minutes to check first?
All right. Go ahead.
Sure caught us cold, Murph.
Yeah.
See if you can get him on down the hill.
Are you trying to win yourself a wooden cross? I told you to get down the hill.
Thought you might need this. Think you've got a corner on this real estate?
Come on. They can kill us, but they can't eat us. That's against the law.
That did it!
Get down Brandon!
Why didn't you stay down?
Murph...
Come on, Murph, before the rear echelon catches up with us.
We're being pressured by
División for being held up.
We've got to get that German artillery off of us so we can push through.
They have an observation post somewhere on Hill 481.
I can back you up with a couple of pieces of armor.
Send a platoon out, and get rid of it.
Right, sir.
You sent for Murphy?
He's on his way, sir.
He can't turn it down this time.
Did you know he was turned down... by the Navy, the Marines and the paratroops?
It's not so funny, sir.
I tried to get him transferred out of the company... as being unfit for combat.
Sergeant Murphy's here, sir.
Sir, Sergeant Murphy reports to Battalion
Commander as ordered. At ease, Murphy.
- How would you like to go to West Point?
- West Point?
He means it. Quite a few men who have shown special qualifications are being picked.
I talked it over at Regimental, and we think you ought to be one of them.
You'll never find a better break than this.
Sir, it's true I've decided to stay in the Army, but...
West Point. I'm not qualified for it, sir.
I didn't even finish grade school.
The courses you took...
and the coaching we can give you will get you through.
After we move through the Colmar area, we'll get things rolling.
In the meantime, you'll take a commissión.
But, sir, how about... You won't have to transfer.
With the replacement shortage being what it is, the rule has been waived.
You are now a gentleman by act of Congress.
Take a bath, shave...
Well, anyway, take a bath and get back into the lines.
Thank you, sir.
Congratulations.
Thank you, Captain.
Why is it always the 3rd
División that takes the beating?
Yeah, and the closer we get to the German border, the tougherJerry's gonna be.
You mean they can get tougher?
With somebody moving in on the States, wouldn't you?
You see what I see?
Well, what do ya know!
Well, congratulations. It's time you took it, sir. Shavetail.
I still say you're gonna get shot right in the... At ease.
Take your cotton-pickin' hands off me.
From now on, there'll be a little more respect shown second lieutenants.
Yes, sir. And another thing,
I want to thank you two for all the buckin' you've been doing for me over the past two years.
Ah, don't mention it, Murph.
Ah, forget it, Murph.
Forget it? Just when I'm in a position to repay you?
You take over the platoon,
Sergeant Kerrigan.
But I don't want the rank. I don't deserve it. Give it to one of the other guys.
I didn't hear anyone ask you, soldier.
All right.
That's what I like in enlisted men: Spirit.
Sergeant Kerrigan.
What are you laughing about, Corporal?
Huh? Oh, not me, Murph.
Get the platoon ready to move out.
Yes, sir.
I'm Murphy. Pierce.
They brief you back at headquarters?
Just generally.
That German observation post that's breaking our back... seems to be located along this ridge about five miles up.
It's up to us to take him out of there.
All right, you men, from here on down, get on the first tank.
The rest of you take the second.
As Platoon Sergeant, I will assume my proper position. Your hand, please.
Be my guest, Corporal Valentino.
Thank you, Sergeant Kerrigan.
Hey, Lieutenant, you tankers have really got it soft.
This is the way to travel, with a hundred thousand dollars worth of machinery under you.
If we run into German
Tigers, you won't think so.
This thing's only got about four inches of armor. Oh, yeah?
Say, how thick do you think this G.I.
Shirt is?
Sergeant Kerrigan, have the men dismount.
All right, you guys, bail out!
Valentino, get those men out of here!
Move out!
See what promotion does to you.
You lucky son of a gun.
Looks like somebody just handed you a ticket home.
Who wants to go home? And I was getting used to the rank.
Just to the right of those trees!
Can you get a few rounds in there?
Murphy. Lieutenant Black. I brought him down to help you out.
Black. How are you?
You're gonna take over the company.
Captain Marks, sir? His jeep hit a mine.
He's busted up pretty bad.
We're moving into the
Colmar area immediately.
The battalion objective is this wooded area... on the outskirts of Holtzwihr.
It's heavily defended because it's
Jerry's last foothold in France.
You can expect them to throw everything they've got at you, but it's got to be taken at all costs.
When this city's reduced, there's nothing between us and the German border.
Able Company will be on your right flank, Charlie on your left.
Be in position here at 0600 and ready to jump off. Yes, sir.
Good luck. Thank you, sir.
Colonel Howe? Sir, we're on our objective, but I haven't been able to contact the companies on either flank.
Artillery's delayed them temporarily.
Any change in orders? No, you'll attack in ten minutes.
You'll get your support.
Yes, sir.
Get the men ready to jump off.
Yes, sir.
Should we dig in? Too late for that now.
We'll never be able to stay here with 30 men.
Pull back and tie in with "A" Company.
What about you?
I'm gonna see if I can get some artillery working.
Better knock on it.
You two get out of here.
Artillery, I need a round of smoke... at coordinate 3-0-5-6-0-1!
What are you up against?
Five tanks that I can see... and two reinforced rifle companies.
Tell thoseJoes to get the lead out!
One hundred short, 50 right, and fire for effect!
You're right on the nose!
Keep it coming!
Keep it coming! Keep it coming!
That's good shootin'! The tanks are heading for cover!
Give me a correction! Let's stay on those tanks!
Never mind the tanks! Let's keep after that infantry!
Are we too close to you?
Keep firing for effect!
How close are they? Hold the phone, I'll let you talk to them!
He's got more guts than sense!
That tank is loaded with gas and ammo!
It'll blow up!
Murph, get outta there! Murph!
Murphy, are you... Keep
'em rollin', Black!
Medic! Medic, over here!
I'm all right, Val. Get movin'.
You crazy Irishman, you ought to be dead!
Well, I'm not, so get movin'!
Okay, I'll see you, Murph.
Take care of yourself.
And you still owe me a spaghetti dinner!
Hey, Murph... uh, sir. You aren't supposed to be in this ward.
I know, sir, but I've got to see my old buddy.
You're liable to get into trouble.
Sir, if I have to,
I can prove I'm a bird colonel from
Intelligence in disguise.
You shanty Irishman.
I figured you'd be on your way back to the States.
No, not for a while yet.
Where'd you get it?
In the hip. Wha... But where did it come out?
You know where it came out.
I told him where he was gonna get it.
Didn't I tell ya?
Sergeant, you'll have to leave.
Look, sir, he's a friend of mine.
When he goes to West Point, I'm gonna open a bar right across the street.
What's the matter?
What's wrong with a bar?
His wound's going to keep him out of West Point.
It will probably put him out of the Army.
Gee, I'm sorry to hear that, Murph.
It doesn't matter.
You're probably better off anyway. Let
'em bust you right back to civilian.
You'll be in big demand back in the States.
You can pick off a man at
500 yards with an M-1,
You can toss a grenade further than anybody in the neighborhood... and you can bathe in ditch water!
Sergeant, roll up your sleeve.
At least I can quiet you down so my patients can get their rest.
Okay, sir. I was just leaving.
I'll be back and see you later, Murph, uh, sir!
On August 9, 1945,
a little more than three years after his enlistment...
and shortly after his 19th birthday,
Lieutenant Audie L. Murphy had fought in seven major campaigns of Worid War II.
He had been awarded three Purple
Hearts, a Bronze Star Medal,
a Bronze Star Medal with a
Bronze Service Arrowhead,
a Legion of Merit, two
Silver Star Medals,
the Distinguished Service Cross,:
And, from the French government,
two Croix de Guerre with Palm and the Legion of Honor Chevalier.
On this memorable day in his life,
he was awarded his country's highest decoration,
the Congressional
Medal of Honor.
When are you going to get a real knife?
You can keep this.
Who has your papers?
Right here.
Good morning, my children.
Well, come closer. Come closer.
Here are their names, my president.
Now then, my children, what's the problem you've brought me?
Well, someone has to tell.
You must have come for something.
Yes, my president, we have come for something.
Well, you. You tell me.
You know that field?
That field with the big white rock just south of Anenecuilco?
- My president, our delegation...
Shh!
- They've taken our land away.
- Who took your land away?
Children, when you make accusations, be certain you have the facts.
- Who took your land away?
- The biggest state there.
- It's bigger than a kingdom.
- They've taken our valleys.
- Left us only the rocky hillside.
We can't grow our corn.
That's right.
There's a new fence with barbed wire.
We can't feed our cows.
Those three houses by that white rock?
- They burned those!
- They're planting sugarcane in our land.
Can you prove that you own this field?
Our village has owned this land since before history.
We have a paper from the Spanish crown and from the Mexican Republic.
Well, if this is true, you have no problem. The courts will settle this.
I'll send you to my personal attorney.
But before you see him, I urge you to find your boundary stones.
Check them against your grants and titles.
Verify your boundaries. Facts. Facts!
Now, my children, I have many other matters to attend to.
I've been your president for 34 years.
It's not an easy job being president.
Thank you, my president.
- Thank you.
- Thank you, my president.
What's next?
We can't verify the boundaries, my president.
The land is fenced and guarded.
They're planting sugar cane in our cornfields.
- The courts...
- With your permissi髇...
The courts?
Do you know of any land suit that was ever won by country people?
Has your land been taken?
My father's land was taken long ago, my president.
My children, I'm your father, your protector. I'm of your blood.
But believe me, these matters take time. You must be patient.
With your permissi髇. We make our tortillas out of corn, not patience.
And patience will not cross an armed and guarded fence.
To do as you suggest, to verify those boundaries...
...we need your authority.
I cannot possibly exercise such authority.
- But you advise it.
- I can only advise.
Then naturally, my president, we will do as you advise.
Thank you. With your permissi髇.
You!
You!
- Yes, my president?
- What is your name?
- Zapata.
- What is it?
Emiliano Zapata.
There you are.
Thank you, my son.
My pleasure, Father.
Come here! Come here.
Here! Here, here!
Here!
Go back! Go back!
Get the one on the white horse, the one we're supposed to bring in!
That's the one, the one on the white horse. That's the one, come on!
Zapata! Emiliano Zapata!
Emiliano Zapata!
Zapata! Emiliano Zapata!
Zapata? Emiliano Zapata?
The stupid, he's still coming.
Who do you think he is?
- A stranger.
- Shall I kill him?
- No.
- Shoot in front of him again.
Don't hit him.
When I want to hit, I hit.
When I want to miss, I miss.
A man has been known to die of a close miss.
Zapata! Emiliano Zapata!
He's more stupid than I thought.
He's still coming.
He's crazy. You know it's not nice to kill crazy people.
- Should I try him again, a bit closer?
- How can you come closer?
- Maybe he has a message.
- Maybe it's a trap.
Why don't we kill him?
It's so much easier.
- What does it cost? One bullet...
No!
- What do you want?
- I'm looking for Emiliano Zapata.
He's not here.
- His friends sent me.
Who are his friends?
- People of the village.
He's not here.
I have no weapons.
- What's this?
- Writing machine.
- Sword of the mind.
- I thought you had no weapons.
Don't you dare break that!
Put it down! Put it down!
No.
Put it down.
You are Emiliano Zapata.
I come with news of Madero, leader of the fight against Diaz.
Give me some water.
- Why do you come to me?
- Give me some water while I talk.
Fernando Aguirre.
Pablo Gomez.
- I want to talk to you.
- Talk.
- I want you to listen.
- Well, talk.
"The despotism of Porfirio Diaz is unbearable.
For 34 years, he's ruled with the hand of a ruthless tyrant."
- Yeah, Blanco. Pretty soon now.
Listen.
"The meaning of democracy has long been forgotten.
Elections are a farce. The people have no voice in the government.
Control is in the hands of one man and those he's appointed."
Who wrote that?
- Francisco Madero.
"If we are to bring back to Mexico the freedom that goes with democracy...
...we must unite to drive this tyrant from office."
- Who's Madero?
- Leader of the fight against Diaz.
Where is he?
- In a part of the United States, Texas.
- A fine place to fight against Diaz.
- He's making preparations.
Now he's ready to move.
He's sending out people to spread the word, search out leaders in Mexico.
I was sent to the state of Morelos.
Careful. The smell of a mare came in on the wind and he's restless.
So am I.
- The people told me...
- Don't believe what people tell you.
Hey. Hey you!
- Come on, eat.
- Go on, eat.
Madero?
Yeah, remember?
I read to you about him.
- You promised to teach me to read.
I will. I will!
Let's talk to this man more about
Madero. Maybe he has a letter.
Anybody can write a letter, even you.
I like the look of his eyes.
- Then go and talk to him.
- I can't.
- Why not?
- Not now.
I know why.
I want you to go to Madero and tell me what you see.
- Me? He's in Texas!
- Then go to Texas.
- How far is it?
- Who knows? Go and see.
- I've never been out of our state.
- Now you will be.
I want you to go see if we can trust him.
I like his face.
But a picture is only a picture.
- When do you want me to go?
- Now.
- Now?
- Right now, cinch up.
If you like what you see, tell him about our troubles here.
And tell him that we recognize him as a leader against Diaz.
- Where is he going?
- What?
- Where is he going?
- I don't know. He didn't say.
- Now where is he going?
I don't know. He didn't say.
- What's the matter with him?
- Woman, what else?
- Where are you going?
- Where else?
- What about her?
- She can take care of herself.
This is all very disorganized.
Police.
Josefa, I must speak with you. Shh!
- The rurales are after you.
- I risked my life to come here.
- When may I speak with your father?
- What for?
- To ask permissi髇 for your hand.
- No, don't do it.
- Why not?
- Just don't do it.
- What is wrong with me?
- That's not it.
- What would be wrong with me?
- What do you mean?
I have no intention of ending up washing clothes in a ditch...
...and patting tortillas like an Indian.
Who says this?
- My father.
- My mother was a Salazar.
Zapatas were chieftains and when your grandfather lived in a cave.
Always remember that.
Well, you're not chieftains now.
You have no land, no money.
- You'll be in jail by tomorrow.
- Be still!
I've been offered a position by Don Nacio Delator.
Don Nacio Delator does not employ fugitives from the law.
If I accept, he will have me pardoned.
Why in the worid would Don Nacio need anyone like you? Why?
Apparently, you do not know I am the best judge of horses in the country.
You are the only one who does not know this.
I was with him for years,
I bought every horse in his stable.
When I have not helped
Don Nacio buy his horses...
...it's later discovered that they have five legs.
Conceited monkey.
Do you know that I can take you away with me by force, now?
By force?
I would not prevent you.
I would go with you because I couldn't prevent you.
- But soon you will go to sleep.
- And then?
Sooner or later you will go to sleep.
You wouldn't do that.
A respectable girl like you?
Yes, I would.
Because I am a respectable girl.
A respectable girl wants to live a safe life. Protected, uneventful.
Without surprises.
And preferably with a rich man.
You don't mean that.
I do.
Come back when you can offer me that.
He's going to let you go. Don't scream.
The police are after him.
Let her go.
- I like him.
You do?
I mean, he's a terrible man.
A fugitive, a criminal.
I like him too.
Rub it in. Rub it in harder.
They're so lazy.
Luncheon is ready now.
If this is the best of the lot, where are the others?
- Are the others here?
- They're so lazy.
If they're not stealing, they're asleep.
If they're awake, they're drunk.
- Let's look at the others.
- But luncheon is served.
Lt'll wait.
Hey, hey!
- This is what I'm talking about!
- What is it?
Stealing! Even a horse's food.
They steal everything!
Stop it, Emiliano! Stop it!
Get ahold of him!
Get him out!
Get out!
Get out!
When I had the charges dismissed, you promised.
- I don't want to regret it.
- I know.
I've told you, violence is no good.
- Then why does he use it?
- So full of anger!
- That boy was hungry.
- Calm down, calm down.
Now, look, Emiliano.
You're clever and able, you might even be important...
...have money and property, be respected.
You told me that's what you wanted.
Do you want it or don't you?
- That boy was hungry!
- Are you responsible to everybody?
You can't be the conscience of the whole worid.
Thank you.
You should see them go down.
You have another cigar?
- Some of your admirers.
- Indians.
The most civilized thing about you is your taste for good cigars.
I'm gonna prescribe for you, Emiliano.
You need that wife.
- You ever spoken to Josefa's father?
- No.
- Well, why not?
- He doesn't like me, I don't like him.
In the worid of business, few people like each other...
...but they have to get along or there wouldn't be any business.
Now look, Emiliano.
Now you have position, clothes...
Go to Se駉r Espejo, tell him I'm your patron. Make your peace with him.
And don't forget, the president has drawn a circle around your name.
You must behave.
You better start practicing now.
Go over and apologize to him.
Well, go ahead.
- I apologize.
- Accepted. Accepted.
All right?
- You know them?
- He's a friend. He's been away.
Hey, look.
- What's that?
- Texas.
Hello.
- He spoke of you.
- He wants a message.
One strong push from the North or South and Diaz drops like an old bull.
- The time has come.
- Why don't they lock Madero up?
- They protect political refugees.
- Why?
- Up there, they're a democracy.
- We're a democracy too, and look.
- I know, but...
- I'll explain it.
Up there, the government governs, but with consent.
- The people have a voice.
- That's right.
They have a president, but he governs with the consent of the people.
Here we have a president, no consent.
- Who asked us if we wanted Diaz?
- Nobody ever asked me nothing.
Well...
- How are you in all this?
Madero sent him with me.
- He wants a message.
- Tell him to get another leader.
- You don't believe in him?
- Yes.
- So?
- Tell him to get another man.
- As you wish.
- I have private affairs.
I don't want to be the conscience of the worid or the conscience of anybody.
As you wish.
- Nacente, what's the matter?
- Get away from the prisoner!
Nacente, what are they taking you in for? Hey, Nacente.
He can't talk, Emiliano.
Nacente, here.
- What did he do?
- They're the craziest people I've seen.
- Well, what did he do?
- They're always doing something.
What are you going to do with him?
I think you better let him go.
Let him go!
Should have cut the rope without talking.
He crawled through the fence to plant the corn.
My father does the same thing.
He still thinks it's his own field.
Stubborn. That's what you are.
No, not stubborn.
The field is like a woman.
You live with it all of your life, it's hard to learn that she isn't yours.
He understands.
Mano, I couldn't catch them...
- I'm sorry we've caused you trouble.
Now they'll be after you.
- You can hide in my house.
- It would be an honor.
Thank you.
You mentioned Don Nacio?
- Don Nacio is my patron.
He has assured me that I will be a man of substance.
On that basis, I presume to sue for your daughter's hand.
Do not think I'm insensible of the honor you do me...
...by offering to take my daughter off my hands.
Why is it impossible for me to get a glass of cold water?
- Go, go!
- Shh!
Go, go!
But I do not need to give the problem a great deal of thought...
...before I answer with a permanent and unchanging no.
The answer is no.
- What is wrong with me?
- We have a proverb:
Though we are all made of the same clay, a jug is not a vase.
- What is wrong with me?
- I'd hoped you would not ask again.
But since you have, you are a rancher without land.
A gentleman without money. A man of substance without substance.
A fighter, a drinker, a brawler.
These things you are.
Though I have nothing against you personally...
...and I can see wherein some quarters you may be considered desirable.
But my daughter...
I have no intentions of finding her squatting on the bare earth...
...patting tortillas like a common Indian.
What are you doing?
Find her a merchant. A musty, moth-eaten man like yourself.
Let her be queen of warehouses and mistress of the receipt book.
All right, bring him down here. Down here!
Clear the way.
This man is a criminal.
You are making yourselves liable for his crime.
What are you trying to do?
We are here, my captain, with your permissi髇...
...to see that the prisoner does not try to escape. For if he did...
...you would shoot him in the back.
Is that not so?
- You're breaking the law.
- No, helping the law...
...guarding the prisoner.
Zapata. The wire.
- What do you mean?
Telegraph wire.
Cut it before he uses it.
Don't touch that!
This is rebellion.
- Emiliano?
- Cut.
No ammunition?
No ammunition.
What?
Uniforms and blankets.
No ammunition?
No ammunition.
Hermano, come here.
Look what I found.
Ammunition?
No. Dynamite.
- Boxes and boxes, all dynamite.
- Ammunition?
- Powder and dynamite.
How much?
- Plenty, look.
What do you think?
Only one way.
We use what we have.
- Anything doing?
- A few women.
- I liked it when they were shooting.
- Maybe Zapata's out of ammo.
- I wouldn't depend on it.
- They went away.
Market women.
If it's a market, they've gone.
- I don't trust the Indian women.
- No sign of Zapata.
- Send out a scout.
Captain! My captain.
What are you doing?
- Like to buy eggs?
Get away!
Pile those baskets.
Get away!
Pile. Hurry.
Get away, or I'll fire!
Get the baskets. Quick.
Fire!
Emiliano! Remember the gun that flanked us from the hill?
Yeah.
- He and his brother...
...lassoed and took the gun from the gunner. Look at his size.
- You do that?
- Of course. Bring the gun!
Leave the gun.
Did you do that?
Where's your brother?
He was killed.
- He should have a reward.
- Hey, hey. Mano, here.
Here.
Do you want this pig?
Well, what? Anything.
Not my horse.
That's a good horse.
He says that's why he wants it.
Take him.
- What did he do?
- I'm waiting to find out.
Don Emiliano, my friend...
...I'm here to present representatives of our great liberator...
...Francisco Madero. Gentlemen.
Gentlemen, here he is.
I found him for you.
Emiliano Zapata, one of my oldest acquaintances.
I think we know each other.
My congratulations,
General Zapata.
Read it.
- Read it!
- "To Emiliano Zapata:
I, Madero, act on authority given me by the forces of Liberation...
...grade you general of the armies of the South.
- Hey, padre.
- May a day come...
...when I embrace you in triumph. Long live Mexico."
He signed it with his own hand.
I and my family would be happy...
Now you have to wear things a general wears.
I and my family would...
- Where did you get those?
- Well, off a general, where else?
General.
My wife, my daughter and myself would be honored...
A present.
Boys! General Zapata!
Boys! General Zapata!
Take this one, please. It's nicer.
What a waste of time.
- He should've stolen her.
- This way he gets her father's money.
But is it worth all this?
I have loved with all my heart 100 women I never want to see again...
...and he is still after this one.
It escapes me.
Did you think of me?
It is said, a warrior's shield is his sweetheart's heart.
Huh?
We have a proverb: A man well-dressed is a man well-thought-of.
A monkey in silk is still a monkey.
But when love and beauty come into the house...
...then throw out the lamps.
- It's an hour and three-quarters.
- I know, makes me sick.
That's how these people go about getting married.
Excuse me.
Do you believe the saying: An egg unbroke, a horse unrode, a girl unwed?
I believe that a man is fire, and a woman fuel.
And she who is born beautiful, is born married.
Can you get away from the window?
Let some air through.
And get that horse out of here!
Go on!
Best horse I ever had.
Josefa, let's go walk, there might be a breeze.
- A walk?
- Alone?
A whipped dog is the wiser dog.
Do you think that three women and a goose make a market?
I believe that love cannot be bought except with love.
And he who has a good wife wears heaven in his hat.
After love food, a cup of chocolate?
- A starved body has a skinny soul.
Emiliano!
- Shh!
- Emili...
The pediment of the heart is the stomach.
Alicia, will you bring chocolate?
Emiliano.
- What?
Diaz ran away. He left the country.
Viva Zapata! Viva Zapata!
- It's true?
It's true.
Josefa, the fighting is over.
- Josefa! Josefa!
- Mama, be quiet.
The fighting is over.
Emiliano?
It's almost morning.
- They never get tired.
Emiliano!
Emiliano, my little brother!
Josefa. Josefa, my sister.
Oh!
Emiliano, come back to bed.
My darling friend, we are getting old.
We are getting very, very old.
I know what's the matter with you.
- What?
- You, my friend, you have heavy blood.
- You are unhappy the fighting is over.
- Half-victors.
Always celebrating, nothing really won.
I love you, but I don't like you.
I never liked you, my darling friend.
- There will be a lot more bloodshed.
- All right!
But not tonight! Here. Enjoy yourself.
Be human!
Emiliano?
Huh?
You're restless.
Are you unhappy?
No. Go to sleep.
- Can't you sleep?
- Pretty soon now.
What are you thinking?
Nothing.
- You are too.
- No, no, no.
What are you worried about?
We'll find a good piece of land someplace, and we'll settle down.
- Now go to sleep.
- I don't want to sleep.
Emiliano, the fighting is over.
Madero is in the capital, and tomorrow I'll go see him.
- Can I go with you?
- No.
- You think we'll have children?
- Yes.
We'll name them all Francisco, after
Madero because he brought peace.
Emiliano, is it something about me?
No.
You mustn't think that.
Then I want you to tell me.
I'll see Madero and the men around him.
You're not telling me.
Men from schools.
- Lawyers, educated men.
- You're not telling me.
My horse and my rifle won't help me there.
I can't read.
Teach me.
Of course.
Teach me now.
Get a book.
Hey, be quiet down there!
Can't you let a man sleep on his wedding night?
- Shh!
- Shh!
"Ma馻nitas." "Ma馻nitas."
Begin.
"In the beginning, God created the heavens and the earth."
In.
"In."
- The.
- "The."
Beginning.
Well, there he goes.
Old Diaz was rottener than we knew.
Huerta pushed from the North with
Pancho Villa, you, the South...
...why, Diaz crumbled.
- Pardon me, sir.
When will the village lands be given back? People ask.
Don't worry.
We build slowly and carefully.
Give me this. I'll sign this now.
The country people want to know.
They will get their land, but under the law. It's delicate. It must be studied.
What's to study?
Land must be given back under the law so there's no injustice.
And speaking of lands...
Close the door, please.
Let me show you this.
Thank you.
You see here, where these two streams meet?
The land is very rich here.
Rich and level and well-watered.
And I'm told it has a good house on it.
You know what this is, general?
- No.
- This is your ranch.
My ranch?
It's an old custom to reward victorious generals...
...and no one deserves it more than you.
I did not fight for a ranch.
I don't think you know what I meant.
I know what you meant.
The land that I fought for was not for myself.
- But...
- What about the land I did fight for?
General, that'll be taken care of.
Believe me. In good time.
Now is a good time.
- General, sit down.
- I am not tired.
This is a constitutional government.
There's a way to do things.
This noise, confusi髇, I can't think.
Get out! Out! Get out!
Give me these. I'll sign now.
They're still waiting, sir.
- Let them wait. I'll come.
I'll be back. Don't let anybody in!
Get the workmen out.
They make too much noise.
This mouse in a black suit talks like Diaz.
No, he's right. This is peace.
It takes time. We work by law.
Laws. Laws don't govern, men do.
The same men who governed before are here in that room. They have his ear.
- They've got to be cleaned out.
- And land given back.
- And if Madero doesn't do it...
- Yes?
Then he's an enemy too.
You're his emissary, officer, friend.
I'm a friend to no one and to nothing except logic.
Peace is very difficult.
Mano, what do you think?
- It's a nice piece of land.
- Shh.
What's the harm?
You've never taken anything.
The result? We have nothing.
Now it's finally quiet.
General Zapata, don't you trust me?
You must trust me.
I promise, my first preoccupation is the land...
...but in a way that's permanent.
Before you do anything by law...
...you must have law. We cannot have an armed and angry nation.
It is time to stack our arms.
That is the first step.
That is my first request.
Stack your arms and disband your army.
- And who will enforce the laws?
- The regular army, the police.
They're the ones we just fought and beat!
Give me your watch.
- What?
- Give me your watch.
Give it to me!
It's a beautiful watch.
Expensive.
- Now take my rifle.
- No.
Now you can have your watch back, but without this, never!
You draw a strong moral.
You ask us to disarm.
How can we get our land or keep it if we disarm?
It's not that simple.
There's a matter of time...
Time is one thing to a lawmaker, but to a farmer...
...there's a time to plant and a time to harvest.
And you cannot plant in harvest time.
General Zapata, do you trust me?
Just the way my people trust me.
I trust you and they trust me as long as we keep promises.
And not a moment longer.
Where are you going?
I'm going home.
What will you do there?
I will wait, but not for long.
Kill that Zapata now.
Save time, lives, perhaps your own.
- Were you listening, General...?
- I advise you to shoot Zapata now!
General,
I do not shoot my own people.
- You'll learn.
- He is a fine man.
- What does that mean?
- He is an honest man.
What's that got to do with it?
A man can be honest and wrong.
- I trust him.
- To do what?
I think it is essential to take my troops to Morelos...
...and help him decide to disarm.
Yes.
Oh, excuse me.
No, no. Wait, wait!
Come in. Come in.
- L...
- You can speak freely.
Yes. Excuse me.
Come in, come in.
I want to speak to Zapata again.
Ask him to come back.
He won't come back. He's stubborn, but if you could come to Morelos...
...he's different there. You know, his whole life has been fighting. He...
He can hardly read.
He needs you. He may not know it yet, but he needs you to help him.
He can learn. He wants to.
If you'll excuse me for saying it, you need him too.
I will come.
- Thank you.
- I will come.
With your permissi髇.
Excuse the interruption, please.
Troops are not necessary.
I will do it without troops.
These are fine people.
You know, General Huerta, there is such a thing as an honest man.
Oh, the odor of goodness.
Get me a drink.
We're never going to get anywhere as long as Zapata's alive.
- He believes in what he's fighting for.
- So does Madero, sir.
I know, but he's a mouse.
He can be handled.
Zapata's a tiger.
You have to kill a tiger.
They don't mind giving up their arms, now that I've explained it.
Explained it very well, didn't he, Emiliano?
They have accepted it. Have you?
I've been fighting for so long,
I don't understand peace.
Peace is the hard problem.
Many men have been honest in war.
But peace...
I often wonder how a man can stay honest under the pressure of peace.
What ever happened to that little boy who got your horse?
He's dead. And they were never able to find the horse.
- This woman has three rifles.
- Husband and two sons, killed.
Se駉ra.
Please. Take this.
No, it is too valuable.
As valuable as your sons?
- Emiliano! Emiliano!
- What is it?
- Ask him.
- What is it?
Huerta's forces are coming through the pass!
- Pretend you don't know it.
- No, they're not.
No, they can't.
- How many?
- Three regiments with artillery.
- Who posted scout?
- I did.
- You?
- I don't trust him. I'm right.
Look at him!
Bugle.
I want to shake hands with our liberator so I can tell my children.
Troops are coming?
Huerta has disobeyed my orders?
What did you say, sir?
Thank you very much, thank you.
I have to go and stop them.
Huerta would not dare!
Would not dare!
We must trust Madero, only he can bring us peace.
- Emiliano, please listen to me!
- No!
Now get the snipers out and flank the road.
Might be better to finish him off.
Emiliano, I give you my word.
I will stop the troops.
I hope so.
But if you don't, I will.
- Sorry, Mr. President.
- Huerta must have misunderstood.
He's got good qualities too.
- Pablo.
- Yes. I know, I know.
I'll talk to Emiliano.
I'll bring you two together again.
You look across the river.
I'll look upstream.
Hey, the hat.
Hey!
Here! Here!
All right.
- Did you see him?
- Did you see Huerta?
- Yes.
- Why am I a prisoner here?
- You are no longer a prisoner.
But they won't let me leave.
I have been here for days.
He's been guarding you for your safety.
- You have enemies.
- What enemies?
- Zapata, Pancho Villa.
- I don't understand.
But don't worry, Huerta loves you. He will protect you.
You must agree, here you've been safe.
Why doesn't he give me safe conduct to the port?
- When is he going to let me see him?
- Tonight.
- He asked me to take you to him now.
- Good. Good, good.
I don't want to keep him waiting.
We mustn't keep him waiting.
Come on.
I'll be with you in a minute.
It's going to be all right.
It stopped.
Where are they?
What's keeping them?
- We'll be late for the reception.
There they come.
Will you step out, my president?
Is Huerta here?
Where is he?
Where, where is...?
What is...?
What you do is wrong.
Wrong, I say.
No, you can't do this.
I tell you, because, because...
No!
Come on, come on, I'm late.
You were seen talking to an officer of Huerta's army.
We were ambushed. We know that now.
What have you got to say for yourself?
He was my brother-in-law. They brought me a message from my wife.
- How did he know where to find you?
- I sent word...
And we were ambushed.
- Shoot him.
Wait.
Look behind you.
Two hundred and forty-four fighting men.
We planned a surprise.
Huerta was ready for us!
When they killed Madero, we had to begin again.
We lost many men, and there was a reason.
But this was useless.
Two hundred and forty-four good farmers...
...your relatives, with victory in their mouths, will never chew it.
Now you see why we have hard discipline.
You told your wife where we would be, and what?
Shoot him.
Thirty-two deserters.
They want to come over to us.
It's easy to come over to us now that we're winning, isn't it?
Take care of them.
Go on.
Hexed.
I think I'll get some sleep.
Putting it off?
No.
You're looking tired, Emiliano.
You met with the enemy.
I have witnesses.
You don't need witnesses, just ask me.
It's true. I met with Madero before he was killed.
- You met him many times.
- Many times...
Even after he signed orders to destroy us.
At the end, Madero wasn't himself.
He tried to hold Huerta in check, and Huerta killed him!
He was a good man, Emiliano.
Wanted to build houses, plant fields.
If we could begin to build even while we're burning...
If we could plant while we destroy...
- You deserted our cause.
- No!
Our cause was land, not a thought.
The corn-planted earth to feed the families.
Liberty, not a word...
...but a man sitting safely in front of his home in the evening.
Peace, not a dream!
Time for rest, kindness.
A question beats in my head:
Can a good thing come from a bad act?
Can peace come from so much killing?
Can kindness finally come from so much violence?
Can a man whose thoughts were born in anger and hatred...
...can such a man lead the peace?
Can he govern in peace?
I don't know.
You must have thought about it,
Emiliano. Do you know?
Do you know?
Do you know?
Two hundred and forty-four of our men were killed this morning.
We planned to surprise the enemy.
They surprised us.
Emiliano.
We've been friends since we guarded the corn.
You know our rule against consorting with the enemy.
Yes, my general.
- And you ignored it.
- Yes, my general!
- Shall I call the squad?
- Emiliano, not strangers.
Do it yourself. Do it yourself.
Message from General Villa.
Important.
General Zapata's busy.
General Zapata will see you now.
Why aren't you eating?
Tell me, why is he a general at all?
What's he got from it?
More.
Look at you. Look at that dress.
Is this a general's house?
Pancho Villa knows what to do with his opportunities.
Look how he dresses.
Don't argue with me.
- More meat?
- More everything.
I know what I'm talking about.
It's a business opportunity, and he's not taking advantage of it.
He could take half the state, and everyone would respect him for it...
...and he won't touch it.
I give up on him.
Never had any faith in him!
What's that? Do you hear horses?
Are you hurt?
- No.
Sentry.
- How'd you get through the lines?
- There are no lines.
Huerta's defeated.
If he's in Mexico City,
I'll see him there.
Congratulations, my son.
- Are you sick?
- No.
I'm tired.
I'm tired.
Something's wrong with you.
No, nothing's wrong.
We've won. I just need sleep.
Right this way, gentlemen.
- Zapata!
- Look, look, Huerta.
Zapata.
Let's get this over with.
Here, sit down.
No.
- Sit there.
No.
- Sit down. Sit down!
I'll stand guard now.
What are they doing?
Pancho Villa's still talking, deciding the fate of Mexico.
Let them take their time.
It's important.
- Forgive me, but it's past 3.
- You're right, we should be asleep.
- We have a great deal to discuss.
What?
- Political matters.
- Ah...
I ate too much.
I haven't anything to discuss.
I've made up my mind.
I'm going home.
I have a nice ranch now. I'm going to be president of that ranch.
In the morning, I'll hear roosters instead of bugles.
You know somebody took a shot at me this morning, someone I didn't know?
What do you propose?
I've been fighting too long, lost my appetite for it.
You're going home?
- I'm sick of it.
You beat one down and two more jump up.
- I used to think it would work.
- What about Mexico?
I figured it out.
Only one man I can trust.
Can you read?
- Then you're the president.
- No.
- Yes.
- No.
Yes. Yes, you are.
I just appointed you.
You sleep on it. You'll see I'm right.
There isn't anyone else.
Do I look like a president?
There's no one else.
Acting on the report that there have been gatherings of disgruntled officers...
...Chavez, on your orders, moved in with a troop of cavalry after nightfall.
The names of the deceased officers, my president.
- General, I am not president.
- General.
- All killed?
- All.
- Telegraph congratulations to Chavez.
- Yes, sir.
Next.
A delegation from the state of Morelos with a petition.
I know these men.
Carlito, how are you?
Pepe, you got skinny.
Well, what can I do for you?
Huh?
What is it?
Lazaro?
What's wrong?
Well...
We have a complaint against your brother.
My brother?
Your brother moved into the hacienda de Ayala.
- And?
He took land you distributed.
He's living there.
He put us out.
He killed a man who wouldn't go.
- Carlito, is this true?
It's true.
Well...
All right.
- When I get time, I'll look into it.
These men haven't got time.
Huh?
- These men haven't got time.
- Well, I just...
One minute.
They plowed the land, and got it half-sowed, and they haven't got time.
- Your brother...
- My brother is a general!
And he became one, fighting and killing many of your enemies.
And don't you forget it.
I'm one of you, and you can trust me.
Since you are, you know the land can't wait.
The furrows are open, the seed's not planted, and stomachs can't wait.
What's your name?
Hernandez.
- What is it?
- Hernandez.
- H-E-R-N-A...
- I have it.
- Where are you going?
- I'm going home.
So you're throwing it away.
Leave tonight, your enemies will be here tomorrow, in this room.
They'll hunt you down till you get your rest in the sun.
- Leave now, you won't live long.
- I won't anyway.
In the name of all we fought for, don't go!
In the name of all we fought for,
I'm going.
- I won't go with you.
- I don't expect you to.
Now I know you. No fields, no home.
No wife, no woman.
No friends, no love.
You'll only destroy, that is your love.
And I will tell you what you will do.
You will go to Obreg髇 or Carranza.
And you will never change.
Come on.
Brother, be careful what you say to me.
Did you take the land away from these people?
I took what I wanted.
- Mano...
- I took their wives too.
What kind of animal are you?
I'm a man, not a freak like my brother!
Get out!
I fought as long and as hard as you.
Every day you fought, I fought!
I'm a general. Look. Look!
Here's my pay, a little dust.
I can't even buy a bottle of tequila.
We beat Diaz. He's living in a palace in Paris.
We beat Huerta.
He's rich in the United States.
I have to beg pennies from people who never fired a gun!
I'm a general! I'm gonna act like one!
And don't you or anybody else try to stop me.
Chula!
So?
This land is yours.
But you must protect it.
It won't be yours long if you don't protect it.
If necessary, with your lives, and your children with their lives.
Don't discount your enemies.
They will be back.
And if your house is burned, build it again.
If your corn is destroyed, replant.
If your children die, bear more.
If they drive you out of the valley, live on the mountain, but live.
You always look for leaders, strong men without faults.
There aren't any.
There are only men like yourselves.
They change. They desert. They die.
There are no leaders but yourselves.
A strong people is the only lasting strength.
Emiliano!
Mano!
What he said was true.
He fought every day we fought.
He was a general.
We will bury him as a general.
No.
He didn't die in battle.
I'll take him home with me.
Pancho Villa's in the North.
There's no trouble with him.
But Zapata, what about Zapata?
Sir, how could you fight an enemy you can't see?
You're looking for an army to fight.
There is no army.
Every man, woman and child in Morelos is Zapata's army.
There's only one thing to do.
Wipe them out. All of them.
Excuse me, sir, we can't find anybody to wipe out.
We go there, the corn is growing, a fire in the hearth, and no one.
We burn the house, we destroy the corn.
We go back, there are new shelter, the corn is growing again.
They're like a different race.
They're not afraid of anything.
This is not a man we're discussing.
It's an idea, and it's spreading.
It's a man!
Cut off the head of the snake and the body will die.
Ideas are harder to kill than snakes.
How do you kill an idea?
Kill Zapata, your problem's solved.
Let us through. Let us through!
Let us through.
Let me by!
- Well?
We saw the supplies.
The guns are new, never fired.
Machine guns too.
Shh.
- Ammunition?
- A mountain of it.
- Have you seen it?
- Yes.
That would give us a year. And in a year, we'd be ready for anything.
- Why does he want to join us?
Was stripped of his rank.
He wants revenge.
And now he's a colonel with a first-class regiment?
Sounds like a trap.
- But it's strange enough to be true.
- Yes.
What proof did he give you of his good faith?
He executed Juan Calsavo, chief of police.
Further proof he leads to you.
All right. All right.
Be here at sunset ready to ride, and I'll think out some more proofs.
- What has happened?
Nothing.
- Emiliano, I want to know.
- What?
- What is happening?
- Are the hens beginning to crow?
Every night I have the same thought.
My heart says to me:
"Now for the first time, you have your husband alone...
...without fighting, running, hiding."
But it also says soon you will be dead, and I have never known you in peace.
Josefa, I'm trying to make a plan.
- We're getting the ammunition we need.
I don't want to hear!
Josefa.
Soon you will be gone, and a stranger will come to tell me you're dead.
That is what is left for me.
That is what is left for me.
A federal colonel is giving me his regiment and all his equipment...
- It's a trick.
- I always suspect a trick.
- They'll kill you.
- I haven't decided.
- Don't go.
- We need the ammunition!
- I have a feeling. Don't go!
- Enough! I will make up my mind.
- You want to die?
- I must do what is needed.
- Do you want to die?
- Josefa, that's enough!
I will make up my mind.
I must do what is needed.
I will be all right.
Look how the little clouds go across the face of the moon.
The moon is racing.
Time's racing too.
Yes.
It reminds me, you've made up your mind.
Shh.
I don't speak for myself now...
...but if anything happens to you, what will become of these people?
- What will they have left?
- Themselves.
With all the fighting and the death, what has really changed?
They've changed.
That's how things really change.
Slowly, through people.
They don't need me anymore.
- They have to be led.
- Yes, but by each other.
A strong man makes a weak people.
Strong people don't need a strong man.
Here.
Well?
The town is destroyed, its garrison dead.
You saw it?
- The garrison is destroyed!
- And the supplies?
- I saw them stacked and waiting.
What do you think?
What do you think?
He's passed every test.
Paco.
When will you go?
Now.
We leave tonight. It's safer by night.
Chamaco.
Suppose something happened to me?
We'll get along.
Someday we'll go down into the valleys again.
Until then, we know how to survive.
Don't, don't!
Emiliano, no.
Don't go, I tell you.
Emiliano, don't. Don't!
Emiliano!
Emiliano Zapata.
Jesus Gaujardo.
- Where did you find him?
- He's yours.
- Where have you been?
- A federal officer had him.
Got old.
Get that horse!
Shoot him!
Shoot him!
- The horse got away.
- The horse?
Well, these people are very superstitious.
They must have been very afraid of him. They shot him to ribbons.
The tiger is dead.
- Well, that's the end of that.
- I don't know.
Sometimes a dead man can be a terrible enemy.
Expose his body in the plaza so they can see it.
So they can all see that he's dead.
Who are they fooling?
Shot up that way, could be anybody.
- He fooled them again.
- You sure?
I fought with him all these years.
They think they can fool me?
- They can't kill him.
- They never will.
- Can you catch a river, kill the wind?
- He's not a river, he's a man!
- And still they can't kill him.
- Then where is he?
He's in the mountains.
You couldn't find him now.
But if we ever need him again, he'll be back.
Yes.
He's in the mountains.
You saw nothing in Hiroshima.
Nothing.
I saw everything.
I saw the hospital - I'm sure of it.
The hospital in Hiroshima exists.
How could I not have seen it?
You didn't see the hospital in Hiroshima.
You saw nothing in Hiroshima.
Four times at the museum.
What museum in Hiroshima?
Four times at the museum in Hiroshima.
I saw people walking around.
People walk around, lost in thought, among the photographs,
the reconstructions, for lack of anything else.
The photographs, the photographs,
the reconstructions, for lack of anything else.
The explanations, for lack of anything else.
Four times at the museum in Hiroshima.
I watched the people.
I myself, lost in thought,
looked at the scorched metal.
The twisted metal.
Metal made as vulnerable as flesh.
I saw the bouquet of bottle caps.
Who would have thought?
Human flesh, suspended, as if still alive,
its agony still fresh.
Stones. Charred stones.
Shattered stones.
Anonymous masses of hair
that the women of Hiroshima, upon waking in the morning,
would find had fallen out.
I was hot in Peace Square.
10,000 degrees in Peace Square.
I know it.
The temperature of the sun in Peace Square.
How could you not know it?
The grass. It's quite simple.
You saw nothing in Hiroshima.
Nothing.
The reconstructions were as authentic as possible.
The films were as authentic as possible.
The illusion, quite simply, is so perfect
that tourists weep.
One can always scoff,
but what else can a tourist do
but weep?
I've always wept over Hiroshima's fate.
Always.
No.
What was there for you to weep over?
I saw the newsreels.
On the second day, history tells us -
I'm not making it up -
from the second day on,
certain species of animals crawled
from the depths of the earth, and from the ashes.
Dogs were captured on film for all time.
I saw them.
I saw the newsreels.
I saw them.
Of the first day, the second day,
the third day.
You saw nothing.
Of the 15th day too.
Hiroshima was covered in flowers.
There were cornflowers and gladioli everywhere,
morning glories and daylilies
born again from the ashes
with an extraordinary vitality unheard of in flowers before then.
I didn't make any of it up.
You made it all up.
None of it.
Just as the illusion exists in love,
the illusion you can never forget,
so I was under the illusion
I would never forget Hiroshima.
Just like with love.
I saw the survivors too,
and those who were in the wombs of the women of Hiroshima.
I saw the patience,
the innocence,
the apparent meekness
with which the temporary survivors of Hiroshima
adapted to a fate so unjust
that the imagination, usually so fertile,
is silent before it.
Listen. I know.
I know everything.
It went on.
Nothing. You know nothing.
Women risk giving birth to deformed children, to monsters,
but it goes on.
Men risk becoming sterile,
but it goes on.
Rain causes panic, the rain of ash on the waters of the Pacific.
The Pacific turns deadly, and its fishermen die.
Food becomes an object of fear.
An entire city's food is thrown away.
The food of entire cities is buried.
An entire city rises up in anger.
Entire cities rise up in anger.
But against whom do they rise up in anger?
The anger of entire cities, whether they like it or not,
against the principle of inequality advanced
by one people against another.
The principle of inequality advanced
by certain races against other races.
The principle of inequality advanced
by certain classes against other classes.
Listen to me.
Like you,
I know what it is to forget.
No, you don't know what it is to forget.
Like you,
I am endowed with memory.
I know what it is to forget.
No, you are not endowed with memory.
Like you, I too have struggled with all my might
not to forget.
Like you, I forgot.
Like you, I longed for a memory beyond consolation,
a memory of shadows and stone.
For my part I struggled every day with all my might
against the horror of no longer understanding
the reason to remember.
Like you, I forgot.
Why deny the obvious necessity of remembering?
Listen to me.
I know something else.
It will begin again.
200,000 dead and 80,000 wounded in nine seconds.
Those are the official figures.
It will begin again.
It will be 10,000 degrees on the earth.
10,000 suns, people will say.
The asphalt will burn.
Chaos will prevail.
An entire city will be lifted off the ground,
then fall back to earth in ashes.
New vegetation rises from the sands.
Four students together await
a fraternal and legendary death.
The seven branches of the delta estuary
of the river Ota
drain and fill at their usual hour,
precisely at their usual hour,
with freshwater rich with fish, gray or blue,
depending on the season and time of day.
People along the muddy banks no longer watch
the tide slowly rise
in the seven branches of the delta estuary
of the river Ota.
I meet you.
I remember you.
Who are you?
You're destroying me.
You're good for me.
How could I know this city was tailor-made for love?
How could I know you fit my body like a glove?
I like you.
How unlikely.
I like you.
How slow all of a sudden.
How sweet.
You cannot know.
You're destroying me.
You're good for me.
You're destroying me.
You're good for me.
I have time.
Please, devour me.
Deform me to the point of ugliness.
Why not you?
Why not you in this city and in this night
so like other cities and other nights you can hardly tell the difference?
I beg of you.
You have such beautiful skin.
You!
Yes, me. Surprised?
Are you completely Japanese or not?
Completely. I am Japanese.
Your eyes are green, aren't they?
Yes, I think they're green.
You're like a thousand women in one.
That's because you don't know me.
That might not be the only reason.
I don't mind being a thousand women in one for you.
Listen.
It's 4:00.
Why?
I don't know who it is.
Every day he passes by at 4:00 and coughs.
Were you here in Hiroshima?
Of course not.
That's right.
How foolish of me.
But my family was in Hiroshima.
I was off fighting the war.
Lucky for you, eh?
Yes.
Lucky for me too.
- Why are you in Hiroshima?
- A film.
A film?
I'm acting in a film.
Where were you before you came to Hiroshima?
Paris.
And before Paris?
Before Paris I was in Nevers.
It's in the province of Nièvre.
You don't know it.
Why did you want to see everything in Hiroshima?
It interested me.
I have my own idea about it.
For example, looking closely at things... is something that has to be learned.
Would you like some coffee?
What were you dreaming about?
I don't remember. Why?
I was watching your hands.
They move when you're sleep.
Maybe that happens when you don't realize you're dreaming.
You're a beautiful woman.
You know that?
- You think so?
- I think so.
A bit worn out, no?
- A bit ugly.
- You don't mind?
That's what I noticed last night at the café.
How ugly you were and -
- And?
- And how bored you looked.
Tell me more.
You were bored in a way that makes a man want to know a woman.
You speak French well.
Don't I though!
I'm glad you finally noticed.
I hadn't noticed that you don't speak Japanese.
Have you ever noticed people have a way of noticing what they want?
I noticed you. That's all.
To meet in Hiroshima.
That doesn't happen every day.
What did Hiroshima mean to you in France?
The end of the war.
I mean completely.
Astonishment that they dared do it, and astonishment that they succeeded.
And the beginning of an unknown fear for us as well.
And then indifference.
And fear of indifference as well.
Where were you?
I had just left Nevers.
I was in Paris. In the street.
That's a beautiful French word:
Nevers.
A word like any other.
Just like the town.
Have you met many Japanese in Hiroshima?
A few, but none like you.
- Am I the first Japanese in your life?
- Yes.
Hiroshima.
The whole world rejoiced, and you rejoiced with it.
Was it a beautiful summer day in Paris?
I heard it was. Wasn't it?
Yes, it was a nice day.
- How old were you?
- Twenty. You?
- Twenty-two.
- The same age, really.
Just about.
What do you do for work?
I'm an architect.
And I'm also... in politics.
Is that why you speak French so well?
That's why. To read about the French Revolution.
What is this film you're in?
It's a film about peace.
What else would you expect in Hiroshima?
I'd like to see you again.
At this time tomorrow...
I'll be on my way back to France.
Really? You didn't tell me.
It's true.
There was no point in telling you.
That's why you let me come up to your room last night.
Because it was your last day in Hiroshima.
Not at all.
The thought never crossed my mind.
When you speak, I wonder whether you lie or tell the truth.
I lie... and I tell the truth.
But I have no reason to lie to you.
Tell me, do things like this happen to you often?
Not all that often.
But they happen.
I'm very fond of men.
I have dubious morals, you know.
What do you call having "dubious morals"?
Being dubious about other people's morals.
I'd like to see you again.
Even if your plane leaves tomorrow morning.
Even if you have dubious morals.
Why?
Because.
You don't want to talk to me anymore?
I'd like to see you again.
Where are you going in France?
Nevers?
No, Paris.
I'm never going back to Nevers.
- Never?
- Never.
I was never younger than I was in Nevers.
Young in Nevers.
Young in Nevers.
And mad in Nevers too.
You see, Nevers is the one city in the world - the one thing in the world -
I dream of most at night.
And at the same time, think about the least.
What was this madness of yours in Nevers like?
Madness is like intelligence.
You can't explain it.
Just like intelligence.
It comes over you, consumes you, and then you understand.
But when it's gone, you no longer understand it at all.
Were you full of hate?
That was my madness.
I was mad with hate.
I felt I could make a career of hating.
All I cared about was hating.
Do you understand?
- Yes.
It's true. I guess you must understand that too.
Did it ever happen to you again?
It's over.
- During the war?
- Right after it.
Was that one of the hardships of life in France after the war?
You could say that.
When did this madness of yours pass?
It went away little by little, and then when I had children, of course.
What did you say?
I said it went away little by little, and then when I had children, of course.
I'd like to spend a few days with you somewhere sometime.
Me too.
To see you again today wouldn't really be "seeing you again."
Such a short time doesn't count.
I really would like to.
Very well.
It's because you know I'm leaving tomorrow.
That may be part of it.
But it's as good a reason as any, isn't it?
The thought of never seeing you again in just a few hours -
You were easy to find in Hiroshima.
Is it a French film?
No. International. it's about peace.
- Is it finished?
- It is for me.
There are some crowd scenes left to shoot.
There are lots of commercials for soap.
Maybe by pressing the point -
Yes, maybe.
Here in Hiroshima we don't make fun of films about peace.
Are you tired?
No more than you.
I've been thinking about Nevers in France.
I've been thinking about you.
Is your flight still tomorrow?
- Yes.
- Without fail?
- Yes.
The picture is behind schedule.
I was supposed to be in Paris a month ago.
You give me a tremendous desire to love.
Always.
Short-lived affairs.
Me too.
It's not always this strong, and you know it.
They say there's a storm coming before nightfall.
IF ONE A-BOMB EQUALS
20,000 ORDINARY BOMBS,
AND AN H-BOMB EQUALS
1,500 ATOMIC BOMBS,
HOW MUCH DO THE 40,000
A-BOMBS AND H-BOMBS
CURRENTLY STOCKPILED
IN THE WORLD EQUAL?
THEY ARE A TRIBUTE
TO MAN'S SCIENTIFIC GENIUS.
BUT UNFORTUNATELY MAN'S
POLITICAL INTELLIGENCE
IS 100 TIMES
LESS DEVELOPED
THAN HIS SCIENTIFIC
INTELLIGENCE,
AND FOR THAT REASON
HE FORFEITS OUR RESPECT.
STOP THERMONUCLEAR
TESTING!
I don't like to think about you leaving tomorrow.
I think I love you.
You will come with me once more.
Answer me.
Are you afraid?
Sit down.
Are you all alone in Hiroshima?
Where is your wife?
She's in Unzen, in the mountains.
I'm alone.
When is she coming back?
In a few days.
What is your wife like?
Beautiful.
I'm a man who's happy with his wife.
So am I.
I'm a woman who's happy with her husband.
It would have been too easy.
- Don't you work in the afternoon?
- Yes, a lot.
Mostly in the afternoon.
This whole thing is ridiculous.
Are you giving up your afternoon because of me?
Tell me.
What difference can it make?
The man you loved during the war - was he French?
He wasn't French.
Yes.
It was in Nevers.
At first we met in barns.
Then among the ruins.
Then in rooms.
Like anywhere else.
Then he died.
I was 18.
He was 23.
Why speak of him and not others?
- Why not?
- No! Why?
Because of Nevers.
I'm only just beginning to know you, and from the many thousands of things in your life,
I choose Nevers.
Just like that?
Yes.
No, it wasn't by chance.
You have to tell me why.
I somehow understand that it was there that you were so young that you didn't yet belong to anyone in particular, and I like that.
No, that's not it.
I somehow understand that it was there that I almost lost you and ran the risk of never, ever meeting you.
I somehow understand that it was there that you began to be who you are today.
I want to leave this place!
There's nothing left for us to do now but kill the hours until your departure.
Sixteen hours until your flight.
It's too much!
You mustn't be afraid.
Does "Nevers" have any other meaning in French?
No.
Would you have been cold in that cellar in Nevers if we had loved each other?
I would have been cold.
The cellars in Nevers are cold both summer and winter.
The city slopes down to a river called the Loire.
I can't picture Nevers.
Nevers. Population 40,000.
Built like a capital.
A child can walk all the way around it.
I was born in Nevers.
I grew up in Nevers.
I learned to read in Nevers.
That's where I turned 20.
And the Loire?
It's a completely unnavigable river.
It's always empty... due to its irregular course and sand bars.
In France it's considered a very beautiful river... due mostly to its light.
So very soft.
If you only knew.
When you're in the cellar, am I dead?
You're dead.
How can anyone endure such pain?
The cellar is small.
Very small.
The "Marseillaise" passes above my head.
It's deafening!
Hands become useless in a cellar.
They claw and scrape away at the rocks...
until they bleed.
It's all you can think of to help yourself
and to remember.
I loved blood since I had tasted yours.
The world passes by above my head... in place of the sky, of course.
I watch that world pass by.
Hurriedly during the week...
leisurely on Sundays.
It doesn't know I'm in the cellar.
They pretend I'm dead.
Dead, far from Nevers.
My father prefers it that way, since I was disgraced.
My father prefers -
Do you scream?
Not in the beginning.
I call your name softly.
- But I'm dead.
I call your name anyway.
Even if you're dead.
Then one day, I suddenly scream.
Loud, like a deaf person.
That's when they put me in the cellar.
To punish me.
What did you scream?
Your German name.
Just your name.
The only memory I have left is your name.
I promise I won't scream anymore,
so they take me back up to my room.
I yearn for you so badly
I can't bear it anymore.
- Are you afraid?
- I'm afraid everywhere.
In the cellar. In my room.
- Of what?
- Of never seeing you again.
Even
I turn 20 one day in the cellar.
My mother comes and tells me I'm 20 years old.
My mother's crying.
Do you spit in your mother's face?
Yes.
Drink.
Afterwards,
I don't remember anymore.
I don't remember anymore.
You were saying the cellars in Nevers are old and damp?
Yes, full of saltpeter.
Sometimes a cat comes in to have a look around.
It doesn't bother me.
I don't remember anymore.
Afterwards,
I don't remember anymore.
How long?
An eternity.
I was so young once!
At night my mother takes me into the garden.
She looks at my head.
Every night she looks carefully at my head.
She still doesn't dare come close.
At night I can see the town square.
So I look.
It's huge.
It curves in the middle.
Sleep comes only at dawn.
Does it ever rain?
Along the walls.
I think of you... but I no longer speak of it.
Madwoman!
Madly in love with you.
My hair grows back.
I can feel it with my hands, day by day.
I don't care.
But still, it's growing back.
Do you scream before going down to the cellar?
No. I feel nothing.
They're young.
They shave my head carefully till they finish the job.
They believe it's their duty.
Are you ashamed for them, my love?
You are dead.
I'm too busy suffering.
Night falls.
I hear nothing but the sound of the scissors on my head.
It eases the pain of your death a bit, like -
I don't know how else to say it - like for my nails, the walls, my anger.
What pain!
What pain in my heart!
They sing the "Marseillaise" all through the town.
Night falls.
My dead lover is an enemy of France.
Someone says she should be paraded through town.
My father's pharmacy is closed due to the disgrace.
I am alone.
Some of them are laughing.
I return home at night.
And then one day, my love, your eternity comes to an end.
Yes.
A long time.
They said it was a long time.
The cathedral bells ring at 6:00 every evening, summer and winter.
One day I hear them.
I remember having heard them before.
Before, when we were in love,
when we were happy.
I begin to see.
I remember having seen before,
when we were in love,
when we were happy.
I remember.
I see the ink.
I see the daylight.
I see my life. Your death.
My life that goes on, your death that goes on.
I see that the shadows take longer to reach the corners of the room...
and the corners of the cellar.
About half past 6:00.
Winter has ended.
It's horrible!
I remember you less and less clearly.
Give me something to drink.
I begin to forget you.
I tremble at forgetting such love.
More.
We were to meet at noon on the banks of the Loire.
I was to leave with him.
When I arrived at noon on the banks of the Loire...
he wasn't quite dead yet.
Someone had fired on him from a garden.
I stayed by his body all that day... and all the following night.
The next morning, they came to get him and put him in a truck.
Nevers was liberated that night.
The cathedral bells rang and rang.
He grew cold beneath me, little by little.
He took so long to die!
When?
I don't know exactly.
I was lying on top of him.
The moment of his death actually escaped me... because at that moment and even afterwards - yes, I can even say afterwards -
I couldn't find the slightest difference between his dead body and my own.
His body and mine... seemed to me to be one and the same.
You understand?
He was my first love!
Then one day I screamed again,
so they put me back in the cellar.
It was warm.
I think it was then that my hatred left me.
I don't scream anymore.
I become reasonable.
They say,
"She's become reasonable."
One holiday evening... they let me out.
The banks of the Loire at dawn.
People cross the bridge,
in greater or smaller numbers, depending on the hour.
From afar they're nobody.
It isn't long after that
that my mother tells me I must leave for Paris during the night.
She gives me some money.
I take off for Paris one night on a bicycle.
It's summer, and the nights are warm.
When I get to Paris two days later,
Hiroshima is in all the papers.
My hair has grown back to a decent length.
I'm among the crowds in the street.
Fourteen years have passed.
I don't even remember his hands very well.
I still remember the pain a little bit.
Tonight?
Yes, I remember it tonight.
But one day
I will no longer remember it.
At all.
Nothing.
This time tomorrow,
I'll be thousands of miles from you.
Does your husband know this story?
So I'm the only one?
Yes.
I'm the only one who knows!
Be quiet.
It's so nice sometimes to be with someone!
Yes.
Tell me more.
Tell me.
In a few years, when I have forgotten you, and other adventures like this one will happen to me from sheer force of habit...
I'll remember you as the symbol of love's forgetfulness.
I'll think of this story as of the horror of forgetting.
I already know it.
Don't things ever stop at night in Hiroshima?
No, they never stop.
I like that.
Cities where there's always someone awake, day or night.
Sometimes we have to avoid thinking about the problems life presents.
Otherwise we'd suffocate.
Get away from me.
The sun hasn't risen yet.
We'll probably die without ever seeing each other again.
Yes, probably.
Unless, perhaps, one day... a war-
Yes.
A war.
You think you know,
but no.
Never.
In her youth in Nevers she had a German love.
We'll go to Bavaria, my love, and we'll get married.
She never went to Bavaria.
Let those who never went to Bavaria dare speak to her of love!
You were not quite dead yet.
I told our story.
I cheated on you tonight with that stranger.
I told our story.
You see, it was there to tell.
Fourteen years since
I've tasted an impossible love!
Since Nevers.
Look how I'm forgetting you.
Look how I've forgotten you.
Look at me.
I'm going to stay in Hiroshima.
With him. Every night.
In Hiroshima.
I'm going to stay here. Here.
Stay in Hiroshima.
Of course I'll stay in Hiroshima... with you.
I'm so miserable!
I wasn't expecting this at all.
You understand?
Go away!
I couldn't possibly leave you.
Stay in Hiroshima with me.
He's going to walk towards me.
He's going to take me by the shoulders.
He's going to kiss me.
He's going to kiss me and I'll be lost.
I meet you.
I remember you.
This city was tailor-made for love.
You fit my body like a glove.
Who are you?
You're destroying me.
I was hungry.
Hungry for infidelity,
for adultery, for lies
and for death.
I always have been.
I had no doubt you'd cross my path one day.
I waited for you calmly, with boundless impatience.
Devour me.
Deform me to your likeness,
so that no one after you will ever again understand
the reason for so much desire.
We'll be alone, my love.
Night will never end.
The day will never dawn again on anyone.
Never again.
At last.
You're still destroying me.
You're good for me.
We'll mourn the departed day
in good conscience and with goodwill.
There'll be nothing else for us to do
but mourn the departed day.
Time will pass. Only time.
And a time will come...
when we can no longer name what it is that binds us.
Its name will gradually be erased from our memory
until it vanishes completely.
Perhaps there's a chance you'll stay.
You know very well.
Staying is even more impossible than leaving.
A week.
Three days.
Time enough for what?
To live from it? To die from it?
Time enough to know which.
There is no such thing.
Neither time enough to live from it, nor time enough to die from it.
So I don't give a damn.
I would prefer you had died in Nevers.
So would I.
But I didn't die in Nevers.
Nevers, you whom I'd forgotten,
tonight I'd like to see you again.
Night after night, month after month, I set you afire...
while my body was ablaze with his memory.
While my body is still ablaze with the memory of you...
I'd like to see Nevers once again.
The Loire.
Lovely poplar trees of Nièvre...
I give you up to oblivion.
Dime-store romance,
I consign you to oblivion.
One night without you and I waited for day to deliver me.
One day without his eyes and she dies,
the young girl from Nevers,
shameless young girl from Nevers.
One day without his hands and she knows the pain of love.
Silly little girl
who died of love in Nevers.
Little girl from Nevers with shaven head,
this evening
I relinquish you to oblivion.
Dime-store romance.
As it was with him, forgetting will begin with your eyes.
Then, as with him, it will swallow your voice.
Then, as with him, it will consume you entirely,
little by little.
You will become a song.
Who is she?
A Frenchwoman.
What's the matter?
She's leaving Japan in a little while.
We're sad at having to leave each other.
I had to come.
I'll forget you.
I'm forgetting you already!
Look how I'm forgetting you!
Look at me!
That's your name.
Yes, that's my name.
And your name is Nevers.
Nevers in France.
OFFICIAL ENTRY
1959 FESTIVAL OF THE ARTS
A SHOCHIKU FILM
THE HUMAN CONDITION
Produced by NINGEN PRODUCTION
Developed by SHIGERU WAKATSUKI
Producer - TATSUO HOSO YA
Ass't Producer - MASAHARU KOKAJI
Based on the Novel by
JUNPEI GOMIKAWA
Screenplay by ZENZO MATSUYAMA and MASAKI KOBAYASHI
Dir. Of Photography - YOSHIO MIYAJIMA
Production Design - KAZUE HIRATAKA
Music - CHUJI KINOSHITA
Sound Recording - HIDEO NISHIZAKI
Lighting - AKIRA AOMATSU
Editing - KEIICHI URAOKA
Sound Technician - TAKESHI KANEKO
Ass't Director - KOICHI INAGAKI
Set Design - TAKAMASA KOBAYASHI
Set Decoration - SEIJI ISHIKAWA
Production Ass't. - MASAYA ARAKI
Ass't Camera - TAKASHI KAWAMATA
Production Manager
ZENPEI MORIYAMA
Cast of Part 3
TATSUYA NAKADAI as Kaji
MICHIYO ARATAMA as Michiko
KOKINJI KATSURA - Sasa
JUN TATARA - Hino
MICHIO MINAMI - Yoshida
KEl SATO - Shinjo
KUNIE TANAKA - Obara
RYOHEI UCHIDA
KAN YANAGIYA, KENJIRO UEMURA
KANEKO IWASAKI
MAYUMI KURATA, TAKETOSHI NAITO
HIDEO KIDOKORO
YOSHIAKI AOKI, RO OSE
TAMOTSU TAMURA
KOJI ITO, SEN HARA
Cast of Part 4
TATSUYA NAKADAI as Kaji
KEIJI SADA as Kageyama
YUSUKE KAWAZU - Terada
SUSUMU FUJITA - Naruto
MINORU CHIAKI - Onodera
SHOJI YASUI - Officer Aspirant
FUMIO WATANABE - Staff Officer
JUN HAMAMURA, SHOJI KOBAYASHI
KEIJIRO MOROZUMI
YOSHIO HAYANO, SHOBUN INOUE
SHINJI MAKI, SHOJIRO OGASAWARA
Directed by
MASAKI KOBAYASHI
PART 3
- All's in order, sir!
- Good.
Attention!
All's in order, sir!
- Good.
Salute!
At ease.
JANUARY 23RD - 20:00 HOURS
32° BELOW ZERO
Here he comes.
You recruits are feigning sleep, eh?
You can't rest until I've made my rounds.
All seems to be in order.
Recruits, fall in!
Turn on the light.
Legs apart and grit your teeth.
Idiots!
Did that hurt?
- No, sir!
Good.
I'll teach you dogs a lesson!
Fools!
You know what that was for?
What about you?
- I dunno.
- What?
I don't know, sir!
You don't?
Well, I'll show you.
It was for this.
Since when do you use the water tank as an ashtray?
Speak up!
The duty officer specifically ordered that those tanks be kept clean and sanitary.
We received the order.
Who was on duty today?
Step forward!
Remove your glasses.
Get up!
Obara refilled the tanks before evening mess.
I removed the ash trays after "lights out."
You're implying that one of your superiors smoked after "lights out"?
Kaji, are you trying to pin blame on a senior serviceman?
No. I only said that Obara showed no neglect.
Watch your language!
Recruit Obara admits his neglect.
Of course.
Why didn't you say so?
- I'm very sorry.
- You should be.
- I'll be more careful.
- It's too late for that!
Owaku, where are you going?
To change the water.
You don't have to do that.
Kaji, you dare talk back to PFC Bannai?
I didn't talk back.
The platoon leader demands discipline!
Who taught you to be insubordinate?
Your friend Shinjo over there?
Logic won't get you anywhere in this army.
Don't try acting big around here just because you went to college.
Any arguments?
PFC Bannai, leave this to me.
Very well.
You, report to me later!
Can't you even see the target?
I can.
Then your heart isn't in it.
Take careful aim.
Imagine it's the enemy out there.
Come on, Obara.
Hit it, please!
Draw a bead carefully onto the target at the bottom of the bull's -eye.
Hold your breath!
Apply pressure on the trigger and squeeze gently.
You idiot!
No luck.
We'll never get to lunch at this rate.
And always because of him!
- It can't be helped.
- Shut up, you hick.
That's no excuse.
What's going on over there?
Stop acting like starved mongrels.
Kaji!
Show Obara how to do it.
Yes, sir!
Unstack arms.
Show him you can hit the target with eyes closed.
- With eyes closed?
- That's right.
With proper posture, you should at least hit the target.
Objective - the target!
Position - prone!
Obara, watch how he holds it and squeezes the trigger.
You see, Obara?
Bad eyesight is no excuse.
Try again.
Obara, try to relax.
Don't jerk the trigger.
Squeeze down on it.
Squeeze it slowly.
Slowly now...
You'd be better off dead!
You're a disgrace to the whole Kwangtung Army!
Obara, listen carefully.
A sense of responsibility is a soldier's life.
A grenade could wipe out your squad because of your missed shot.
Show some responsibility and some shame!
To the target on the double!
Kaji, you go with him.
Bayonet attack!
Charge!
Down!
Obara, stop crying!
Forward!
"A t the time,
Kaji was trying to save
the lives
of innocent Chinese.
This earned him the hatred
of the Kenpeitai.
They arrested him
and grilled him mercilessly.
If my husband
had indeed been guilty,
they would not have released him
after just 20 days.
I fervently hope that
this unfortunate incident...
will not compromise his position
as a member of your unit.
As the wife of a recruit,
I address this appeal to you.
The life of a recruit
under suspicion
would be a living hell
with no salvation."
Orderly!
Where's the orderly?
Entering, sir!
Your orderly, sir!
Call Warrant Officer Hino.
Salute the warrant officer!
Present arms!
Eyes front!
PFC Yamazaki now relieved of guard duty, sir.
Good.
Thank you for your work!
Knock it off!
See to your own duties.
Thank you.
We're very grateful.
Anything you need washed?
That's all right.
You're a hard worker, Kaji.
I hated laundry duty even more than beatings.
One might hate it, but there's no avoiding it.
You won't be a private forever like me.
You're tops among the recruits.
But don't forget:
You're under suspicion.
I know.
They can't afford to have a Red leading the pack.
They're hoping you'll make a misstep.
You and I can't even talk without being watched.
Anything suspicious about Kaji's actions?
Have you received reports to that effect?
I asked if you had.
None, sir, though I have him under surveillance.
What are Sergeant Hashitani's thoughts?
He's giving Kaji special sniper training now, sir.
- He's a good marksman?
- An unerring eye, sir.
- And his barracks discipline?
- Excellent, sir.
How is he with Shinjo?
They seem close, but -
Seem? You don't know?
They're both blacklisted by the Kenpeitai.
They have no time now to do any plotting.
Why's that?
I've kept Shinjo on constant supply transport and guard duty.
Keep an eye on them.
They'll soon show their true colors.
If they straighten up, they could be our best soldiers.
Attention!
At ease.
Listen as you are.
Afternoon training is canceled.
There'll be an arms inspection.
The tiniest speck of dust will not be tolerated.
After dark there'll be sentry training, followed by attack training at dawn.
What do you think?
Like the full schedule?
Owaku, you have a letter.
Kaji.
Obara.
Corporal Shibata.
- Salute!
Arms inspection again?
From your wife?
Read it out loud.
No, I save it till I can't bear it any longer.
Oh, well.
You must have a good wife.
I wonder what that wench of mine is up to.
Hey, Obara.
Think things will get better after basic?
It won't be this rough much longer.
I'm getting fed up.
Don't let little things get you down.
Little things, eh?
Bad news from home bothering you?
My mother and wife are fighting as usual.
My wife's threatening to leave home.
Doesn't mean she's leaving you.
You wouldn't understand.
You've had all the breaks.
It would leave my aging mother all alone.
Back one and drop the other.
To back 'em both is asking for trouble.
That's the wrong one.
Take it out.
You broke it.
You weren't paying attention.
You fool!
That was mine!
What are you gonna do about it?
I'm not apologizing to the army for you.
That won't fix your rifle, Kubo.
Forgive him.
- No, I won't!
- Then don't.
You stay out of this.
Everybody here knows you're a Red.
And so?
I'm just saying no one loves a Red.
Hit me.
Hit me all you want.
Attention!
Eyes right!
Front!
- All right, they're ready.
- Thank you!
Start distributing.
- Is there a Private Shinjo here?
- Yes, one.
Private Shinjo will take two recruits and clean out the latrines.
Good luck.
On whose orders?
Sergeant Soga's.
He sets up the roster for latrine duty too?
Quit your griping, Shinjo.
Is a three-year man too good to clean latrines?
Tell the NCO on duty or Warrant Officer Hino that I'll do it alone.
I don't need help from any recruits.
Shinjo... better take somebody along.
It ain't easy cartin' all that shit alone.
Will none of you recruits go with him?
Kaji, why don't you go?
You're another Red shit like him.
Kubo, come with us.
I don't take orders from you.
That's it, fight it out.
The liquor will be here soon.
Come on, one more!
Get moving.
Recruit Kaji to latrine duty!
Recruit Tanoue to latrine duty!
That's the spirit!
They're giving you and me all the dirty work.
Standing duty the other night,
I suddenly realized how haggard you looked.
You've been on constant duty.
You have stamina, Kaji.
I've about had it.
They're just waiting for me to cave in under the pressure.
Salute!
- All is in order.
- Good.
A huddle in the latrine?
A truly stinking discussion.
Sir... does the company commander approve all duty assignments?
I wouldn't know.
Ask WO Hino.
I'll do that.
One more question.
What happens if a soldier refuses an assignment?
When such assignment is unfair, of course.
I suggest you check the Army Penal Code.
Aren't you asking for trouble?
I don't care about going home, but I do want to get out of here.
What do you mean?
I'm not even sure myself.
To go to some unknown place and get a fresh start.
Someplace where no one knows me.
Is there such a place?
Escaping from here only means immediate recapture.
There's only one other possibility.
Is the border close?
Not far.
But it's all marshland up to the lake.
Get bogged down there and you're finished.
Which would you choose?
The land where people are promised freedom... or the land where your loving wife awaits you?
I promised my wife we'd start a new life together.
You really believe you'll get back alive?
I don't know... but I hope so.
A rare Sunday leave
Walking down the boulevard
With her hairdo
of a married woman
She led me up the stairs
To a tiny little room
" You're a wisteria
dangling above
And I'm a lily below"
Just five minutes
To get back to barracks
"Come on, let me go!"
No time to take a train
No money for a cab
With my legs strong
from daily drills
I'll make a run for it
PFC Yoshida!
There's to be a transfer.
A transfer?
They can't toss us out of here after four years' service.
They've already decided who it is.
Who?
Kaji, got a copy of the Penal Code?
Don't let them get to you.
What's the Penal Code for,
Shinjo?
What did you tell him just now?
- Nothing.
- Nothing?
A senior serviceman addressed you and you didn't reply?
Sir, have I done something wrong?
That's better.
What did you say?
Use your head.
We're celebrating today.
A beating could hurt.
I mentioned that he seemed tired and shouldn't be reading.
Hear that?
Telling a three-year man what to do.
So the old veteran
Shinjo is tired, eh?
Hey, Shinjo!
Sorry to fatigue you even more, but may I trouble you with a question?
It seems he didn't hear you.
I'll clean out his ears!
A fight means trouble for us both, Yoshida.
I was reading the Penal Code at Sergeant Soga's suggestion to learn how to refuse an order without being insubordinate.
Attention!
Attention!
Salute!
At ease.
What happened?
It's Private Shinjo, sir.
He was taken suddenly ill.
I put him to bed.
Does a feverish man account for broken bowls?
Pick up these pieces.
Salute!
Cherry tree
the color of my lapel
Your blossoms are scattered
all over Mount Yoshino
If you're born a man
in old Yamato
You must fall like a blossom
at the battle front
It's ridiculous for a lady to come out here.
There's no place for you to stay.
What will you do?
I only wanted to see him.
I had no other concern.
The next train out is tomorrow afternoon.
Will you sleep outdoors?
Or spend the night walking home?
If you'll only let me see him,
I'm willing to walk back.
Recruit Tanoue leaving to polish his boots!
Is Kaji here?
Report to the office.
You have a visitor.
- A visitor?
- Who is it?
A dame, no less!
Son of a bitch!
Better hurry up, Kaji, or someone might swipe her.
Don't be bashful.
Better hurry up.
I'll finish up for you.
Recruit Kaji reporting to the office!
Make sure you come back.
Damn! Coming all the way out here to get laid!
Permission to enter, sir!
- Yes?
- Entering, sir!
Recruit Kaji reporting!
You wanted something?
What did you want?
Recruit Kaji, leaving!
Hold it there.
You're a disgrace to military discipline.
Don't let your wife make you homesick.
You're hereby authorized to spend the night with your wife within the confines of the company storeroom.
I finally had to come.
It's so far.
How did you make it?
I've changed, haven't I?
It must be rough.
I'm used to it now.
But winter makes things tougher.
We went hunting today.
I'll bring some of the meat later.
You haven't lost any weight.
I'm relieved.
You've come all this way, and there's so little I can offer you.
I'm just a recruit.
Look at me.
I am.
You mustn't worry.
I'll come through it all right.
How much time did they give us?
Until morning.
Even less than when they shipped me off.
So... it's all right then?
Entering!
Recruit Sasa with our squad leader's meal!
Ma'am...
Kaji bagged this game for us today.
Eat heartily and enjoy yourselves.
Thanks.
My husband is much indebted to you.
We recruits are all in the same boat.
The army's one helluva place.
But Kaji's a lucky devil.
No other woman would come way out here to see her man.
That's the truth.
There's so little time.
I hope it's not too much... but would you write my wife and tell her to do like you and come out to see me?
All she does is eat and sleep.
She cares about nothing else.
Tell her that things are rough out here and to bring lots of gifts for the senior servicemen.
Ride her good!
Recruit Sasa leaving!
Come on. Let's eat.
A rookie allowed to monkey around with his wife!
The army sheds bitter tears!
Kaji, you're a sneaky one, keeping all the good things for yourself.
I request this favor.
He wants blankets.
Your wife should keep you warm.
Aren't your own blankets enough?
They are. I'll make do.
Rolling around on a narrow futon.
Curse the blasted luck!
As long as we're alive, we'll be able to meet again.
I came here confident that I'd get to see you.
Even after you left, that
Sergeant Watai kept coming by.
Wanted me to let him read your letters.
Nasty man! Maybe he thinks you're planning to desert.
What would you do if I did?
Where would you go?
Across the border.
There's a man in my squad named Shinjo.
After three years, he's still a private.
His brother was arrested for communist leanings.
Even his girlfriend sold him out.
He claims there's a better world beyond that border.
A better world?
Where they treat people like human beings.
And you intend to escape there all by yourself?
You can't run away!
Not while you still have me!
The warrant officer said you were a top soldier, but you're still under suspicion, aren't you?
I won't go.
I won't run away.
I'll carry on here.
Please don't run away.
Come back to me.
All is in order!
You are relieved.
Assuming duty.
Forward... march!
Break step!
Don't forget your promise to come back alive.
I won't forget.
Aren't you sleepy?
Not a bit.
There wasn't anything else you wished to say?
No.
Even if there were,
I couldn't express it in words.
I'm always thinking
I must tell you about this, mustn't forget to tell you that.
Me too.
Thanks for coming to see me.
It's only natural.
Thank you for such a wonderful night.
Don't thank me.
There's so little I can do.
Let's hope we never spend such a wretched yet beautiful night again.
Maybe it's because... you're headed for the front.
Why do you say that?
I just have this strange feeling.
Maybe that's why they let me see you.
No, you must come back to me!
You have to!
Will you grant me one last favor?
Anything. Just ask.
I came here for your sake.
I realize it's cold... but I'd like you to undress and stand over by that window.
I must see you... all of you.
I want to burn that image into my mind.
I have nothing to offer you!
Nothing!
Please take me!
Reveille!
What's wrong, Kaji?
All worn out?
Bastard!
Come on, Kaji.
I'll give you a workout.
I'm not as easy to poke as your wife. Come on!
I'm ready!
Enough!
Well done, Kaji.
PFC Yoshida... you let this recruit push you around?
Let's have another round like that.
I'm ready!
Don't retreat, Kaji.
Retreat is no way to victory.
I'm right here.
Come at me!
What is it?
I can't see you off.
We're leaving on maneuvers.
Be careful on your way back.
Time to part once again.
Thank you for coming.
Hurry and go.
I can't bear it.
Let's not say "good-bye", all right?
A soldier's will before departing should convey his resolution to his family and inspire them to carry on in a fitting way.
What does a departing soldier's resolution imply? Speak up.
It means to lay down one's life for one's country.
You parrot back the right answer, but what did you write in your letter?
"Driving you crazy," eh?
"So worried that I could never face death" - was that it?
Coward! I've never seen a worse soldier in ten years of service!
Obara admits his fault, sir.
That's not the answer your commander seeks!
Such effeminate ideas are more harmful than Red propaganda.
Even a Red will fight bravely when the time comes, but your kind surrenders before fighting.
WO Hino... see that he writes to his wife again.
Let him reaffirm his resolution.
" Tomie...
your thinking
is completely mistaken.
It's the duty
of a Japanese wife
to look after her mother-in-law
in her husband's absence.
Please consider
how your endless complaining
interferes with
the performance of my duties.
I'm very busy here.
Your bickering with my mother
hinders me in my training.
It's my wish that you look
after my mother,
but if you feel this
to be impossible,
I must ask you
to leave my house."
Buck up, Obara!
We're only halfway there!
Come on!
Regulate your breathing!
This march ends your basic training.
Don't disgrace the whole squad!
Obara, don't give up!
Come on! Keep going!
Somebody help him with his pack.
What kind of buddies are you?
Very well! I'll help him.
You gonna let that happen?
Can you hold up your heads up if I do?
Lance Corporal, sir!
- I'll help him.
- Good! Compassion for a buddy.
But if he still drops out, leave him.
A cart will pick him up.
Give me your blanket, pick, shovel, and tent.
You can handle the rest, right?
Sorry, Kaji. Forgive me.
Hurry up!
Let me rest a while.
Your pack is 20 pounds lighter.
You don't need a rest!
You go on ahead.
I don't want you dropping out on my account.
Shut up and walk!
Quit now and all you've suffered will have been in vain.
We're almost done with basic.
Show some guts for once!
Obara, get up!
Get up, Obara!
It's no use.
Leave me behind.
I can't go on.
You'd let my help be for nothing?
Think what the senior soldiers will do to you, you fool!
It's no use.
Then to hell with you!
Be a quitter!
I'm going on!
Hate me all you want.
You quit before the fight was over.
But I won't quit!
You hear? I'm going!
A bit fatigued, honorable recruits?
Bastard!
- Back a bit early, aren't you?
- Get up!
We've been waiting for you wretched dogs!
All you think about is food!
Stand up!
Stupid dog!
Pull yourself together!
Give 'em a shower!
Worthless scum!
Anyone who rides back on a cart isn't a man!
Don't you dogs have any balls?
If not, we can find a use for you.
Right, Obara?
Keep those fingers straight!
Get behind the gun rack and call out for customers.
"Hey, handsome, come on inside."
Go on.
Move it!
Show us how it's done.
The honorable Shosuke Obara
What made the man go broke
He loved his morning baths,
morning chasers and morning lays
It finally wore the poor man out
Get on with it.
Hey, mister, come in and have some fun.
Absolutely no sex appeal!
Hey, handsome, come on inside.
That's it.
Now beckon with your hands.
Say, handsome, come inside.
- Any takers for the lady?
- That's one I'd rather not mount.
Here's a customer.
Come on, keep it up!
Come on inside, handsome.
Want me to come in?
I haven't gotten any in a long time.
No objections to me buying this one?
We appreciate the business!
You stinkin' shit!
You dog!
In the infantry, we don't ride home like a bunch of whores!
We walk! You got that?
You should be grateful.
We never had it this easy!
You scum!
Worthless shit!
Why don't you go kill yourself?
Just returning the book I borrowed.
Get up!
Mind if I go to the latrine?
Don't be a fool!
You're on duty.
You're dead if they catch you.
Say I'm patrolling outside.
Do whatever you want.
We all have to die... sometime.
Is that a sign that I shouldn't?
Yes! After all, one can die at any time.
Does that give you something to think about?
On your feet!
Attention!
Your morals are putrid!
You're like a bunch of stinking women!
This quitter who committed suicide... wasn't the only one at fault here.
It proves you're all rotten.
When did I ever train you to be like that?
What about it?
If you feel I didn't train you right, speak up!
All right. Dismissed.
Do we stand guard over the corpse?
He's dead now.
He was a human being, after all.
That dog Obara jinxed us to the very end!
Say that again!
What's wrong?
Why so worked up?
Will you back me?
Don't do it. They're all on edge over Obara's suicide.
You should have done it yesterday.
- Then why did you stop me?
Would you have stood a chance if you'd intervened?
I won't involve you, but I'll see this through.
Sir, I demand that
PFC Yoshida be punished.
Demand?
That's no way to address your superiors.
Are you aware of the personal punishment he inflicted upon Obara yesterday?
I am not.
Not even a private 1st class is authorized to inflict such personal punishment upon a recruit.
But yesterday -
Hold it there!
Only dogs inform on others.
I'm not informing.
I'm demanding punishment.
Suicide is contrary to military discipline.
No matter the reason, there's no excuse.
Was Yoshida's action in accord with military discipline?
Forcing a helpless recruit to mimic a common harlot?
Silence!
You dog!
Regardless of what
Yoshida did, this is all pure speculation on your part.
I don't claim it was the only reason... but it was the final humiliating blow.
Listen carefully.
A false step now could ruin your whole life.
I'm not concerned about myself.
What do you intend to do?
If you fail to adopt appropriate measures, I shall -
Spit it out!
It may be unwise, but there's no other way.
I'll be forced to take action myself.
You plan to make trouble, eh?
A personal feud could mean a stiff term in the guard house.
I won't be there alone.
Sir... please convey to PFC Yoshida that he'd better watch out for Kaji.
So you're implying that I indirectly caused my husband's death?
I can't honestly say otherwise.
I understand.
If only I hadn't written that letter.
It sounds cruel, but it's true.
I'm in a similar position.
I let him drop out during our march.
To help him walk would have meant dropping out myself.
If only I had quit with him -
The army recognizes no such reason for shirking one's duty.
When one drops out, what happens to him?
Please ask the warrant officer.
Quitters are the dredges of the military, a disgrace to their company.
Then my husband's suicide has doubled his shame?
I had hoped you'd understand.
Are there special ways of handling men who drop out?
No, nothing specific.
However, their promotions are delayed.
I just can't believe it!
My husband wasn't the type to do such a thing.
There must have been some reason.
Won't you tell me the truth?
A demoralized home front is the main reason.
Good soldiers only come from wholesome families.
I wouldn't probe too deeply.
Please try to see it like this.
A part of Obara died due to your feuding with your mother-in-law.
Another part died when I deserted him.
What was left -
That's enough!
You're dismissed.
Recruit Kaji leaving!
Is it true you're contemplating revenge on a superior out of personal enmity?
Answer me!
I have not breached military discipline, but PFC Yoshida has.
It's unfair to question me first.
You scum!
Is that any way to address the commander?
It's all right.
Let him speak.
Go ahead.
He inflicted unauthorized personal punishment of a vile nature after Obara dropped out from sheer fatigue.
I only ask why this goes unpunished.
- You were given an A in marching?
- Yes, sir.
- How were you treated that day?
- Very well, sir.
- Did Yoshida harass you?
- No, sir.
Would he have if you had dropped out?
I believe so, sir.
- Was Obara the only man punished?
- There were three men, sir.
- All by Yoshida?
- No, by others too.
Did all three commit suicide?
No, sir.
- Just Obara?
- Yes, sir.
Then why do you single out Yoshida?
Because Obara killed himself.
But I'm ready to press charges against the others too.
Silence!
It's clear you're out to get Yoshida and cause disorder in the unit.
Obara's death is merely an excuse.
By blaming a superior for a weak soldier's suicide, you undermine our finest military traditions.
I do not blame
PFC Yoshida alone.
His actions only revealed the absurdity of conditions here.
That's why I demand his punishment.
Obara's death was not caused by domestic troubles.
Then what did cause it?
With your eloquence,
I'm sure you can explain.
Tell me.
Answer me!
The basic cause... is the military itself.
You'd make a good private 1st class if you'd shut up!
Hashitani, teach him a lesson.
That's enough.
I'll warn you again:
Personal feuds are forbidden.
Violations will be treated as insubordination.
All right. You may go.
Recruit Kaji leaving!
That one has guts.
His type make good soldiers.
WO Hino, I want him kept on the promotions list.
- Keep him on, sir?
- Yes.
Make sure he's well up on the list.
As his stars increase, his ideas will change.
Men are like springs.
The more pressure, the stronger they snap back.
It's best not to drive his kind too hard.
Put him on duty with the vets.
We're headed for the border in a few days anyway.
Thank you for your trying duties.
When did you come out here?
Today. Half the guard's being replaced.
They keeping you out here?
Practically nothing but sentry duty.
That's just like WO Hino.
I admit it's effective.
I've about had it.
It's damn hot.
Take care of yourself.
They're wrong if they think they can wear me down.
What's that scoundrel
Yoshida up to?
Don't do anything rash.
They're just waiting for an excuse to send you to prison.
So this is the real border!
You gonna try?
You coming along?
To the land of promise?
What'll you do over there?
That depends on them.
You believe unconditionally that true freedom can be found over there?
Not unconditionally.
It's all relative.
What use do they have for a deserter?
You'd be a mere tool.
A little tool in the service of their big promises.
You doubt that all races are equal?
I just don't share the same naive certainty.
What have the Japanese done?
Deserting the ranks of the invader doesn't prove the purity of your ideals.
You're still just a deserter.
What are you trying to say?
Prettier flowers blossoming on their soil... doesn't justify rejecting your own.
I could never do it.
This is WO Hino!
You hear me?
Send Kaji back immediately.
We need him for the intramural shooting match in two days.
Got that? What?
I see.
They may not have plans to desert, but the danger definitely exists.
They were seen whispering together again last night.
Obara's death is shame enough for this company.
Have Shinjo transferred out at the first opportunity.
A signal flare!
It's close by!
Not that close.
Yes, it is.
Let's pick up a few merit points.
Come on.
I don't see anything.
You sure?
Might be farther away.
Damn!
Who goes there?
Stop or I'll shoot!
He was fishing.
You scared him and he ran off.
Does that prove he's innocent?
Son of a bitch!
You shot off that flare!
Confess!
I didn't!
I was just out fishing!
Please spare us!
He was really just fishing.
Shinjo, don't just stand there.
Take him to the guard post.
But if he's not the culprit -
Fool!
We'll make him the culprit.
That's ridiculous!
Do as I order you!
Forgive us!
Spare us!
What are you doing?
No, don't! No!
Thanks for your troubles!
Kaji!
- There's mail from your wife.
- You've lost weight!
Have I?
I'm being sent out next week.
Was it rough?
Generally it shouldn't be too bad.
Three letters in three weeks.
Oh, and...
Obara's widow sent a letter to the entire squad.
What did she write?
She apologized for everything.
She also says the dead have no tongue, and she can't find out the truth about Obara's suicide. Right?
What's that scoundrel
Yoshida doing?
Five men for work duty!
At the storeroom.
One, two, three, four - still one short!
Kaji?
Obara would have made it five,
PFC Yoshida!
Yoshida!
Shinjo's been called up before
WO Hino for letting a spy escape.
Long time no see, Kaji.
You know your buddy's going to prison?
You're a disgrace to the Imperial Army!
Bannai shot the culprit anyway, so I'll let you off with the guard house.
I knew you'd end up there sooner or later.
Fire call!
Prairie fire!
Prairie fire!
Let's go!
Fan out to the right!
Move back to the left flank!
What the hell are you doing?
Move forward!
Careful, sir!
Hold your ground!
Move forward!
Start a backfire!
Retreat! Everyone retreat!
Fall back!
Retreat!
Fall back!
Form a fire line where you are!
Stop!
Who's that?
Shinjo.
Deserter!
Sir, a deserter!
It's Shinjo, sir!
Cut that grass!
Kaji, wait!
It's too dangerous! Stop!
Shinjo!
Shinjo, run for it!
Help me, Kaji!
Help me!
Yoshida, I'll save you if you'll make me a promise.
Can you hear me?
Admit to the CO that you made
Obara commit suicide.
Can you hear me?
You're a lucky man.
You probably remember nothing.
We've shot you full of camphor.
I'm afraid it was too late for the other man.
He had hemorrhagic fever.
You were talking in your sleep, calling for Shinjo and a Michiko.
Your sweetheart?
Or your wife?
Both.
Who's been changing my bedpan?
Don't worry about that.
Just try to rest.
- Private Ishii?
- Yes.
- How many years of service?
- Three.
Well, you're not getting away with it!
Hey, medic... didn't you ever learn how to treat patients?
How long have you been in?
Three years, and still a private.
You may be a lance corporal, but don't try pulling rank.
What?
The slob took sputum from a TB patient to get shipped out.
Punishment should be per regulations.
We don't need people shouting in the middle of the night here.
Private Tange, eh?
Very well.
We'll see who has the last laugh.
PRIVATE TANGE
Don't overexert yourself.
They'll have you up and working soon anyway.
No point rushing things.
Patients get work detail too?
A rookie, eh?
Have a seat.
What was your profession,
Honorable Veteran?
Forget the "honorable veteran" stuff.
I was a latheman, and a good one.
Weren't you guys exempted from service?
There are some guys it's safer to keep in the army.
Is that right?
Yes, it is.
You there!
Since when did you start walking?
No one does anything here without authorization.
I'm practicing my walking, nurse.
Hon. Head Nurse!
Sorry, Hon. Head Nurse!
I was practicing walking.
What's so funny?
Lance Cpl. Minakami... this ward lacks discipline.
Army hospitals aren't playgrounds.
Tighten things up!
Try that again and you've had it.
They say Roosevelt's in Russia talking to Stalin.
If Germany surrenders, that leaves only Japan.
Yes, the end is drawing near.
But if the Russians enter the war -
Kaji.
Private Tange's being sent back to his unit.
When?
Tomorrow.
That's terrible.
It's bad news, isn't it?
Sent back to his unit, eh?
No one can ever know what will happen tomorrow.
Your unit's been ordered to the front.
They'll probably keep you here on hospital duty.
Really?
Even in here, there's always more bad news than good.
There was so much
I wanted to discuss with you.
We'll meet again somewhere.
You can always meet those you really wish to.
Someone once told me that true human beings will always find kindred spirits.
You're proof of that.
Don't give me too much credit.
But I appreciate your words.
More work for you.
Writing to your wife?
But I don't dare write the truth.
Because of the censors?
Not just that.
Everything I write ends up as a half-truth.
I want her to know how Ionely I am, but I don't want to worry her.
What's more, as much as I detest army life,
I actually want to stay here as long as I can.
Is it that nice here?
There are things here you don't get at the front.
For instance?
For instance... talking to you.
And now... stay back.
The steam is hot.
Is it all right for you to be here?
I probably shouldn't be.
Nurse Tokunaga, why did you leave your post?
What's the meaning of this misconduct?
A rendezvous in broad daylight - while on duty!
Rendezvous?
Forgive me, but there's been no misconduct.
I asked Nurse Tokunaga to assist me.
A patient issuing orders to a nurse?
That's as bad as a rendezvous!
Hon. Head Nurse,
I came of my own accord.
No excuses!
Get back to your post!
As you are outside my authority,
I shall report this to your superiors.
It seems I repaid your kindness with injury.
You're being sent to the front because of me.
It's all right.
We had to part sooner or later.
We may even meet again somewhere.
I believe we will, whatever the odds.
You can always meet those you really wish to.
PART 4
Class-A fortifications with log-barrel cannons.
Must be the
"scarecrow strategy."
This stinks!
Five years' artillery training, and they give us peashooters.
Let's put that one to old Commander Yamada.
Attention!
Is there a Private Kaji in this squad?
Yes, sir.
It's been a long time, Kaji.
So you're still alive?
At ease!
I am 2nd Lt. Kageyama.
I'm taking over your training as of today.
Who goes there?
Who goes there?
Firefly.
Snow.
Sounds of gun tractors or tanks for 10 minutes.
Otherwise all is in order, sir.
Good work.
What's that?
Probably a festival.
They shot off fireworks.
Doesn't make sense.
The fighting in Europe must have ended.
Germany must have surrendered.
A new batch of recruits arrives soon.
I want you to assist me in their training.
In what way?
The new men range from 20 to 44 years old.
Half active service, the remainder untrained.
Artillery men are a rough bunch.
They'd tear these men to shreds.
Basic is like that anywhere.
That's why I need your help.
Count me out.
I told you I gave up guarding the army's sheep.
I've reported that you're my assistant in the rifle squad.
I'll see that you make private 1st class.
Think you can bait me with a promotion?
No, I know I can't.
I just figured you could spare those recruits a lot of grief.
Need I say more?
I'll accept your proposal... on one condition.
What's that?
I want radical changes in squad composition.
And the training officer has agreed to separate the recruits from the veterans?
He has.
Hon. Squad Leader, if you approve, the company commander will as well.
Sure it's not just to keep the veterans off your own back?
That's part of it, but not all.
Many of the new untrained recruits are in their 40s.
Excessively rough treatment in the barracks would make it difficult for them to learn anything.
From my own days in basic
I remember one case of suicide.
It's our duty to weed out such weaklings.
Training alone won't make men strong.
I'll work them hard during training but show them kindness in the barracks.
What would a two-year man like you know?
You have to put the screws on from the start to teach them what army life is really like.
So, PFC Kaji, you're the new assistant?
That is correct.
What will you teach them?
Just what I was taught.
And what were you taught?
Since you were picked as assistant, you must know a lot.
But there's one thing you have yet to learn.
Masui... teach the lad.
What could a mere private like me teach PFC Kaji?
Don't try to act big around me!
How long have you served?
I'll show you how artillery trains its men!
Cannon No. 1 loaded!
Kaji-san, you're a private 1st class in the infantry.
You could give Masui a beating if you wanted.
So our presence would interfere with training your recruits?
Want to lord it over them all alone, eh?
Won't let anyone lay a finger on your precious recruits, eh?
Then get ready for what you've got coming!
Open your mouth.
Wider!
Now listen carefully!
I didn't plug your ears, so you should be able to hear.
The pheasant that cries is apt to be killed.
This one won't cry anymore, the poor sap.
This is what you get for slighting the veterans.
When your beloved rookies arrive, forget the codes and manuals and teach them that!
Who'll save their hides under fire?
Not your codes or manuals, but the vets.
The same ones showing you such affection now.
Remember that!
The lieutenant!
What's going on here?
Take that slipper out of your mouth!
Take it out.
I'll overlook this whole matter... but only this once.
Such behavior will not be tolerated!
Nice young kid.
Thank you for everything.
- Get your men settled in?
- Yes, sir.
The vets may have grumbled, but you got your way, even if it meant eating that slipper.
I want to train men who'll be willing to die with me.
How many men will the rifle squad get?
Twenty on light machine guns and 20 on mortars.
Well, are you tired out?
Is the border close to the enemy?
The enemy?
Yes, very close.
Then this is the very front line.
I can boast to Father.
What does he do?
He's an officer. A major.
Worried about your kid?
I'm not the only one.
I'll be all right, sir.
Sir...
I'm gonna carry a picture, okay?
Watch the casual language.
What kind of picture?
Of a girl.
Sure. Most pictures are of girls or boys.
- I told you.
- His is different.
It's a naked woman.
A good luck charm?
Something like that.
It'll never pass inspection.
Better sew it into your loincloth.
Listen here:
Use formal language when addressing veterans besides myself.
If they hear
"ain't" or "gonna," you'll get a beating you'll never forget.
Understand?
With eager face
and eager voice
My wife and children
urge me on to great deeds
Come here.
A little early to go around with loose buttons.
Words don't seem to teach you men anything.
I'll be more careful.
May I have it back, please?
No, you may not.
You can come for it later.
The button must have worked itself loose.
Go to the veterans' room and don't waver.
Be prepared for a beating.
Go get it back.
You'll have to handle this yourself.
Recruit Koizumi to retrieve his button!
Enter!
- What's that? Your button?
- It was my fault.
Tashiro did it!
He pushed me!
What? You dog!
Look at what they serve the veterans.
Don't tell me you scooped it up off the ground with those dainty hands you wipe your ass with!
Who cut our ration?
Why do you keep blaming me?
Tashiro, stop playing innocent!
What's that?
Cut it out!
Why fight over it now?
What should I do?
What should you do?
Hon. Lance Corporal, what should he do?
How about another helping from the kitchen?
No real hurry.
We'll wait.
Very well!
Dump the food back in the bucket.
Azumi, when that's done, take it to the vets.
We'll eat just rice.
It's better than nothing.
Take this!
Is that how Kaji taught you?
No, it was all my own mistake.
You polish your boots sitting on your ass?
What did you do, Enji?
Ah, the Honorable Assistant.
Kaji, how'd you teach your men to shine their boots?
- I was at fault.
- Shut your mouth!
How about it, Kaji?
I've yet to give them any special instructions.
He did teach us.
I was at fault.
You keep quiet.
I'll see that they're taught correctly.
Please forgive him.
Fine.
I'll stand by and watch how you teach him.
Hit him!
I understand you're opposed to striking your recruits.
I cannot do it.
Shall I show you how?
Like this!
Sir, strike me!
You're through here. Go!
Son of a bitch!
It's not because
I took a beating.
I want orders forbidding all corporal punishment of recruits.
I'd go along with you if we were stationed further back.
But it's different here.
The vets may be louts, but they can stand on their own two feet.
If I lost control over them, what would happen in battle?
I'd place my recruits and myself at your command.
In actual combat...
I couldn't trust you half as much as I trust those men.
Those jaded five-year vets wouldn't listen to a 2nd lieutenant fresh from the academy.
I understand, sir!
Just a minute.
Michiko wrote me.
I told her you were here with me.
She can't understand why you so rarely write, since you must be enjoying more freedom here.
More freedom, eh?
Want to read it?
Just give me the gist.
She's relieved. Figures you have it easy under my command.
She has a lot to learn.
She asked me to keep an eye on you.
Be careful, Kaji.
Don't twist her words to support your own position.
Fool!
She's praying that our worthless lives might be spared, hoping against hope that you'll survive.
She repeats that over and over.
I'm sorry.
You're an officer.
You can write to her.
If you send a reply, here's what you should say:
"Kaji will not die.
No matter what happens, he'll make it out alive."
Please tell her that.
2nd Lt. Kageyama.
Okinawa has fallen, but we have the main island.
The 2.5 million soldiers waiting there -
- It's too late to pray for miracles.
- We're not!
Our strategy aims at final victory.
We all like to think so.
Though the home front expects the tide to turn, our men are being wiped out.
That's the true picture.
Meaning they died in vain?
Depends on how you look at it.
- Why, you -
- Calm down!
Save your heroism for your soldiers.
He who shouts loudest isn't always the bravest.
2nd Lt. Kageyama.
Aren't you making a mistake?
Japan's not as feeble as you might think.
From the Aleutians to Australia, from Tarawa to India,
Japan has pressed the battle across thousands of miles.
A pessimist like you can't begin to grasp her strength.
Yes, we've had to draw back our battle lines.
We've lost Okinawa and face battle on our mainland.
But that's all part of our basic strategy.
Look how the enemy doesn't yet dare attack our main island.
Their supply lines grow longer as our units grow more ready and compact.
Our main forces at home are still intact.
Our Pacific losses are like a single hair off the hide of a bull.
Can't you understand that?
- I understand.
- What do you understand?
That I'll probably die here.
And 2nd Lt. Nonaka... so will you.
What's going to happen to us?
If the Japanese lose -
Nonsense!
Japan will never lose.
It's un-Japanese to even consider it!
Un-Japanese? It's only natural to be concerned about oneself.
Tucking your tails just 'cause we lost Okinawa!
You have no dedication!
PFC Kaji pampers you!
As far as I'm concerned, he's -
I'm what?
Afraid to say it to my face?
You've said nothing to us about the fall of Okinawa.
We need a pep talk.
We need faith in our ultimate victory.
You seem to love ultimate victory even more than food.
Personally, I love my wife more than ultimate victory.
You may consider that unmanly.
But when fighting starts,
I'll be the only one you can count on.
Hey, where's your salute?
Hold it!
You call that a salute?
Hon. Squad Leader!
I alone was at fault.
Let me alone be punished.
Save your breath.
Nice work,
Hon. Squad Leader.
Mind taking over here?
Sir, spare the others!
Just shut up and keep it up!
- Hon. Squad Leader!
- Shut your trap!
Sir!
Naruto, shut up!
I'm taking it too.
You'll keep it up until he says you can stop... even if the commander says otherwise.
Got that?
You dog!
Get up or I'll whack you one!
Who's that?
Enji?
I'm sorry, sir.
When we were rookies, we kept this up for an hour.
Naruto!
Drinking after hours and raising hell!
You damned NCOs!
Scum! You dare defy us?
Dog! We'll murder you!
Yeah? Just try it!
You're in for a surprise.
Son of a bitch!
I've been in and out of worse places.
Throw me in your guard house -
I don't care!
Naruto, they'll throw you in prison!
Out of my way!
What have you got to brag about?
You've never earned an honest meal in your lives!
To hell with all of you!
Sir, please leave this to me.
I'll assume custody of him.
Insubordination and insulting a superior.
What will happen?
Can you help him?
If the CO feels that locking up a recruit would disgrace the company...
Please try to convince him.
Salute the duty officer!
Eyes right!
Front!
Cpl. Takeda and command of eight men have duly transferred guard duties to Cpl. Fujimoto and command.
Out!
Was it tough?
Sorry to concern you.
It was only three days.
They're all waiting.
Naruto's back!
Go on inside.
Naruto, was it rough?
PFC Kaji, come here!
Some training you're giving your recruits.
Our men are worn out from guard duty.
What are your men doing?
I'm sorry.
I happened to be out.
That's no excuse!
You'd better teach them right.
And stop acting big because you're a PFC!
Take that!
Kaji... get ready!
You scum!
Get up!
Well, how do you like being sacrificed for your precious recruits?
That's enough, Akaboshi.
Let's see you do that again, Akaboshi.
Come on!
I'll cut you wide open!
Don't think I won't do it.
Pride and face mean nothing to me now.
Come on!
You filthy -
Wait!
Filthy braggarts!
Don't tell me you're afraid of one two-year man.
I'll swap my life for one of you stinking worms!
Wait, Kaji!
Afraid to fight man-to-man?
Sir!
Naruto, let me go!
- Sir!
- Let me go!
Don't you rats ever forget:
I'll get even with you someday!
Sir... next time let me lend a hand.
Tashiro will help too.
Thanks, but that would never do.
Why not?
We'd all be called up for mutiny.
We'll fight it in court.
We'd be sure to lose.
Naruto... we can't win right now.
Maybe we could give those vets a good licking... but they're not the real enemy.
Our real enemy... is the army.
Prepare for roll call!
Sir, don't get up.
I want Lt. Kageyama to get a good look at my face.
Roll call!
Attention!
First squad: Total 36.
Absent: 4. Present: 32.
Count off!
Unnumbered: 1. Sick room: 4.
All accounted for.
Emergency orders for this squad.
PFC Kaji and 28 recruits will depart at 19:00 hrs. Tomorrow for trench-digging detail.
You'll march at night to maintain secrecy.
You'll join Cpl. Hironaka's command on site.
Work detail:
Approximately one month.
This is a cowardly trick... sending me out with a work party to avoid friction with the vets.
Look at that way if you wish.
You may think you've rid the company of its cancerous growth, but I'll be back in a month... probably more malignant than ever.
I don't think so.
When you get back,
I'm sending you away for special training.
Sending the prodigal son out for a few knocks in the harsh world?
To South Manchuria.
Maybe even close to Michiko.
Why stay here at the front if you have a chance to get away?
You agree?
You and I still have unfinished business.
You avoided the issue, while I pushed a little too hard.
Neither of us accomplished anything.
You're a clever man, but picking the army as the stage for your battles was a fool's work.
It's wiser to play it safe than to be stubborn.
Will you do this clever fool a favor?
The mother hen's leaving half her brood behind.
It causes her some concern.
My absence may make it easier to keep the vets in line.
Can I count on you?
Don't be such a pessimist.
If you must worry, worry about your wife.
You must be all out.
Take them.
Sir, please come back to us.
It's only a month.
I get the strange feeling
I'm being stranded.
You and I here together makes some people nervous.
Neither of us is very patient.
Naruto, watch that temper.
Take any trouble to Lt. Kageyama, you hear?
Work party, fall in!
Attention!
Salute the honorable lieutenant!
Eyes center!
Front!
PFC Kaji and party now departing!
Right face!
Forward... march!
Here comes our water!
Sir!
Take a look.
Good work. Well done.
Feels like I'm building my own house.
Yes, I suppose you'd want to fight in here if possible.
I could battle fate with an easy mind here.
I see.
Sir, that bum wants to bring his mother and girlfriend to live here.
You idiot!
Your mother might want to sleep between you and your bride!
Are you engaged?
When the war's over, let Naruto build you a love nest.
He's a carpenter.
He'll be glad to.
Nakai, you can help handle his mother.
I'll help handle the bride anytime!
Sir, you've never told us about your wife.
She's a good wife.
You'll all have to meet her after the war.
Is she tall or short?
Medium build.
About 5'2 ", 105 Ibs.
- Just my size!
- Fool!
Work party, fall in!
On the double!
Listen carefully!
At dawn today, our Seiundai fortifications were attacked by heavy Soviet forces.
It seems Major Ushijima and all his men died a glorious death.
The enemy is advancing inland along the entire
Manchurian border.
We are to return immediately to barracks to await reassignment.
We are to construct fortifications along the new line of defense, where we shall meet and crush the advancing enemy!
Disperse!
Hit the dirt!
A reconnaissance plane.
Nonaka Platoon, listen carefully.
Those without rifles will lash their bayonets to birch staffs for use in close combat.
Don't we get rifles?
Birch breaks too easily to be of much use.
Is it my fault it's all that grows here?
We're moving out!
Break camp!
Prepare to depart in 10 minutes!
Volunteers to go pick up our weapons!
Tashiro to the supply depot for weapons!
Very well. Be careful.
We're moving out!
Break camp!
We leave in one hour!
Sir... what's happening with our command unit?
These conflicting orders confuse and demoralize our troops.
Do your griping to the CO!
This is war!
Where's Doi Company?
Over here!
Hironaka Squad?
Over here!
What happened?
We're worn out.
Did you come from Seiundai?
There weren't any survivors there!
Only Onodera managed to sneak away.
I didn't sneak away.
I was sent out with a message.
What's the difference?
Why so angry?
At least you got out alive.
Recruits, bring us some food!
What happened at Seiundai?
We got wiped out, including all your precious recruits.
Russian shells suddenly started whistling overhead.
And Lt. Kageyama?
Killed in action.
Aircraft approaching
from the north!
Let's go!
Platoon... halt!
Fall out!
You'll find no loot around here.
Where's the senior officer?
Good question.
Hey, you know where he is?
Probably giving his girl a final workover.
In that case, Sergeant, will you issue orders for weapons?
Sorry, sir, but I'm not authorized to issue orders.
You'll need orders from HQ.
Where's the phone?
I'll talk to HQ.
Right there.
What's wrong with this thing?
The bombings cut the lines.
Sir, shall I liberate more candy from the canteen?
Good idea.
Stay where you are!
Traitors!
I'll kill you all!
I'm taking the rifles on my authority.
300 men can't possibly dig 1.5 miles of trenches in 48 hours.
You think the enemy will wait while you finish?
Instead of ineffective half measures, we should stop up the valleys with trenches and concentrate on strengthening our fortifications.
When you're the strategy officer, you can do it your way.
You're stationed in Area C,
I believe?
I'm sorry to say this, but for strategic reasons, your area will suffer heavy casualties.
I'm not saying this to protect myself.
The task is simply impossible.
Even if I order you?
Lieutenant Doi... proceed with the work.
Yes, sir.
But the Hon. Staff Officer must remember that some areas will not be finished.
Should those breaches prove fatal,
I cannot be held responsible.
To hell with your family.
The fate of Japan is at stake.
If we lose, we'll have no homes!
Easy for you to say with no family.
Even if we lose, if I survive, my wife has a future.
If parents survive, the kids have a chance to grow up.
It's not them.
You're just afraid to die.
That's enough, Terada.
You're always arguing with everybody.
Because they only think of themselves, not our country.
You're not afraid to die?
I am not.
I see.
Well, I am.
I thought you'd say that.
Now that we're in combat, may I speak my mind?
Go ahead.
You hate me because my father's a major.
That can't be helped.
But you defend this cowardly scum because you're critical of this war.
It's all right. Let him talk.
Yes, I am critical of it.
I sold my soul for a military exemption.
I can't approve of how your father raised you.
So you mean you reject this war completely?
I mean I should have rejected it.
Then you're a coward with a split personality!
You've had your chance to speak.
Now it's my turn.
You're a fool!
A simpleton who wouldn't understand why his mother would shed tears if he was killed in action.
To die here is a dog's death.
Even you'll understand that someday, if you survive.
Here come our rifles!
Command squad leader
Cpl. Hironaka.
Light machine gun squad,
PFC Iwabuchi.
Rifle squad, PFC Kaji.
Antitank suicide squad,
PFC Akaboshi.
At ease!
Attention!
Lt. Nonaka will assume command of Platoon III.
The enemy attack will presumably commence at dawn.
Each man will dig a foxhole by midnight in the spot designated by his squad leader and prepare to meet the enemy.
PFC Kaji.
You will take a scouting party and ascertain the location of the enemy.
You'll rejoin this main party before sundown.
Takasugi and Terada, step forward.
Ready ammunition!
This is ridiculous!
After five years of training, they want me crawling under tanks!
I'll bet you recruits don't want to die either.
Well, don't look to me.
You're on your own.
Your report conflicts with the others.
Did you penetrate deeply enough to confirm?
I did, sir.
Can your two men confirm the 15 tanks?
I left them behind the embankment, sir.
Why?
We were ordered to remain behind until called.
And he didn't call you?
- I did not, sir.
- Why not?
Recruits are not trained in scouting tactics.
Very considerate of you.
You never got close enough to confirm those tanks.
Coward!
I'm scared out of my wits.
This waiting's getting on my nerves.
It's already decided who will live and who will die.
It's just a few hours till dawn.
We're like condemned men awaiting execution.
There's white cloth in my foxhole.
It must be a grave.
There are no graves here.
It has to be a grave.
It must be filled with crumbling bones.
Stop driving yourself crazy!
You're not a child anymore.
Please let me change places with someone.
Sir...
I'll swap with him.
No!
You'll soon be glad to hide under corpses. Why worry about a grave?
Terada, go join Cpl. Hironaka as orderly and runner.
Well, the end has come.
Orders may not be heard above the din of battle.
Each of you must think for himself.
There are just two things
I want to say.
Don't be a coward.
Like it or not, what comes will come.
The other thing is:
Never give up.
Not for the sake of victory, but for yourself.
If things get too hot, take cover and think about home... or your girl.
That's what I plan to do.
Nakai, you got that girl in your loincloth?
Of course!
Good. Hang on to her.
They're coming!
Send up the signal flare!
Lt. Nonaka, prepare for action.
Nonaka Platoon, every man to his station.
Hold your fire.
Commence firing at 300.
Distance 800. Fire!
Blast 'em!
Wipe 'em all out!
Hold your fire!
Save your ammo!
To your right, 400! Fire!
Get those tanks!
Rifle squad... when the big guns open up, keep your heads down!
Lhara!
Sir!
What is it?
Tanks closing in on our rear!
Where's the CO?
- Over there!
I'm going!
Wait! They're still firing.
I'll be okay.
Fire!
Keep your heads down!
Sir!
Koizumi...
Mimura...
Our only alternative is to attack.
Send a runner to the CO.
Ask what he plans to do.
Terada, take the message!
Terada relaying the message!
I'm out of ammo, sir!
Azumi, you got ammo?
Let me have some.
No, I'm short too.
You're not even firing!
Fine, keep it!
I'm out of ammo, sir!
I warned you about wasting it.
Here.
Wait! Stay here.
We'll fire together.
Commander!
Where's that runner?
Enemy troops to our rear!
We're trapped!
We all feel safer with you here, sir.
And I want to send you home safe to your mothers.
Enji!
I'm out of ammo, sir!
I'll take him some.
You'll go?
I'm out. Ammo!
I'll be right back.
No, if you go, stay there.
Make every bullet count, okay?
Get ready. I'll cover you.
Go!
Tashiro!
Nakai, stay down!
Tashiro!
Sons of bitches!
Lieutenant, should we retreat?
Fool!
Long live the Japanese empire!
You fool, come back!
Terada, what are you doing?
Where's the tank?
It's gone.
Does it hurt?
They'll come back for us again.
The major's son fought bravely.
You just might make it through this.
I'll sear your wound.
Close your eyes.
Rifle squad!
Rifle squad, show yourselves!
Anyone there?
I refuse to die.
- What'll we do?
- One final charge.
A final charge?
Watch out, Kaji!
Onodera.
Will we make it?
They coming this way?
- You got a grenade?
- No.
If we have to, we jump at 'em.
Please save me!
Are they gone?
Are they?
- Quiet!
They're still up there.
Stop shooting!
He'll get us all killed!
- Stop shooting!
- I got him in the leg!
The battle's over.
No, it's not!
I'm gonna attack!
If you wanna die like a dog, go ahead.
What do we do now?
We were lucky to come through it alive.
Let's try and stay that way.
All right, we get it!
We know how tough you are.
Stop showing off!
You don't know the Kwangtung Army!
He's raving mad!
Pin him down, Kaji!
Come on, you damned Ruskies!
I'll chop you up!
Onodera, it's too dangerous!
Quiet!
You don't know how tough I am!
Quiet or we'll all be killed!
Onodera, be quiet!
Be quiet!
What happened?
He's dead.
I won't claim
I put him out of his misery.
I killed him!
You didn't have to kill him.
Do you blame me?
Do you?
I'm a monster!
But I'm going to stay alive!
Is anyone there?
Isn't anyone left alive?
Answer me!
Is anyone else still alive?
END OF PART 4
This is the Appian Way...
... the most famous road
that leads to Rome...
... as all roads lead to Rome.
On this road march
her conquering legions.
Imperial Rome is
the center of the empire...
... and undisputed master of the world.
But with this power
inevitably comes corruption.
No man is sure of his life.
The individual is at the mercy
of the state.
Murder replaces justice.
Rulers of conquered nations surrender
their helpless subjects to bondage.
High and low alike
become Roman slaves...
... Roman hostages.
There is no escape
from the whip and the sword.
That any force on earth
can shake the foundations...
... of this pyramid
of power and corruption...
... of human misery and slavery,
seems inconceivable.
But 30 years before this day,
a miracle occurred.
On a Roman cross in Judea,
a man died to make men free...
... to spread the gospel
of love and redemption.
Soon that humble cross is destined
to replace the proud eagles...
... that now top
the victorious Roman standards.
This is the story
of that immortal conflict.
In this, the early summer
in the year 64 A. D...
... in the reign of the Antichrist
known to history as the Emperor Nero...
... the victorious 14th Legion
is on its way back to Rome...
... under the command
of one Marcus Vinicius.
We can see Rome from the top of the hill.
Well, there it stands. Rome.
Three years is a long time, eh, Fabius?
Yes, Marcus, a long time.
Drusilla and the children.
Tonight I sleep at home.
Man of the family to the bitter end.
It's not sleep I'll be looking for.
It seems we've been given an escort.
The least they could do.
Hail, in the name of the divine Nero, prince emperor and supreme pontiff.
Hail.
Captain Flavius,
Praetorian Guard, salutes you.
The news of your brilliant victories has preceded you to Rome.
We're rather anxious to be there.
Lead us in.
I'm sorry, commander. I have orders.
Imperial orders.
By the body of...
A fine welcome after a three-year campaign.
We're ordered to pull up and camp here until notified to enter.
What for? How many days' wait?
I know nothing but the orders.
Rome loves her brave warriors.
Give that man 10 lashes.
Fall out!
And double it for any more complaints.
Make camp here. Out of the way.
- Where to, Marcus?
- To the palace, where else?
Out of the way!
Commander Marcus Vinicius.
I request an audience with the emperor.
I will report immediately, commander.
Commander, sir, if I might presume, sir...
...there's been much discussion of your unsurpassed victories.
- Did you fight the Britons with a mass...?
- We fought with our bowels.
- Try it sometime.
- Yes, commander.
Yes, well, now you have it as I composed it.
Now, from the beginning.
O lambent flames
O force divine
O omnivorous powers, hail
"Omnivorous."
Omnipotent.
Yes.
Omnipotent power, hail
Seneca, don't you think omnipotent is better?
Far better, Divinity.
There's no conviction in your voice.
You disturb me.
Petronius, you're my arbiter of elegance.
Which is it?
I find omnipotent most feeble, Divinity.
In fact, puerile.
Puerile? Feeble?
Omnivorous has your pure, inspired imagery in it.
It is vivid, comprehensive.
A genius, Divinity, should hold to his first thoughts...
...on any subject.
Petronius. Dear Petronius.
What would I do without your clear insight into...?
You clumsy toad!
Isn't the inner agony of my creating enough without you carving me to bits?
Take her away.
Oh, where was I? What now?
Commander Marcus Vinicius.
He wishes an immediate audience.
Marcus, here?
Vinicius? Who is Marcus Vinicius?
My nephew. Just returned with his legions from Britain.
Oh, yes. Bid him enter.
There seems to be a disregard for orders here.
You sent word to Vinicius to remain outside the city.
So I did. That's true, Tigellinus.
Does this nephew of yours consider...
...that his conquests give him a right to override...?
I cannot believe that he entered with his army, Divinity, knowing Marcus as I do.
Doubtless he has come to make obeisance and pay homage...
...to his emperor and his god in private.
Oh, yes. Yes, of course.
I fear that a natural humility often blinds me.
Yes.
Hail Nero, emperor.
Commander, hail. Come forward.
Your proud uncle has been explaining the impetuosity of your devotion to me.
It's a joy to be such an inspiration to my commanders.
My loyalty and my life always, Caesar.
My men have been away a long time.
They have fought and died for their emperor.
They have gladly accepted weeks of forced marches to reach home.
They're anxious to see their families, their women.
Just as you said, Petronius.
Such loyalty, such devotion.
You see, the delay in my men reaching their homes...
...it's a question of morale.
Didn't you explain in...?
Maybe good Tigellinus left the reason out of his orders.
- An oversight...
- Reasons are not given in imperial orders.
Oh, Tigellinus, how boorish.
How ungrateful.
We desire that you wait until you are joined...
...by the legions from Africa and Asia, which should be a matter of hours.
Tomorrow you will enter Rome in triumph.
More and more the people need diversion these...
Or rather, shall we say that this too is a question of morale?
They demand a spectacle.
A look at heroes.
Bear with me in this, dear commander.
- It is now clear to me, emperor.
- Divinity, may I retire with my nephew?
We have much to talk over.
Naturally.
I shall expect you at the feast after the triumph, Vinicius.
We shall try to make it diverting.
An added honor, emperor.
Now, again.
No arms missing? No legs?
No. I picked up a good healthy slash in the side here.
- You seem to be faring well, uncle.
- Oh, indestructible.
You're gonna spend time with me before rushing to your estates in Sicily?
I intend a full month's relaxation in Rome.
And as I remember, your house is the best place for it.
Marcus, I've recently purchased several new delectable slaves.
There's one from Spain. Skin like cream.
Hair with the sheen of a young raven.
She's yours.
- I might stay two months.
- Hmm.
Tonight I've arranged for you to stay at Plautius' country place.
It's near your camp.
Aulus Plautius, the old retired general?
That's a gloomy outlook.
I know. And his wife's not young either, besides being virtuous.
Still, it's better quarters than a tent.
Body of Bacchus,
I've been listening to that since noon.
He seems in rare voice.
Is it true what I heard while I was gone, that he murdered his wife and mother?
My dear boy, you must learn the language of privileged government.
Let us rather say that poor Agrippina and Octavia were removed...
...for the good of the empire.
The new wife, Poppaea, sounds interesting.
A harlot for an empress.
My dear commander, what a proletarian observation.
You must realize that a woman has no past when she mates with a god.
Well, he's our emperor.
There are some in the senate who are not so pleased with him.
They would like to replace Nero with General Galba.
I know nothing of politics.
Just as long as there's money to pay the army...
...Rome will stand forever, that I'm sure of.
I bid you welcome, Marcus Vinicius.
I salute the general.
We traveled the splendid roads you built in Britain and Gaul.
My wife, the Lady Pomponia.
Our house is honored to have you as guest.
My tribune, Fabius Nerva.
These young men must wish to wash and change.
The baths are ready.
Will you show them, my dear?
This way, commander.
Dinner is at the 9th hour.
You're expecting other guests this evening, general?
We're not intruding on any festivities, I hope.
Oh, no. We live a quiet life here.
"Oh, no. We live a quiet life here."
Here we are, transforming ourselves into sweet-smelling flowers...
...only to bloom in a hay field.
- Ha-ha.
You know, Marcus,
Drusilla last sent word...
...that the oldest boy is almost as tall as she is now.
When I left,
I carried him around on my shoulder.
That little slave from Spain
Petronius told me about...
...I'll let her sit on mine.
Speaking of things that grow, cast your eye on this one.
For your bath.
Stand up, fellow.
Body of... What a prospect.
What's going on in the arena these days?
Is Croton still champion?
I do not know.
General Plautius never thought of having you trained as a gladiator?
He'd win enough gold to fill your sandals.
I do not fight.
You don't fight?
Why, with one arm strapped, you could kill 50 Nubians an hour.
I'll speak to your master about you.
I can make you a champion.
It is a sin to kill.
Half-witted.
Grew so fast, his brain hit the top of the stable.
Behold, she stands with her gown hung loose.
Framed is her face in golden tresses...
...reflecting the milk-white beauty of her shoulders.
So it was that Venus stood before Mars, welcoming her lover.
Nothing do I see that is not perfection.
You're in service to this household,
I take it?
Very much so.
- Your name?
- Lygia.
Lygia. Lygia, you're a windfall.
I shall sacrifice a dozen white doves to Venus to commemorate our meeting.
Your sacrifice will be in vain, commander.
By the gods, the old general must know a good slave market.
Not only beauty, but spirit as well.
There are no slaves in this household.
The old general, as you call him...
...well, I have the honor and the joy to be his daughter.
I crave your pardon.
Three years in the field have dulled my perceptions.
Truly, I'm sorry, Lygia.
Will you forgive me?
You've done nothing to ask forgiveness for.
For a long time, the only women I've seen or known...
...have been poor, dull barbarians, very uninspiring.
Barbarians?
I've heard the women of Britain and Gaul are most beautiful.
Lygia, I'm forced to tell you...
...that the women of Britain cover themselves with deer fat.
I'd say that was an understandable desire to be warm.
The warmth is not transferable,
I assure you. Only in its aroma.
And as for the women of Gaul...
...well, their hair is like the frazzled ends of rope.
Not a soft, red-gold crown with stars in it.
And their palm was the hide of a wild boar.
- Not like this soft...
- At least that proves they are diligent.
Yes, at building mud huts.
But not in bringing a man's thoughts to life.
I'm not sorry at all.
- Sorry?
- That Petronius arranged my stay here.
If things go as fate surely meant, the man should be decorated.
If you will excuse me,
I must decorate the table.
And so you see, sir, you can understand my problem.
We were outnumbered at least...
- Well, wouldn't you say three to one?
- Easily.
I drew up the spearmen in a formation much like the Macedonian phalanx.
Let me tell you, your barbarous Briton...
...is as worthy an opponent as I've ever engaged.
They impaled themselves on the spearheads like meat to the spit.
We were standing ankle deep in their blood.
Can you understand the strategy, Lygia?
Can you see it?
I can only see the awful necessity of defending one's home.
Defending?
They were in revolt against Rome.
But as I say, I credit courage.
A general's daughter can understand it gives no pleasure to overcome weaklings.
The battle loses its zest.
Right, general?
- I find I've outgrown that zest.
- Don't be modest, general.
Look here, you don't seem to be excited by the glorious exploits of your legions.
That's an odd attitude for a woman of Rome.
I am not a Roman, I am a Lygian.
A Lygian? I thought, uh...
She's our adopted daughter.
Oh, I see. Lygian, Lygia.
She was named Callina, but she prefers to be called Lygia.
As a child, she was taken prisoner during my campaign in Lygia.
- A slave, then.
- No, no. Her father was king of Lygia.
She was assigned to me as a hostage.
We've tried to erase the wrong done her with the love we have for her.
You should envy me such love, commander.
Lygia, I envy the roof that covers you.
This one or any future.
May a traveler interrupt with his greetings?
- Paul.
- Paul, you're here.
- We've been counting the days.
- Pomponia. Lygia, dear.
One need not pray that peace be with this house. It's written in your faces.
Paul, our two guests.
Tribune Fabius Nerva and Commander Marcus Vinicius.
You must have seen their army camped along the road.
Ah, yes.
- Gentlemen, our friend Paul of Tarsus.
- Our very dear friend.
- You mustn't let me interrupt your meal.
- We've done with it.
Come, let's sit in here.
Commander?
You must be tired, Paul.
Will you have food? A cup of wine?
No, thank you, my dear.
I supped along the way.
And the rigors of travel always fall away rapidly here.
I take it, like us, you've just returned from a journey.
Oh, yes. Antioch, Corinth.
Oh.
- You're Greek.
- No, I'm a Jew.
A citizen of Rome, though I was born in Tarsus.
Oh, yes, Tarsus. North of Palestine.
That's correct.
You come from a troublesome part of the world.
Much unrest down there in the past.
- You're a merchant of some sort?
- No, I'm a rabbi.
Well, I'm just a heavy-skulled soldier.
What in the name of Jupiter is a rabbi?
- I...
- Paul is a teacher.
Oh, what do you teach?
He teaches...
- He teaches philosophy.
- Yes.
Yes, I suppose you'd call it that.
Did you know that all this time,
I've been teaching you philosophy?
I don't know a great deal about philosophy.
And lovely women shouldn't have the time to think that deeply.
As for me, Lygia, would you ever think that I was fond of flowers?
I should like to see the garden.
You have the evening tour of the camp to make, commander.
You must see to the disposition of the men.
Will you excuse me?
I shall be back early.
In time for the flowers, I hope.
And now tell us the things we've been waiting to hear.
- Did you see Peter?
- Yes, how is our big fisherman?
I missed him all along the way.
Wherever I went,
Peter had been there before me.
At Antioch, they said he'd gone on to Jerusalem.
Others said that he'd set out for Persia and the East.
Finally, in Corinth,
I learned he was on his way here...
...and that he would come to us any day now.
Peter? In Rome? Magnificent.
All of us.
To be able to speak with a man who talked with Christ, our Lord.
I saw results of seeds Peter has planted.
Green shoots are sprouting.
There will be a good harvest.
Everywhere, strangers approached and drew the sign of the fish before me.
And we spoke of the great work ahead.
The work is difficult and dangerous now, Paul.
Ever since you were tried here, even though you were acquitted...
...Christians are under constant suspicion.
I noticed you seemed worried in the presence of your two guests.
Believe me,
I would have exercised caution.
Though at times, I admit the desire to cry the message aloud.
But I suppose tactics must be applied even in the spreading of love and faith.
Be patient, Paul. Your time will come.
Those two vital young men, for instance.
They are Rome.
If we could teach them, we could teach the world.
Marcus Vinicius?
You are asking for miracles.
I am.
I am, indeed.
There is still nothing I see that is not perfection.
However, if you're thinking of me, as you undoubtedly were...
...do I look that much like a fish?
Oh.
It wasn't anything to do with you.
You're too lovely to be a lonely artist, Lygia.
But then, I did ask you to wait up for me.
- It was merely that I couldn't sleep.
- Nor can I.
I'll tell you what, Lygia.
The night's still young.
This place is unworthy of our first meeting. Let's go to Petronius' house.
There will be gaiety there you've never dreamed of.
Dancers, musicians, singers.
The best in Rome.
My uncle's house was built by the goddess of love herself.
No. No, it's too late, I...
I mean, it's impossible.
Well, we could plan it more discreetly, perhaps.
What about tomorrow?
You'll come see my triumph, won't you?
Tomorrow, there will be a feast to tempt all the gods.
No. No, I don't wish to watch your triumph.
I must go in now.
Good night, commander.
Tell me.
- What is it?
- What?
What is it you see that you don't like?
I'd be lying if I said I wasn't attracted by what I see, Marcus Vinicius.
- Well, then...
- It's what I hear I don't like.
You see, a man's fame always brings him fresh enemies.
- Who's been telling you stories about me?
- You have, from your own lips.
Ugly stories of conquests and bloodshed.
Conquest? But what's conquest?
Only method of uniting and civilizing the world under one power.
- Have to spill a little blood to do it.
- No.
There's a gentler and more powerful way of doing that.
Without bloodshed and war.
Without slaves and captives bound in chains to your triumphal chariots.
There will always be slaves.
Who will do the work?
Paul speaks of a world where there would be no slaves.
That beggar-faced philosopher...
...shouldn't be stuffing your luscious little head with such nonsense.
How could I expect you to understand?
I wish you were a slave, as I first thought.
I'd offer a price for you.
King's ransom for a king's daughter.
And taken me to your estates in Sicily with all the others?
On a special ship.
What a way for a conqueror to win a woman.
To buy her like an unresisting beast.
What false security you must have in your heart and soul.
In your manhood, Marcus Vinicius.
What hidden scorn you must have for yourself.
You're forgetting you're a hostage of Rome, aren't you?
Here, you, hostage, come back here.
- No, commander.
- Out of my way.
I guard her, commander.
By whose orders? Who are you?
I am Ursus.
I guarded the king, her father.
I guard her now.
Guard her well, my gray-haired colossus.
Guard her well.
Romance seems to have been short-lived.
There's always a weapon to bring down a flighty dove, my friend.
And please, dear Lord, forgive me my anger and my spite.
I do not know what came over me.
It was temptation, perhaps.
A selfish desire that this man might see your light.
For my sake rather than for his.
And yet I pray that one day, he shall feel the joy of your love.
I pray with all my heart.
Captain, what's the delay here?
The emperor has not yet appeared on the balcony.
You will hear the trumpets, commander.
Gods of Rome.
Mighty.
Eternal.
Beneath whose auspices,
Rome rules the world.
Hear us.
We worship you.
We worship you.
Venus...
...goddess of love.
We worship.
Mars, god of war.
We worship.
Juno, goddess of heaven.
We worship.
Jupiter, father of the gods.
We worship.
And Nero, his divine son.
They are impatient, Divinity.
They hunger to see you.
They're impatient?
What about my patience?
Oho. A triumph to divert them?
Who diverts me?
I slave, I agonize for them.
I have no privacy.
You are the sun in their heavens.
Does the sun have privacy?
The sun has the night.
They expect me to shine daily, hourly.
And for whom? For the people.
For that foul-smelling rabble.
It's so hot today.
This heat of Rome oppresses me.
It stifles me.
They demand too much.
I tell you, this mob, this mob tortures me.
I hate it second only to Rome itself.
The foul breath of that mob floats in my house.
In my garden.
I wish...
Oh, I wish...
Your wish, Caesar.
Tell me, that I may execute it.
I wish it had but a single throat, that mob, that I might cut it.
It could be done if your wish were a command.
A typical butcher's solution.
Tigellinus would deprive you of the one thing an artist must have:
- His audience.
- But they irk me, those people.
They irk me.
Do I live for them or do they live for me?
Unfortunately, Caesar, as a ruler, you must have subjects to rule.
Sheer population is a necessary evil.
It is easy for Petronius to talk, but the burden is on you.
On the only shoulders in the world strong enough to bear it.
That's true, isn't it, Petronius?
It's lonely to be an emperor.
It is lonelier still to be a genius.
You're the only one who understands the complications of my tortured nature.
Is that not a theme for a poem,
Petronius?
It is a theme for an epic, Divinity.
But to write it, you must suffer it.
Yes.
Where is Poppaea?
Where is my empress?
Here, lord. Always at your side.
Come. Petronius, you were right.
I must feel it, know it, live it.
Come, Petronius, attend me closely.
Attend me closely in my ordeal.
Hail Nero, son of Jupiter.
Look at him, my darling, the emperor.
- Wife killer. Mother killer.
- Quiet, woman, you'll have us all...
Everybody knows it. He's a beast.
Quiet.
No man is a beast.
Look at him and know that he is but sick.
Sick in heart and spirit, in his soul.
You were right, Petronius.
How they love me.
How, indeed.
Remember, thou art only a man.
Remember, thou art only a man.
Marcus Vinicius.
Isn't he the one who came to see Nero yesterday?
An arrogant man. He bears watching.
From what I hear, he might bear watching at much closer range.
Poppaea, what are you muttering about?
Ha-ha.
Come closer.
Look, they march as they fight.
Strong, brave, relentless.
Our unconquerable children.
We must take them to our breast.
Yes, my lord.
Well.
The hero at last.
You know, Marcus, usually one is embarrassed by one's relatives...
...but today I was proud of you.
Hot work in that sun. A hippodrome.
The emperor positively adores you.
He called you his brave, relentless child.
If you play your hand well, you can have a military governorship. Egypt, perhaps.
Sit down.
Relax before you take your bath.
Oh, very well.
And taste this.
Straight from the vines of Olympus.
Your Sicilian vintages will pale to nothing.
- Well?
- What's the law regarding hostages?
Hostages?
Can they be bought, reassigned, what?
Well...
I take it this hostage is female?
Head to toe, hip to hip. What's the law?
When you see what I have for you, you'll think of nothing else.
Now, this is the...
Well, here she is.
Bring her here.
Your exquisite wildflower from the hills of Spain, Marcus.
- What's her name? I've forgotten.
- You called me Eunice, my lord.
Silence.
Oh, yes.
Eunice.
Lift your chin, Eunice.
Did you ever see such skin, Marcus?
Turn around, slowly.
Flawless proportions.
Fold your arms behind your head.
Makes one wish one were a sculptor.
Lovely.
Enough of my collector's enthusiasm.
She's the commander's.
Take her to his apartment.
I won't go.
What did you say?
Don't give me away, my lord.
Whip me, beat me, but don't send me from here.
Don't send me from you, my lord.
You can stay here, girl. I don't want you.
You don't want her?
And I refused an offer from Seneca of six Arabian stallions.
Keep her, Petronius. She's yours.
Well, by the body of Juno.
Nevertheless, give her five lashes for impertinence.
You won't give me away, then, lord?
That depends on your future conduct.
Oh, yes. Yes, my good lord.
Ply the lash carefully, now.
Don't damage her skin.
No, master.
Tell me, now.
Can one purchase a hostage?
Where is this precious gem?
At Plautius' place. You should see her.
A fiery young Lygian.
She throws flames at you.
A Lygian?
Yes, I do recall a child assigned to him.
It was some years ago, I'd forgotten.
How can I get my hands on her?
Hostages are wards of the state.
She belongs to Nero.
Perfect. He would give me Egypt?
He can keep Egypt and give me Lygia.
We'll go to the palace.
Plautius may not be in accord with this.
Well, she will be.
They've sentimentalized her into an adopted daughter.
Philosophers, teachers, fools.
This one wasn't born to think, she was born to feel.
But, Marcus, with Plautius regarding her as his daughter, I mean, is this ethical?
After all, he was a general of the empire.
I'll have her if I have to abduct her.
I sense a certain frustration.
Is your little barbarian entirely in sympathy with your plan?
She'll be cooing like a pigeon in the right circumstances.
I wish I had your confidence.
I've never been able to discover an honest warmth in any woman.
Oh, my dear, beautiful lord.
I love you so.
Please, how can I let you know?
Open.
Open in the name of the emperor.
I have an order from the emperor.
- Yes?
- For the hostage, Lygia.
My orders are to take her to the women's quarters in the palace.
She's not a slave.
She is our daughter.
My orders are to take her at once.
Wait here.
You are the hostage, Lygia?
Yes.
Welcome to Nero's house of women.
My name is Acte, I am in charge here.
May I ask why I am here?
I would say you have attracted the attention of the emperor.
And you have been commanded to the feast.
But the emperor has never seen me.
There must be some other reason.
Nero ordered you brought here, just as
I was brought here seven years ago.
He loved me then, more than he knew.
Prepare the bath, oil of lilies.
And bring me the beaded cloth from Persia, mostly blues, I think.
And, yes, the strand of fine gold at the waist.
I am not honored by this.
You were brought up in the home of Plautius and Pomponia, weren't you?
Yes. Yes, do you know them?
I know of them.
- Lygia, child, listen to me.
- Yes, yes, yes, chatter, chatter, chatter.
You'd think each one had the hair of a queen.
Well, this one has possibilities at least.
What were you going to tell me?
Simply that you are the chosen guest of Nero.
You are in the hands of the master of the world.
You will have to consider that your good fortune and your fate.
The hostage, Lygia.
Aren't you coming?
The emperor did not ask me.
She needed a poet, not a soldier, to describe her.
Everything's there but the smile.
I leave that to you.
Petronius is quite right.
I wish I were a poet.
But I had you escorted here in great honor.
I deserve a smile for that.
It was gracious of you.
Ten big, strong Praetorian Guards to support my eagerness to come.
Well said, Lygia.
But you know a caravan of rare merchandise is always well-guarded.
And you belong here, Lygia.
A king's daughter in a royal palace.
That's something you should have a natural appetite for.
And I can tell you, you have other natural appetites too.
Hasn't old Dull-Beard, your philosopher friend, Paul...
...told you about those?
Or has he lived in a cave all his life?
You should have seen my triumph today.
It was quite a display.
I looked for you, but then, I imagine they had you chained to a peach tree.
Here. The panacea for all reticence.
You're right.
Your mouth has its own sweetness.
I know I'll find it so.
Don't look so frightened, Lygia.
I'm no heartless, unfeeling machine of war.
I won't rush upon you like a boulder from a catapult.
You've only to relax, smile a little, and before you know it...
I can think of nothing, pray for nothing but that this is over soon...
...so that you can send me home again.
Home?
Yes.
Hail Nero.
Hail Nero.
Hail Nero.
Have you ever seen your emperor and your god this close before?
No, I have never seen Nero this close before.
Same faces.
Same noses.
All green.
Just for variety, divine lord, try a ruby.
Is that the hostage I brought for Vinicius?
Oh, yes, yes, Divinity.
Mm, Vinicius has an eye.
She's exquisite.
You are generous, lord.
Perhaps you've overlooked something for yourself.
Yes.
What do you think, Petronius?
Put a dress on an olive stump...
...and my poor, untutored nephew would call it beautiful.
I know your incomparable judgment,
Divinity.
And I'll wager you've already decided, even from here...
...that she is too narrow in the hips.
Yes, yes, that's exactly what I think.
Dear Poppaea, one woman should never judge another.
She hasn't the glands for it. Ha-ha-ha.
Isn't that witty, Petronius?
Among the gods, your humor is unique.
Dear Petronius.
Oh, yes.
Too narrow in the hip.
Sing for us, Divinity, sing for us.
Sing for us, sing for us.
I had almost come to a tragic decision.
I had decided not to sing for you tonight.
We beseech thee.
My throat hurts.
And when one has been given a divine gift, one should not jeopardize it.
But I am not the only one afflicted.
My empress has a headache.
And the only thing which will bring her relief...
...is the sound of my voice.
You promised to sing, or I would not be here.
I'm totally unprepared.
So I must compose as I sing.
Bravo.
You must be content with that.
My throat.
Watch Croton.
He's killed over 300 opponents.
He could twist the head off your Ursus before he knew what touched him.
Orpheus at this moment must be as yellow with envy as our poet Lucan.
I am as a candle next to the sun.
And you, Petronius, what do you say?
I say that your verses are common and fit only for the fire they celebrate.
Farewell, Petronius.
What defect do you find in them?
Well, your verses would be worthy of Ovid, of Virgil, even of Homer.
But they are not worthy of you.
The conflagration you describe does not blaze enough.
It is not all-consuming.
Had Lucan here written these verses,
I should acknowledge him a genius.
But you can create a work such as the world has never known.
Therefore, I say this to your eyes.
Take greater pains.
The gods have given me a certain talent, but they've given me something greater.
A true judge and friend.
I thought it sufficient to equal Homer.
You have opened my eyes.
Then all men, born and unborn, are my debtors.
You're right.
My conflagration does not burn enough.
And do you know why?
I've never seen a burning city.
You said one must suffer an experience to re-create it.
A sculptor has his model.
I had no model.
To burn a city in order to create an epic.
That's carrying the principle of art for art's sake too far.
Soon the spring will be over.
The summer heat will begin.
What stenches will arise from Rome?
I shall move the court to Antium.
You did not observe
Croton's masterful stroke.
I was not the only one.
Vinicius has hardly taken his eyes from her.
She must be truly exciting.
I must see this for myself.
But it was a fair match.
It could have been one or the other.
You seemed pleased with my gift, commander.
Is it enough, in the light of your service?
Or isn't it?
Do you know, lovely one?
Has he told you?
No, Caesar,
I thought it should come from you.
Know then, Lygia, that I have given you to Marcus Vinicius...
...as a reward for his devotion to me and his brilliant service on the battlefield.
Henceforth, your guardian is no longer General Plautius.
You belong to the household of Vinicius.
On closer inspection,
I find it a fair reward.
Perhaps excessive.
Except, of course, as you so wisely observed, Divinity.
Oh, yes.
Too narrow in the hips. Ha-ha.
Let us go and greet my guests.
Now you know, Lygia.
And there were moments when I thought I could love you.
Make use of your beauty, live with me.
Love as you were made to love.
What difference does it make whether I love, now that you own me?
You have but to give the word, the command.
The small, empty command.
Yes, I own you.
You realize that, don't you?
You realize I can take you and have you flogged until you love me?
Take me, then.
Take me to your house, anything.
Take me and you'll hear nothing from me but a prayer for you.
- Lygia.
- Commander Vinicius.
The empress requests your presence at once.
Very well.
Here. Take this girl to the house of Gaius Petronius.
Put her in charge of Anaxander, master of slaves there.
Yes, commander.
Tears have but one use, Lygia.
As a prelude to joy.
Remember that while you wait for me.
You seem to have been having difficulty in proving your ownership.
A young mare often enjoys fighting the bit, empress.
I've always found conflict between man and woman a waste of time.
It consumes so much...
So much vitality.
Well said, empress.
I am not your empress.
I'm a priestess of Amon, and you are the serpent.
Therefore, poison is in your mouth.
And I have a taste for poison, Marcus.
To change to a serpent, that might take time.
I can bring that about.
Those are Commander Vinicius' orders.
Here. Oh, how clumsy of me.
You see, I know your symbol, even though I'm not yet one of you.
Have courage, child.
Come along.
Bear in mind, your fate is determined by the greatest power in this world.
His will be done.
Aulus, my dear, you must get some sleep.
I'll call you as soon as
Ursus sends word.
We should be hearing from Ursus soon no matter what happened.
Good morning.
You're right, perhaps we'd better ignore the formalities.
Will you tell Lygia I have come for her?
We've not seen Lygia since she was taken from us.
Bring Lygia here at once.
I tell you, we don't know where she is.
- You're lying, general.
- I do not lie.
On my oath as a Roman officer, so that you can understand, I do not lie.
You may search the house if you wish.
You refuse to say anything more?
Only this:
That you've violated our hospitality...
...in the cruelest way a man could.
Hospitality?
You're overlooking our law of hostages, aren't you?
The emperor assigned Lygia to my care.
She's my property.
You're overlooking what's happening to Rome.
To the world, Vinicius.
It's such laws as this that will tumble its foundations.
Your emperor, your god, Nero, bathed in his own infamy.
- Aulus, my dear, please.
- I understand your concern.
I hope I shall continue to forget what I just heard, general.
Marcus.
My dear young Marcus.
I want to call you that because for all of your rank, you could be my son.
A woman of my years is not unaware of things.
Lygia's eyes were drawn to you.
I saw that.
And they would not have been if deep down inside of you...
...you were this cold, this relentless.
Look in your heart, Marcus, and recognize the truth of you that should be.
Well, as long as you return empty-handed...
...sit down and fill your obviously empty stomach.
They claim to know nothing of her.
Plautius is lying.
Forget the whole undignified whim and come with me to Antium.
There's something strange about Plautius and that household.
By the gods, they don't even talk like Romans.
And their friend, a fellow from Tarsus named Paul.
Paul, you say? Of Tarsus?
Yes, he's some fool philosopher
I met there.
Paul of Tarsus.
My poor Marcus.
This is drama for the ages.
You picked the cherished egg in a nest of Christians.
She's a Christian, and Christians have spirited her away.
Christians. Are they the ones who worship some dead carpenter?
Yes, that's right.
A rebel against the state, a Jew called Christ.
Crucified in Palestine, as I remember.
The sect is a secret one.
It consists of Jews, Greeks, and many others...
...who meet in secret and spread their superstitions among the Romans.
They are a constant worry to Nero and the senate.
Tigellinus is always collecting a group of them for questioning...
This calls for a detachment of Praetorians.
I'll tell Tigellinus to start a search.
Well, now, wait.
My dear boy, that not only lacks dignity...
...but these Christians are known to be resourceful.
An open display of force will only bury your little hostage deeper in the nest.
What do you suggest?
That I join the scurvy group?
Listen, I know of a Greek, a man called Chilo.
He's a self-styled soothsayer, astrologer, and diviner of mysteries.
I've no doubt he'd show the way to your escaped Lygia before nightfall.
- Anaxander?
- Yes, master?
You know the house of Chilo?
- Yes, master.
- My nephew has urgent business there.
- Escort him.
- Yes, master.
Well, your advice has certain merit.
I'll give your Greek a chance.
- If you find her, bring her to Antium.
- I'll send you word.
You have heard, Eunice?
Is not love a madness?
Do not ask me, lord.
I am among the mad.
You love someone?
It was once prophesied by an old woman...
...that both pain and happiness would visit me.
That's a safe prophesy about any human.
She spoke a rhyme, in which she said my true fate was hidden.
Well?
Anon shall Venus rise
From out the violet Roman sea
And bear two lovers in her arms
Towards eternity
Whom do you love? Anaxander?
Mirmillon?
Oh, your beloved is not of this house?
He is, my lord.
What if I said that today you should go with me to the violet Roman sea?
I'd swoon with happiness.
Only you haven't said it, my lord.
Then go ready yourself for Antium.
- You haven't yet swooned.
- I have no time, my lord.
I have no time. I have no time.
Yes, yes.
Hearing all this, I vow you've come to the right man, Marcus Vinicius.
Speak. Can you find this girl?
Patience, lord. I must first verify if she is truly of this Christian breed.
- My lord, do you read Greek?
- Passably.
Look here, then. What does that say?
- "Jesus Christ, Son of God, savior."
- Exactly.
So it's the name of their dead God.
I've seen no such symbols.
Ah, but observe the first letters of each word.
What do they spell?
I-C-T-H-U-S, icthus.
The Greek word for fish.
Have you seen the symbol of a fish in all this?
Fish, why should I have seen a...?
- She once drew one.
- Aha. Their sign of recognition.
Fish are caught with a bait and Christians with a fish.
How do I find her?
Where are the gatherings?
They practice foul rites at night...
...in certain caves and old ruins outside the city.
- Is there a gathering tonight?
- Possibly, lord.
But it is most dangerous.
There are hundreds of them.
I'll hire Croton the gladiator to protect you. Does that suit?
Croton? Why, yes, lord.
We'll meet you here at sundown.
But, my lord, I shall need other arms.
A small weapon in advance, perhaps?
You see how they gather, lord?
In stealth, like thieves and murderers.
- That's the man I met at her house.
- Yes, she's here, without a doubt, lord.
I baptize thee in the name of the Father and of the Son and of the Holy Ghost.
- What's he doing now?
- They call it baptism.
An evil bath of black water.
I know there are some here who still hold back in doubt.
A few who have not accepted baptism.
Our Lord Jesus understood that...
...and he welcomed questions, as the right of free men.
But at last, there is one among us tonight for whom we have long waited.
Who was there when the people gathered about Christ and questioned him.
Who heard the answers from his own lips.
A man who saw the face of Jesus and touched his hand.
He comes from Jerusalem.
The fisherman, Simon, called Peter.
The first apostle of our Lord.
Unworthy though I am, Jesus said to me:
"Thou art Peter, and upon this rock
I will build my church."
He has guided my feet to Rome...
...so that together we can begin to build his church here.
I give thanks for the faith you have in him whom you have never seen...
...but whose voice you have heard and answered in your hearts.
I heard his voice by the Sea of Galilee.
My brothers and I were fishermen.
All the night through we had been fishing and had caught nothing.
We were cold and very tired.
As our boat was coming into the shore,
I heard someone call my name.
I looked up and a man stood there.
At the sight of him, the cold and
weariness left me, my heart grew light.
I answered, "Yes, friend?"
He called and asked
that he might come into our boat...
... so he could speak better to the people
who were pressing around him on shore.
We bade him enter.
He spoke to the people about the kingdom of heaven at hand.
Suddenly, my heart leapt in my breast and
I knew that he was the Christ to come.
When he had finished, he said to me:
"Go out into deep waters and let down your nets."
In a moment, the nets were full as if by a miracle.
He looked at my wonderment and said:
"Do not be afraid. From henceforth, you shall be a fisher of men."
He told me to follow him, and I did.
I and my brothers, James and John.
Throughout the length and breadth of the land, we followed him.
Others joined us until besides himself, we were 12.
To the hungry and thirsty, he gave food and drink.
To those who were sick and worn and weary, he gave hope and peace.
Who but the Son of God could have brought such gifts to man?
Who but the Son of God could have commanded the storm to be calm?
Who but he could have raised
Lazarus of Bethany from the dead...
...and given peace to the heart of Mary Magdalene?
And yet, I lived to deny this man.
He himself foretold that I would on the night of our last supper.
"Lord, " I had said, "I am willing to
follow you both to prison and to death."
But he answered:
"Peter, this night,
before the cock crows...
... thou shalt deny me thrice."
And I did.
Three times outside the house of his judges.
When they accused me of being with him, I said:
"I know not the man."
With a curse for the weakness of my body in the face of death.
Then they weighed him down with a cross and scourged him.
And at a place called Calvary...
...they crucified him, with a crown of thorns upon his head.
But even in the midst of his suffering, Jesus said:
"Father, forgive them, for they know not what they do."
Only the Son of God could have forgiven them...
...as he forgave me for my denial of him.
But he who raised the dead could not be conquered by death.
The room in which we later sat, in silence and in sorrow...
... was filled suddenly with a great light
and the risen Lord stood before us.
We saw his hands that the nails
had pierced and his wounded side...
... and we knew indeed
that he was the Lord.
And we heard his voice say,
"Peace be unto you."
And he commanded us to preach
to all men his holy word.
Blessed are the poor in spirit, for theirs is the kingdom of heaven.
Blessed are they who mourn, for they shall be comforted.
Blessed are the meek, for they shall inherit the earth.
Blessed are they which do hunger and thirst after righteousness...
...for they shall be filled.
Blessed are the merciful, for they shall obtain mercy.
Blessed are the pure in heart, for they shall see God.
Blessed are the peacemakers, for they shall be called the children of God.
But beyond these things, Jesus asks us to obey the commandments...
...which God gave to the prophet Moses.
Obey those who govern you and the laws by which they govern.
Even though, under them, you suffer cruelties...
...and witness maliciousness beyond your mind's dimensions...
...make no threat of violence in return.
And in the words of Jesus,
I further say to you...
...whosoever shall smite thee upon thy right cheek, turn to him the other also.
Love thy neighbor as thyself.
Whatsoever you would that men should do to you, do ye even so to them.
Love your enemies.
Bless them that curse you.
Do good to them that hate you.
And pray for them that despitefully use you and persecute you.
Oh, believe in him.
Endure all things in his name, so that you may dwell in blessedness.
Even from everlasting to everlasting.
Amen.
Amen.
Endure all things in his name, that you may dwell in blessedness.
If I smite him on one cheek, the old rat will have no chance to turn the other.
I don't know.
The old rat has courage of sorts.
Will you both come to our house tomorrow to see Peter and Paul?
We must bide our time, we may be watched.
Good night, Father. Good night, Mother.
There. There she is.
- Well, commander?
- Come along.
That giant looks as though he had the strength of a Cretan bull.
- Do you think you can down him?
- I'll squeeze the seeds out of him.
Wait. We're being followed.
- I don't hear anyone.
- Three times I have heard.
They stop when we do.
Go on to the house.
- But what will...?
- Go to the house.
Go no further, commander.
- Step aside.
- My lord, you haven't paid me.
It's only a small cut in the scalp, but they always bleed the most.
Hot water.
I'll get some ointment.
Look. Did you do that too, Ursus?
No, dear. That's an old scar.
A scar? What from?
Probably some battle wound.
That's right. He's one of Nero's best generals, isn't he?
Here. Come, Nazarius, it's time you were asleep.
- But, Mother, did you see the big sword...?
- Yes, dear.
- Wash the wound thoroughly first, Lygia.
- Yes.
Come, Ursus.
Ursus wishes to speak to you.
- Yes?
- I want to ask...
...the commander's forgiveness.
I killed his friend.
Ha-ha. You killed Croton?
Good man. I told you you'd be a champion. Kill the old Greek too?
The other man disappeared.
I'll wager he did, and fast.
Please say you'll forgive him.
For what? Croton faced his chances.
Killing was his profession.
Of all the gods, why didn't you kill me?
In our faith, it is a sin to kill.
I seem to remember.
He should have killed me.
You should have had him kill me.
But instead, you bring me in and patch me up, all of you who hate me.
You've defeated me, Lygia.
Go on home. Stop hiding.
I won't come pursuing you about the countryside any longer.
You're free and rid of me, Lygia.
You could look happier about it.
Well, so be it.
Marcus.
Oh, Marcus, you know I don't hate you.
Lygia.
- Oh, Marcus, Marcus.
- The sweetness of you.
Oh, this is the beauty, I knew it.
I should have known it had to happen when I watched you leave the gathering.
- You were there?
- Yes.
I should have known what I really wished.
You with me always as my wife.
Will you do that, Lygia?
Will you give me the greatest triumph a man ever had? Be my wife?
Oh, yes, Marcus.
Gather what you need and let's be gone from this den.
- Hurry.
- Yes, Marcus, I'll hurry.
We'll go to Antium.
Petronius will outdo himself.
A ceremony and wedding feast such as never has been seen.
And even that will be lost moments.
Oh...
Marcus, Paul will be here soon.
I would like so much to ask his blessing.
Perhaps let him say the words over us.
What words?
You've heard enough of his words.
They've deafened your ears to everything life has to tell you.
But you heard Peter and Paul speak.
Did you hear anything that was ugly or wrong?
I heard a childish old man speak in riddles.
Believe as they do...
...and you'll think a cow is a bull and a bull is an ox and an ox is a goat.
Oh, Marcus, dear.
I thought, having heard, you might begin to know...
...to understand why.
Here, now.
Is this the symbol of your God, your Christ?
The cross on which he was crucified.
I'm willing to accept your God, if it makes you happier.
I don't demand it.
In our gardens in Sicily, we'll put up a big cross, higher than the roof.
I'll put up a special pedestal and crown it with a figure of your Christ...
...carved from the finest marble.
You'll have to have Peter tell the sculptor what he looks like.
- Marcus, listen to me...
- Why not? It's no trouble.
There's such an army of gods these days we can always find room for another.
I'm not asking it as a condition of our having one another.
I just hope and pray that one day...
...the image of Christ will appear in your heart.
My heart is only for you.
There won't be room for him there.
There will be.
I always carry him in mine with you.
Well, take him out if he means that much, Lygia.
- Do you hear me? Get rid of him.
- Well.
I'm glad to see you on your feet again.
Last night and this morning, you had us quite concerned.
Paul.
- Marcus has just asked me to be his wife.
- Oh?
I'm sure that this has brought her great joy, Marcus.
You could see, Paul, that I loved him.
I was just trying to explain to him that...
Well, that there are other things. I mean...
- I understand.
- I don't.
I offered to accept the symbols of her God into my house.
I don't ask her to accept mine.
What more can I do to prove that I'm not an enemy of her God?
Marcus.
For some of us it takes months, years of thought...
...of contemplation, of looking back on our lives...
...on the course of mankind and realizing...
Tell me what more I should do.
Well, you own slaves, do you not?
Hundreds. Good ones too. Why?
Jesus wishes no man to be in bondage.
You should set them free.
Set them free?
But they're mine, I own them.
But you can't buy human beings,
Marcus.
Faith in Christ is based on love.
He asks all people to love one another.
So I heard your old fisherman say. You want me to love the whole human race?
You want me to love Parthians,
Egyptians, Persians?
The rest who wanna put a blade through my ribs?
Has it occurred to you to put down your sword...
...and renounce war against these people?
That you might conquer them with love?
Yes, yes, you tame a pack of wolves with a feather.
It's occurred to me you've a whining beggar for God.
A cringing God for slaves, aliens, and outcasts like yourself.
But that's not Lygia.
Let's be gone from this idiocy of words.
Get your cloak, Lygia.
- Marcus, dear, a moment more.
- We've lost too much time as it is.
You're going to be wife of
Commander Marcus Vinicius...
...not the miserable slave of some crucified carpenter.
Oh, Marcus, try to understand my faith, my beliefs, my very deep beliefs.
Don't force me to choose.
You mean, between me and your Christ?
Yes, choose.
I'd no more share you with your Christ than I would with other men.
But, Marcus, don't you see?
Unless you try to understand, what we feel for each other will destroy itself.
Destroy us.
My son, your love for Lygia, great and beautiful as you feel it...
...is small compared with your love for all mankind.
What sort of love is it that acknowledges a force greater than itself?
What runs in your veins, philosopher, blood or water?
What sort of poison are you spreading?
Are you coming with me, Lygia?
Lygia.
No, my dear.
Twice today, I've been a fool.
But I'll not go back on my word.
You can go your way.
I'll not disclose what I've seen or heard.
Something is hidden behind your meek words, philosopher.
Yours and your fanatical fisherman's.
They strike at Rome and Roman law.
I warn you, if ever Roman rule is threatened, you'll feel my sword.
I almost...
I wanted to go with him, Paul.
Lygia.
Even our Lord knew temptation.
Your strength too will prevail and be rewarded in this.
I know that.
Yes, yes.
These will be the imperial gardens, where the cattle market now stands?
Yes, Divinity.
Each palace rising out of its own lake...
...surfaced with water fowl of the rarest plumage.
No longer will the stench of pig and oxen rise up the slopes of the Palatine.
No. It shall be landscaped with Damascene roses.
Oh, Phaon, you are an architect who could have laid the plans of Olympus.
- My lord, I have brought food.
- Take it away.
- It comes to life...
- You've not eaten since morning, my lord.
Be gone with it, all of you!
You irritate me.
Why do you stare at me, Acte?
My lord...
I can only say...
When all this sets with the final sun, remember the look of Acte.
Why should I remember you?
No one loves you as I love you.
I command you to stop loving me!
I cannot, lord.
Forgive me.
For years, she has been a thorn in my flesh.
Now that thorn will be removed.
Henceforth, you are banished from Rome and from my sight.
One day, Nero, you will need me.
And I will come to you.
Is it not disgusting when common bovine solicitude...
...replaces the fire in a woman's body?
Ah, but what pulsating purity there is in fire.
My new Rome shall spring from the loins of fire...
...a twisting, writhing, breathing flame.
What do you think Petronius will say to this?
You doubt his approval, my lord?
I too remember his strange look at the feast when the thought first came to you.
- I should be careful lest...
- No, no.
Petronius appreciates my genius even more than you, dear Phaon.
It's just that he may not fully understand the method, the means I must use...
...to bring this greatest of my accomplishments into being.
He seems to be well-occupied at the moment.
When I have news of Tigellinus coming,
I shall summon him with the others.
This must be disclosed to him with intelligence...
...with, uh, sincerity.
Yes.
There you are.
- Marcus.
- Hmm?
Well, it's your game.
Only two games you've won in three weeks, Marcus.
Does the play bore you?
I fear I have met my superior.
I fear you might have met something else.
Other than a glare of distaste...
...I've been given no details concerning your sudden renunciation...
...of your little Christian hostage.
Your well-bred curiosity now breaks its bounds, eh?
It shatters me.
Well, uncle, it happened quite simply.
Your valiant Greek led me to Lygia and a swarming hive of idiots.
Their black honey choked my mouth and I said words I never thought I'd utter.
For their mammoth stupidity
I should've been broken in half...
...and dropped piecemeal into the sewers.
- Fascinated?
- In a way.
Yes?
The empress requests your presence in her pavilion, commander.
At once.
I leave you to your fascination.
I have been summoned to mine.
None of this bodes well.
Wouldn't the emperor be angry if he should...?
Poppaea's indulgences merely stimulate him to his own.
But I sense a fresh preoccupation in Nero.
For some time now, he has avoided me.
My lord is troubled?
A doubled guard and yesterday...
...Tigellinus and a squadron of his butchers left for Rome.
I feel a strange and heavy breeze.
Oh, my dear lord.
Even your little song is sad with its note of death.
It is just words.
And I sing it joyfully.
Because love such as I feel cannot ever die.
As always, your entrance is proud and aloof.
I come proudly, as fast as my hands and knees will carry me.
And as always, sardonic and unassailable.
Unassailable?
I've never been so readily, so happily, so expertly vanquished in my life.
I believe everything except the word "vanquished."
I should like to vanquish you, Marcus.
Like the spider who eats her mate when he is no longer a necessity?
Mm-hm. Something like that.
I heard today you're planning to leave for Sicily.
Three years away, there's much to look after.
Will you sail from here or will you go via Rome?
Rome?
That's rather an indirect route, isn't it?
Then I shall be direct.
I know about your little
Christian hostage vanishing.
I've eyes and ears in the Praetorian Guard.
And an arm or two to fit your waist, no doubt?
Possibly.
Did you find her, Marcus?
Naturally.
Only to find myself a fool and sever her chains, I might add.
You severed them thoroughly?
Thoroughly.
I'm glad.
Marcus.
Because you know how I consoled myself when you vanished from the feast.
Spare me names, dear empress.
I consoled myself with the thought of your death.
I fondled your bodiless head...
...running my fingers through your hair, making you smile and frown.
May I ask what stopped you?
It is foolish to kill those you hate, because once dead they are beyond pain.
And I hated you, Marcus.
I welcome your change of heart, at least.
But if ever she bewitches you again,
I shall know.
And since I have no hatred for her,
I do not care whether she feels pain.
You'd never turn the other cheek to me, would you?
I don't know what you mean.
But my mouth is here.
Where is Petronius?
Have you summoned him?
- Have you called Petronius?
- Yes, Caesar.
Well, summon him again. Tell him l...
As ever, I'm impatient for you.
I have missed you, Divinity.
Petronius, forgive me if I seem to have slighted you of late.
I have been steeped in my genius beyond all description.
I sense a fresh inspiration.
Your senses shall leap to it.
Attend me. Attend me, all.
My lack of consideration for you during the past few days...
...in keeping you from my presence, forces me to impress upon you again...
...the tribulations of the true artist.
When I play and sing, I have visions of things I never dreamed existed.
The world is mine.
And mine to end.
Music opens up new worlds for me.
Draws back the veil from new delights.
I can see Olympus...
...and a breeze blows on me from beyond the Earth.
And in those moments...
...I, a god, feel as diminutive as dust.
This is a day for sincerity.
Let me open my soul to you.
Do you think I do not know...
...that there are people in Rome who call me a matricide, a wife killer?
Hold me a monster?
Tyrant?
But there is something they do not realize.
A man's acts may be cruel while he himself is not cruel.
And there are moments, my dear Petronius...
...when music caresses my soul.
I feel as gentle as a child in a cradle.
Believe me?
All men should know you as we do, Divinity.
Only then would they be able to appreciate you.
Yet there are those who say that I am mad.
I'm only seeking.
The flatness and misery of common life depress me.
I seek because I must exceed the stature of man in both good and evil.
I seek because I must be greater than man...
...for only then will I be the supreme artist.
Do you know why I condemned both my wife...
...and my mother to death?
I did it in order to lay at the gates of an unknown world...
...the greatest sacrifice a man can put there.
Now, I thought, doors will open...
...beyond which I shall catch a glimpse of the unknown.
Let it be wonderful.
Or let it be awful.
So long as it is uncommon.
So now.
Behold, dear Petronius.
My new Rome.
It shall rise in gleaming white beauty.
Master gem of the world's crown.
It shall have a new name.
Neropolis, city of Nero.
- Magnificent.
- You have outdone yourself.
Something the world has never seen.
But what of the Rome that has stood for a thousand years?
After all, Divinity, the old Rome, our Rome...
...dirty and magnificent, but still our beloved Rome...
...it still stands.
Does it?
It still stands.
We never thought of that, did we?
Or does it, Tigellinus?
Rome is a sea of flames.
It burns from rim to rim.
You hear that? That is my epic.
To change the face of the world.
To demolish and create, and create anew.
Now, to your chariots, all of you.
You shall come with me to the funeral pyre.
This very night you shall hear my dirge over burning Rome.
Its flames shall carry me higher than the gods.
- All of Rome is burning?
- All but the Palatine area.
- What of the section across the river?
- An inferno.
- Thousands of roofs going up like tinder.
- Marcus.
Stop Vinicius. Hold him.
Now, indeed,
Nero has his place in history.
Look, there's one of Nero's soldiers.
He burned Rome.
The people here, the girl with the giant, have you seen them?
They left. Don't kill me, don't kill me.
Mama, Mama.
Mama.
Mama, Mama.
Here, go on. Take care of her.
The sewers. The sewers lead to the river.
Into the sewers.
Lygia.
Marcus.
Lygia.
Oh, Marcus, Marcus, I prayed to see you.
Marcus, Miriam is dead, in the fire.
- She...
- My mother.
A wall fell on her.
We'll get you out of this, son.
The Praetorians are holding the bridge.
Open up.
- Who's in command here?
- I am.
Open this barricade.
Imperial orders. We're to keep them from entering the Palatine area.
Break ranks. Let them through.
Hold your line there.
I'm in charge here, commander, and by the...
Break ranks, I say.
Petronius, look what I've created!
Tigellinus, my robe of grief.
Terpnos, lyre.
History will judge my song, Petronius.
Will it be great enough to match the occasion?
I'm seized with the fear that it will not be great enough.
You will be worthy of the spectacle, as the spectacle is worthy of you.
You encourage me, Petronius.
But I'm aware that I must compete with those who sang of the burning of Troy.
My song must be greater, just as Rome is greater than Troy.
Silence, ye spheres
Be still, ye hurtling stars
Open wide-vaulted skies above me
Now, at last, lo, I see Olympus
And a light from its summit
Doth illumine me
I am one with the gods, immortal
I am Nero
The artist who creates with fire
That the dreams of my life
May come true
To the flames now I give the past
To the flames and soil
Take thou this Rome
Oh, receive her now, ye flames
Consume her as would a furnace
Burn on, O ancient Rome
Burn on, burn on
The mob from burned areas.
They want to survive.
Who asked them to survive?
Tigellinus.
The palace is fully guarded, Majesty.
They will never pass my Praetorians.
The night is chilly.
Let us withdraw.
Is it possible that human beings can produce such a sound?
Yes, when they've been driven too far.
- Death to Nero.
- Death to the incendiary.
They'll break through.
Summon all the detachments from the barracks.
Death to the incendiary.
They're shouting something.
What are they shouting?
They have given you a new title, Divinity.
"Incendiary."
I've sent for reinforcements.
I hope they arrive in time.
I'd speak to the mob.
Make some promises.
I do not ask favors, I confer them.
You go. Speak to them in my name.
Not until detachments arrive, then I'll speak with steel.
They'd stone me to death now.
In what better cause could you die?
This was your architect's dream.
Go and tell them, Phaon.
This is all for them.
How can we admit that, Divinity?
You're right, we must never admit it.
How can I expect that mob to share my vision?
Seneca, what do you advise?
The mob is a wild animal, and with an animal you cannot reason.
I'm surrounded by eunuchs.
Why do you stand aloof?
You're my counselor.
Why don't you counsel me?
Let them enter, we shall all die.
All except you.
You, of course, being a god, are immortal.
Your levity is ill-timed, Petronius.
They'll destroy you also.
I do not share your passion for self-preservation.
I love Rome, and I am not eager to survive it.
You're not like these other people.
They think that you're their friend.
Speak to them, make promises.
Grain, oil, wine.
They will take them, Nero, without your permission.
Insatiable and thankless mob.
- What do they want?
- Justice.
No mob ever wants justice.
They want vengeance.
A victim.
Tigellinus, it was you who burnt Rome.
At your command, Nero.
Tigellinus, do you love me?
- You know it, lord.
- Then prove it.
Go to the mob, bare your breast to them and your guilt.
I would do so gladly, Nero...
...but I am head of the Praetorian Guard and the Praetorians love me.
If I die, they may turn against you.
I cannot subject you to that danger.
Are you threatening me, Tigellinus?
Do you hear him threaten me with the Praetorian Guard?
You're all willing to desert me. I know it.
I feel it.
Nero, my beloved, you were right.
Give the people what they want.
Give them blood and vengeance.
Not one victim, but a hundred, a thousand.
Victims? What victims?
A group who worship one they say is higher than you.
They are the enemies of the human race, and of you.
Who are these people?
They despise our temples and our gods...
...and prophesy that the end of the world shall be caused by fire.
Well, then, make their prophesy come true.
Let it end for them.
Who are they?
They call themselves Christians.
Christians?
Yes, I've heard of them.
The empress speaks rightly, Caesar.
The people hate these Christians.
They are the enemies of Rome and of the state.
The people want vengeance, Nero.
Let them have it.
The people suspect you.
Let their suspicion turn in this more beneficial direction.
- Surely, my lord...
- They should pay, Caesar.
They must pay.
Do you hear?
The Christians are plotting to destroy me.
You have often reminded us, Nero, of the judgment of history.
What will its verdict be if you punish the innocent...
...and betray your own greatness?
Let future ages, looking back at this time...
...regard Nero with wonder and amazement.
Let history say:
Nero, the ruler of the world.
Nero, a god, burned Rome because he was as powerful as Jupiter.
He loved poetry so much that he sacrificed Rome for a song.
History need not say that the burning of Rome was good...
...but it must say that it was colossal, uncommon.
I cannot listen to any veiled suggestion that my emperor is a coward.
That is amusing.
You, who were too cowardly to risk your life for him yourself.
Petronius is right.
You refused to die for me.
He wants to preserve your enemies.
I want to kill them.
- Why do you defend these people?
- I'll tell you why, my lord.
Because his nephew, Vinicius, loves a Christian girl, Lygia.
And it may be Petronius is himself a Christian.
Petronius, are you a Christian?
I am not.
I have heard that the Christians teach you to love your neighbor.
And as I see what men are...
...I cannot, for the life of me, love my fellow man.
Ha!
He does not love you, gentlemen.
A tablet, Phaon.
The people shall have their vengeance.
I hereby proclaim that the guilt of the burning of our beloved city...
...rests with the foul sect which calls itself Christian.
They have spread the lie that it was Nero who burnt Rome.
I will exterminate these criminals...
...in a manner matching the enormity of their crime.
Their punishment will be a warning.
A spectacle of terror...
...to all evil men...
...everywhere and forever...
...who would harm you or harm Rome...
...or harm your emperor...
...who loves you.
Pause, Nero, before you sign this decree.
Rome has given the world justice and order.
Sign that, and Roman justice will receive a blow...
...from which it may never recover.
Condemn these Christians and you make martyrs of them...
...and insure their immortality.
Condemn them, and in the eyes of history...
...you'll condemn yourself.
When I have finished with these Christians, Petronius...
...history will not be sure that they ever existed.
When I grow up, I'm gonna be a sailor.
Nothing burns at sea.
There's too much water.
Nero can burn the whole ocean.
Marcus.
Did you rest well?
I was impatient to see the sunrise, and here you are.
You should have slept longer.
Your journey from Antium and last night must have...
I've been asleep too long in many ways, Lygia.
I must return to the city at once, meet with Nerva and the others.
Yes, Rome and what it stands for.
Something must be done about this maniac.
There must be an answer to this, quickly, decisive.
You do know the answer.
You do understand.
There can be no turning the other cheek now, Lygia.
If I have not returned by nightfall,
I'll send word.
Marcus Vinicius?
We have not met, but I have heard of you.
You must realize how grateful we are for what you have done.
For your concern for Lygia.
My only concern is for Lygia.
Hold yourself straight, youngster.
A man must be a soldier.
I don't want to be a soldier.
Let's talk about our journey.
We'll be meeting Paul in Greece, you know.
That's good.
You'll like Greece, Nazarius.
You'll help me to fish for men there.
And I think we'll have time to fish for fish too.
Are we leaving soon?
As soon as we eat.
We shall be starting within the hour.
I'm glad, because I don't like it here anymore.
Yes, indeed.
We shall be fishermen together.
Please, my lord, do not trouble yourself so.
It is a moment for thought, Eunice.
Yesterday, I could have gone to the mob and told them that Nero burned Rome.
I could've offered them a new emperor in General Galba...
...and so set my seal upon the times.
But I did not.
Do you know why, Eunice?
I know nothing of these things, my lord.
Because I love Nero, perhaps?
He fills me with loathing.
No, because out of force of long habit...
...I've become content only to be an amused cynic...
...a selfish onlooker, leaving others to shape the world.
Marcus.
The gods be praised.
I was worried about you.
You know Nerva, here.
My third in command, Justin Scipio.
We meet in a ghastly hour, gentlemen.
We've made our decision.
The time has come for Galba to replace Nero.
Justin is taking this message to him...
...asking him to come with his legions in all haste.
Your signature added to these will make
Galba confident of his reception.
I know you will give it.
I sign it with humility.
On your way.
You took a risk in coming here.
You're a marked man.
You scorned Poppaea.
She has death in her eye for you and your Lygia.
I'll chance that.
Take Lygia and leave Rome as quickly as possible.
At least you'll be spared
Nero's final horror.
He is about to extinguish his conflagration in a sea of blood.
Whose blood?
Did you not hear his orators at the street corners?
Already the people are being given the story, along with grain and wine...
...that it was the Christians and not Nero who set fire to Rome.
- They won't believe such a lie.
- But they are believing it.
The people will believe any lie if it is fantastic enough.
I'll meet you at your house by midday.
We will keep you informed.
Farewell, Marcus.
Farewell.
Farewell?
What do you mean, my lord?
My dear, this morning
Nero sent to inquire after my health.
A Praetorian officer brought his solicitude.
It is easy to see that he means to amuse himself...
...by making a sport of my extermination.
- But then you must...
- No, no, my dear.
I have the means to disappoint him.
Send Anaxander to me.
I will give him the names of those few I love.
He will go and ask them to dine with us tonight.
- Gen. Plautius, his family, where are they?
- You're late, they're already imprisoned.
The Praetorians came and collected the whole scurvy lot.
Me, raising my children right by the house of dirty Christians.
Burn the city, will they?
Put them in Number 4.
Have you the family of General Plautius here?
I do not know, commander.
See if we have them.
I have an order for their immediate release.
A signed order? By whom?
I do not accept questions, Praetorian.
I transmit orders.
A seasoned campaigner trapped by love.
We've been expecting you.
As soldiers, we've always hoped to die a quick and noble death...
...haven't we, Vinicius?
But Nero has in mind for you something more leisurely...
...and certainly ignoble.
Put him with his Christian friends.
Marcus?
Oh, why did they take you?
This is none of your doing.
I carry my share of the blame.
We knew they were looking for you, but we had no way to send warning.
This is a sad reward for your friendship.
Marcus, I once accused you bitterly.
I'm proved wrong.
It's no triumph for me to find you here.
General Plautius, l...
The lions!
It is the lions.
No, no, please, God!
No, I can't stand...
No, dear, no.
We must be strong in him, in each other.
Where is he, then?
If he is so all-powerful as you say, why do we find ourselves here?
My friend, stand firm.
My two babies and all of our children to be sold into slavery.
Is that what the redeemer promised us?
Only by strength in faith will we be able to endure the ordeal.
I thank God Peter and Paul were spared.
But I miss their spirit and their courage.
I think it's going to rain.
We'd better look for a place to take shelter.
Peter, don't you think so?
What troubles you?
You've hardly said anything all morning.
Oh, I'm sorry, Nazarius.
Are you very tired?
Oh, my mind is as heavy as my body.
There is something wrong, with our people, perhaps.
I do not know.
It is at such times
I need our Lord's counsel.
There is within me a decision that I cannot find.
If only he would speak to me, l...
Look, those treetops there, they do not bend with the wind.
Yes, that is so.
And that sudden brightness coming, do you see it, Nazarius?
It is the light of the Lord.
I have seen it.
Christ Jesus, you are here.
What is wrong, O Lord?
What should I do?
I am weary.
How should I follow thee now?
Whither goest thou, Lord?
My people in Rome have need of thee.
What did you say, Nazarius?
My people in Rome have need of thee.
If thou desert my people...
...I shall go to Rome to be crucified a second time.
Nazarius, blessed child, speak on.
Speak.
Oh, Peter, you've stumbled. Here.
The words you said, say them again.
I didn't say anything.
You said, " If thou desert my people...
...I shall go to Rome to be crucified a second time."
But I said nothing.
Yes.
He has again spoken to me.
Come, Nazarius.
Where are you going?
To Rome.
I have invited you here tonight, my friends...
...you who have been steadfast through the years.
That you have come proves not only your recklessness...
...but your devotion.
You pay us too much respect.
We know you have the wit to bring yourself into his favor again.
No.
Tigellinus has won.
Nero, our master...
...is at the moment anticipating how he will make me suffer.
But I shall deprive him of that pleasure.
This is an evening of farewells.
Where will you go, my lord?
Your lord?
You've called me that for long enough.
My name is Gaius.
And you've worn this emblem of slavery for far too long.
Henceforth, you are legally free.
And this villa, with its treasures, its slaves, its gardens, will be yours.
Why do you say this?
Because this evening, with its warmth and feeling...
...this evening is my signature.
The last flourish.
Tell the physician to come in.
It is not enough to live well.
One must die well.
No, my lord.
No. Please don't let him.
I understand the Christians say that death is but a transition to a better life.
It will be interesting to discover.
Oh, my lord.
My dear, no tears before our guests.
Petronius...
If the Christians are right, this will be but a brief parting.
We can't... We can't part.
Eunice.
Did you think I could live without you?
No, no. Bind her wrist.
For the first time, Gaius, I disobey you.
What have I done that forever I should hear the sweet thunder of your heart?
You have given me your love.
And now, my friends,
I wish to write a letter to our emperor.
Scribe?
Will you permit me?
Let us hear it, Petronius.
To Nero, emperor of Rome...
...master of the world, divine pontiff.
I know that my death will be a disappointment to you...
...since you wished to render me this service yourself.
To be born in your reign is a miscalculation...
...but to die in it is a joy.
I can forgive you for murdering your wife and your mother...
...for burning our beloved Rome, for befouling our fair country...
...with the stench of your crimes.
But one thing I cannot forgive...
...the boredom of having to listen to your verses...
...your second-rate songs, your mediocre performances.
Adhere to your special gifts, Nero.
Murder and arson, betrayal and terror.
Mutilate your subjects, if you must.
But with my last breath, I beg you, do not mutilate the arts.
Farewell, but compose no more music.
Brutalize the people...
...but do not bore them...
...as you have bored to death your friend...
...the late Gaius Petronius.
Seneca, I entrust to you the delivery of this letter.
I will deliver it.
Farewell, Petronius.
With you perishes the best of our Roman world.
Petronius?
Dead?
By his own hand?
- I don't believe it.
- I witnessed it, Divinity.
I shall never forgive him for this.
Never!
Without my permission?
It's rebellion.
It's blasphemy.
He left you a message of farewell.
Then he did think of me.
His last thoughts were of me.
How I loved you, Petronius.
You were my one friend.
You alone understood my soul.
Tigellinus, the weeping vase.
Who will listen to my songs now?
Who will appreciate the true value of my verses?
I weep for you, Petronius.
One tear for you.
One for me.
Seal up these fruits of my sorrow...
...so that posterity may know how Nero grieved for his dearest friend...
...and truest critic.
And now for his tender words.
Destroy!
Destroy his house, every stone to dust.
Burn his books.
Slaughter his animals.
Kill his servants.
Male, female, eunuch, every one of them.
Beat his memory into the ground!
Where is the emperor?
Let Nero start the game.
The lions are getting hungry.
Bring on those house burners.
They're crying for blood.
I doubt if we can chance anything today.
Nothing will change the temper of this mob.
Have you heard any news of the commander?
Only that he's been taken, that's all.
O holy gods of Rome...
...in the name of Nero, emperor and supreme pontiff...
...we beseech you to receive in sacrifice...
...the lives of those who sought to destroy...
...this sacred and eternal city.
Have strength as he did.
It will not be long.
Oh, dear Lord Jesus, help them.
Help them.
Don't.
Don't torture yourself.
I'll be as close to her as I can.
You may give the signal, Divinity.
Peace to the martyrs!
Peter.
Peace, peace to them.
Take thy children, Lord.
Numb their wounds, soften their pains.
Give them strength, O savior.
Seize that man.
Blessed are you, my children, who die in the name of Jesus.
I say to you that this day...
...you shall be with him in paradise.
Here, where Nero rules today,
Christ shall rule forever.
Who is that man?
I think he is their leader, a man called Peter.
He escaped us before.
But he said Christ would replace me.
What sort of...?
They're singing.
These dogs have effrontery even in death.
The lions will sing louder, I think.
Oh, Peter, could our Lord at least not have saved you?
Oh, Peter, why did you come back?
It was the Lord's will.
Nazarius is safe.
Some good people sheltered him outside the city.
Yes, sing to him as he now opens his arms to you.
Sing to the welcome of Christ, our Lord.
More singing. Why aren't they afraid?
They irritate me.
They should have been tortured first, their insolence destroyed.
What of Marcus Vinicius and the girl Lygia?
- Shall we bring them after these?
- Yes.
Alone, with one lion.
- The hungriest.
- Not yet, my lord.
I should like Vinicius and his little flower held in reserve.
I am planning something most unusual.
A surprise for you.
What is it, Poppaea? Tell me.
It will not be a surprise, then.
Please, Poppaea.
My lord, have I ever disappointed you in conceiving new delights?
New thrills?
True.
You haven't.
Singing.
How can they?
It's beyond understanding.
Don't have the arena cleared at the end of the day.
I'm most curious.
No face on this one at all.
Oh, look, there's another one smiling.
It's monstrous of them to die smiling.
It's inhuman.
Yet they look no different from other people.
The man, Peter, he put an evil spell on them.
Yes.
The man, Peter.
Something singular must be done with him.
Marcus.
Yes?
Nothing do I see that is not perfection.
That night you said it, even though you were most predatory about it...
...even then, my heart must have told me:
"That is the man you will love."
Only, then, you wouldn't let me hear my heart talking, Marcus.
I said a great deal, I remember.
All of it loud and empty.
I would so love to have given you a son.
Lygia.
Oh, Marcus.
No matter what,
I want to be your wife now.
- Peter will say the words over us.
- Lygia, you know l...
I want it to be that way before they take us...
...so that it will be that way when we are together again.
You would never wish me to pretend, would you?
Pretend?
That I feel myself Christian.
It's still strange, new.
There's something I can't quite...
I mean...
Yes, it's proven good...
...full of courage, right here.
But there are many things
I cannot believe, understand.
Christ is within you, Marcus.
You feel him more strongly than you know.
Come.
Peter.
Before I die, I want to marry Marcus.
This is a holy thing, my son.
It concerns Lygia.
I look upon it as holy.
Marcus.
Lygia.
May he who blessed the marriage at Cana bless you also.
Love one another from this moment forward...
...as man and wife in his holy name.
In the name of the Father and of the Son and of the Holy Ghost.
In this life and the next...
...now and forevermore.
Marcus.
My husband.
Here he is, Your Majesty.
He meets with your approval?
Very much so.
It will be like a fresco from Crete.
The maiden sacrificed to the Minotaur.
It will be a spectacle worthy of the eyes of the emperor.
Superb conception.
You seem sad and restless, my little black friend.
But do not grieve.
I promise you a rare playmate for your lonely horns...
...to fondle and caress.
You are the man Peter?
I am Simon, called Peter.
"The man called Peter has been heard to preach rebellion and blasphemy...
...against the rule and the divinity of the emperor.
It is accordingly decreed that he be taken to Vatican Hill...
...where it has been confessed he made his first preachment...
...to be crucified and left there as a warning to all and any...
...who henceforth wish to call themselves Christians."
To die as our Lord died is more than I deserve.
We can change that.
You'll notice, Divinity, they've stopped singing.
They have, haven't they?
I seem to know that man.
General Plautius.
He conquered Parthia and the north countries...
...when you were a boy.
Rome made him famous, and he repaid her with treason.
What a dramatic reversal.
Now he faces his first defeat.
I shall write a poem.
People of Rome.
I am Aulus Plautius...
...once general of your armies.
Rome is ruled by a monster...
...who tells you the Christians burned Rome.
But he lies.
You lie, Nero.
You are the incendiary.
Nero kills Christians to deceive you.
He alone is guilty.
I swear it by my death and by my...
I begin to envy Petronius.
I have envied him long since.
I tell you, this is a horrible blot on Roman justice.
The mob isn't as happy as it was.
Have you noticed?
Save me.
They are singing.
He said something to Nero.
I could not hear the words.
Nero's looking at a man that knows how to die.
Take him.
Commander?
They're not parting us.
Prepare her.
Here, my lord, is our honored guest.
Vinicius?
- Why is he not in the arena?
- He will be, very much so.
In spirit.
It's a giant.
It's Hercules himself.
He has guarded the Lygian girl from birth.
Now let us see him guard her from death.
But what is the contest?
Look.
They've brought Marcus here to face this.
By the...
Do not fret, Vinicius.
Remember, I said I did not hate her.
I wish her no pain.
Lasting pain, that is.
I am devastated dear Petronius is not here...
...to witness our pleasure, Vinicius.
"Sing no more," he said.
Upon these lilies I heap now
Red roses upon red
A blood-red tide shall surge
Upon her milk-white flesh
Like your uncle, you do have a certain amount of taste.
But I still think that she's too narrow in the hips.
These people know how to die, Nero.
In death, you will squeal like a hog.
Give him the sword. Let him...
No, stay.
My lord, would you deprive him of his final pleasure?
Ha!
Superb, Poppaea. Magnificent.
A fair contest.
Nero's justice is proverbial.
If the bull kills the giant, so much for the girl.
But if our Hercules should be cruel enough to destroy the poor animal...
...I shall have to spare her life for Vinicius.
To breed more Christians.
Christ.
Christ, give him strength.
Seize him.
- Burner of Rome!
- Thumbs up!
- Burner of Rome!
- Thumbs up!
Ready up there? First line, follow me.
Citizens of Rome.
I am Marcus Vinicius...
...commander of your 14th Legion.
This man who burned Rome...
...who killed innocents for his own crime...
...the rule of this madman is ended.
Rome is yours again.
Tonight, General Galba marches from the north.
Your army has risen.
Hail Galba.
Galba, new emperor of Rome.
- A sword from Plautius.
- Aah!
Where are the Praetorian Guard?
Dead or in revolt.
Dead, all dead.
My dear mother.
Octavia, the wife I loved.
My friend Petronius, all dead.
Dead.
You alone are left.
Kill the Christians, you said.
It was you.
It was you who turned my people...
...my faithful subjects...
...against me.
You are my evil genius.
What are you doing here?
I banished you. I didn't recall you.
I told you that when you needed me,
I would come to you.
You defied me. Begone!
Acte, what will they do to me?
They will kill you.
But they won't get in.
You've lived like a monster.
Now die like an emperor, by your own hand.
I didn't wish to be a monster.
The gods willed it.
Now, or they will find you here.
Is this, then, the end of Nero?
Yes, my lord.
To be lord of the earth and my own executioner.
Quickly.
Oh, how dull, how tasteless life will be for them without me.
How can they face such a world?
How can they endure it?
Now, my lord.
Help me, Acte.
Hail Galba. Hail.
Hail Galba.
Hail Galba.
Hail Galba.
Hail Galba.
Hail.
Hail Galba.
Galba has a task ahead of him.
To rebuild Rome and bring back Roman justice.
I fear the glory that was Rome will never fully be reached again, Marcus.
Babylon, Egypt, Greece, Rome.
What follows?
A more permanent world, I hope.
Or a more permanent faith.
One is not possible without the other.
What is it, commander?
It was right in this very spot that Peter and I turned back to Rome.
It was here the Lord spoke to him.
It's a blessed spot.
I am the way, the truth and the life.
Subtitles by
SDI Media Group
It is men who endure toil and dare dangers that achieve glorious deeds.
And it is a lovely thing to live with courage, and to die leaving behind an everlasting renown.
War! This is what Demosthenes calls for, war!
- Aeschenes puts words in my mouth.
- If you mean truth, I put it there.
I know of no other way for it to come from your mouth!
Your audience performs well today.
Philip's money is well spent. The words
I used were "arms" and "money".
I quarrel with the words you did not use:
"Men" and "blood".
If these words must be used... yes, men and blood.
Athenian men and Athenian blood?
To save Athens, whose blood should be shed?
- To save Athens, not Olynthus!
- And if Olynthus falls to the barbarian, what stands between
Athens and destruction?
- Peace!
- Move for peace and I'll support you.
Men of Athens, are there still madmen among you...?
Who wish to live?
I'm mad. I'm stark, raving mad.
Are there sane men among you who still think that we have the power to debate the question of war or peace?
Who will fight? You or us?
Why do you speak thus? For love of country or love of Philip's gold?
No! No! No!
Philip has been at war with us ever since he razed the first Greek city to the ground.
And as each Greek city fell,
Philip, too, kept proclaiming peace.
And, to our eternal shame, we stood by and never once cried out against his barbaric acts.
Are you blind that you cannot see that this is the plan for Philip's conquest... to extend his rule city by city, state by state, by bribery, treachery, force of arms?
- Yes?
- From Macedonia. Message for the king.
Philip.
Philip, wake up.
There's a messenger from Macedonia.
Ah, such dreams I had.
Such strange and troubled drunken dreams.
A messenger...?
- What news do you bring? Good or bad?
- You have a son.
- A son?
- Born to the queen three weeks ago.
- I have a son.
- Alexander.
- That's the name the queen gave him.
- Alexander. And the queen?
- She sends you greetings.
- Greetings?
"To Philip. Hail and rejoice."
"On this day to Olympias, your queen and wife, a god was born."
- A god?
- Those were the queen's words.
What mother in Greece has not dreamed that her first-born was a god?
Hail, Philip, conqueror.
Hail, Egyptian.
I want to see my son.
Looks like you... the hair, the eyes.
Even his beard!
You named him well: Alexander.
Alexander of Macedonia.
Alexander of Greece.
Little lion.
Little god.
I say, uh...
I've heard that legend.
There were signs of greatness at his birth.
Quakes and storms shook the earth, and in the skies a star fell.
And two eagles perched upon the roof of the queen's chamber.
And in far off Asia, the Temple of Ephesus was struck by lightning and burnt to the ground.
How did you read these signs, soothsayer?
The two eagles... that he was born to rule two worlds.
The burning of the temple... that a torch was kindled that day that would one day consume all the world, and this torch, your son.
And the falling of the star?
That a god was born to me... of a god.
There were other signs and portents of divinity.
Before his birth, the queen had a dream.
I had a dream, too, soothsayer.
One night on the battlefield of Olynthus I had a dream.
I dreamed of death.
And when I awoke,
I didn't know whose death it was.
We want Philip!
- Foretell it to me.
- Those shouts are for you.
The people have been waiting for hours to see the king and his son.
- And if you kill him, what?
- Pleasure, bloody pleasure.
- And if you're wrong?
- An Egyptian soothsayer dies.
- And king Philip says to the world...?
- That he is also a man.
A madman! And if you are, play the role and also kill her and the boy.
Kill her?
- And the boy?
- Why not?
Isn't it the ancient law of the wild Macedonian chiefs?
You knew her when you married... proud and jealous, as wild as the mountains from which she came and the gods she worshipped.
What she thinks I don't know, but this I do know: She's a woman and she taunts you.
Taunts me?
Tears me.
And what do you believe, Parmenio?
Even the oracle at Delphi proclaims his divinity.
- I've bought shrines and burned them.
- I accept the will of the gods.
And what do you believe?
I believe in the glory of Macedonia, in the kingdom.
In the army, forged with your will and your strength and your belief that we were stronger and more fit to rule than anyone in Greece, even in Athens.
And you're right, Philip. We are.
We must proclaim to the world that Macedonia will not fall apart, that she will continue to rule through you and through your son.
And then, Philip, we shall have truly lived.
Go to her.
You loved her once. At least you can live in peace with her.
Accept the boy. He's yours.
And give them what they want.
Alexander.
Alexander.
Achilles, too, was born of a god.
And at his birth it was foretold that he would be greater than his father.
And he was.
And this destiny shall be yours, too, Alexander.
Al...
They want to see the prince... and the queen.
- Greetings, Aristotle.
- Greetings, Alexander.
- Whose kill?
- His. Alone, on foot.
You should have seen it. It was like a duel to decide which of them was king.
That duel need never have been fought.
Cleitus is back.
Cleitus?
Cleitus. Black Cleitus!
- King.
- Companion.
Lucky Cleitus, to be the only one amongst us chosen to go to war.
- For war you need men.
- Three years doesn't make a man.
What does, Philotas?
The news, friend. The news. My father?
He's well. He sends you greetings.
As do all your fathers.
- Were there many victories?
- Does the sun rise every morning?
- We even raided Persian soil.
- Persia!
Across the Bosphorus one night... a quick, short, sharp raid.
Before they knew it, we'd sacked three towns.
A Greek army on Persian soil... the dream of Greece for 200 years, and to Philip goes the glory.
Hail, Philip.
Hail, Philip!
Cleitus, why did my father send you here?
To train new troops and bring them back.
- And us?
- To train you, too, as always.
- And bring us back, too?
- I have no orders concerning that.
- Hail, Philip!
- Your father means you well.
I mean him well, and love him.
But he hoards his glory like a miser, while we sit at the feet of Aristotle and learn of great wonders of science, of mathematics and of logic.
And maybe one of us will write a book and be known as the pupil of Aristotle!
Aristotle... forgive me.
For what? You spoke like a king.
I, like a teacher.
- Your blood ran quick, too?
- At Cleitus' tale of the Persian raid? Yes.
For in that act I saw something that might unite our torn and bloody land, and put an end to Greeks killing Greeks, and send them marching under Philip on their holy mission... to conquer Persia and destroy it.
Will Greece follow my father?
I do not know. Neither does he. Men do not easily forget years of slaughter and burning and pillage, and deep and bitter hatreds.
And the cry of "Philip the Barbarian" still echoes through the land.
He may conquer, but he will not rule.
Do you know how vast the Persian Empire is?
From the Nile to the Indus, from Samarkand to Babylon.
And beyond. Do you know how many different people live there?
By heart. Carians, Armenians,
Jews, Parthians, Egyptians.
- I know their customs and their gods.
- Yes.
For this is more than an empire, this is Colossus.
To rule it would take a man as great as you can be.
That is why I say patience.
Patience? My time is short.
Short?
When the great god Zeus, father of Achilles, gave him his choice between a long life of obscurity and a short one filled with glory, he chose glory.
So did I.
Achilles died young.
Your friends are waiting for you on the field. It's your turn to throw.
We Greeks are the chosen, the elect.
Our culture is the best, our civilisation the best, our men the best.
- Now watch.
- All others are barbarians, and it is our moral duty to conquer them, enslave them, and, if necessary, destroy them.
Wonders are many, but none is more wonderful than man himself.
The Persian way of life has the seed of death and fear in it, the Greek, of life and courage.
The gods of the Greeks are made in the image of man.
Not men with birds' heads and bulls with lions' heads, but men who can be understood and felt.
"Thus beneath great-hearted Achilles his whole-hooved horses trampled corpses and shields together, and with blood all the axle-tree below was sprinkled, for blood drops from the horses' hooves splashed them, and blood drops from the tyres of the wheels."
"But the son of Peleus pressed on to win glory, flecking with gore his irresistible hands."
To place such responsibility on his shoulders, to thrust manhood on a boy!
- Aristotle, we waste words.
- You waste a great man. In another year...
Another year?! In a year
I once swept through half Greece.
In another year they may sweep me back.
- This time victory is not on my spears.
- You asked for my opinion.
- I treasure it.
- You won't take it.
- Tell him why.
- There are many whys.
- I know them all.
- I know one. The queen.
- I know that one.
- Listen to him.
Listen to what?
Does he say the boy's not loyal?
- To you?
- To me.
- He'd lay his life down...
- I for him.
But you are asking him to make a choice between the mind and the heart.
He'd make the right one.
I hold him to be a man.
An Illyrian spear through the knee.
What's an arm or a leg or an eye for the sake of glory?
You've grown.
A year ago, when I left you here...
- Almost two.
- So it is.
Tall and straight as a spear.
A Macedonian spear.
- Do you come from Pella?
- No.
- Straight from the battlefield, to see you.
- Me?
- How's your mother?
- When I last saw her, well.
- When was that?
- Several months ago. Why?
- Aristotle tells me you excel.
- Except in patience.
He's told me that, too.
And that you thirst for glory.
- When we hear news of your victories...
- Victories? There are none.
For the first time in 20 years,
Macedonians retreat.
- I've heard that, too.
- And what do you think?
That my father's name is Philip of Macedonia.
Can you rule in Pella while I fight?
- Rule in Pella?
- There is a revolt there.
In my capital, in my palace!
That's why I'm back.
There must be loyalty here to the House of Philip.
Can you rule? Aristotle stands opposed.
Who else?
Attalus.
And you?
I rode 200 leagues to Mieza.
I can rule.
- At all costs?
- I can rule.
Tomorrow morning, when the sun is high,
I want you and your companions to ride into Pella.
And there, in full view of the entire populace,
I'll proclaim you regent in Macedonia.
- I'll go and tell the others.
- Alexander.
There's work to do. Farewell, Aristotle.
Farewell. Take these words with you, and use them for what they're worth.
Alexander is many things.
He's logic and he's dreams.
He's warrior and he's poet.
He's man and he's spirit.
He's your son, but he's also hers, and he believes himself to be a god.
Alexander!
The night was a thousand years.
When I heard last night that you...
You heard last night that I was coming?
From whom?
Oh, a man... a soldier... a messenger.
I don't remember.
I couldn't wait.
I wanted to come to you, to warn you.
- To what?
- No. No, not to warn you. To beg you.
- To warn me? To beg me?
- I vowed to the gods that...
Mother, say what you want to say.
He's gone mad.
No one was safe in Pella this night.
Philip has gone mad.
- Send them away.
- They're my friends, here for safety.
Send them away!
What's all this about my father?
To the sword, the cross, the rack, men that have been his friends for years.
Now everyone is his enemy. He accuses everyone of conspiring against him.
Even me. You'll hear that story,
Alexander. You'll hear it from him.
But you mustn't believe it.
You mustn't. You don't, do you?
Why should he accuse you?
He wants to get rid of me.
He's been wanting to for years.
He wants to marry again.
- Who?
- Attalus's niece.
You be careful of Attalus.
You be careful of all of them.
She's no fool.
She won't let him throw her away like he's done with all the others. She's young.
Mother!
Whatever he asks of you, do.
Whatever he says, agree with.
For when you're regent...
When you're regent, then... we'll rule.
We?
Your father will see you now.
Have you seen your mother?
Yes.
An act of revolt against the state is treason.
In giving you the regency,
I give you power.
Power is absolute... if you don't use it, you lose it.
- My father always spoke bluntly.
- Did he?
That's not what people say.
They say "Philip, the cunning", "the fox".
- Speak bluntly now.
- I do not choose to.
- Then I do not choose to answer.
- Who says choice is yours? Alexander!
All I ask is truth.
- I've been at Mieza all this time.
- You saw her. Many times you saw her.
- Whenever I could.
- And never did you hear about this plot?
It's your choice as king to put me on the rack.
There's a man on the rack now, a kinsman of your mother's, who, before he died, screamed her name.
Torture makes men scream blasphemies.
- Is it blasphemy to speak her name?
- In foul lies, yes.
And if I brought you proof that this revolt was brewed by her?
If I brought you proof, and you brought me proof, and we swore to heaven?
Here we stand, and you believe in me or you don't!
I want to.
- And I want you to.
- Then listen.
And listen carefully, boy. This woman...
- My mother.
- ...wants to rule.
She is the queen.
You asked for blunt words... so she's called.
There is no love between us. She can only rule through you. You are her power.
And her pawn.
- I'm no one's pawn.
- Are you sure?
A rumour here in Pella... the Macedonian army is defeated.
Philip is dying. Philip is dead.
Rumours, rumours.
- Spread by whom?
- By her. Here in Pella, chaos.
Who rules? She does.
Antipater, my regent, dare not oppose her, for she claims she rules for you.
To back up that claim, she calls on her brother, the king of Epirus.
For the first time since I took power in Macedonia, a foreign army stands on its borders.
Now she has the power she seeks, for
Antipater dare not use his troops in war.
So he gives in to her, for he knows that
I may need those troops. And I do!
Now there's no longer chaos in Pella, there's murder.
Some of my best men died.
What does it matter that the Macedonian
Empire crumbles? She rules in Pella!
This is why Attalus stood opposed last night at Mieza.
Is it?
And why Parmenio stood in silence.
They were afraid of her hold on you.
I am not.
Alexander, as your first act as regent, send your mother away.
- Exile my mother?
- Back to her kinsmen in Epirus.
- She'll be happy.
- Is that the cost of my proof?
How do you think I came to power?
My brothers...
I know. You slew them.
Do you want me to do that, too?
Why didn't you ask me this last night in Mieza?
And if I do this, then, Father,
I'll be your pawn, won't I?
Aristotle was right.
You're not ready to rule.
All you're fit for is to fight and die like any Macedonian soldier.
Then at least live like one.
Get drunk. Choose a woman.
I do!
I choose her!
Young fool!
Fool! You fool!
By my right as king,
I give you, Alexander of Macedonia, the seal of regency.
With this seal, you rule in my absence as though you were king.
You have the power to collect taxes, raise troops, make war and hold royal court.
For as it is with the king, according to ancient Macedonian law, so it is with his regent.
He is, in his single person, lord of all things, both open and secret, at once general and absolute.
I am leaving Antipater here as your adviser.
Alexander, there's another ancient law of kingship... to trust no one, and to learn how to be alone.
Are you asleep?
No.
You're regent now.
Not because he wanted it so, but because he had no choice.
You're regent now.
Good night, Mother.
- Alexander, I swear to you...
- Do not swear, Mother.
Who else should
I have fought for except you?
What other love do I have?
There were rumours of his death.
He was being defeated.
There were others who claimed the crown.
Why, Mother?
The crown is mine by right of birth, isn't it?
You wanted to swear before. Swear that!
By divine right.
Good night, Mother.
Good night, Alexander.
- There's peace in the hills.
- The tribes revolted against the king.
- Your father may need these troops.
- The regent is, in my father's words, lord of all things, open and secret, general and absolute.
You will rebuild your city here and name it Alexandropolis.
No man's pawn.
I return this seal of regency, as ordered.
The news is that you move against Athens.
The news here is that you move against hill tribesmen.
That you set men free whom I imprisoned.
That you set up statues to yourself.
That you name cities after yourself.
That you're all heroes.
- Mine were the orders, they obeyed.
- Yes.
You ruled well in Pella... for yourself.
How many Macedonian troops that I could use have you lost on your road to glory?
This leg of mine!
How could you, sir, regret a wound that at every step reminds us of your conquests?
Alexander, walk with me.
- You have my temper.
- I know.
And my ambition. More, I think.
Alexandropolis!
At least wait until I die.
I've given you command of the left wing of my cavalry.
This time we'll crush them.
I'll ride into Athens.
And what'll they cry then?
"Philip the Barbarian" or
"Philip, captain general of all Greece"?
You will ride with me.
Alexander, this girl, Attalus' niece, she means very much to me.
My name is Eurydice.
I know your name.
Are you afraid to speak to me?
Afraid?
Forgive me for using the word "afraid" to Alexander.
- Laughter sits well on your face.
- And on yours.
- Could there be a bond between us?
- A bond?
- I will not have you frown.
- Command comes easily to you.
It was not a command. An entreaty, a wish.
You are very young.
Older than you by a year.
And very beautiful.
You look at a woman like your father does.
Perhaps I'm... jealous.
I am... of his love for you.
- Flattery comes easily to you, too.
- Does Alexander need flattery?
Truth.
Why did you come here?
To find out if there will be hate between us.
- Once, when I was much younger...
- Much?
Very much.
...my father took a new woman into the house. I went to him and spoke out.
For my father has had many wives and mistresses, and many children by them.
There will be hate between us.
As I said, I was young and did not understand my father.
"Why" I asked "must there always be new rivals for the throne?"
He threw back his head, laughed, and he said
"My boy, if I surround you with competitors you will have all the more reason to surpass them in merit."
My father, as I said, had many wives and mistresses.
- Tears spring easily to your eyes.
- I do not wear a mask as you do.
What I am is on my face, and what I see is on my tongue.
And what do you see?
A young girl, an old man and an ambitious general called Attalus.
And love?
You do not see that at all, do you?
- This is not the way I wanted it.
- What do you want?
To be able to love Philip, and to be loved in turn... in peace.
As his mistress, his wife or his queen?
As his queen.
So be it.
Alexander, I told you before, this girl means very much to me.
The Thebans will not let us pass.
We fight tomorrow.
To fight means perhaps to die.
Again, please, let there be no quarrel between us.
I said... so be it.
Again, the Macedonian is on the march... the wolf, Philip, and his whelp, Alexander.
Again, all we hold sacred is in peril.
But here, at Chaeronea, the fate of Greece will once and for all be decided.
Shall it live under freedom? Or tyranny?
For this sacred struggle, even the graves of our fathers will yield up their dead.
Athenians!
Macedonians!
Demosthenes declares openly that the battle of Chaeronea will decide once and for all who is to be master in Greece.
Macedonians, give him his answer!
Hail, Alexander, hero. Hero of Chaeronea.
We Athenians would like permission to bury our dead.
Let them lie and rot on the field of
Chaeronea till they stink to the heavens.
To the hero of Chaeronea!
Alexander!
And now... to the victor.
- To me!
- To Philip!
To Philip.
Fierce in battle, generous in victory.
You see, Memnon?
I defeat you and
I invite you to dine with me.
Isn't that the way an Athenian gentleman behaves?
I could destroy Athens now, but I won't.
To destroy a centre of culture would be the act of a barbarian.
And that, Philip is not.
Is he, Memnon?
Is he, Athenians?
Is he, Demosthenes?
Is he, Demosthenes?
Is he?
Is he, Demosthenes?
Is he, Demosthenes?
Philip the Barbarian.
Philip the Barbarian
Philip the Barbarian
Philip the Barbarian dances over your dead bodies, you Athenians!
Father, you're Philip of Macedonia, now captain general of all Greece.
You're right. My victory, my kingdom, my Greece!
Not yours!
Philip the Barbarian!
Alexander.
Too much to drink.
Much too much to drink.
Athenians...
Demosthenes...
Saved my life.
He could have been king. Saved my life.
Don't ever forget that.
Philip the Barbarian
Philip the Barbarian
Philip...
A young girl... and a drunken, foolish old man.
In tribute to the heroic Athenian dead,
I send their ashes back to Athens under the escort of my son Alexander.
And there, in Athens, a treaty of peace will be drawn up between us by my son Alexander.
To all those who died like men on the bloody field of Chaeronea, all hail!
Alexander rides to Athens, and I stay here.
It was a wise decision.
To win the war and lose the peace is folly.
There'd be no cheers for you in Athens.
Only hatred, and perhaps an assassin's dagger at your throat.
When and where will I meet that dagger, friend?
To my humble home, Alexander, and in the name of Athens, I bid you welcome.
Oratory, Demosthenes, is a noble profession, and, I am told, a rewarding one.
How humble is your home, Aeschenes?
Almost Macedonian... empty of all, save victories.
- Well said.
- Well rehearsed.
And well acted.
I have heard that there are no two better actors than Demosthenes and Aeschenes.
I should like to witness a performance.
And I should like to know, where were all these wonderful physiques when we defeated you at Chaeronea?
Memnon.
Had so great a victory been mine,
I would have said the same.
My wife, Barsine.
- Barsine.
- And this, Stratocles, Athenian senator.
Thocian, general. Charidemus, commander of the Athenian fleet.
- Barsine is a Persian name.
- I am both Persian and Greek.
Athens is now my home.
Both my husband and I love it very much.
My father once said "Athens is neither a city nor a state. It's an idea."
I can understand that now that I'm here.
And Aristotle taught me that an idea is greater than a man. An idea is divine.
Do you believe that?
We demand no ransom nor tribute.
All Athenian prisoners of war shall go free.
We ask that all Greek city states and nations agree that no Greek in any part of the world shall bear arms against us.
- And that is all?
- No.
Each state here agrees to supply men, arms and ships for the war against Persia.
Unlimited men?
Unlimited arms? Unlimited ships?
- Till victory be won.
- Whose victory?
These are the terms.
You see? We have lost the right to choose for whom and for what we are to die.
What have you gained?
For the first time in history, Greece is able to measure its strength with any empire.
A nation with a destiny, a divine mission to bring Greek culture to all the world.
Or have your ideas grown greater than your men?
Now you have that unity and strength to fulfil that mission.
And this is what I have brought you.
Philip of Macedonia further decrees that no Macedonian troops...
Philip of Macedon used words to gain his ends.
This boy believes in what he says.
Mother, I have brought you many tales from Athens, and many gifts... gifts for a queen.
Bring them to her, not to me.
I am queen no longer.
- Queen no longer?
- Divorced by your father's royal decree.
Philip has said to all Greece that his wife, your mother, is unfaithful.
- I am leaving Pella.
- Also by royal decree?
Not by his words, by his deeds.
Here I am alone.
Behind my back, laughter.
Olympias wants no one's pity.
I'll be treated like I once was or...
I did not think I had any tears left to shed.
No!
No, Alexander.
Go to his wedding in peace.
Accept it as the will of the gods.
I have my destiny, you have yours.
Greetings, companion... my son.
Alexander.
How do I tear down this wall that stands between us? By breach? Assault? Storm?
- You built the wall.
- How? By marrying Eurydice?
- You said "So be it."
- Were my words all you needed?
- No.
- Then why seek my approval now?
Because you're my son.
Your divorce stated my mother was unfaithful.
Everyone worships the gods in their own way. Your mother...
- But it states...
- That was a mistake.
- A mistake that threw dirt on my name.
- I was angry, sick.
- I acted without thinking.
- Not you, Father.
You've never done a thing without weighing it on the scale of your ambition.
You give, not because you want to.
You made me regent.
You gave me my command at Chaeronea, sent me to Athens.
You, Alexander! You high-minded philosopher, you god among men, why did you accept, if not for love of the same things?
In heaven's name, let's talk of things as they really are.
A Macedonian princess!
Not from Epirus, nor Athens, but Macedonia.
Is it in your mind to cut me out of the succession?
You play a dangerous game with me, boy.
And you with me.
If you think victory at Chaeronea made you greater than you are,
- you'd better measure your shadow.
- I have measured it.
Why should that be in my mind?
Because you now see me as a rival, not as a son.
If I did, you wouldn't be alive.
Give me your hand.
Give it to me!
To the new queen!
And may the gods at long last give to
Macedonia a legitimate heir to the throne.
You stupid, drunken fool!
You dare to call me a bastard?!
Alexander!
Look at him, Macedonians.
This is the man who is preparing to pass from Europe into Asia, but cannot even pass from one couch to another.
Mother, get dressed.
We leave Pella tonight.
To all men in Greece, hail and rejoice.
On this day, to Philip of Macedonia and his queen, Eurydice, a son has been born.
These are Philip's words:
Let all strife cease.
Let all crimes be pardoned.
Let all in exile return home.
Your father bids you welcome.
The city states have sent their quota in men and arms.
We march on Persia before the month is out. There will be three armies.
You will command the one that marches east.
And Attalus?
He marches south with me. The ceremonies that will be held at Pella...
- For the birth of his son?
- For many reasons.
...are very important.
All the ambassadors of Greece are here, as an expression of their loyalty.
It's fitting that you appear at your father's side.
- My mother is to be treated with honour?
- Agreed.
I want the king's word for that.
Agreed.
Within the week, four of your companions are to be banished.
Harpalus, Ptolemy, my son Philotas, and Pausanias.
- Why?
- Because I think it best.
- Is their loyalty to me treason?
- When it sets you against me.
I believe this is what they have done from Chaeronea onwards, even during the months that you were in exile.
- I've heard reports.
- And I have, too.
I know the reason that I'm back here in Pella.
I saw it in the streets. You need me here.
- On this, I'm firm.
- And I am, too!
Let theirs be the choice.
Philotas?
I accept.
Then it's done.
Done.
Pausanias?
How will you be able to live without your... god, Alexander?
I accepted exile, not disgrace.
And Philip laughed?
As though I were a stable boy.
Your quarrel's not with Attalus, but with Philip.
For Philip could have done you justice, but he laughed.
Come take the sword, this wretched hand of mine.
One deed, one act of glory.
My father once asked what a man should do to hand his name down to posterity.
He replied "kill the person who has accomplished the greatest deeds, and then, whenever that person is spoken of, he too will be remembered."
- Mother!
- Alexander!
Pausanias, friend, you've had much to drink.
Go now and sleep. And tomorrow...
Tomorrow?
Tomorrow... king!
Mother... what thoughts do you put in his head?
- None that are not already there.
- And what's in yours?
- A name.
- Whose?
A baby's, the king's new son.
Philip has named him karanos.
A name, like any other.
The king who founded the Macedonian royal family was named karanos.
What's in Philip's mind?
What's in Philip's mind?
What's in Philip's mind?
What's in Philip's mind?
Walk in front of me.
I'll walk alone.
Leave him alone.
Alexander!
May the gods curse the killer from now till evermore, whoever the killer may be.
Father, neither on my hands... nor in my heart.
I swear it.
I hear you wait to declare who is to be your king.
According to ancient privilege, it is the right of the army, both by law and force of arms, to decide who shall be their king.
The hand that plunged the dagger into my father's body was the hand of my friend.
And I slew my friend.
My father's murder was carefully planned.
My friend was a tool used by others for larger ends, by men whose purses bulge with Persian gold, and who, for this gold, would betray their country and their holy cause.
From Demosthenes, the rabble-rouser in Athens, to men here in Pella.
And there is not world enough nor time enough for these men to escape my vengeance.
Soldiers, you were assembled here on the plains of Axios by my father, Philip, to be led to the greatest glory and riches that any army since the world began has ever yet achieved... the conquest and destruction of the Persian Empire.
Nothing is changed but the name of the king!
Alexander! Alexander! Alexander!
Delegates of the Greek states here assembled, at the Treaty of Corinth you elected my father captain general of all Greece, and pledged him loyalty.
I claim that loyalty, and his titles, now.
Corinth?
We pledge it.
Thebes?
Thessaly?
Argos?
Athens?
Do you place value on pledges given at the point of spears?
If broken, I'll not hesitate at the gates of Athens, as my father did.
I do not doubt that, Alexander.
And you do not have my oath.
For it is sacred only when, as a Greek, I have free choice.
Memnon, to be exiled from Greece for the rest of his life.
With, of course, the approval of Athens.
I also order the arrests of Aeropas and Hermanes for high treason.
To be executed in accordance with our ancient law.
Eurydice.
- She was very dear to me.
- She was as my child.
Then bury her like a queen, not like a thief in the night.
We Macedonians are a religious people.
- A suicide must be buried in the night.
- Suicide?
So it will read. She took her own life.
- The babe?
- Plucked from her, and thrown into the sacrificial flames in front of her.
For your mother is a religious woman and seeks to appease the gods.
Is the tale too horrible for your ears?
Shall I tell you, too, who placed the noose around her pretty, white young neck?
But I am a religious man, and accept the will of the gods.
What's man's fate is man's fate, both yours and mine.
O Father...
O Father Zeus,
I will lay victories upon your altar the like of which no man or god has ever seen.
You god, that gave him to me, and for whom I have kept him all these years, do not break your vow.
If his life be short, as is the prophecy, give him in that short span of life that which is the prophecy also:
Eternal glory to the end of time.
I now claim the whole of Asia... land won by the spear.
I oppose meeting Alexander, now in battle, at the River Granicus.
This is Asia, where space is as vast as time, and both are on our side.
Here to the east... mountains, desert, wasteland,
2,000 thirsty miles to Babylon.
Here, along the shores of Asia Minor... rich cities, good harbours.
Here... Alexander, with neither enough men, money or supplies to do anything now but live off the land.
He must move down the coast.
What do you propose?
Retreat and destroy everything before him.
Let him conquer nothing but burned-out land.
And when his supplies are gone, his lines cut... At a time and place of our choosing.
Retreat before this boy, this adventurer, this pirate?!
This boy brought Greece to its knees in 16 months. It took his father 20 years.
This is the Persian Empire. If necessary, we can put a million men against him.
But not at Granicus. There we stand equal in numbers. I fight one battle at a time.
Then let us fight it and have done with talk!
- Talk?! Then fight it by yourselves.
- Memnon!
Darius, Emperor, you hired my skill in war.
- He also hired your courage.
- If I doubted either, he would not be here.
Speak, Memnon.
My lords of Persia, listen well.
Alexander is like a lion on the scent of blood.
He needs a fight, a kill, and he needs it quickly.
If you feed the growing legend of his invincibility, if you give him victory in Persia, if we are defeated at Granicus...
You seem too sure of that, Greek.
The cities along the shores of Asia Minor will go over to him.
- For they still consider themselves Greek.
- Persian for 200 years.
Greek or Persian, a man's roots are a man's roots.
Are they?
Is there also a doubt here of my loyalty?
My lords, let me speak bluntly.
I am a Greek, as you did call me, taking arms against a Greek.
This is not a game for me or for my men.
We have to win, as do you.
This is a professional army we face.
You spoke bluntly, now I will.
These lands you speak of burning are ours. The crops are ours.
Handed down to the nobles of Persia by the great kings of Persia thousands of years ago... when men still lived like beasts on those Greek islands of his.
Not a foot of land, not a grain of wheat will be destroyed.
This is our decision, Darius, Emperor.
We will meet Alexander at Granicus, and we will destroy his army!
And I will kill him.
- On your heads.
- On our heads.
Do you have stomach for this fight,
Memnon?
Break of day?
Our women also wait.
For time is a thief.
I am not sending you to Babylon.
Who, then, will the king hold as hostage for your loyalty?
You'll go to Miletus with the rest of the women and wait for news of Granicus.
- As you will.
- As I will.
I will many things.
I can't believe in what you're doing.
Nor do I think that you do.
- You have eyes and cannot see.
- I see that I have no choice.
- No choice but to lead Greeks to death?
- They're mercenaries. They fight for pay.
- And you?
- You ask me that now?
Shall I ask it of your body when it's brought back?
- Would you have me play the traitor?
- What would you betray?
Half the night I've sat and listened to your talk of Babylon, the king, his nobles.
Even in your troubled sleep, the words you spoke drew a picture of twisted men to whom wheat stands higher than a man's life.
Who else opposes Alexander?
- Who else should?
- Every man who hates tyranny.
Which do you hate most, tyranny or Alexander?
- Those words are strange.
- This empire for which you fight is old and corrupt and begs destruction.
- The world we live in begs destruction.
- No. It needs a new force, a new idea.
And that idea has come to Asia, as it came to Greece.
And like Greece, it's here.
You see it, but you don't understand it.
Alexander.
I am both Persian and Greek, and I know both worlds.
Perhaps the Athens in which we believe is old and corrupt, too, but its ideas and glories are worth keeping alive.
Whose glories? Athens' or Alexander's?
Both, if needs be. A Persian victory will not do this. Alexander's will.
If you could not see it when he spoke in Athens, you must see it now.
Did you, when you went into exile with me?
- I wasn't sure.
- But you went.
- I am your wife.
- That's a word in your heart?
- You ask me that now?
- Yes, now.
For I believe he's never left either your mind or your heart, has he?
- It's a bitter farewell.
- Memnon...
For you, Memnon, I plead for you.
At Troy, Achilles found his Hector and killed him.
Who will be my Hector?
To the god of battles!
Charge!
Alexander! Duck!
You treacherous, murderous Persian dogs!
We ask for quarter.
Every Greek in the world was pledged by sacred oath not to take arms against me.
- I gave no such oath.
- But you were bound by it, like your men.
We now stand on the field of battle... you the victor, we the vanquished.
No. I as captain general of all Greece, and you as traitor to your people.
Not for myself but for my men, again I ask for quarter.
Ask it of the Persians, who deserted you.
How will you celebrate this victory?
At Chaeronea your father danced over the bodies of Greeks who fought for freedom.
Freedom?
You fight for pay! Earn it!
Then let it be to the death.
Of all the Greeks who fought at Granicus, no one escaped alive.
This, Alexander, is the legend of the Gordian knot.
In many years past, when we were sorely pressed, it was said that a king would arrive in a village cart who would help us and become our ruler.
This came about. And the king was Gordius, who left his cart here, as it stands, with this message:
That anyone who could unravel this knot would become ruler of Asia.
Many have tried.
All have failed.
Ephesus, Sardis, Helicarnassus.
He is cutting off the Persian fleet from every port along the coast of Asia Minor.
Alexander's turning the Aegean Sea into a Greek lake!
Alexander, your wound!
These Greeks to Macedonia, to till the soil and work in the mines to the end of their days.
The entire population to be sold into slavery.
And you, Athenians, you citizens of the capital of the world, you representatives of its culture, you dignitaries, emissaries, whom I find in Persia still conspiring with Darius as you did against my father, you will be held with us as hostages for Athens' fickle favours.
Do you think to win her favour by what you did at Miletus or Zeleia or Granicus?
Do you think those at home will ever forget such savagery?
And for those of us who might have come over to you, we have had our warning.
Against you it must be to the death!
Yours the victory, yours... the spoils.
You will be treated... according to your rank.
- Barsine.
- Alexander, conqueror!
- Is he?
- That's for you to say.
- No, you.
- You sacked a city.
- Look at me.
- Burned it.
- Look at me!
- Looted, pillaged, taken a woman.
What do you expect to see?
- What I saw in your eyes when I awoke.
- Because you want it so?
- What I saw in your eyes in Athens.
- There I betrayed Memnon with my soul.
Here at Miletus, Alexander must be loved.
And where is Alexander's love? "You will be treated according to your rank"!
- I did not mean...
- Those were your words!
My rank is hers.
I will share both her glory and her shame.
(WHISPERS) Alexander!
What?
- I did not speak.
- Your lips formed words.
What do you now fear to say that you did not fear to say last night?
What thoughts drive through your storm-tossed brain?
Thoughts?
Storm-tossed?
You chose to go.
Go.
My head turns.
It swims.
And why must you always choose to be alone?
Alexander... now look at me.
These were found on the battlefield.
From Demosthenes... to Darius.
We need wait for the Athenian fleet no longer. Let's face it here, now, in Miletus.
Athens is not with us, neither is Greece.
We have been betrayed!
- Betrayed.
- It's over.
- Whose voice do you speak with?
- I speak for myself.
- The quarrel is not here.
- The issue is.
It has not been stated.
I see it in all your eyes... and your thoughts:
"Turn back. Turn back."
There is nothing in my eyes, nor in my thoughts, that is not on my tongue.
Nor ever will there be.
Command, and I'll follow.
That is not enough. You're Macedonians, not Persian slaves. I want your hearts!
You propose to go on... without the Athenian fleet, without support, with a lifeline that stretches back more than a thousand leagues into Macedonia.
This is what your father would have done.
He would have left a garrison here, taken back the spoils to Macedonia in what little fleet we have left, forced Athens into supporting us, then invaded with an army five times as strong.
This your father would have done!
My father! My father! My father!
I am Alexander, not my father!
The hand that plunged the dagger into my father's body was the hand of my friend.
And I slew my friend.
Mine the sin, too.
The crown is mine by right of birth, isn't it?
Philip the Barbarian, Philip the Barbarian
And nothing can stand in the way of Alexander's destiny, can it?
What's man's fate is man's fate, both yours and mine.
Macedonians, I am disbanding our fleet and sending it back to Macedonian shores.
We came here to Asia to conquer, to win... or to die.
Do you need further words from me?
You Greeks in chains, who fought for Persian pay, are free to go back to your homes or to serve under me as you choose.
For it is your birthright as Greeks to live under no tyranny, but as free men with a free choice.
You, too, are free to go back to Athens, if you wish, as I no longer need Athens.
For if she will not lead in this holy war, then she must follow.
For I will embrace in my cause any man...
Greek, Carian, Lydian, lonian... who believes in it.
Greece is where you are.
Where you walk.
Where you talk, breathe, live.
To Alexander, write:
Every nation of Asia have I,
Darius the Persian, king of kings, king of lands of every tongue, ordered to be assembled on the plains of Babylon.
Such an army as the world has never seen before stands against you.
Therefore, we command you, withdraw and return.
Go back to the bosom of your mother Olympias.
For you are still an impudent and shameless boy, who in your madness and ignorance have come to Asia with your band of robbers to do mischief.
I send you a whip, a ball and a bag of gold. The whip to train you.
The ball so that you may play with boys of your own age and not meddle in the affairs of men.
And the gold for expenses.
For I have heard that you are poor, and since I have gold as abundant as the sunlight, you need not come to Asia as a thief to steal it.
You should not have informed us of your vast amounts of gold and silver, because now we will fight harder until all your possessions are ours.
Nor have called me "thief" and "boy", for if you slay me, it will not be accounted a great triumph, because you will have slain merely a robber chief.
But if I slay you, which I intend to do, it will be said that this great king and warrior died by the hand of a little Greek boy.
For I am coming against you, and, having entrusted myself to the immortal gods,
I shall be victorious over you.
Does he make camp?
Half a league from here they stand at arms, no baggage train, no tents pitched.
He will attack soon, within this night.
And we?
We will wait.
Order each man to stand at arms all through the night and to raise his voice in loud battle cries.
40,000 horse. Nearly a million infantry.
200 chariots, with scythes to cut horses' hooves.
Pits dug as traps for our cavalry.
- 1500 bowmen.
- Will the Persian move?
- He hugs the earth like a child its mother.
- Make camp.
Make camp? Attack now, under cover of night. In the dark there is confusion.
On both sides, Parmenio.
I will not steal a victory. If I am to be destroyed, let it be by the light of day.
Tell the men to rest.
Oh! An evil omen! An evil omen!
Macedonians... disaster, destruction, death!
It is an omen of good fortune.
The Persian moon will be eclipsed by the
Macedonian sun. Is it not so, Aristander?
Tell the men not to have fear.
The heavens are on our side.
O God of Fear, to you and against failure...
I make sacrifice.
I now call upon all the gods to prove to me and to all men that I am truly the son of heaven, by giving me this day... victory.
This aid I beg in prayer with outstretched arms, Ahura Mazda.
Grant me through righteousness the increase of my kingdom, never to be destroyed.
Come to my support at my call.
You generals, companions, officers... this message you will bring to the troops under your command:
This is the final battle.
This day, Greece will be revenged, all Asia will be ours, its riches in our hands, and all our labours ended.
This, then, is the plan of battle.
We are outnumbered in everything save courage and discipline.
But the Macedonian army is such that even if I, Alexander, were to fall in battle, only one man would be lost.
The Persian such that if the head is cut off the rest of the body dies with it.
Therefore, Macedonians, hold and wait.
Hold and wait.
Then, when we charge, have but one thought:
Kill Darius! Kill Darius!
Kill Darius!
Charge!
Darius's bow, his shield, his chariot.
The great king has fled! He has run away!
The great king has run away!
So this, it seems, is royalty.
My mother weeps for my father.
Grant us this, Alexander... that we may bury him before you put us to death.
Your father is alive.
I bear no hatred toward you or your family, Queen.
He's braver than his father.
What's your name?
- Ochus.
- And yours?
Amytis.
Roxane.
Roxane.
We will go to the north, to the
Caspian Gate, to raise another army.
My wife and family, how are they?
Ha! Go on. Go on. Ha!
Alexander rides towards us.
He is no more than ten leagues away.
Abdicate.
Get away.
Get on!
Then die, Darius, Emperor.
Get away, quickly!
- This is how I found him.
- Did he speak?
- He asked for water. I gave him some.
- Did he speak?
Some words I did not understand well, about destiny and fate.
He gave me this to give to you.
Then he prayed. Then he died.
"My son, Alexander, look now what I was and what I am, with no one near me to even close my eyes."
"Let the Macedonians and Persians sit in mourning for me."
"Take my daughter, Roxane, for your wife, so that the seed of Darius and of Philip may be mingled in her, and that our worlds may become as one."
"Into your hands... I commend my spirit."
"That our worlds may become as one."
"Into your hands I commend my spirit."
Let the man who slew my enemy come forward, for I seek to honour him.
Let him fear not, for I swear by the gods and by the life of my mother Olympias that I will make him renowned and exalted over my troops.
Why did you betray, make prisoner and finally murder Darius?
I did not act alone. We agreed that such an act would win favour in your eyes.
And the crown of Persia which you had the arrogance to place upon your head?
- You won hatred and death.
- You swore falsely!
No. You.
For he was both your lord and your kinsman, and you swore loyalty to him.
I will keep my oath.
You will be exalted above my troops.
Impaled upon a stake, and there be left for all men to see and remember... that only a king... may slay a king.
I weep, friends.
I weep for all those Greeks who did not live long enough to see such a sight as Alexander on the throne of Darius.
For Ptolemy, a throne, too.
Thrones for all of you, for all of you shall be kings.
Hephaestion, Nearchus, Harpalus, all my companions, generals, soldiers... kings, all of you.
Ask and it's yours.
Gold, silver, spices, jewels, slaves, women... yours.
Cleitus! Where's Cleitus?
- Cleitus is drunk.
- And has what he needs.
I, too, like Alexander, give to you everything I've gained.
For I, too, like Alexander, am rich enough in glory.
My son, to make yourself less great would be far better.
To my king,
Alexander of Macedonia, son of Philip, who led us here and will lead us safely home again victorious conquerors.
The war is over! Darius is dead!
The city burns!
Our soldiers have set fire to the city.
Look, it's burning. Look!
Look, it's on fire! It burns.
As should this palace, a symbol to all the world that the holy war is ended, that the Persian Empire is no more, that Alexander has revenged Greece.
Women, who followed the camp of Alexander all over Asia and dreamed of this day when we should return to Greece, shall I, Barsine, throw the first torch for you?
Or will you, Alexander, throw it for us?
No.
No. Put them out.
Put the flames out! It's my palace!
My palace! Mine! Mine! Mine!
It must not be said of Alexander that wherever he passed only charred ruins remain as his monument.
It will be said of Alexander what he has always wanted said.
You think me too drunk not to know that you, too, seek to betray me?
- Betray?
- Either that, or you cannot understand.
- I understand too well.
- What?
The fire that burns inside you, put that out, too.
- That's heaven's fire.
- Alexander, let there be an end.
- Why? So that you can hold me chained?
- Yes.
- Is this the degree of your love?
- My love has no degree.
You fear I'll leave you for another woman.
No other woman is my rival except your mother, and your frenzied desire to outdo your father!
I am not Philip's son.
I am the son of God.
The world is my domain, and my mission is to rule it and rebuild it.
We will march to the end of the world.
It's men who must follow you, not gods.
Men will. All men will!
Athenians!
Alexander asks that we now formally proclaim him a god, son of Zeus Ammon.
"O Athenians, when will you see your days of glory again?"
Demosthenes once asked.
Well, now you have your answer... never!
Alexander, who could have conquered for us, but now conquers for himself and stands master of two worlds...
Europe and Asia!
In ten short years he has conquered the world.
He has fought his way
2,000 miles to Babylon.
Miletus, Sidon, Tyre... all these great cities have fallen before him.
He has entered Egypt.
He has crossed the Euphrates.
Babylon, Persepolis, Susa... all are his treasure houses.
He has done away with Darius, and made himself king of kings over all his domain.
Master of two worlds, he has achieved what no man has achieved in history.
And now he has crossed into the lands of India.
He has gone further than any man or god before him.
He has conquered man.
He has outdone the gods!
Make the resolution, Demosthenes.
Proclaim him a god.
Proclaim Alexander a god!
Why should the blood of thousands be shed to gratify the ambition of one man, who has disowned his father and insanely affects kinship with the gods?
This I've heard the soldiers say.
You will proceed to Ecbatana.
You will take command, to ensure our lines of communication against attack.
Farewell, Parmenio.
Philotas, you are under arrest... for high treason.
No more. No more.
Whatever you want me to say, I'll say.
It's true, I plotted against you.
I and my father Parmenio!
For your pleasure, great king, a contest of skill between a Macedonian and a Persian.
20 gold talents, the province of Bactria... my king has been very generous to me...
I'll wager it all against one of your Persian robes, which I, too, must now learn to wear, that my Macedonian there can beat any Persian that you bring against him.
Come, Persians, will you wager?
Will you fight?
- Will you hold your tongue?
- No.
That's for slaves to do, not free men.
Either I am that, or do not invite me to dine.
Or drink, for the wine has gone to your head.
Your father, Philip, won many battles as drunk as Dionysus.
Send in your man.
- Let him live.
- No. Let him die, as have so many Macedonians, by order!
- Cleitus, brother.
- Can I be a brother to a god?
It is by the blood of Macedonians that you have grown so great.
- We were the victors, not the Persians.
- There are no victors nor vanquished.
There are vanquished. All those who came with you are vanquished.
If you cannot hold your tongue, go!
Your tongue is thick with wine, too.
Is that seemly for the king of kings?
Cleitus is dismissed by Alexander!
- In heaven's name, go!
- No, till I've had my say.
Then stand on your drunken feet, if you can, and say it!
You cast aside every man who's helped you, even your father.
I?
- I saved his life at Chaeronea.
- I saved yours at Granicus.
- He bore me a grudge for this.
- As you bear me one.
As you do to any man who might throw a shadow on your glory.
There is no man alive who can throw a shadow on my glory.
There are dead men who can, and do!
Philip, Attalus, Parmenio.
- These words are little short of treason!
- They are not short of truth.
Let those who will bow before your Persian robes and throne, and accept that you have disclaimed your father and pass yourself off as the son of God!
Let go of me! Am I Darius, to be held prisoner by my friends?
Let go!
"Are these your customs? Is it thus that Greece rewards her heroes?"
"Shall one man claim the trophies won by thousands?"
I quote from Euripides, your favourite poet, as did Pausanias and your mother, before Philip's murder!
Go now!
To Philip,
Attalus... and Parmenio.
Cleitus, brother!
Cleitus, brother!
Is this Alexander, who cries because he has killed a man?
Can this be he, who lies there, crying in fear of the law and of the tongues of men, when he himself is the law and the measure of right and wrong?
Whatever is done by supreme power is right.
These are words.
And Cleitus is dead, and I killed him.
We will go back, Macedonians.
And I, Ptolemy, companion of Alexander, later Pharaoh of Egypt, bear witness to the terrible return from India to Babylon.
For the first time in the ten years since he left Macedonia,
Alexander, sick and weary, retreated.
But he turned even this retreat into victory.
For within him, out of the death of Cleitus, a new idea was born, a new understanding, a new driving force... that it was not lands that must be conquered, but the hearts of men.
And at the end of the thirsty road, at Susa,
Alexander pledged himself and us to this new idea.
Make this union fruitful as the seeds of the earth, and let the children of Alexander, a Greek, and Roxane, a Persian, be of both worlds and live in one.
And let this be true of all you Greeks and Persians who are married here this day at Susa.
And let this be true of all you Greeks and Persians who are married here this day at Susa.
And let this be true of all you Greeks and Persians who are married here this day...
To you, you men and women with whom
I have lived and with whom I have died...
Philip, Eurydice,
Parmenio, Philotas, Darius... and Cleitus... my brother...
I offer this prayer.
And to you for peace I pray, that Macedonians and Persians and all the people of my empire will always be alike.
Not merely subjects, but people who will live and build together in harmony and unity of heart and of mind.
For we are all alike under God.
And if God is the father, then he is the father of all.
No.
Oh, no.
No, no. Not yet.
There is still so much to do.
Barsine.
Man's fate.
You gods, have I not done enough in this short span of life to sit among you?
Must I be cursed with man's fate?
Barsine, after I am dead, see to it that my body is carried out and cast into the River Euphrates, so that it may disappear, that men will forever believe that from the gods I came... and to the gods... I returned.
To whom do you leave your empire?
To... the strongest.
Wonders are many, but none is more wonderful than man himself.
FEAR AND DESIRE
There is war in this forest.
Not a war that's been fought, or one that will be, but any war.
And the enemies who struggle here do not exist, unless we call them into being.
This forest, then, and all that happens now, is outside History.
Only the unchanging shapes of fear and doubt and death are from our world.
These soldiers that you see keep our language and our time, but have no other country than the mind.
Do you think they're looking for us?
It's one of ours alright.
He can't see us.
But maybe they saw a plane back there.
There isn't much left of it to see,
'less it's still burning.
Even if they could spot us, there isn't anything they could do to help us here.
Yeah. Six miles behind the enemy lines.
- Well, that's not too far.
- Not too far?
In those six miles there's probably thousand of guys and every one of them was taught to shoot at uniforms like this.
If you're so worried about that, why don't you keep your voice down?
I'm not worried.
What's going to happen, Lieutenant?
Somebody around who saw our plane go down.
They might be looking for us in the woods already!
It'd be a lot easier if ours knew where to start.
It isn't very much.
Too bad you fellows didn't get your rifles out of the plane.
Let's see what can be done.
Once you understand how a mousetrap works, if you're clever enough, you can use it as a springboard.
Here are the front lines.
From our position just before we crashed, we should be in this general area.
Our own lines are here and we should be about here.
There's a river that runs East of where we are now, I think.
That river cuts through the front lines and winds up on our side.
Now, as I see it, we could use our reconditioned mouse trap on the river.
Is that your idea?
To go down the river?
Yes.
But how? How can we get down it?
I can't swimm very well.
And Fletcher.
We could do it on a raft.
At night.
Well, we'll never make it any other way.
It's suicide to try to walk out.
I wouldn't have the vaguest idea of how and where to start.
This way we'd cruise through together in a few hours and arrive in one piece.
- Well, by my computations...
- Your computations...
With your brilliant figuring that got us here in the first place.
They must be somebody's pet.
It has a collar.
Ney, make a better watch dog.
Seems friendly enough.
We can't use a mascot in this trip.
Hurry up! We don't have all day.
If no one has a better suggestion, let's head for the river.
Some more animals might show up.
It's hard. One foot fights the other.
- Get there, before it burns in the bushes! - I could do it alone.
- Nobody's safe here.
- Are they watching me?
- Getting hungry.
- What's up?
- They're all scared.
- How hungry...
- Who'll they look out to later?
- Oh, the cracking in my head.
- I bet he was wounded.
- I don't run for no reason.
What's gonna hang from the trees tonight?
- Hurry!
- We'll die in the woods!
- Don't die here!
- They're scared.
Alright, alright. Lead them on!
After we get past this road, the river isn't much further.
Mac! Get down on the road and take a look.
You know? There's nothing so refreshing as an afternoon out of doors in enemy territory.
It's really too bad that the sun doesn't burn us green instead of brown.
Camouflage!
Well, if you see some strange faces across the way, wave to them casually and try to look as native as possible.
Lieutenant!
Lieutenant! Come here.
Bring your binoculars.
- What do you want?
- I'd like you to see something.
Around the river bend.
- What? - I can't make out exactly what it is, but I think you'll be interested.
Come on!
Over there.
See?
Looks like some kind of small air strip.
Yes, you're right.
Lots of rank around.
It looks like a General!
Sure.
A General! He is a General!
Let's get back and help with the raft.
Mac, let's go!
All we need now is Huckleberry Finn.
- This oughtta see us through.
- Yeah, it doesn't look bad at all.
Should we make sure it floats?
Rafts always float.
It's unfortunate that we don't have a fine bottle to christen it with.
We could give it a name...
He must have seen us!
If we stay here, we'll get killed!
It's starting to get dark.
Perhaps they didn't see us.
But it's too dangerous to wait here until we find out.
What are we gonna do?
How are we gonna get back?
Hurry up, let's go!
That plane must have landed down that house we saw before.
What's the difference?
There must be something big going on down there.
Maybe the General is having a convention tonight.
We didn't see this on the way to the river.
We've been running in a new direction.
Whatever they're jumping, sure smells good.
Like mother's own.
Those guns look even more jummy than the food does.
I've got an idea...
No matter what we do from here on, we're much better off with some guns.
- You better hurry. Others maybe around. - I'm gonna have some stew first.
Sidney, better grab something to eat.
It may be a long tima 'till our... next feast.
We better eat something.
How's the stew, Mac?
Kinda cold, but cold stews are alright.
Cold stew on a blazing island.
We've just made a perfect definition of war, Mac.
That's cocky!
A blazing island with a tempest of gunfire around it.
Perhaps if we could...
- Somebody must have heard us.
- Grab those guns and let's get going.
- Why did you have to shoot?
- Forget it. Let's move!
We spend our lives running our fingers down the lists and directories, looking for our real names, our permanent adresses.
No man is an island?
Perhaps that was true a long time ago, before the Ice Age.
The glaciars have melted away and now we're all islands, parts of a world made of islands only.
How long are you gonna hang around here?
We're in a fine mess now!
I'd give anything to trade places with that dog we chased yesterday.
Seems like whenever people get in a hole they get to get jealous of dogs.
I admit that our prospects aren't very cheerful.
But how about going back to see if our raft is still there?
Look, if we were spotted, they'll have a trap waiting for us when we show up.
It's a chance. Trying to walk out is as risky today as it was yesterday.
We'll scout around the river and make certain.
Then, what? Even if we find the raft there.
Even if none of them is waiting for us. Then, what?
We have to sit tight until it gets dark, and hope that we don't have a full moon.
We can sing old songs if we get restless waiting.
What's the matter, snowcoombs?
I heard that they're cannibals.
- So even if we get caught you're pretty safe. - Leave me alone!
We may be in the woods, McClellan, but let's try to remain civilized.
Yeah, I suppose you're right,
Lieutenant.
Anyway, there won't be many days left to be civilized in.
If we stick around these woods much longer.
- She'll see us!
- Shut up!
Don't be afraid, we're not going to hurt you.
She's quite nice.
Don't you think so, boys?
What are we supposed to do with her now?
I've got a wife at home.
I'm afraid she's become our unvited guest.
I must say I've had worse guests at better parties.
All right, Corby, all right.
Let's not forget where we are.
"Even if we're lost in the woods let's try to remain civilized."
Well, we can't stay here.
- Shall we leave her fish here?
- There'll be plenty.
What are you gonna do with her,
Lieutenant?
Give me your belt.
You too, Fletcher.
Please, don't beat her!
She's scared like we are.
She doesn't even talk.
Get a grip on yourself, no one's gonna punish her. I simply wanna tie her up.
Now give me your belt.
Let's hurry it up.
My arm's getting tired.
Be careful not to hurt her.
I hope she doesn't start screaming.
She's a pretty little thing.
Why don't we just leave her here and get going?
Don't rush me.
If we can make her understand us, perhaps she can tell us whether they found the raft.
You speak Spanish?
I'll handle this, Sidney. I'm quite sure she wasn't educated abroad.
You - see - boat?
Our - boat?
- Boat?
- Yes, that's it, boat.
You - see - boat?
Don't tell me she doesn't understand you.
If she can't tell us anything, let's let her go.
Sure, so she can run down stream to that command post and tip our hand.
You kids and your ideas!
- Maybe she was going there in the first place. - With the fish, you mean?
Sure. A general gets what he wants for dinner, no matter what.
If it's fish cod or fresh strawberrys or gold plates...
This is hardly the time to become a revolutionary.
We oughtta continue to see about the raft, but we can't let her go yet.
Why? What she'd do to us? If she could understand she would have told you.
Mac already told you why.
Sidney, you'll stay here with the young lady until we come back.
Here, take this.
You're gonna leave me here?
Yes, I told you, to watch the girl.
You're gonna make me stay and then not come back.
I know because of yesterday.
Keep calm, kid!
If we're not back by night just get in touch with her old man about a wedding.
Maybe you can settle down in a treehouse and raise some monkeys.
- Leave him alone, Mac. - Remember you promised to come back, Fletcher.
I want you to stay here and keep an eye on her, because she may prove very useful if the raft has been discovered.
We'll be back in a couple of hours.
Just relax.
Don't get panicky.
See you later, Sidney.
I'm really glad they let me stay.
I'm not fooling!
Please, don't be afraid to like me.
That's why they let me stay.
They thought you'd like me.
The troops are gone and I can't go home!
Don't do that! Don't move away, it's not my fault!
I stopped them from beating you.
Don't scowl.
Watch, I'll make you laugh.
Look, I'm the General.
Hey, watch me!
Attention, the General is here!
Attention!
Glad to have you with us, Sir.
Quite frankly, the situation is desperate.
I don't think I can cope with it alone.
Isn't funny?
Isn't it?
Orderly, more fat fish that the girl caught for me.
The General, I'm the General.
You don't even smile.
What do you want?
Listen.
I'm lost...
Lost... on this terrible island.
If you have to hate me, please, try to like me also.
They must have been reading a magazine in that plane.
I wouldn't have believed.
Mac, better take a look around the river bend.
Be careful.
We'll get to work camouflaging the raft.
I'm a little worried about
Sidney back there with the girl.
I don't like the way he's been acting.
You're not going softheaded and thinking about taking her along with us tonight?
You're beginning to sound like Sidney.
No. If she can bring three friends, perhaps.
But as it is, she'll remain lodged in the forest, like we were.
That must be the one that almost nailed us.
There he is again. It's him!
A cocky little king.
And me holding binoculars like a lady watching an opera.
Binoculars! Soon he'll go into his palace with all his iron lap dogs.
If only this was a rifle sight and I could make the red eye between his ears.
Then he'd see McClellan!
Girls always love stories, but it's so hard to finish and wait for words...
You wanna hear more?
Do you?
Alright.
Then the spirit in magician's power goes back to the island and tells Miranda that her father's dead.
The spirit sings how he's dead at the bottom of the ocean.
His bones are coral, his eyes are pearls, and Miranda, her father's dead.
Dead!
Can't you understand anything?
Dead!
Dead!
Dead!
Now d'you understand?
All clear?
Everything's alright.
- I'd like to talk to you about the house. - What house?
That house down there.
The one where we saw that General yesterday.
Wait around, Mac. Right now I'd like you to go back to Sidney.
I didn't like the way he was acting when we left.
I'm a little concerned.
- But don't you think...
- Do as I say, will you?
As soon as we're through here we'll join you.
I don't want anything to go wrong back there.
Here, I brought you some water.
Now you like me, don't you?
I'll get you loose.
Just a minute.
You'll put your arms around me.
I know. Wait.
I knew you'd like me.
Just a minute.
Don't run away!
Don't make me stay!
You're going to tell the General!
You're gonna tell him
I made fun of him!
Come back, don't tell the General!
I won't let you!
Blood... Blood...
No word. It's just broken with blood.
What's the matter?
Where's the girl?
Answer me!
What have you done? Tell me or I'll pulp you to a jelly!
She was tired.
She went to lie down.
Over there.
Don't annoy her, Mac.
Come here.
It wasn't my fault! The magician did it.
Honest!
Prospero the Magician!
First we're a bird, and then we're an island.
Before I was a general, and now I'm a fish!
Hoorah for the magicians!
The river...
It's blood, Mac!
Cold...
Cold...
I'm going for a swim.
Come on in, Mac!
Listen to them...
It's blood!
What happened?
Where's Sidney and the girl?
The kid must have gone out of his head.
When I got back, he was just laying there.
The girls is dead.
- Over there. He shot her.
- Where is he?
He's gone.
He yelled something about how the magician does it.
Before he was something and now he's a fish.
Before I could stop him he ran away towards the river.
- He kept laughing and screaming.
- We can't do anything abut it now.
Let's move again.
I'm expecting the raft to be the best way to wait 'til night.
I guess there's gonna be more elbow room than I thought.
Yeah.
And I wanna talk to you about that house down the river and the General.
- Kill him.
- Yeah.
No, I won't hear anymore about it.
I don't know what's gotten into you, Mac.
So you saw a General. So what?
Raft is all set.
In a couple of hours we'll be on it.
Raft!
Raft, raft, raft!
Can't you see any further?
A General... Why, he...?
How many times do I have to go over this? Must I tell you again?
What's one of their Generals to me?
He's cheap in my rate of exchange, but our lives aren't.
Your rate of exchange...
You make me laugh!
- If you had any guts... - Look,
I don't wanna talk about it anymore.
Forget about the General for a minute.
What about the plane you saw?
That's right!
What about that plane?
We've already been over this.
It looks like a two seater with that small field built in the clear.
One of us can take the raft down stream to the field when it gets dark and start shooting to draw the sentries from the house.
The other two can plug that guy and get away in the plane, while I keep 'em busy from the raft.
- You?
- Sure, me.
They'd get you.
You'd never make it back alive.
Who else could do it the way I could?
You couldn't.
You'd be riding home sitting down nice and comfortable up in a cockpit looking down on what's going on. Sure.
You'll recite a few tags you picked up and everything will be alright.
I'll just as soon make the trip back myself, on a raft.
Do you think you have any chance at all to get away with it alive?
I don't know.
Here I am.
I'm 34 years old.
I've never done anything important. Nothing!
When this is over I'll fix radios and washing machines.
- They'll see.
- Good boy, Mac. That's all.
I don't care if they got a million Generals.
There's one two miles from here.
If his heist is gonna keep me from going nuts like Sidney.
Only in a different way,
I'm gonna pull up my own heist.
But why should we?
The raft's still there.
As soon as it gets dark, it can take us all back tonight.
If I draw 'em down to the river, you and Fletcher can do the job and get away in a plane.
What do you say, Fletch?
Well, not that I wanna seem important.
Half the trouble in the world happens because of what some people do, but I think half the good things happen that way too.
If we're gonna get away with it it would sure be better.
I don't know the words to say what I mean, but...
This is something for me.
Sure, I guess we could all probably make it back on that thing, but...
When you walk and walk through the woods and then suddenly they dangle a General in front of you like magic, and you know it's only for this once, you can't turn your back on 'em.
None of us asked to be here, but we all have to gamble.
It's not as if we could refuse.
We had to gamble once we crashed, a General raised the stakes and we've been so lucky.
Why shouldn't we put up a little more than we have to?
What are you living for anyway?
To make talk? Why?
Why is your life so precious?
Why? The only reason is to hunt for the reason.
But, can I stand in the way of a man with a reason to die?
- You'll do it. Won't you, Corby?
- Do it for me.
Well, we have nothing to lose but our futures.
OK, I guess we leave you now.
Remember, don't start for a half an hour.
If the plane isn't still there, we'll have time to get back to you.
Don't worry, it'll be there.
Good luck, Mac.
See you soon.
Try not to get your feet wet.
- You look out for your head.
- OK, fellow.
So long.
- Mac, I hope that sometime...
- You talk too much.
I guess we both do a little.
Sometimes, talk is an indispensable medicine.
Yeah, but you get sicker later.
Good luck.
I didn't really mean what
I said before about guts.
Yes, you did, but only to bother you.
- Take it easy, fellow.
- Yeah.
The plane's still there so I guess there is no really good excuse to go back.
I guess not.
- Can you see?
- Hold it, hold it!
Yes, there he is.
What time is it?
We have about 10 minutes before Mac begins. Let's hurry!
It's better...
It's better to roll up your life into one night and one man and one gun.
It hurts too much to keep hurting everyone else in every direction and to be hurt with all the separate hates exploding day after day.
You can't help it.
A curse buzzes out of your mouth with every word you say and nobody alive can tell which is which or what you mean.
Yeah.
You try door after door when you hear voices you like behind them, but the nobs come off in your hand...
Go in!
Where did you find him?
One of the men did down by the river.
He was very busy baying at the moon.
Dear Proteus, aren't you ashamed of yourself?
Staying away without leave for two whole days.
- Have a drink, Captain.
- Yes, sir. Thank you, sir.
You must never, never do that again, Proteus.
Don't you know that there are evil spirits without bodies... roam the forest looking for unsuspecting dogs like you?
And that when you open your jaws to disturb the moon they leap into your mouth and possess you?
Then you could become a spy, a murderer, or even a traitor.
Not your dog, sir.
He knows his allegiance.
Have you been alert, Proteus?
Have you detected all the distant marchings?
Has your wet nose become aware of all the blood on the grass?
What else can you tell us beside your puppy dog sadness?
Wish he could tell us where those enemy soldiers from that wrecked plane are.
They've been bothersome for the last two days.
They'll soon grow tired of starving and being hunted.
Even Proteus grows tired of it after two days.
See that Lieutenant Proteus gets something to eat.
Yes, sir.
Nobody's gonna cry for me later or cheer for me now.
Nobody else is me.
I know that.
Who else but me is buried under the chain of everything I ever did?
I didn't mean any of it.
It was all wrong.
Good riddance!
Oh, what a trade, him for me!
What a thing to come to at the end, like building a bridge or stealing the crown jewels.
Thanks, General!
Thanks! I'll take the tombstone if it's really mine.
Waiting...
Waiting to kill...
Waiting to heal...
Waiting to die...
Awaiting in the North with four divisions.
One by one the men turned black through waiting for the last snowflake to dissolve.
Across the valley, our enemies blew on their cold hands until no more breath came.
Then they were dead.
And they knew it.
We were so well prepared for death that the armistice was a mutual disappointment.
Now he's in his cotton house, taking up the cartridges on his maps, full of his supper.
They'll get him soon.
A duck at a shooting gallery, and I'll be the wheeler rolling the ducks in all the bull's eyes.
I should talk. A clay pigeon on a slow raft.
Frankly, I still become uneasy when I find myself trapped directing the courses of frightened men.
I cannot quite admit that it is I who am creating a slaughter in this abyss, or that I left the road, that I ordered this and that.
I'm trapped.
What is a prison for me?
I make a grave for others.
To your health, sir.
It's the only way to finish up.
Alone, like the North Pole in the middle of the night.
The river is helping me out of my life.
Sometimes, these maps...
Sometimes, as I look at these maps,
I wonder if my own grave isn't being planned.
Here...
Or here...
Or here.
No more Sundays.
No more a thousand things.
I'm a little scared though.
Just a little... like kissing my great grandma when she was dying.
Come on out here, bunch of half-witted cannibals!
I missed him, I think he's only wounded!
We have to finish him off.
But they stopped shooting at the river.
They'll be here any minute.
I surrender!
Come on, let's go!
Please, please, we don't have any time.
You going back?
Can I come?
I won't be any bother.
Sure, kid.
Hop on, there plenty of room.
You look tired.
Yeah.
Thanks a lot for stopping.
There was so much noise in there...
All right, Mac. You rest.
I'll be quiet.
You know?
I lost my watch!
Mac, don't close your eyes!
The trees! They're naked!
They're naked, Mac!
And what happened to the Sergeant?
I don't know, sir.
He might make it.
Sir, with your permission, I'd like to go down to the river and watch for him for a while.
Yes, sir, the same goes for me.
You most certainly have the right to it if you wish.
Do you think he'll come back?
I don't know.
I'm not sure yet whether even we've come back.
I think we've all travelled too far from our own private boundaries to be certain about these other things anymore...
Or come back to ourselves.
Part of me is glad, but...
Yeah.
I'm glad in a way too.
And I feel free all of a sudden.
But somehow I don't want what I wanted before.
I know it's good. There's nothing else I can want.
I'm all mixed up...
I wish I could want what I wanted before.
Is your head bugging you?
No, it's something else...
What's that?
I guess I'm not... built for this.
Nobody ever was.
It's all a trick we perform when we'd rather not die... immediately.
Come on!
[Man]
Last night I dreamed a deadly dream.
Beyond the Isle of Skye...
I saw a dead man win a fight...
and I think that man was I.
[Winston Churchill]
This we may say—
the sun of victory...
has begun to touch
our soldiers'helmets.
I have this day received
the following communication...
from General Alexander:
"Sir, the orders you gave me...
"on August 15, 1942...
"have been fulfilled.
"His Majesty's enemies...
"together with their impedimenta...
"have been completely
eliminated from Egypt...
"Cyrenaica, Libya and Tripolitania.
I now await your further instructions. "
Well, obviously we shall now
have to think of something else.
I am sure the House will bear with me...
if I do not publicly proclaim...
what that something else will be.
[Man] Sicily, eh?
I suppose it was the obvious choice.
Too obvious.
Here we are, all along the North African coast, except for Tunisia... and here's Jerry opposite from the Pyrenees to Greece.
He knows we're coming, and he knows we're almost certain to come through here.
All he's got to do is to sit and wait for us.
As a king's counsel, Montagu, and a leading member of the bar... you've sometimes defended a man in peril of his life.
Yes, sir.
Well, here's your chance to defend thousands of men.
If we land in Sicily now, we shall have 30% casualties getting ashore.
We sit in offices and talk about casualties... as though they were just figures on a bit of paper.
I take it the chiefs of staff want us to think up a cover plan.
One that'll makeJerry think we're going somewhere else.
Greece, Sardinia... the south of France.
I'm told Corsica is very pleasant.
But with respect, sir... the Germans know we need Sicily.
They must go on defending it.
But we may make them thin their defenses a bit... if they think the main attack is coming somewhere else.
You and your outfit must drop everything for it.
If we can getJerry... to move one single battalion... a battery, or even a gun... it's going to save a lot of lives.
[Man On P.A.] Now, to your left you will see a further wave of aircraft.
Here you see the multicolored chutes
which are dropping before you.
Ah, there's one taking a short cut.
That's what we call
jumping to a conclusion, gentlemen.
Just for a moment
I thought someone had had it.
Me too. Those things aren't nearly as safe as they're made out to be.
I don't think there's anything for us here, George.
Any scheme that means using troops would take far too long to set up.
Next phase:
"Use of natural cover."
Let's slide out.
Monty, that parachute that didn't open—
Suppose we were to drop a fellow out of a plane over enemy territory... with papers on him saying we were going to invade Greece... and his parachute didn't open up.
The Germans would find him dead... and the papers... and "A-ha," they'd say, "look at this.
"Officer with secret papers, parachute didn't open— they're going to invade Greece."
Do we tell the man who jumps that the parachute doesn't work... or is it a sort of practical joke that he finds out on the way down?
Well, of course it'd have to be somebody we didn't mind much about.
Are you volunteering?
No, George, it wouldn't work.
What about using a man already dead?
The autopsy would show he'd been dead before he hit the ground.
Let's get back to the office and think again.
[Bells Pealing]
If those boys of yours drink any more coffee, they won't be able to sleep.
That won't worry them.
They gave up sleeping two days ago.
[Laughs]
Will you come and get it while it's hot, sir?
Monty, what we really want... is something absolutely simple.
- The simpler the better.
- Good boy, George. You're absolutely right.
How about this? Supposing we issue
Greek dictionaries to all the troops.
Why should we do that unless we intend to invade Greece? That'd fool 'em.
I'd make it Eskimo dictionaries.
That would really fool them.
Pam, first thing in the morning...
I want you to get me the fullest possible details... of the tides and currents between...
Gibraltar and the Portuguese border.
- Between where, sir?
- Gibraltar and the Portuguese border.
- Yes, sir.
- Going for a swim?
No.
Sardine fishing.
Now, Pam, it's getting late.
You'd better get off home.
Are you sure you don't want some sandwiches before I go?
My dear child, you must try not to be so greedy.
You think of nothing but my stomach.
Go on, hop it.
Leave the coffee.
Poor Pam.
How she does fuss over you.
Close the door, George.
Come here.
That idea of yours yesterday about a dead body and a parachute that doesn't open—
Yes?
It won't work the way you had it, but...
I have an idea about something that just might work.
[Air Raid Siren Blaring]
[Air Raid Siren Blaring]
- Good night, miss.
- Good night.
[Siren Winding Down]
##[Piano, Faint]
##[Continues]
##[Ends]
[Pam]
You there, Lucy?
Come on in, Pam.
Joe, this is Pam... who runs this war pretty well single-handedly... from crack of dawn till midnight.
Pam, this is Joe.
- Hello.
- Hello, Pam.
- Don't mind me. I'm just passing through.
- Good-bye, little train.
Before you puff off, shall I fix you a drink?
Joe brought gin.
Later.
So, that's Pam.
She looks all right.
But, Lu... why don't you have a place on your own?
This apartment belongs to her parents.
We get it rent-free.
Besides, I need a nice, steady, sensible girl around, and that's what Pam is.
- I've gotta have somebody to protect me.
- From me?
I hope so.
- Come on. You've got to go.
- I know.
- You flying tomorrow?
- Maybe.
I've never asked you this, Joe—
- Does it scare you?
- I get used to it.
- You'll ring me when you get back.
- As soon as I can.
You won't ever forget to ring, every evening.
- Because if I didn't hear, I think I'd go mad.
- I'll ring, Lu.
Or if anything stops me, Larry'll ring.
- What do you mean, if anything stops you?
- Oh, just anything.
- Home long?
- About 7:00.
You were late. They certainly get their money's worth out of you in that joint.
So that's Joe.
I always thought he was an American.
Maybe the one you're thinking of was.
I don't know how you keep away from these boys, Pam.
I know me.
If I started anything like that,
I'd probably fall in love.
I'd only want one.
And then where would we be?
Let's get the war over first... and then I'll think about it.
That's what I'm afraid you'll do— fall in love with someone you can't have.
- Don't do it, Lucy. You'll only get hurt.
- Who, me?
Lucy, the languishing librarian?
Not a chance.
If ever I fall in love, it'll be with a guy who goes out at 9:00 to a nice, safe office... and comes back at 6:00.
Not one of these flyers— here today and gone tomorrow.
- [Knocking]
- Come in.
Commander Montagu and Lieutenant Acres, sir.
- Sir Bernard.
- Nice to see you.
- How are you?
- Well, thank you.
My chief assistant, George Acres,
Sir Bernard Spilsbury.
- How do you do?
- I'm honored to meet you, sir.
I've always wanted to ever since I heard you give evidence in the Shotgun Murders.
- You were absolutely masterly.
- Thank you.
Though, mind you, for sheer brilliance—
No doubt if you continue to charm Sir Bernard, he'll give you his autograph later.
- Meantime, may we get on?
- Yes, sir.
- Thank you.
- Sit down.
Thank you.
Sir Bernard... may I ask you some rather odd questions without explaining why I'm asking them?
You may.
Suppose I wanted to put a dead body in the sea... let it float ashore and have it accepted by the people who find it... as the victim of an air crash at sea.
What sort of body would I need?
Do you want the body to show any physical damage?
No.
- But to look as though he'd died by drowning.
- Yes.
- Could he be wearing a Mae West?
- Yes.
- How long in the water?
- Two, three days.
It rather depends on the information I get from you.
I would say your best bet would be someone who died of pneumonia.
When somebody dies of pneumonia... there's a certain amount of fluid in the lungs.
After a few days in the water, it would be almost impossible... to say that he'd not died of drowning.
That is, unless one had reason to be suspicious.
You mean, if you were suspicious you'd probably spot it?
I would, if it came here.
But I don't suppose it would come here, would it?
I don't want to ask any awkward questions... but at what sort of place might this body be found?
Shall we say... Spain.
You wouldn't have any trouble there.
I don't think there's anyone in Spain... who would examine the body closely enough to spot the sort of thing that I have in mind.
One other thing, Sir Bernard.
If we had to keep the body for a week or two... how would we stop it from decomposing?
Refrigeration.
And while it was
being transported?
I would suggest some sort of airtight canister packed with dry ice.
Why dry ice?
It would melt and give off carbon dioxide which would dispel the air.
It's the oxygen in air that causes decomposition.
It would be possible to store a body in a canister in this way for quite a while.
Well, thank you very much.
That gives me a start.
Sir Bernard, you won't mind if we come back to you on some of these points?
By all means.
Incidentally, on this question of refrigeration... you'd better have a word with my man Adams, the fellow who brought you in.
He has all the facilities here... and I can arrange for him to look after things for you.
That would help a great deal.
If I were in your place, I shouldn't be able to resist asking what all this is about.
Lieutenant Acres, if you were in my place... you would have to remember what we used to be told in the nursery.
Ask me no questions and I'll tell you no lies.
Go on, George.
Good-bye.
Thank you very much.
Well, so far, so good.
That part of it seems to be practical anyway, provided we can get a body.
Oh, any decent undertaker will fix us up with a body.
I don't think that's a problem.
So that in essence, sir, the idea is this:
The body of a dead man, dressed as an officer... will be put into the sea from a submarine off the coast of Spain... near Huelva.
On the body will be top secret documents... or a letter suggesting our main attack will be Greece... not Sicily.
The body will drift ashore.
It will be picked up and the papers found.
The impression will be that it is the body of an officer... who was traveling by plane... and was drowned when his plane crashed into the sea.
Hmm.
- Why Huelva?
- Two reasons, sir.
First, there are strong inshore currents... and a prevailing onshore wind... which will almost certainly carry the body ashore.
Second, one of the sharpest German agents in Spain operates in that district.
But the beauty of the whole scheme, sir, is that it involves only one man... and therefore might be possible... in the ridiculously short time allowed us.
May I have your views, sir?
In over 30 years of intelligence work
I've never heard of anything like it.
Neither have the Germans.
It's the most outrageous, disgusting, preposterous, not to say barbaric idea.
But work out full details... and be on hand at the war cabinet offices at 4:30 tomorrow afternoon.
Thank you, sir.
You'll need a code name.
You can have... Jumbo,
Trader, Wigwam...
Mincemeat, Jubilee—
With your permission, sir, Mincemeat.
Operation Mincemeat.
Comments and criticisms. Admiral.
Well, it's an ingenious idea, of course.
Up to now, I've thought of four major ways where it could go wrong.
Four?
I was going to say 40.
First, your body may not oblige by drifting ashore.
Next, it may simply be handed over to the British consul for burial.
Next, even if the papers are examined...
they may not leak to the Germans.
And finally, if they do leak to the Germans, the Germans may guess they're a fake.
That's all quite true, of course.
There are ways in which it can go wrong.
But that is so of any operation of war, and certainly any deception plan.
- Dickie.
- I'm for the idea in principle.
But why not the south of France?
Then you'd be sure that the Germans
would get the documents.
After all, Spain is neutral.
Sir, perhaps you would allow Lt. Cmdr. Montagu, who put forward the idea... to answer
Adm. Mountbatten's question.
Well, Montagu?
The reason for choosing Spain, sir... is that we don't want the Germans themselves to get the body... because we don't want it examined too closely.
But forgive me, even if we could get over these obvious snags... surely we're being far too ambitious.
The man might be carrying letters at a lower level... but you can't expect the Germans to swallow fake letters from the vice chief to Gen. Alexander.
From their point of view,
it'd be altogether too good to be true.
Montagu, surely the first question
German intelligence will ask themselves... is why the letter wasn't sent through the normal channels... instead of by this— this dead gentleman.
It was my intention, sir... to ask for a letter of a personal and private type from you to General Alexander.
It might contain certain references to other people... which you would hardly want to go through ordinary channels.
You mean saying someone important is a nitwit or something.
- [All Chuckling]
- Yes, sir.
There are, in fact, a number of jokes already in circulation that might be suitable.
Why is this officer flying to Africa?
Where is he going?
What's his job?
We'd like to make him a major in the Royal Marines, sir... on your staff at Combined Operations.
He's an expert on landing craft.
You are lending him to General Eisenhower... to whom he also carries a letter.
- Oh, I write a letter as well?
- Yes, sir.
He seems to have jobs for all of us.
- Can my letter be rude about somebody too?
- [All Chuckling]
You realize that if the Germans see through this... you're pinpointing Sicily as the place where we are going.
- Quite right.
- We've got a big agenda. We must get on.
This is an imaginative plan... but obviously it needs careful consideration or we may do more harm than good.
I think we'd better
leave it for the moment.
The time is very short, sir, and we must get going as soon as possible.
We're aware of that.
We'll put it on the agenda for the next meeting.
- [Bells Pealing]
- [Sergeant] Attention.!
I have a feeling it would be easier to convince the Germans... than it is to persuade our masters.
It's no use losing your temper.
They've got a lot of other things to think about.
Then why can't they make up their minds and give us a plain yes or no?
They want to mull it over, quite rightly.
You'll just have to be patient. The moment they agree, if they do, you can go ahead.
Till then, you'll just have to wait.
Sticky?
Like trying to swim through a barrel of syrup.
They just want to stand and chew their cud... and gaze into the distance with big, brown eyes.
What are we supposed to do, get on with our knitting?
I'll wager that in the end they won't turn it down.
I'm going to take a chance and jump the gun.
You go and get a body.
I'll start working out drawings for a canister.
[Airplanes Passing Overhead]
Mosquitoes.
One engine.
He'll be lucky if he makes it.
[Bell Clanging]
[Bell Clanging]
- Larry.
- You all right?
Port engine cracked up, and Steve's had it.
- Steve?
- Just outside Brussels.
Light flak.
He went down fast.
Didn't have time to bail out.
[Ringing]
Hello?
Hello?
Joe?
I was on my way back.
I saw them come in.
Are you all right, Joey?
I'm all right, baby.
I'm fine.
It was an easy one.
Oh...
I'm glad.
[Buzzing]
- Is Commander Montagu there?
- Yes, sir. He's here now, sir.
- Thank you.
- Hello?
- Commander Montagu?
- Yes?
- General Nye wants to talk to you.
- Thank you.
- [Nye] Montagu?
- Good evening, sir.
- Good evening.
Montagu, I want you to be at 10 Downing Street tomorrow morning at 10:30.
Of course, sir.
Tomorrow morning at 10:30.
I'll be there.
It's going up to the prime minister.
[Bells Pealing]
[Pealing Ends]
[Bell Tolling]
[Tolling Continues]
- [Churchill] And Nye—
- Sir?
Anybody in his senses knows
we shall go through Sicily anyway...
so we've got everything to gain
and nothing to lose.
Let the plan be implemented.!
Thank you, sir.
All right, Montagu, you've got the all-clear.
And your submarine's fixed.
- Jewell is sailing in Seraph for Malta on Friday.
- Jewell?
He's the man who put Mark Clark ashore in Africa and rescued General Giraud... so you're in good hands.
- Can you make it?
- I assure you, sir, we shall make it.
Good.
Carry on.
Yes, I'll hold on.
George, it's on. We've got the right of way from the old man himself.
"Let the plan be implemented!"
I knew he wouldn't shoot it down.
May I ask what you're up to?
I've got a socking great blister on my foot.
I've walked more than 50 miles in the last two days...
I didn't go to bed at all last night... and it doesn't matter whether he shoots it down or not... because the whole thing is utterly impracticable.
- What?
- Napoo. Won't go. Not on.
- Hello? Yes.
- Why not?
Because, Monty, there simply isn't any way of getting a body.
You wave an airy hand and say, "George, go and get a body," as though there was nothing to it.
- Well, you try.
- Nonsense!
There are hospitals, nursing homes, mortuaries—
- I've tried 'em! Not a hope.
- Is he at the hospital now?
You see, Monty, every body belongs to somebody... and it isn't a thing people want messed about.
What about the fellow in St. Luke's Hospital?
Changed his mind at the last moment and recovered.
- Very unreliable type.
- Yes, we'll come round immediately.
- Have you tried Spilsbury?
- Yes, he gets bodies.
But they're special ones that the police think have been murdered... and he wants them himself.
- Sir, I think I'm onto something.
- Where?
In a small hospital in St. John's Wood.
I said you'd come and see the father.
There doesn't seem to be anybody else.
- When did he die?
- 3:00 this morning.
- Pneumonia?
- Bronchial pneumonia.
Are there any other relatives beside the father?
I don't think so. He was an only child, and I gather the wife's dead.
- Is the father with him now?
- He is waiting for you.
You wait here.
I think I'd rather deal with this by myself.
Perhaps you'd like to sit over there while you're waiting.
- Thank you.
- I'll come back in a few minutes.
Right.
It has been explained to you... that, for reasons of security... we cannot tell you why we are asking you this?
Yes.
That has been explained.
But if there is any question you wish to ask me, sir...
I will answer it if I can.
I'll try not to embarrass you.
Can you assure me,
Commander Montagu... as an officer and a gentleman... that if I agree to your request... my son's body will be treated decently and with respect?
I give you my word.
His name will never be revealed?
Never.
And finally... his body will have Christian burial?
I cannot absolutely promise that... but I am fairly certain of it.
I was never the one... nor was he... to mind very much about the last resting place of the body... being more concerned with the repose of the spirit.
But still...
I would like to be sure that this thing you are going to do... is good... and worthy of him.
I can assure you that... this is an opportunity for your son to do a great thing for England.
My son, sir, was a Scotsman... and very proud of it.
I beg your pardon.
Never mind.
We're used to that.
You English always talk about England when you mean Britain.
Good-bye, son.
I don't know what they want with you... but it doesn't matter now... because... you're not here anymore.
You're somewhere else... and at peace.
Good day to you.
I have no son now... but you have a body.
I think William Martin is a good name.
One naval identity card... in the name of
Captain, Acting Major, William Martin...
Royal Marines.
Born in Cardiff, 1907.
I thought of Glasgow, but I don't want to say he's a Scot.
Also, a combined Operations Headquarters pass in the same name.
You'll need a photograph of him, sir, for the identity card.
So we shall.
It's only a passport photograph.
It needn't look like him.
Now, we need various articles to go in his pockets— cigarettes, matches, bunch of keys—
- What's he carrying the documents in?
- Briefcase.
But he's floating in the water.
Has he got it in his hand, or what?
What about one of those things that bank messengers have?
Goes around the waist, comes down the sleeve and clips onto the briefcase.
Get one, and we'll see.
And he'll have to have a wallet, money, wristwatch.
- George.
- Hmm?
I think we're attacking this the wrong way round.
Wallet, money, wristwatch, they're all right and necessary.
But, after all, he must have had some private life.
There ought to be something more intimate on him when they find him.
Personal things like photographs or maybe some private letters.
I'll tell you what. He'd better have a girlfriend with a love letter from her.
That's a good idea, but we'll have to make it really convincing.
Hmm.
We'll get Pam to write it for us.
You wouldn't mind, would you?
[Montagu]
Would you have a go at it, Pam?
I'll do anything I can to help with the work, sir.
- Hang on a minute. I'll be back.
- Okay, sir.
I won't come up, Lu.
There isn't time.
All right.
Good-bye, Joey.
Now, remember, you're my girl now.
Official.
I won't ever forget.
[Joe]
Victoria Station.
- [Car Door Closes]
- [Car Drives Away]
[Door Opens, Closes]
Hi, Pam.
How goes it?
Little bit tired.
Pam, I've got some news for you... and maybe it's going to make you angry.
Tell me later, Lucy, when I've done this.
Okay.
I'll go make some coffee.
It's already done.
It's on the hot plate.
That's what I like about you— you're so inefficient.
- You want some?
- No, thanks.
"Dearest Willie"?
Have you ever tried writing? That's the greatest opening I've ever heard in my life.
Don't fool.
It isn't a real letter.
It's just something I've got to do.
Love letters are always something you've got to do. What's it for then?
It's part of a story
I've got to make up.
Well, let me help you. I'm completely undiscovered and cheap. My work, I mean.
- What's the story?
- Oh, it's very ordinary.
They've just got engaged.
He's going off on a dangerous job... and she's writing to him.
Oh, that one.
It's the start that's sticking me.
"Dearest Willie—"
His name's Willie Martin.
"It was lovely seeing you."
Willie Martin.
What a name.
"Dearest Willie."
Take dictation.
Darling... when you went away tonight... something went with you.
I think it must have been my heart...
because now I'm cold and empty.
It's always bad when you go away... but it was worse tonight... because the day was so good.
You shouldn't have bought the ring... and I knew you shouldn't.
And you did because you love me... and I let you because I love you.
There isn't much more than that to be had from any day.
I won't wear it, darling.
I told you I wouldn't.
Because if I did... that would mean that you were real... that you belonged to me... and that they couldn't take you away from me... whereas now they can send you away... and leave me to wonder if I'll ever see you again... or whether I may wake up... and find I'd dreamed you.
[Gasps]
Maybe there'll be a time when it's all over... and you're still there and real and lovely.
Then I'll put your ring on and wear it... and wear it until I die.
Oh, God, darling, take care of yourself.
As if you ever could or would.
I suppose I mean...
O God, take care of you.
I love you.
I love you.
This is really wonderful, Pam.
I had no idea you were a writer.
- I'm afraid I didn't do it, sir.
- Oh?
A friend of mine did it.
I only altered a word here and there.
That's why I've signed it Lucy.
- You didn't tell her anything.
- Of course not.
- She did it just for fun?
- Yes, sir.
- Just for fun.
- Good.
- Oh, George, have you seen this?
- Yes.
- I always told you there were hidden depths.
- Mr. Acres, I have—
Never mind, my dear.
It happens to the nicest people.
Oh, by the way, I fixed the letter from the bank about Willie's overdraft.
The manager was very helpful.
- I told him just enough.
- Fine.
Tell me, does this alleged girlfriend of yours wear thick spectacles?
No.
- Reasonably good to look at?
- Very.
Ah, then we want her photograph for Willie's wallet.
- It doesn't have to be her photograph.
- Oh, don't spoil it, Monty.
I want to see this passionate Lucy creature.
What are you doing?
It's got to look as though it's been in his pocket for several days.
Can we get a snap of this girl?
- I should think so, sir.
- Good.
Now about dates.
There's got to be something on him that will show when he left.
I think I can fix to get a receipted bill from the Naval and Military Club.
He stayed there on his last night.
And he went to the theater.
Final celebration.
He has the stubs of the tickets in his pocket.
Item: Two theater tickets for the night of...
April 22.
- Dress circle.
- Make it four.
And for something worth seeing.
And what's going on in that bright little mind?
You've got to buy the tickets anyway, and Willie can't use them.
We might as well.
There are three of us already, and with Pam's alleged girlfriend—
I understand, dear chap.
Mmm.
Make it four.
I've hacked it about a bit, as we agreed.
It now reads, "General, the Honorable Sir Harold R.O.G. Alexander.
"My dear Alex, I am taking advantage of this opportunity...
"to send you a personal letter by hand of one of Mountbatten's officers... to put you in the picture regarding our intention in the Mediterranean."
- Good.
- Then comes the personal stuff.
Then, "The plan is that the 5th and 56th divisions will be reinforced... and form the main force for the attack on Greece."
Then a lot about possible landing points.
Then,
"In the western Mediterranean...
"the heavy bombardment of Sicily will continue...
"as it is necessary to make the enemy think... that this island is still our main objective."
- That's exactly right, sir.
- And the rest as we had it before.
Well, here you are.
Let's hope it foxes them.
- I won't touch it, sir, if you don't mind.
- Why?
I want only two sets of fingerprints on it— yours and your secretary's.
- What do you want me to do with it then?
- Fold it, sir.
As sharp folds as you can.
Now put it in the envelope.
Now, if you'll wrap a piece of paper around it so that I can handle it...
I'll take it out to your secretary and get her to seal it.
- Thank you, sir.
- Any more chores?
No, thank you, sir.
And thank you very much.
[Bell Tolling]
Thank you.
- Sorry I'm late. Got his clothes?
- It's there.
- Good. Where's Adams?
- He's gone down.
[Air Raid Siren Blaring]
[Dry Ice Scraping]
All ready, Mr. Adams?
Yes, sir.
[Air Raid Sirens Continue Blaring]
[Sirens Fall Silent]
Identity disks.
Underwear.
- Laundry marks fixed?
- Yes.
[Explosion]
[Explosions Continue]
Socks and shirt.
- This is new.
- He just bought half a dozen at Gieve's.
- I've got the bill to put in his pocket.
- Right.
[Explosions Continue]
Collar and tie.
[Airplane Passing Overhead]
Awkward doing this on somebody else.
Let me, sir.
Now the uniform.
Trousers.
Things in the pockets first, or after they're on him?
After.
Blouse.
Shoes.
[Airplanes Droning Overhead]
[Explosions Continue]
[Bomb Whistling]
- [Loud Explosion]
- [Woman Screams]
[Police Whistle Blowing]
[Sighs]
Not bad.
The crowns on his shoulders look a bit new.
[George]
He's just been promoted.
The marks are still there
where his captain's pips were.
[Montagu] Right.
Get the Mae West and the trench coat.
[Footsteps Running On Street]
- [Police Whistle Continues Blowing]
- [Explosions Continue, Faint]
Now the personal effects.
- One wristwatch.
- Right.
Wallet containing one five-pound note, three one-pound notes... letter from bank manager re overdraft... book of stamps, photograph of fiancée.
Correct.
Ten shillings in loose change to go in right-hand trouser pocket.
- Correct.
- [Explosions Cease]
Letter from fiancée to go next to wallet.
Correct.
Bill for six shirts from Gieve's, Piccadilly... and receipted bill for a room at the Naval and Military.
Correct.
Two stubs of tickets to the Prince of Wales Theater.
Correct.
Cigarettes, matches, bunch of keys.
Correct.
Combined Operations pass and naval identity card in cellophane container.
- Correct.
- Briefcase.
- I'll fasten the trench coat and Mae West, sir.
- Thank you, Adams.
Apart from the cover stuff already in there... letter from General Nye to General Alexander.
Right.
Letter to General Eisenhower from Admiral Mountbatten.
Right.
- Shouldn't he have the key?
- He already has one on his key ring.
Well...
I think Major Martin is ready to go to war.
[Air Raid Siren Blaring]
[Siren Winding Down] keep up a steady average to make it.
- Thank you, Adams.
- Thank you.
[Engine Starts]
Attention!
If you can manage the launching of the body... with only officers on deck, do so.
The fewer people in the know the better.
Better all round.
Sailors are a superstitious lot.
What's your cover story for the crew?
I put it round that the canister contains a special sort of secret weather-reporting buoy.
[Marine Siren Blaring]
Well, I think that's the lot.
- And the very best of luck.
- Thank you.
We'll try and do a good job for you.
[Whistles Blowing]
[Marine Siren Continues Blaring]
Carry on, Number One.
[Whistle Blows]
[All Laughing]
[Murmuring, Chattering]
- Ah, there we are.
- No sherry, no whiskey, no gin, no rum.
- Well, what's this?
- Egg flip.
I think my alleged friend wants a light.
Why am I always your "alleged" friend?
- George has never been quite sure you exist.
- Oh, I exist, all right.
- That's about all I do.
- There's no doubt about that.
This is very interesting.
From his attitude in the office, one would never suspect George was such a fast worker.
You should see him in the typist's office.
George, I think we ought to drink to the major.
- Oh, we must.
- Yes. He's the chap who got us the seats.
He couldn't come.
Well, I don't know the major, but I'm quite sure he won't mind me drinking to his health.
He's probably a grand boy.
Let's drink the health of all the majors and all the commanders... and all the lieutenants.
The major. May he have a safe and successful journey.
- The major.
- The major.
[Explosion]
[Explosions Continue]
[Explosion]
[Explosion]
[Explosion Reverberating]
[Explosion]
[Explosion]
- Steady as you go.
- [Sailor] Steady, sir. Course:2-7-2, sir.
- [Rustling]
- [Cooing]
All right, my beauties.
Not long now.
[Sailor]
Sixty feet.
Fifty-five feet, sir.
Fifty feet, sir.
Forty-five feet.
- Forty feet.
- Okay, Sub. Get going.
- Aye-aye, sir.
- Thirty-five feet, sir.
Up periscope.
Thirty feet.
Twenty-five feet, sir.
Blast those fishermen.
Haven't they got any homes?
Down periscope.
Stand by to surface.
[First Lieutenant] Check main vents.
Open all L.P. Master blowers.
[Sailor] Check main vents.
Open all L.P. Master blowers.
[Sailor]
Canister party on casing.
Tackle!
- Hooked up!
- Take the weight!
Steady.
Steady does it.
Back down.
Right up.
Boats.
Dinghy first.
Unto Almighty God we commend the soul of this, our brother departed... and we commit his body to the deep.
The Lord gave, and the Lord hath taken away.
- Blessed be the name of the Lord.
- [All] Amen.
All right, chaps.
Come on.
[Jewell]
Canister party back on casing.
[Sailor]
Canister party on casing.
All right.
Down below.
[Man Speaking Spanish]
[Bell Tolling]
[Child Shouting]
[Bell Tolling Continues]
- ¿Es inglés?
- Sí, señor.
Entonces creo lo mejor
hacerme cargo de aquello.
Eso es imposible, señor.
Primero ha de ser reconocido oficialmente.
[Both Speaking German]
[Buzzing]
- [Man] 9-8-7.
- Yes.
- Montagu?
- Yes.
This is D.N.I.
Scramble, will you?
I've got a bit of news for you.
The major's arrived.
I've just received a signal.
The vice-counsul at Huelva is very worried.
He says the body carried what looked like an official briefcase... and he's pulling every string to retrieve it.
Let's hope he doesn't pull too hard, sir.
Yes. But I think it might help to keep the ball rolling if I make a signal... telling him to get hold of it at all costs.
If it was genuine, that would be the natural thing to do, wouldn't it?
Good.
Meantime,
I'll put Major Martin in the casualty lists.
- That's the first thing they'll check.
- Right.
- [Receiver Hangs Up]
- [Man Speaking Spanish]
[Man]
Amen.
- [Speaking Latin]
- [Spanish]
- [Latin]
- Amen.
[Latin]
Amen.
[Shouts Orders In Spanish]
[Shouting Orders Continues]
I called on the magistrate before the funeral.
All Major Martin's belongings have been returned.
- And the briefcase?
- Yes, and the briefcase.
Good.
[Man]
Well, that's a bit of a blow.
Either Lawrence was too efficient
or the Nazis were too dumb.
The lazy, incompetent beggars.
Doesn't anything ever penetrate those Prussian skulls?
[Chuckles] The net result of Operation Mincemeat so far... seems to be that we've lost two bob.
Everything else is horribly intact.
Of course, sir, there are ways of opening letters... apart from using a knife with marmalade on it... and ways of closing them again.
I'd like to hear what the scientific boys have to say.
Agreed.
[Instrument Clicks Off]
- Well?
- Course, this has been in water.
Yes?
- Seawater.
- Yes.
It makes it very difficult when things have been in water, particularly seawater.
- Well, can you tell us anything?
- I'm afraid very little.
You see, when the thing's been in water, seawater, it obscures so much.
- But do you think it's been opened?
- Opened?
Oh, yes, it's been opened.
Oh, yes, it's been opened.
It has been opened?
And closed again by somebody who knows his business.
It's been stretched out on a flat surface and held lightly at the corners... probably to be photographed.
- I only wish I could be more helpful.
- You've done splendidly.
That's all we had to know.
Well?
- Mincemeat swallowed whole.
- Mincemeat?
Well?
There's nothing new from Madrid, Herr Admiral.
The führer has told his conference that the documents... are undoubtedly genuine.
- You mean he doesn't doubt them.
- He's quite sure.
The führer, of course, has certain advantages... over mere intelligence officers like you and me, Frederik.
He has his intuition... whereas we have to rely on our brains.
- And he's sure God is on his side.
- But you are not?
I do not believe that God is on my side to the extent... of handing me the enemy's plans.
There's no way in which we can check the genuineness of these papers.
Those certainly appear to be
Nye's and Mountbatten's signatures.
The question is whether what is in the letters is true.
[Chuckles] And only the people who wrote them could tell us.
But we can do something... to check the genuineness of the bearer.
In what sense, Herr Admiral?
We know a great deal about the lamented Major Martin, Frederik.
We know the address of his club, of his bank.
We even know about his debts.
I think someone had better ask a few discreet questions in London... just to make sure there was such a man.
[Ship Horn Blows]
[Ship Horn Blows]
[Train Whistle Blows]
- From Dublin, Mr. O'Reilly?
- That's right.
- How long are you staying?
- Uh, three days.
- London?
- Yeah.
- Business?
- Yes.
- All right. Thank you.
- Thank you.
- Is this all your luggage?
- Uh, yes.
- Will you read this notice, please?
- I have.
- Have you any articles subject to duty?
- No.
All right.
I'll open this one up.
All right. Thank you.
Shut it up again.
Is this all your luggage, madam?
Will you read this notice, please?
Do you have any articles subject to duty?
- [Woman On P.A., Indistinct]
- [Whistle Blows]
Will you drive me to Number 57
Landsmere Gardens, please?
57 Landsmere Gardens?
All right. Step in.
I trust you had a pleasant journey.
I am here with thee and thy goats.
- Where from?
- Dublin.
If you look over your head, you'll see a plate with a telephone number.
Memorize it, but don't write it down.
If it's absolutely necessary, but not otherwise... ring that number for a cab to pick you up outside the south entrance... to the tube station at Hyde Park Corner.
Go straight there and wait for me.
But don't ring unless it's important.
You're not under my orders.
I'm not responsible for you, and I have troubles enough of my own.
My instructions simply are to meet you and deliver you and your luggage. That's all.
I doubt if I shall bother you much.
It's nothing to do with me, but why were you chosen for this job?
Because I'm so fond of the English.
Yes, they are a loveable people.
[Child]
Hey.!
[Laughing, Shouting]
Your other bag, sir.
- Thank you.
- Three and sixpence on the clock, sir.
Thank you, sir.
Jolly good luck, sir.
- Uh, yes?
- My name's O'Reilly.
I believe you have a room for me.
- Oh, you're the gentleman from Dublin?
- That's right.
- Oh, yes. Of course. Will you come in, please?
- Thank you.
Well, I'll take you straight up, shall I?
Give me one of your cases.
Oh, I can manage.
- Never let it be said I let a lady carry for me.
- Oh, you're all the same.
I always say there's nobody like the Irish for manners.
My granddad was Irish.
He came from the north.
But as he said,
"What does it matter, north or south?
We're all Irish, and all the Irish are kings' sons."
[Laughing] Now, look,
I've put you on the first floor here.
That's the bathroom and the necessary, and this is your room.
I do hope you'll be comfortable.
I expect you'd like a cup of tea, wouldn't you?
I can make you one quite easily.
Oh, no, thank you.
I'll just get on and unpack my things.
Oh, the blackout. Oh, you will be careful
about the blackout, won't you?
Do you know I had the police round three times about it last week?
Oh, don't worry.
I'll be very careful.
Well, I'll leave you to yourself now.
Oh, I almost forgot.
In case you should want to be out late in the evening, I'll put the key on the hall table.
And if there's anything else you want, just call
"coo-ee" over the banisters and I'll pop up.
Thank you.
[Thinking]
Polar... bear.
Polar... bear.
Stand by tonight.
Well, the tie.
The darkish blue goes with this suit.
Yes, with pinstripes right through it, if we can.
Thank you very much, sir.
Good morning.
- Good morning, sir.
- Uh, um, I'd like some khaki shirts, please.
- Made to measure or ready-made, sir?
- Ready-made.
- Collar size?
- Sixteen.
I think you'll like these, sir.
They're very fine poplin.
Practically prewar quality.
- Oh, yes, yes. They're very nice indeed.
- It's a beautiful shirt, sir.
- But they're not really the ones I had in mind.
- No, sir?
No, you sold some to a friend of mine a few weeks ago.
Um, Major William Martin of the Royal Marines.
- They were cotton with separate collars.
- I know the one you mean.
Just take a look at those, will you, sir?
Separate collars. Cotton.
- Oh, good morning, sir.
- Good morning.
- Won't keep you a moment.
- Right.
- Yes, these look like the ones.
- Good, sir.
But I'm not quite sure.
Uh, would it be troubling you too much to look up Major Martin's account—
Look, sir, if your friend got his shirts from us... and if they were cotton with separate collars, those are certainly the ones.
- We haven't any others in stock.
- Oh.
Well, I'll not doubt the word of an honest man.
- I'll take two.
- Thank you very much, sir.
- So I said to this chap, if you can't let us have—
- Excuse me.
- Is this the Naval and Military Club?
- Yes, that's right.
- Thank you.
- Well, you might as well scrap the whole idea.
[Conversation Continues, Indistinct]
[Chattering]
I wonder if you could help me.
[Louder]
I wonder if you could help me.
I'll do my best, sir.
I'm looking for a friend of mine,
Major Martin.
Major William Martin of the Royal Marines.
I believe he's a member here.
Do you happen to have seen him lately or know his whereabouts?
Major Martin.
There's a Major Martin who's a gunner, sir.
[Chuckling] No, that'd hardly be him.
He's in the Royal Marines.
- Eh?
- The Royal Marines!
I don't think I know the gentleman personally, sir.
Is he a regular officer or temporary?
Oh, now, there I couldn't be sure.
If he's a temporary,
I probably shouldn't know him, sir.
There's a lot of members now that I don't know.
"Martin, Brigadier A.T."
"Martin, Captain L."
"Martin, Major W., R.A."
No, sir. No Major Martin what's a marine here, sir.
- Now, surely that's odd if he's a member.
- Eh?
- Surely that's odd if he's a member!
- Not necessarily, sir.
What with the bomb damage and no staff, we're a bit behind with things these days.
If he's a new member, he may not be on the file yet.
You could leave a message. Then if he comes in, I'll personally see he gets it.
No, thanks.
It can wait.
- I'm grateful to you, all the same.
- Eh?
I'm grateful to ya, all the same!
Oh. Thank you, sir.
This is the manager's secretary speaking.
Who is it, please? Thank you.
Will you hold on a moment, please?
There's the contract you asked for.
And there's a Mr. Phillips who'd like to speak to you on the phone.
- What does he want?
- He's making inquiries about a Major Martin.
- About who?
- A Major Martin.
Put him through.
Stay on the line and get a shorthand note of what we say.
Yes, Mr. Emberton.
[Woman]
Switchboard.
- There's a call on my outside line.
- Yes, sir?
- Get through to the exchange and have it traced.
- Yes, sir.
[Rings]
- Hello.
- Is that the manager?
Speaking.
I-I wonder if you could help me.
My name is Phillips, and I'm making some inquiries about Major William Martin.
- Yes?
- I believe he was a customer of yours.
Only the poor fellow's dead, and as an old friend...
I'm trying to help clear up his affairs.
I see.
I'm sure you'll understand it's an absolute rule of the bank not to discuss a client's affairs... with anyone but his accredited representatives.
Certainly not on the telephone.
But I am onto the right branch,
I take it.
I should have thought the best thing would be if you could drop in and see me.
I'm pretty full up this morning, but this afternoon's all right... if you'd like to come in at, say, quarter past 2:00 and ask for me.
Yes. Yes, I suppose that would be a good idea.
- A quarter past 2:00.
- Yes.
All right.
You were very smart to get this, Mr. Emberton.
My secretary often takes notes of important calls.
You say he had a slight accent?
Yes, but, uh, not a foreign accent, if you follow me.
It's difficult to tell on the telephone.
I should have said he was English, but possibly from the west country.
- Did you trace the call?
- It came from a public telephone booth.
Obviously, yet when you suggested an appointment, he agreed.
He agreed, but he didn't sound particularly enthusiastic.
Is there any chance that this might be a coincidence?
William Martin is quite a common name.
He may have just mistaken the bank.
- It's possible, but—
- But not probable.
Well, thank you very much, Mr. Emberton.
You've handled the whole thing beautifully.
Frankly, I don't think the man will turn up.
However, we can't afford to take any chances.
We'll both be back at 2:00.
- I'll be waiting for you.
- Thank you.
- He's a good chap.
- Very good.
Look, George, if there's somebody around who can ring up Willie Martin's bank... it means thatJerry's putting the whole thing under a microscope.
Now, where, if anywhere, is there a weak link?
I'm going to Scotland Yard to talk to General Colbourne of the special branch.
Of course, a voice from a telephone booth isn't much of a starting point.
I realize that, sir.
I wondered whether you'd had any ripple on the waters recently that might give us a line.
I don't think so.
There's a gentleman just arrived from Sweden we're rather interested in... but he's nothing to do with your Major Martin.
It's certain he won't come to the bank, but we'd better have a couple of your men just in case.
Yes, of course.
We must certainly be in on it.
We always like to make a new friend if we can.
Besides, you may be wrong.
He may turn up.
My guess is that he's only over here for this one job.
He knows we haven't got our tabs on him.
He's the sort of man who might take chances.
[Phone Ringing]
[Ticking]
[Locks Sliding Shut]
[Door Closing]
- A washout.
- Yes, sir.
- We'll get back and stand by.
- Right.
Pity. Do you think he suspected Emberton?
I don't know, but it's obvious he can't afford to show himself.
[Ringing]
[Phone Ringing]
- Hello?
- [Man] Is that the American Library?
- Yes.
- Can I speak to Miss Sherwood, please?
Just a moment.
Lucy, it's for you, and you really must get him to ring up out of working hours.
I'm sorry. I'll tell him.
Hello? Hello, Joe?
Lucy, this is Larry.
- Hello, Larry.
- You know why I'm phoning, don't you, Lu?
Sure. Sure.
Oh, no, he's gone.
I guess I knew it would come.
Thank you, Larry.
You all right?
Yes, he was a good flyer.
Thank you for ringing, Larry.
Would you check this book out,
please, miss?
Lucy.!
Lucy?
- [Gasps]
- Good evening.
I'm sorry to disturb you, but the door was open.
Yes.
What do you want?
I'm making some inquiries about a friend of mine, William Martin.
- William Martin?
- Yes.
- Yes, will you come in?
- Thank you.
Won't you sit down?
Willie's death was a great shock to me.
Yes, it was a great pity.
Forgive me, but I take it you're not his fiancée.
No. I hardly knew him.
Only I understood he'd just recently become engaged... and that his fiancée lived at this address.
That's why I came.
Yes, well, that's the girl who lives here with me— Lucy Sherwood.
Oh, will you have a cigarette?
Thank you.
Lucy Sherwood.
That's right. I remember.
I'll get you a light.
I should have liked to see her.
- I'm afraid she's out tonight.
- When will she be back?
Not until late, but if you could come again tomorrow...
I'd say that you'd called and that you'd be coming back.
Yes.
I knew Willie right from the time when he was a boy in Cardiff.
Did he come from Cardiff?
I didn't know.
Is his fiancée very upset?
Well, naturally.
Well, I don't want to take up your time... but I do want to— to do everything I can to help.
So if you would like to give his fiancée my name and address—
- Your address?
- Yes.
Perhaps you'd care to take it down.
My name is Patrick O'Reilly.
R-E-I-double L-Y.
And my address is
57 Landsmere Gardens...
North West 1.
I am to be found there any time.
Right.
- [Door Closes]
- [Gasps]
Oh. Sorry.
Don't mind me.
I'm just passing through.
You're Miss Lucy Sherwood?
That's right.
Well, go on. Where's your manners, Pam?
Introduce your handsome friend.
- Lucy, this is Mr. Patrick O'Reilly.
- Hello there.
Mr. O'Reilly is making inquiries about Willie Martin.
Willie Martin?
Willie Martin.
Dearest Willie?
It's no good making inquiries about him, mister.
Willie Martin doesn't exist.
At least he's dead, which is the same thing.
That's right, isn't it?
That's true.
He's dead, so he doesn't exist.
It's the same with all these boys.
Here today, gone tomorrow.
What's real about that?
I was very sorry to hear of his death.
Why should you be sorry?
You weren't in love with him, were you?
He didn't give you a ring.
I never wore it.
Now I never will.
[Sobbing]
Ever.! Ever.!
- Lucy.
- I knew him in the old days in Cardiff.
Did you, now?
And I'll bet you knew his old man too.
His ma and his sister and the whole shooting match.
Well, I didn't.
They were just photographs.
The usual photographs with folks looking the way folks do.
But I never knew 'em.
In the time, I barely knew him.
Three months.
What sort of time's that?
[Sobs]
And yet I knew him well enough.
And then they took him away from me... and killed him in the sea.
"Down, down into the sea... to be lost evermore in the main."
Tennyson.
Do you know Tennyson?
Why should you?
Why should I know Tennyson?
He almost made it.
Darling, I dreamed you.
I was always afraid I had.
Always afraid.
[Crying]
Lucy, darling,
I really think you ought to go to bed.
Bed? What for?
There's plenty of time to go to bed.
Years and years with nothing else to do and nowheres else to go.
And everything cold and ended.
Oh, why can't you all go away and let me alone?
- ## [Discordant Notes]
- [Sobbing]
- Is she all right?
- Yes, I think so.
But I really must get her to bed.
I'm sorry I've intruded.
You have my address.
Yes.
[Crying Continues]
Lucy. Lucy.
[Door Closes]
[Ticking]
[Thinking]
Polar... bear.
Polar... bear.
Martin probably... genuine... but to be certain... have deliberately... revealed... my identity... to enemy.
Stand by... for confirmation... in one hour.
But if no message...
at that time... have been arrested... therefore...
Martin false.
Come on.
- He had it all pat?
- Yes, about Cardiff and everything.
- Here's the address that he gave me.
- What's he like?
Tall, dark, Irish-sounding, good-looking, about 30.
I'd like to get that description to General Colbourne.
- May I use the phone?
- It's in there.
What chance that he believed you?
I don't know. I wasn't very good.
I wasn't ready for it.
- But he believed Lucy.
- You really think so?
Yes. He believed her, all right.
I saw his face.
- To Lucy it was true.
- For heaven's sake, don't start blubbering.
- How long did he stay?
- About 10 minutes.
I told him it was Lucy that he wanted.
And you didn't get anything out of him that would even give us a lead?
Now, steady, Monty. She got his name and address. That wasn't too bad.
I didn't even have to get that.
He gave it to me.
General Colbourne wants us to go round to this address and check.
- He's sending more men.
- Is there such an address?
Oh, yes.
It's a waste of time, but I don't see what else we can do.
Don't worry.
It's all right.
- Leave one of your men to cover the apartment.
- Right then.
You lead.
[Horns Honking]
[Vehicle Approaching]
- Good night, George.
- Cheerio, old boy.
Oh, I beg your pardon, sir.
I beg your pardon.
Why should he bother to give Pam a phony address?
Why? Why?
Unless— George, I'm off my head.
Stop the car.
- No, get after French and stop him.
- [Tires Screech]
- Well, make up your mind.
- Hurry, man! Hurry!
[Tires Squealing]
- Blow your horn, you idiot. Blow your horn.
- [Horn Honks]
[Honking Continues]
Let's stop rushing around like buffalo and use our brain, if we have any.
Aren't I working for you anymore?
What is all this?
- What's the matter, sir?
- French, we're making fools of ourselves.
I'm inclined to agree with you, but Colbourne feels we shouldn't take any chances.
- He thinks he might be there.
- That's just the point.
- He is there. I'm certain of it.
- Shouldn't we get on?
French, I want you to take your men to the house and cover it.
Don't be spotted and don't do anything else until I tell you.
- And if our man comes out, sir?
- Don't worry about that.
I'm quite sure he won't.
Off you go, and, mind you, no action without further orders.
- You don't want us to scoop him up?
- That's exactly what I mean.
I'm sorry, sir, but my orders from General—
I don't give a damn what your orders are.
You do as I say.
- I'll talk to Gen. Colbourne.
- Thank you very much, Commander.
[Train Whistle Blows]
- French, you have my orders. Carry them out.
- Yes, sir.
Just a minute, sir. Before those orders go through, will you listen for one moment?
Montagu, you're taking too much upon yourself.
The man almost certainly isn't there, but if he is, he won't be there for long.
- Every moment we waste—
- Sir, he is there.
Then why are you trying to countermand my orders?
General Colbourne, if you send your men to the house... you will arrest one spy, and we may lose 30,000 men.
I ask you to send French to cover the house and do no more... until I've had a chance to explain.
- You're uncommonly sure of yourself.
- I'm sure of nothing, sir.
But I've used what few brains I have... and now I must stand by what they tell me.
Your decision, sir.
French, cover the house and wait for further orders from me.
Yes, sir.
- Well, now, Commander?
- I'd prefer not to talk about it in the street, sir.
##[Crowd Singing, Indistinct]
- ## [Singing Continues]
- What I'm asking you to assume, sir, is... that that address is genuine.
- If so, what happens?
- We pick him up.
Suppose he doesn't mind that?
People usually mind being shot.
Suppose he's prepared to risk his life to be sure about Willie Martin.
If we turn up at that address, it can only mean that we've been tipped off... and that the whole
Martin story is a plant.
This man will have committed suicide... butJerry will know the answer... and our operation will be blown.
I'm sorry, sir.
We mustn't touch him. We daren't.
You mean, till after we think he's got a message through.
No, sir.
Right up till the time of the landings.
Because the fact that there have been no further messages from him might give the game away.
You realize he'll probably be out of the country in a couple of days.
Yes, and we must let him go.
After all, he's done us no harm.
Masterly inactivity.
They also serve who only stand and wait.
[Bell Tolling]
[Thinking]
Polar... bear.
Polar bear.
Martin genuine.
- [Man #1] Martin genuine.!
- [Man #2] Martin genuine.!
[Man #1] Three batteries ofheavy artillery
will leave Sicily for Sardinia.
- Martin genuine.!
- Martin genuine.!
The 1 st Panzer Division
will proceed to Greece with all speed.
- Martin genuine.!
- Martin genuine.!
Six flotillas of R-Boats
will leave Sicily for the Aegean.
- Martin genuine.!
- Martin genuine.!
- Martin genuine.!
- Martin genuine.!
[Man] Lieutenant Commander,
the Honorable Ewen Montagu...
Royal Naval Volunteer Reserve.
Lieutenant CommanderJohn Adams...
Royal Navy.
Lieutenant Commander David Hebden...
Royal Navy.
[Martin's Father's Voice]
Can you assure me, Commander Montagu...
as an officer and a gentleman...
that this thing
you are going to do is good...
and worthy ofhim...
that if I agree to your request...
my son's body will be treated
decently and with respect...
and that finally
he will have Christian burial?
[Man]
Last night I dreamed...
a deadly dream.
Beyond the Isle of Skye...
I saw a dead man win a fight...
and I think that man was I.
